THE FIRST KINGS 


The Reign of Kayumars 

What does the Persian poet say about the first man to seek the crown of world 
sovereignty? No one has any knowledge of those first days, unless he has heard 
tales passed down from father to son. This is what those tales tell: The first man 
to be king, and to establish the ceremonies associated with the crown and throne, 
was Kayumars. When he became lord of the world, he lived first in the 
mountains, where he established his throne, and he and his people dressed in 
leopard skins. It was he who first taught men about the preparation of food and 
clothing, which were new in the world at that time. Seated on his throne, as 
splendid as the sun, he reigned for thirty years. He was like a tall cypress tree 
topped by the full moon, and the royal farr shone from him. All the animals of 
the world, wild and tame alike, reverently paid homage to him, bowing down 
before his throne, and their obedience increased his glory and good fortune. 

He had a handsome son, who was wise and eager for fame, like his father. 
His name was Siamak, and Kayumars loved him with all his heart. The sight of 
his son was the one thing in the world that made him happy, and his love for the 
boy made him weep when he thought of their being separated. 

Siamak grew into a fine young man, and he had no enemies, except for 
Ahriman, who was secretly jealous of his splendor and looked for ways to 
humble him. Ahriman had a son who was like a savage wolf; this fearless youth 
gathered an army together, spread sedition throughout the world, and prepared to 
attack the king. 


Siamak Is Killed by the Black Demon 

Kayumars was unaware of these machinations, but the angel Sorush appeared 
before Siamak in the guise of a magical being swathed in a leopard skin, and told 
him of the plots against his father. The prince’s heart seethed with fury and he 
gathered an army together. There was no armor at that time, and the prince 
dressed for war in a leopard skin. The two armies met face to face, and Siamak 


strode forward to attack, but the black demon sunk his claws into the prince’s 
unprotected body and stretched the noble Siamak in the dust. 


Now in the dirt he laid the king’s son low, 
Clawed at his gut, and struck the fatal bow. 
So perished Siamak—a demon’s hand 

Left leaderless his people and his land. 


When the king heard of his son’s death, his world darkened with sorrow. He 
descended from the throne, weeping and beating his head, and scoring his royal 
flesh in an agony of distress. His face was smeared with blood, his heart was in 
mourning, and his days were filled with sorrow. The army was arrayed before 
the king, and a cry of grief went up from its ranks. Everyone wore blue as a sign 
of mourning, and all the animals, wild and tame alike, and the birds of the air, 
gathered and made their way weeping and crying to the mountains, and the dust 
sent up by the throng of mourners hovered in the air above the king’s court. 

They mourned for a year, until the glorious Sorush brought a message from 
God, saying, “Kayumars, weep no more, but be of sound mind again. Gather an 
army together and fight against this malevolent demon.” The king turned his 
weeping face toward the heavens and prayed to the great god that evil strike 
those who think evil. Then he prepared to avenge the death of Siamak, neither 
sleeping at night nor pausing to eat in the day. 


Hushang and Kayumars Fight Against the Black Demon 

The great Siamak had a son, Hushang, who acted as his grandfather’s advisor. 
This splendid youth seemed compounded of intelligence and courtliness. 
Kayumars lovingly brought him up as his own son, because Hushang reminded 
him of Siamak, and he had eyes for no one else. When his heart was set on war 
and vengeance he summoned Hushang and laid before him his plans and secrets. 
He said, “I shall gather an army together and raise a cry of lamentation in the 
demons’ ranks. You must command these warriors, since my days are numbered 
and you must be the new leader.” He gathered together fairies, leopards and 
lions, savage wolves and fearless tigers, birds and domestic animals, and this 
army was led by the intrepid young prince. Kayumars was in the rear, his 
grandson Hushang in the van. The black demon came fearlessly forward, and the 
dust of his forces rose into the heavens, but the king’s fury and the wild animals’ 
magnificence rendered the demons’ claws harmless. When the two groups met, 


the demons were defeated by the animals; like a lion, Hushang caught the black 
demon in his grip, cleaving his body in two and severing his monstrous head. He 
laid him low in the dust and flayed his wretched body of its skin. 

When Kayumars had achieved the vengeance he desired, his days came to an 
end, and the world was deprived of his glory. 


You will not find another who has known 

The might of Kayumars and his great throne. 
The world was his while he remained alive, 
He showed men how to prosper and to thrive: 
But all this world is like a tale we hear— 
Men’s evil, and their glory, disappear. 


The Reign of Hushang 

The just and prudent Hushang was now master of the world, and he set the 
crown on his head and ruled in his grandfather’s place. He reigned for forty 
years, and his mind was filled with wisdom, his heart with justice. Sitting on the 
royal throne, he said, “From this throne I rule over the seven climes, and 
everywhere my commands are obeyed.” Mindful of God’s will, he set about 
establishing justice. He helped the world flourish, and filled the face of the earth 
with his just rule. 


The Discovery of Fire and the Establishment of the Feast of Sadeh 
One day the king was riding toward the mountains with a group of companions 
when something long, and black suddenly appeared. Its two eyes were like 
bowls of blood affixed to its head, and smoke billowed from its mouth, 
darkening the world. Hushang considered carefully, then grasped a rock and 
flung it with all his royal strength at the beast, which flickered aside, so that the 
rock struck against stony ground and shattered. From the collision of the two 
stones a spark leaped out, and the rock’s heart glowed with fire. The snake was 
not killed, but the fiery nature of flint was discovered, so that whenever anyone 
struck it with iron, sparks flashed forth. Hushang gave thanks to God that he had 
given this gift of fire, and from that time forth men prayed toward fire. When 
night came Hushang and his companions made a mountain of fire and 
circumambulated it. They had a feast that night, and drank wine. The feast was 
named “Sadeh” and is Hushang’s legacy to us. 


Then he took ore in his fist, and with fire he separated iron from its rocky 
home. In this way he created the blacksmith’s craft, fashioning maces, axes, 
saws, and hatchets. Then he turned his attention to irrigation, bringing water 
from lakes to the plains by means of channels and canals, and so using his royal 
farr to lessen men’s labor. In this way he increased the land available for 
agriculture and the harvest, so that each man could grow grain for his own bread 
and know the fruits of his own toil. 

Hushang used his God-given royal authority to separate animals into those 
that are wild and can be hunted, like onager and deer, and those suitable for 
domestic use, like cows, sheep, and donkeys. He killed animals with fine pelts, 
like foxes and ermine, the soft squirrel, and the sable, whose fur is so warm, and 
had fine clothes made from them. Hushang toiled and spread justice, and 
consumed his due of the world’s goods, and then departed, leaving behind 
nothing but his good name. In his time he struggled mightily, planning and 
inventing innumerable schemes, but when his days were at an end, for all his 
sagacity and dignity, he departed. The world will not keep faith with you, nor 
will she show you her true face. 


The Reign of Tahmures 

Hushang had an intelligent son, Tahmures, who was called “the Binder of 
Demons.” He sat on his father’s throne and swore to preserve the customs his 
father had instituted. He called his wise counselors to him and spoke eloquently 
with them, saying, “Today the throne and crown, the treasury and army, are 
mine; with my wisdom I shall cleanse the world of evil. I shall restrict the power 
of demons everywhere and make myself lord of the world. Whatever is useful in 
the world I will reveal and make available to mankind.” 

Then he sheared sheep and goats and spun their wool into fibers, from which 
he fashioned clothes; he also taught men how to weave carpets. He had flocks 
fed on grass, straw, and barley, and from among wild animals he selected the 
lynx and cheetah, bringing them in from the mountains and plains and confining 
them, to train them as hunters. He also chose hawks and falcons, and hens and 
roosters, who crow at dawn, and showed men how to tame these birds by 
treating them well and speaking gently to them. He brought out the hidden 
virtues of things, and the world was astonished at his innovations. He said that 
men should praise God, who had given mankind sovereignty over the earth’s 
animals. 


Tahmures had a noble vizier named Shahrasb, a man whose thoughts avoided 
all evil and who was universally praised. Fasting by day and praying by night, he 
was the king’s star of good fortune, and the souls of the malevolent were under 
his control. Shahrasb wished the king’s reign to be just, and he guided him in 
righteous paths, so that Tahmures lived purified of all evil and the divine farr 
emanated from him. The king bound Ahriman by spells and sat on him, using 
him as a mount on which to tour the world. When the demons saw this, many of 
them gathered in groups and murmured against him, saying the crown and farr 
were no longer his. But Tahmures learned of their sedition and attacked them, 
breaking their rebellion. He girded himself with God’s glory and lifted his heavy 
mace to his shoulders, ready for battle. 

All the demons and sorcerers came together in a great army, with the black 
demon as their leader, and their roars ascended to the heavens. But Tahmures 
suddenly confronted them, and the war did not last long; two-thirds of the 
demons he subdued by spells, and the other third by his heavy mace. He dragged 
them wounded and in chains in the dust, and they pleaded for their lives, saying, 
“Don’t kill us, we can teach you something new and highly profitable.” The king 
granted them their lives on condition that they reveal their secrets to him, and 
when he had freed them from their chains they had no choice but to obey him. 
They taught the king how to write, and his heart glowed like the sun with this 
knowledge. They did not teach him just one script, but almost thirty, including 
the Western, Arab, and Persian ways of writing, as well as the Soghdian, 
Chinese, and Pahlavi, showing him how the letters are formed and pronounced. 
For thirty years the king performed these and other noble actions; then his days 
were at an end and he departed, and the memory of his struggles was his 
memorial. 


The Reign of Jamshid 

All mourned when the Binder of Demons died. But his splendid son, Jamshid, 
his heart filled with his father’s precepts, then prepared to reign. He sat on his 
father’s throne, wearing a golden crown according to royal custom. The imperial 
farr was his. The world submitted to him; quarrels were laid to rest, and all 
demons, birds, and fairies obeyed Jamshid’s commands. The royal throne shone 
with his luster, and the wealth of the world increased. He said, “God’s glory is 
with me; I am both prince and priest. I hold evildoers back from their evil, and I 
guide souls toward the light.” 


First he turned his attention to weapons of war, and he opened the way to 
glory for his warriors. His royal farr softened iron, and his able mind taught men 
how to fashion helmets, chain mail, cuirasses, swords, and barding for horses. 
Occupied in this way for fifty years, he laid up stores of weapons. For another 
fifty years he gave his mind to the making of clothes for both feasting and 
fighting, using linen, silk, and wool, and fashioning fine stuffs and brocades 
from them. He taught the arts of spinning and weaving, dyeing and sewing. The 
world rejoiced in his reign, and he too rejoiced. 

Then he spent fifty years gathering the men of different professions about 
him. He separated those whose business is prayer and worship, assigning the 
mountains to them as their dwelling place. Next he drew up ranks of men who 
carry lances, the lion-warriors who give splendor to their army and country, who 
are the throne’s support and from whom a man’s good reputation comes. The 
third group were those who work in the fields, sowing and reaping, and 
receiving no man’s thanks, although no one reproaches them when it is time to 
eat. They are free men and quarrel with no one, and the world flourishes through 
their labor. As a sage once said, “It’s only laziness that will make a slave of a 
free man.” The fourth group were the men who work with their hands at various 
crafts and trades; they are contumacious people, and their hearts are always 
filled with anxiety. Jamshid spent fifty years arranging these matters, so that 
each man was aware of his appropriate duties and knew his own worth and rank. 

Then he ordered the demons to mix clay and water and pack the mixture into 
molds for bricks. They made foundations of stone and plaster; then, using the 
science of geometry, they made the superstructure with bricks. In this way they 
built public baths and castles, and palaces that are a refuge against misfortune. 
He spent time extracting brilliant jewels and precious metals from rock, and so 
came into the possession of rubies, amber, gold, and silver. He used magic to 
solve the mysteries of how this could be done. He introduced the use of 
perfumes like benzoin, camphor, musk, sandalwood, ambergris, and rosewater, 
and he discovered cures for illnesses, showing men the way to good health. He 
revealed all these secrets, and the world had never known such an inquirer into 
her mysteries as he was. Next he turned his attention to water and ships, and so 
was able to travel quickly from country to country. Another fifty years passed in 
these labors, and nothing remained hidden from his wisdom. 


The Festival of No-Ruz 


Although Jamshid had accomplished all these things, he strove to climb even 
higher. With his royal farr he constructed a throne studded with gems, and had 
demons raise him aloft from the earth into the heavens; there he sat on his throne 
like the sun shining in the sky. The world’s creatures gathered in wonder about 
him and scattered jewels on him, and called this day the New Day, or No-Ruz. 
This was the first day of the month of Farvardin, at the beginning of the year, 
when Jamshid rested from his labors and put aside all rancor. His nobles made a 
great feast, calling for wine and musicians, and this splendid festival has been 
passed down to us, as a memorial to Jamshid. Three hundred years went by, and 
death was unknown during that time; men knew nothing of sorrow or evil, and 
the demons were their slaves. The people obeyed their sovereign, and the land 
was filled with music. Years passed, the royal farr radiated from the king, and 
all the world was his to command. 


Jamshid surveyed the world, and saw none there 
Whose greatness or whose splendor could compare 
With his: and he who had known God became 
Ungrateful, proud, forgetful of God’s name. 


He summoned his army commanders and aged advisors and said, “I know of no 
one in the world who is my equal. It was I who introduced the skills and arts of 
living to mankind, and the royal throne has seen no one to compare with me. I 
arranged the world as I wished; your food and sleep and security come from me, 
as do your clothes and all of your comforts. Greatness, royalty, and the crown 
are mine; who would dare say that any man but I was king?” All the elders 
inclined their heads, since no one dared gainsay anything he said. But 


By saying this he lost God’s farr, and through 
The world men’s murmurings of sedition grew. 


As a wise and reverent man once remarked, “If you are a king, be as a slave 
toward God; the heart of any man who is ungrateful to God will be filled with 
countless fears.” Jamshid’s days were darkened, and his world-illuminating 
splendor dimmed. 


THE DEMON-KING ZAHHAK 


The Tale of Merdas and His Son Zahhak 

In those days, in the land of the Arabs, there was a good and fine king who 
sighed with fear before God. His name was Merdas, and he was a man of great 
generosity and justice. Each of the herds he had entrusted to his shepherds 
numbered a thousand, whether of cows, or Arab horses, or goats, or milk-giving 
sheep, and he freely gave milk to anyone who needed it. 

This righteous man had a son, whose character had very little kindness in it. 
He was an ambitious youth named Zahhak, brave, turbulent in his moods, and of 
an evil disposition. Everyone called him Bivarasp, a Pahlavi word meaning “ten 
thousand horses,” because he had ten thousand Arab horses, all with golden 
bridles. He spent most of his days and nights riding them, not into battle so much 
as to demonstrate his wealth and greatness. 

One day at dawn Eblis appeared before Zahhak, presenting himself as a 
friendly well-wisher, and the youth was charmed by his conversation. Eblis said, 
“First I want your promise that our talk will be confidential, and then I will tell 
you what I have to say.” The young man greeted him kindly, and answered, “I 
will tell no one about anything I hear from you.” 

Eblis said, “Listen to my advice. No one but you should be in charge here; 
with a son like you, why should an old, worn-out father go on ruling for so long? 
Take his place, you’re the person best fitted for his position. If you listen to my 
advice, you will be the ruler of the world.” Zahhak heard him out and considered 
his words, but the thought of shedding his father’s blood troubled his heart. He 
said, “This is wrong; give me different advice, this is not something I can do.” 
Eblis said, “If you don’t follow my advice, you’re breaking your promise; you’|l 
stay as a wretched subject and your father will stay as ruler.” And so he led the 
Arab into his trap, and Zahhak decided to obey him. He said, “Tell me how to do 
it, what’s the best way to accomplish this? Don’t make excuses now.” Eblis 
replied, 


“T will take care of how it’s to be done; 
Your head will rise in heaven, like the sun.” 


King Merdas owned a fine orchard, and he would go there in the dawn’s 
darkness, to wash his head and body, and to pray. The servant who accompanied 
him did not bring a lamp. Eblis dug a deep pit there, and when the Arab king 
arrived in the orchard the next morning he fell into the pit and broke his back. 
The reverent man’s good fortune was at an end, and his life departed. Then Eblis 
filled the pit in with soil and went on his way. 

This noble king had taken pains to bring up his son in comfort; he had 
rejoiced in him and given him wealth. But his evil offspring broke faith with him 
and became complicit in his father’s murder. I heard a wise man say that, no 
matter how much of a savage lion a man might be, he does not shed his father’s 
blood, and if there is some untold secret here, it is the mother who can answer an 
inquirer’s questions. 

In this way the willful, unjust Zahhak seized his father’s throne, placed the 
Arab crown on his head, and became the dispenser of largess and punishments to 
his people. When Eblis saw how effective his words had been, he gave some 
new evil advice. He said to Zahhak, “If you do my will, I will give you all you 
could wish from the world. Follow my orders and you will be king of the earth; 
its animals, men, birds, and fish will all be yours.” 


Eblis Makes Himself into a Cook 

Next Eblis disguised himself as an intelligent, talkative young man, and 
appeared humbly before Zahhak. He said, “If the king will accept my service, I 
am an excellent cook.” Zahhak welcomed him, had a place set aside for him, and 
gave him the key to the royal kitchens and pantries. At that time not many foods 
were known, and there were few dishes made from meat. The new cook made 
dishes from the flesh of birds and animals, feeding Zahhak on blood to build up 
his valor, as if he were a lion, all the while obeying all of his orders, and 
apparently submitting his heart to the king’s commands. First he made a dish 
from egg yolks, to make him strong and healthy. Zahhak ate the dish and 
congratulated his cook, who received a reward for his labors. The cunning Eblis 
said, “May you live proudly and forever; tomorrow I shall prepare food which 
will nourish all your body.” Then he left the king’s presence and meditated all 
night on the wonderful dish he would make the following day. 


In the morning the sun’s topaz appeared in the blue dome of heaven, and the 
cook’s heart was filled with hope as he brought in a dish made from partridge 
and white pheasant meat; when the king of the Arabs sat down to eat he gave his 
foolish head into Eblis’s hands. On the third day the cook made dishes of 
chicken and lamb kebab, and on the fourth day, of veal cooked with saffron, 
rosewater, aged wine, and pure musk. When Zahhak stretched out his hand and 
ate, he was astonished at the man’s skill. He said to him, “You are a well- 
meaning man; consider what it is that you desire, and ask me for it.” The cook 
said, “May you live forever your majesty; my heart is filled with love for you, 
and my soul is nourished only by your glances. I have one request to ask of the 
victorious king, even though I am quite unworthy of it, and this is that he will 
command me to kiss his shoulders, and rub my eyes and face there.” When 
Zahbhak heard his words he had no notion of what the man was plotting and said, 
“T grant you your request, and may your name be honored for it.” Then he said 
that the cook should kiss his shoulders, as if he were his bosom friend. The 
demon kissed the king’s shoulders, and disappeared forthwith; no man had ever 
seen such a wonder in all the world. 

Two black snakes grew from Zahhak’s shoulders. In his distress the king 
looked everywhere for a solution, and finally he simply cut them off. But they 
grew again on his shoulders like the limbs of a tree. Learned doctors gathered 
about him and one by one gave their opinions; they tried every kind of remedy, 
but were unable to cure the king of his affliction. Then Eblis himself appeared in 
the guise of a wise doctor and said to Zahhak, “These growths were fated to 
appear; leave the snakes where they are, they should not be cut back. You must 
prepare food for them, and placate them by feeding them; this is the only thing 
you can do. Give them nothing but human brains to eat, and they should die 
from such food.” And what was the evil demon’s purpose in offering such 
advice, if not to empty the earth of mankind? 


Jamshid’s Reign Comes to an End 

Meanwhile Persia was filled with dissension and revolt; the bright day darkened 
and men broke faith with Jamshid. His divine farr grew dim, and he gave 
himself to evil and foolishness. Petty kings and their armies sprang up on all 
sides, every province produced its own claimant to the throne, and they felt no 
love for Jamshid. A contingent made their way to the Arab lands, where they had 
heard there lived a terrifying lord with a face like a serpent’s. Seeking a king, 
Persia’s horsemen approached Zahhak: they greeted him as a sovereign, hailing 


him as the ruler of Iran. This serpentine creature came to Persia as quickly as the 
wind blows, and there set the crown on his head. From every province he 
gathered together an army of Persians and Arabs, and attacked Jamshid on his 
throne, drawing the noose tight about him. When Jamshid saw that his good 
fortune had deserted him, he fled and went into hiding, grieving in darkness, 
abandoning his crown and throne, his sovereignty, armies and wealth, to Zahhak. 
For a hundred years no one saw him anywhere in the world, but then this infidel 
king reappeared on the shores of the Sea of China. He had hidden himself away 
from the serpent king, but could not escape him in the end. When Zahhak had 
him in his clutches, he gave him no time to plead his case but had him sawn in 
two, and filled the world with terror at his fate. 

Jamshid’s throne and glory were at an end, drawn away by time as amber 
draws away straw, and what profit to him were all the troubles he endured while 
he sat on his throne? He had lived for seven hundred years, bringing good and 
evil to light, but what good is a long life, since the world will never reveal her 
secrets to you? 


Her wine and honey will allay your fears, 

And her beguiling voices charm your ears— 
And when you’re sure that she will never show 
Evil to you, she strikes the fatal blow. 


The Reign of Zahhak 

Zahhak reigned for a thousand years, and from end to end the world was his to 
command. The wise concealed themselves and their deeds, and devils achieved 
their heart’s desire. Virtue was despised and magic applauded, justice hid itself 
away while evil flourished; demons rejoiced in their wickedness, while goodness 
was spoken of only in secret. 

Two innocent young women were dragged from Jamshid’s house, trembling 
like the leaves of a willow tree; they were Jamshid’s sisters, the crown among 
his womenfolk. One of these veiled women was Shahrnavaz, and her chaste 
sister was Arnavaz. Zahhak trained them in magic and taught them evil ways, 
since he himself knew nothing but evil—murder, rapine, and the burning of 
cities. 

Each night two young men, either peasants or of noble stock, were brought to 
Zahhak’s palace. There, in the hope of finding a cure for the king’s malady, they 
were killed and their brains made into a meal for the snakes. At the same time, 
there were two noble, upright men who lived in his realm; one was named 
Armayel the Pious, and the other, Garmayel the Perceptive. Together they talked 
of the king’s injustice and the evil manner in which he was nourished. One said, 
“We should go and present ourselves as cooks to the king, to see if we can save 
at least one of each pair who are killed to feed the snakes.” 

They learned how to prepare numerous dishes and were accepted as cooks in 
the king’s kitchens. When the victims were dragged before the cooks, and the 
time came for their blood to be spilled, the two men looked at one another with 
eyes filled with tears and with rage in their hearts. Unable to do more, they saved 
one of the two from slaughter, substituting the brains of a sheep, which they 
mixed with the brains of the man they killed. And so they were able to rescue 
one of each pair, to whom they said, “Hide yourself away in the plains and 
mountains, far from the towns.” In this way they saved thirty victims a month, 
and when there were two hundred of them the cooks secretly gave them goats 
and sheep, and showed them a deserted area where they could live. The Kurds, 
who never settle in towns, are descended from these men. 

Meanwhile Zahhak reigned ever more cruelly. If a warrior had a beautiful 
daughter hidden away in his house, Zahhak would accuse him of consorting with 
demons and kill him, and have the girl brought to him as his slave. He acted 
without regard for the customs of kings or the laws of religion. 


Zahhak Sees Feraydun in a Dream 

See what God did to Zahhak, when he still had forty years to live. Late one night 
he was sleeping with Arnavaz when he dreamed that three warriors suddenly 
appeared from an imperial palace. The youngest of the three was as tall as a 
cypress tree, the royal farr radiated from him, and he strode forward between the 
other two like a prince, ready for battle and bearing an ox-headed mace. He 
attacked Zahhak and smote him on the head with his ox-headed mace. The 
young man flayed him from head to foot, tied his hands behind his back, and set 
a yoke on his shoulders, then he dragged him to Mount Damavand with a group 
of onlookers following. Zahhak writhed in his sleep, and felt that his liver would 
split with terror; he cried out, and his pillared chamber shook with the noise. His 
beautiful serving girls sprang up at their master’s scream, and Arnavaz said to 
him, “Tell me, my lord, what is troubling you; you are sleeping safely in your 
own house, it must be something in your soul that has terrified you. The seven 
climes are yours to rule, and animals, men, and demons watch over your safety.” 

The king said to his womenfolk, “You will not be able to conceal what I tell 
you, and when you hear this wonder you will despair of my life.” Arnavaz 
replied, “You should tell us your secret; we might be able to suggest some 
remedy, since no calamity is without a remedy.” The king described his dream, 
and Arnavaz said, “You should not neglect this. But your throne rules the world, 
which shines with your splendor, and all its animals, men, demons, birds, and 
fairies pay homage to your seal ring. Summon astrologers and magicians from 
every province; tell them what you have seen, seek out the truth of the matter, 
see in whose hands your life lies, and whether it is a man, a demon, or a fairy 
that threatens you. When you know this, that will be the time to make plans; 
don’t tremble in fear at your enemies’ malevolence.” The king liked the advice 
of this woman, whose body was as elegant as a cypress tree, and whose face was 
as lovely as the stars. 

The world was black like a raven’s wing, when suddenly light appeared 
above the mountains; it was as if the sun were scattering topazes in a purple sky. 
The king summoned eloquent and learned sages from every quarter and told 
them of his heart-wrenching dream. 


He said, “Is it good or ill these signs portend? 
When will my earthly life come to an end? 
Who will come after me? Say who will own 
This royal diadem, and belt, and throne. 


Reveal this mystery, and do not lie— 
Tell me this secret or prepare to die.” 


The sages’ lips were dry, and their cheeks wet with tears. They said to one 
another, “If we tell him what will happen, our souls will be worthless, and if he 
doesn’t hear from us, we must wash our hands of life here and now.” Three days 
went by, and no one dared speak to Zahhak; on the fourth he said, “Either be 
strung up on a gibbet alive or tell me my fate.” All the sages bowed their heads, 
and their hearts were filled with terror, their eyes with tears. One of them, a wise 
and prudent man named Zirak, stepped forward. Anxiety seized his heart, but he 
spoke out fearlessly before Zahhak: “Rid your mind of vain thoughts, since no 
man is born from his mother but for death. Many worthy kings have sat on the 
throne before you and experienced great sorrow and great joy; each of them died 
and left the world in another’s hands. Surround yourself with iron walls reaching 
to the sky, but you cannot remain here, another man will occupy your throne, 
and your good fortune will lie in the dust. This celestial ruler’s name will be 
Feraydun; he is not born yet, his mother’s time of anxiety and sighs is still to 
come. But when he is born he will be like a fruitful tree; when he grows to be a 
man he will lift his head up to the moon, and seek the crown and throne and 
royal belt. He will be cypress-tall, and on his shoulders he will carry an iron ox- 
headed mace, which he will bring down on your head; then he will bind you and 
drag you from your palace into the streets.” 

Zahhak asked, “Why should he bind me? What will make him hate me?” The 
sage replied, “If you are wise, you will know that a man does not do evil for no 
reason. His father will die at your hands, and this will fill him with the desire for 
vengeance. A cow called Barmayeh will be his wet nurse, and this too will be 
destroyed by you, and be an added cause of his hatred.” 

Zahhak heard him out, then fell from the throne in a faint, and the sage, 
fearing for his life, fled from the royal presence. When Zahhak regained 
consciousness he sat on his throne again and gave orders that the world be 
scoured for signs of Feraydun. He knew no rest, and could neither eat nor sleep; 
the brightness of his days had darkened. 


The Birth of Feraydun 

Many days passed, and Zahhak lived in fear. The noble Feraydun was born, and 
the world was renewed. He grew as tall as a straight cypress tree, and Jamshid’s 
imperial farr radiated from him as if he were the sun. He was as necessary to the 
earth as rain, as fitting to the soul as wisdom. The turning heavens passed over 
Feraydun and cherished him with loving kindness. The cow called Barmayeh, 
the most splendid of all cows, was also born: she was like a peacock, and every 
hair of her body was a different color. Wise men, astrologers, and priests, 
gathered about her and said that no one in the world had ever seen such a cow, or 
heard of her like from the ancient sages. 

In his search for Feraydun, Zahhak had filled the earth with rumors, and 
Feraydun’s father, Abetin, fled in fear. But he fell into the lion’s trap and was 
caught by some of Zahhak’s malevolent guards. They trussed him up like a 
cheetah and took him before Zahhak, who killed him. When Feraydun’s mother, 
Faranak, saw what had happened to her husband, she feared for Feraydun; sick 
at heart, she made her way to the meadows where the cow Barmayeh grazed. 
She went to the meadow’s owner and wept bitter tears, saying, “Take this 
unweaned child into your safekeeping. Accept him as a father would from his 
mother, and nourish him with that splendid cow’s milk. If you desire payment, 
my soul is yours, and my life will be hostage to your wishes.” The keeper of the 
thickets and of the splendid cow answered, “I shall be as a slave to your son, and 
I will do as you have asked me.” Faranak handed her son over to him and gave 
him lengthy advice on how to bring the boy up. 

This protector was like a father to Feraydun, and for three years he fed him 
the cow’s milk. But Zahhak did not rest in his search, and the world was filled 
with talk of the splendid cow. Faranak hurried to the meadows again and said to 
the man who had saved her son, “God has put a wise notion into my heart, and I 
must act on it, because my son is as sweet as life to me. I will leave this land of 
magicians and go with my boy toward India. I’ll disappear from men’s sight, and 
take this handsome child to the Alborz mountains.” 

She traveled with her son as quickly as a courier, and when she reached the 
uplands she was like a mountain sheep in her agility. There was a religious man 
living there, who had cut himself off from the cares of the world, and Faranak 
said to him, “Reverend sir, I have come here grieving from Iran. You should 
know that this noble child of mine will be the leader of his people; he will cut off 
Zahhak’s head and cast his belt and crown in the dust. You must protect him, 


like a father who trembles for his son’s soul.” The good man accepted her son 
from her without a sigh. 

One day news reached Zahhak of the meadow and of the cow Barmayeh, and 
like a maddened elephant he came there and killed her, together with all the 
other animals he could see nearby. Then he quickly made his way to the house 
where Feraydun had been living and searched it, but found no one. He set fire to 
the building and razed it. 


Feraydun Questions His Mother About His Lineage 

When Feraydun was sixteen years old he descended from the Alborz mountains 
to the plain, and came to his mother, asking her to reveal the secrets of his 
lineage to him. He said, “Who was my father? Who am I? What family am I 
from? Who can I tell people I am? Tell me what knowledge you have of all 
this.” Faranak replied, “My ambitious son, I will tell you all you have asked. 
You are from the land of Iran, and your father was a man named Abetin. He was 
the scion of kings, a wise man and a warrior, who troubled no one. He was 
descended from Tahmures, from father to son. He was your father and a good 
husband to me; all the brightness of my days was from him. And then Zahhak, 
who delights in magic, tried to kill you and I hid you from him. What evil days I 
passed at that time! Your young, noble father sacrificed his life for yours, and I 
went to a wooded area no one knew of. There I saw a cow as lovely as a garden 
in springtime, of wondrous beauty from head to foot. Her keeper sat before her 
like a king, and I gave you to him. For many long days he brought you up, 
cradling you tenderly in his bosom, and feeding you the cow’s milk, which made 
you grow into a fearsome warrior. Eventually the king heard of this cow and the 
meadow where she lived. He went there and killed your kind, mute wet nurse, 
and then he razed our home, sending its dust up to the sun, and made that tall 
building into a ruin.” 

Feraydun sprang up, enraged by his mother’s words; his heart was filled with 
pain, his head with a longing for vengeance. Frowning in anger he answered his 
mother, “A lion becomes brave by being tested. The magician has acted, and 
now it is time for me to grasp my sword. With God’s help I shall raise the dust 
of battle over Zahhak’s palace.” But his mother said, “This is unwise, you have 
no followers anywhere, whereas Zahhak is crowned and rules the world, and has 
an army ready for battle. If he wishes, he can summon to his side a hundred 
thousand warriors from each country. This is not how you should fight: don’t see 
the world through a child’s eyes. 


Whoever drinks the wine of youth can see 
Only himself, and in that stupor he 

Will throw away his life. I seek for you 
Joy and prosperity in all you do.” 


The Story of Kaveh the Blacksmith and Zahhak the Arab 

Day and night Feraydun’s name was on Zahhak’s lips, in his greatness he feared 
his fall, and his heart was filled with terror at the thought of Feraydun. One day, 
seated on his ivory throne, with the turquoise crown on his head, Zahhak 
summoned the great men from every country to bear witness to his reign. He 
said to the sages gathered there, “You are wise, skilled men, and as all wise men 
know, I have a secret enemy. I do not underestimate even a contemptible enemy, 
and I fear that an evil fate awaits me. I must increase the size of my army, with 
men and demons, the two mixed together. I’m impatient to accomplish this and 
you must agree to it. Now a testament is to be written stating that your leader has 
sown nothing but seeds of righteousness, that he says only what is true, and that 
he is zealous in the pursuit of justice.” 

Out of fear of Zahhak, the great men gathered there witnessed the document; 
young and old, they signed their names to that evil monster’s claims. At this 
moment the cries of someone demanding justice were heard at the door; the 
plaintiff was brought in and given a place in front of the nobles present. Zahhak 
frowned and said to him, “Tell us who has been unjust to you.” 


“I’m Kaveh, and a blacksmith, sire,” he said, 
And as he spoke his clenched fists struck his head. 
“It’s you whom I accuse, you are the one 
Whose fire’s destroyed all that I’ve ever done. 
A king then, or a monster? Which are you? 
Tell us, your majesty, which of the two? 

If you reign over seven kingdoms, why 

Must our fate be to suffer and to die? 

Acquit yourself then, let me weigh your worth, 
And let your words astonish all the earth; 

And when we’ve heard you out we’ll see 

The evils that the world has done to me, 

And why it is my son’s brains have to feed 
Your snakes’ insatiable and monstrous greed.” 


Zahhak was astonished to hear such language; he returned Kaveh’s son to him 
and tried to win him over by flattering words. Then he ordered Kaveh to sign the 
testament. But when Kaveh had read the document through, he turned to the 
assembled elders: 


“You’re in the demons’ clutches now,” he roared, 
“Your evil hearts no longer fear the Lord, 

And all your faces are set fair for hell; 

Your hearts believe Zahhak, you wish him well, 
But I will never sign, or give a thought 

To this corrupted tyrant and his court.” 


He stood trembling with rage as he ripped the testament in two and flung it at his 
feet. Then, preceded by his stalwart son, he strode shouting from the palace into 
the public thoroughfare. 

The elders said to the king, “On the day of battle the heavens do not dare to 
send cold winds against you, so why should this foul-mouthed Kaveh be allowed 
to grow red in the face before you as if he were a companion of yours? Why 
should he rip our testament to you in pieces and ignore your commands?” The 
king answered, “You will hear a wonder from me: when Kaveh appeared in the 
doorway and I heard his voice, it was as if a mountain of iron appeared in the 
palace between the two of us; and when he beat his head with his fists, I felt my 
heart break within me. I do not know what will come of this; no man knows the 
heavens’ secrets.” 

When Kaveh left the court, a crowd gathered about him in the marketplace. 
He continued to shout his demands for justice, and he hoisted his leather 
blacksmith’s apron on a spear as a rallying point. So many men crowded around 
that dust rose into the air, and Kaveh strode forward with the spear in his hand, 
shouting “You are God-fearing noble men, and if you’re of Feraydun’s party, 
free yourselves from Zahhak’s chains; this king is Ahriman, and in his heart he 
is God’s enemy.” As he went forward an army of men gathered about him, and it 
was not a small one. 

Kaveh knew where Feraydun was, and he made straight for the new 
commander’s court. As the court caught sight of his approach, a thunderous cry 
went up, and when the prince saw the leathern apron, he took it as an omen of 
good fortune. He draped it in Rumi brocade, and adorned it with a device of 
jewels on a ground of gold, and made fringes for it of crimson, yellow, and 


purple; at the top of the spear he placed a splendid globe like the moon. He 
called the apron the Kaviani banner, and from this time forward any man who 
assumed power and placed the royal crown on his head would add new jewels to 
that blacksmith’s leather apron. The Kaviani banner became so splendid with its 
brocades and silks that it shone in the night’s darkness like the sun, and the 
world took hope from its brilliance. 

The world continued in this way for a while, and the future was unclear. 
Feraydun saw that Zahhak’s days were numbered; he crowned himself, and 
made his way to his mother. “I must leave now for battle,” he said. “Your task is 
to pray to the world’s creator, in good fortune and bad.” His mother wept and 
prayed, “Great God, I place my trust in you; protect my son from evil, and clear 
the world of the unwise.” 

Feraydun quickly prepared for his departure, but kept his plans secret. He had 
two noble older brothers, Kiyanush and Barmayeh. He said to them, “Take heart 
and live in joy, my brave companions; the heavens can only turn for the better, 
and the royal crown will come back to us. Bring me skilled blacksmiths, and 
have a massive mace made.” The two hurried to the blacksmiths’ bazaar, and all 
its inhabitants who were eager for fame made their way to Feraydun. The prince 
took a pair of compasses and drew a picture of an ox-headed mace in the dust. 
The blacksmiths set to work, and when they’d forged the heavy mace, which 
glittered like the sun in the heavens, they took it to Feraydun. He was pleased 
with their work and gave them gold, silver, and clothes as a reward. He promised 
them a better future, and said, “If I can lay that monster beneath the earth, I shall 
wash the dust from your heads; I shall guide the world toward justice, 
remembering the name of God, from whom all justice comes.” 


Feraydun’s War Against Zahhak 
Feraydun lifted his head to the sun and prepared to avenge his father. He set off 
on the day of Khordad, when the omens were favorable, and under an auspicious 
Star; an army gathered about him, and his glory rose up to the clouds. Strong 
elephants and oxen bearing the army’s provisions preceded the column, and 
Kiyanush and Barmayeh were at the king’s side as if they were his loyal younger 
brothers. And so Feraydun went forward like the wind, stage by stage, his head 
filled with thoughts of vengeance and his heart with justice. 

Traveling quickly on their Arab horses, they reached a place where men who 
had devoted themselves to God lived. Feraydun dismounted and sent greetings to 
them. As the night darkened, a man came forward to welcome them: his musky 


hair reached to his feet, and his face was like that of a houri in paradise. This 
angelic figure came to the prince to teach him the secrets of magic, so that he 
would know the key to hidden things. Feraydun understood that this was a divine 
being and not an emissary of evil. His face flushed like the blossoms of the 
Judas-tree, and he rejoiced in his youth and good fortune. His cook made him a 
meal fit for a nobleman, and, when he had eaten, his head became heavy with 
sleep. 

Feraydun’s brothers saw the holy man’s behavior, and how the prince’s good 
fortune flourished, and they decided to destroy him. Feraydun was sleeping 
sweetly at the foot of a mountain, and late that night the two brothers slipped 
away from the army and climbed up to where a huge rock overhung the prince. 
They sent it tumbling down the mountainside to kill their sleeping brother, but 
by God’s command the noise of the rock’s fall woke Feraydun, and he stopped it 
in its descent by means of a magic spell; the rock halted and never moved again. 
Then Feraydun rose and prepared to continue on his journey, saying nothing to 
his brothers about what had happened. 

He made for the River Arvand (if you do not know Pahlavi, this river is 
called “Dejleh” in Arabic, or the Tigris) and pitched camp on its banks, close to 
the city of Baghdad, and sent word to the ferryman there that he needed boats to 
transport his army across the river. But the man neither sent any craft nor came 
to talk with Feraydun. His answer was, “The world’s king has told me in private 
that I am not to let so much as a mosquito cross this river without a permit sealed 
in the correct manner.” Feraydun was enraged by this reply; his mind was 
focused on the coming battle and, undeterred by the river’s depth, he mounted 
his brave horse Golrang and urged it into the water. His companions quickly 
followed suit, plunging their mounts in the river, so that the water rose above 
their saddles. The prince and his army reached the further bank and went on 
toward Jerusalem, which was called in Pahlavi “Gang Dezh Hukht” and was 
where Zahhak had built his palace. 

When they were a mile from the city, the king saw a palace with walls that 
shone like the planet Jupiter in the heavens and were so high that they seemed to 
reach for the stars. He knew that this great palace, which seemed a place of joy 
and peace, was the home of the monster Zahhak, and he said to his companions, 
“T fear that anyone who can raise such a building on the dark earth is somehow 
secretly favored by fate. Rather than delay, we had better attack immediately.” 
He shouldered his mace and urged his horse forward, bearing down on the 
palace guards like a fire, so that not one of them remained. This young, 


courageous warrior, who had no experience of the world, gave thanks to God 
and entered the palace on horseback. 

There he came on an idol made by Zahhak, and its head reached into the sky. 
When Feraydun saw that it bore a name other than that of the Creator, he 
overturned it. With his mace he crushed the heads of the magicians and demons 
who were in the palace, then placed his foot on Zahhak’s throne in victory. He 
had the black-haired women of the harem, whose faces were as splendid as the 
sun, brought before him. They had been brought up as idolaters and were 
trembling and terrified, as if they were drunk, but Feraydun commanded that 
their minds be purified, and their souls freed from darkness. He had them taught 
the ways of righteousness and cleansed them of their idolatry. Then Jamshid’s 
two sisters stained their cheeks with tears and said, “May the old world be 
renewed by your good fortune! Tell us what star guides you, and what tree you 
are sprung from, that you have dared to attack the lion’s sleeping quarters so 
bravely. How wretchedly we’ve passed our days, mistreated by that fool of a 
magician; what sufferings we have endured at that monster’s hands! We have 
never seen anyone strong enough or valiant enough to seek his throne.” 

Feraydun answered, “Neither the throne nor good fortune will remain with 
one man forever. I am the son of the illustrious Abetin, whom Zahhak seized and 
murdered in Iran, and I seek Zahhak’s throne in revenge. The marvelous 
Barmayeh cow was my wet nurse, and that innocent animal’s blood too will be 
avenged by me. I have come from Persia bringing war, and I shall give the evil 
Zabhak no rest or peace until I have crushed his head beneath my ox-headed 
mace.” 

Arnavaz said, “Are you then King Feraydun, who will destroy magic and 
sorcery, and in killing Zahhak, free the world from tyranny? We are two 
princesses of the royal blood, and we cooperated with him only because we 
feared for our lives. My lord, think what it has meant to be married to such a 
serpent.” Feraydun replied, “If the heavens are not in league with evil, I shall 
cleanse the world of this foul monster. Now you must tell me truly where he is 
lurking.” These two beautiful women, who hoped to see Zahhak’s head spitted 
on a lance, said, “He has fled toward India, to turn it into a land of sorcery, and 
there he slaughters innocents by the thousand. He is fearful of his fate, since it 
was predicted to him that the land would soon be rid of him, that his good 
fortune was at an end, and that a man would come who would seize his throne. 
This warning has filled his heart with fire, and nothing in life gives him pleasure 
now; he murders men and women, beasts of burden and wild animals, and mixes 


their blood in a vat, believing that if he washes his head and body there he might 
avert the astrologers’ predictions. And still the snakes that grow from his 
shoulders continue to torment him; though he flees from country to country, this 
pain never ceases. But now he will return, since he is unable to stay anywhere 
for long.” The hero listened while the lovely speaker unburdened her grief- 
stricken heart. 


Feraydun and Zahhak’s Viceroy 

When Zahhak fled from the land, a man as lowly and wretched as a slave took 
his place on the throne and took command of his treasuries and palace. His name 
was Kondrow, and he was a fool who practiced injustice. This man burst into the 
audience chamber and saw that a new prince, as handsome as a cypress tree 
topped by the new moon, sat on the royal throne, while on one side of him sat 
Shahrnavaz, and on the other Arnavaz. Kondrow showed no emotion and asked 
no questions: he came forward humbly and made his obeisance. He said, “O 
king, may you live forever; you become the throne, and the farr that shines from 
you declares you worthy of sovereignty. May the seven climes be your slaves, 
and your head be raised above the clouds.” Feraydun had him approach the 
throne and tell him the court’s secrets, then he said, “Have the royal regalia 
cleansed, then have wine, musicians, and a banquet made ready; bring me 
whoever can please me with their music or knowledge, so that I can hold a feast 
worthy of my good fortune.” 

Kondrow did as he had been ordered; he had wine and musicians brought, 
and summoned nobles worthy of the honor to the prince’s presence. When 
Feraydun saw the wine he called for music, and passed the night in festive 
celebration. But as dawn broke Kondrow left his presence, mounted his horse, 
and set off to join Zahhak. When he reached Zahhak he told him everything he 
had seen and heard. He said, “Proud king, the sign of your good fortune’s eclipse 
has come. Three warriors attacked us with their armies; the central one is 
younger than the others, but in his stature he is like a cypress, and his face shines 
with royal splendor; he is younger than his brothers, but he leads them and is 
their superior. He carries a mace that is like a fragment of a mountain, and his 
glory outshines that of his companions. He rode into the palace, accompanied by 
his brothers, and took his place on your throne; then he destroyed all your idols 
and spells and flung your courtiers, both men and demons, from the castle walls, 
mixing their brains and their blood in death.” 

Zahhak said, 


“There’s nothing wrong in this; he is our guest, 
And everything may still be for the best.” 


Kondrow replied, “When did a guest ever arrive flourishing an ox-headed mace? 
Or take your place on the throne and erase your name from the crown and royal 
belt, then convert your people to his own faith? If you think this man is your 
guest I wish you joy of him!” Zahhak said, 


“Don’t bother me with these complaints; don’t whine! 
Demanding guests are an auspicious sign.” 


Kondrow replied, “So I’ve heard, but listen to this: if this man is your guest, 
what business has he in your harem? He sits on the throne with Jamshid’s sisters 
next to him and takes counsel with them; one hand fondles Sharnavaz’s cheeks, 
while the other is kissed by Arnavaz’s agate lips. And when night’s darkness 
comes, he does more than this: he sleeps pillowed on musk—the musky hair of 
those two women who were your beloved companions.” Hearing these words, 
Zahhak desired death and roared like a wild animal. He fell to cursing his 
wretched fate and said, “You will never be my castle’s guardian again.” His 
servant replied, “My lord, I think that you will never see your throne again. 
What was the point of making me the ruler of your country when you lacked all 
authority? Nothing like this has ever happened to you, so why don’t you act in 
your own defense? You have been forced from power as a hair is forced out of 
dough.” 


Feraydun Captures Zahhak 

Enraged, Zahhak ordered that his swift, keen-sighted horse be saddled, and with 
a massive army of warlike demons he set off for his palace. There, intent on 
vengeance, he clandestinely had his men take the outlying doors and roofs, but 
Feraydun’s men saw this and swarmed to the attack. They were aided by all of 
the city’s inhabitants who could fight, since they hated Zahhak. Like dew from 
dark clouds, bricks and stones rained down from the walls and roofs, and the 
narrow streets were cluttered with swords and arrows. All the young men of the 
city, and the old who had experience of warfare, deserted Zahhak and flocked to 
Feraydun. A cry went up from the fire-temple, “Even if the king is a beast of 
prey, young and old we shall all obey him, but we will not have this evil monster 
Zahhak occupy the throne.” An army of men thronged the city, and such a cloud 
of dust went up that the sun was dimmed. 

Jealousy of his rival’s success made Zahhak seek another remedy. Separating 
himself from his men, he dressed himself in iron armor so that he was 
unrecognizable, seized a lariat of sixty lengths, and made his way onto the roof 
of the palace. From there he could see the black-haired sorceress Shahrnavaz, 
her cheeks as bright as day, her hair as dark as night, closeted with Feraydun and 
cursing Zahhak. He knew then that what had happened was fated by God, and 
that he would not escape from the evil fate that was in store for him. The fire of 
jealousy flared up in his mind, and forgetting his throne and the risk to his life, 
he let himself down into the palace with his lariat. He did not announce himself, 
but drew a glittering dagger, intent on shedding his handmaidens’ blood. As 
Zahhak’s foot touched the ground, Feraydun leapt forward like the wind and 
brought his ox-headed mace crashing down on Zahhak’s head, so that his helmet 
was shattered. At that moment the angel Sorush appeared and said, “Do not 
strike him again; his time has not yet come. Now that you have broken his 
power, bind him and take him to where you see a pass between two mountains. 
He will live imprisoned within the mountain, and his people will never be able to 
reach him.” 

Feraydun lost no time in preparing strips of lion skin, with which he bound 
Zahhak’s arms and body so tightly that a raging elephant could not have broken 
his bonds. Then he sat on Zahhak’s golden throne and overturned the tyrant’s 
evil customs. He had a herald cry at the palace gates, “You are wise and honored 
men; it is not right for you to be wielding weapons and riding out to war, in the 
same way that soldiers should not be artisans. Each group should follow its own 


calling, since if they follow one another’s, the earth is filled with confusion. The 
evil tyrant has been captured, and the earth is cleansed of his power. Return in 
peace to your former occupations, and may you live long and happily!” 

All the nobles and rich men of the city came to pay homage to Feraydun, who 
received them kindly, gave them advice and thanked them, and also gave thanks 
to God. He said, “This is my court, and my star will bring good fortune to your 
land, as my mace has freed the world from the monster’s evil. I am lord of the 
entire earth, and I should not stay always in one place, otherwise I would have 
lived here with you for many long years.” The nobles kissed the ground before 
him, and the din of drums rang out from the court. The bound Zahhak was led 
out, ignominiously flung on a pack animal’s back, and taken to Shir-Khan. 
When they reached the mountains, Feraydun wished to kill Zahhak, but again 
Sorush appeared and spoke persuasively in his ear, telling him to take this 
solitary wretched captive to Mount Damavand. Feraydun did this, as quickly as a 
courier travels, and imprisoned Zahhak in Mount Damavand, loading chains on 
him, and confining him to a narrow cave that seemed to have no end. Heavy 
nails were driven into his body, avoiding his vital organs, and pinning him to the 
rock so that he would suffer there for a long time. And so he was left, hanging in 
chains, with his heart’s blood staining the ground. 


THE STORY OF FERAYDUN AND HIS THREE 
SONS 


Feraydun Is Enthroned 

When Feraydun became the world’s sovereign and saw that there were no rivals 
to his rule, he prepared the royal throne and crown according to the custom of 
the Kayanid kings. He placed the crown on his head at the beginning of the 
month of Mehr, on an auspicious day. People turned toward wisdom, and the 
world was free from the fear of evil; quarrels were put aside, and a new festival 
was established. The nobles sat together rejoicing, each of them holding a cup of 
ruby wine, which glowed as brightly as the new king’s face, and as the month 
began the world was renewed by his justice. He ordered that a fire be lit, and had 
ambergris and saffron sprinkled on the flames. In this way Feraydun instituted 
the festival of Mehregan, and the custom of taking one’s ease and feasting at this 
time. This festival is still observed in his memory, and during the festivities you 
should try to let no sadness show in your face. Feraydun ruled for five hundred 
years, and not one of his days was given over to evil. 

Faranak was unaware that her son had become king of the world and that 
Zahbhak had been driven from the throne, his good fortune at an end. When news 
came to her that her son was crowned, she washed her head and body and 
prayed, bowing her head down to the ground, cursing Zahhak and praising God 
who had brought about such a happy turn of events. She secretly gave succor to 
the poor and unfortunate, telling no one else of her actions. For a week she 
distributed goods in this way, then she held a week of celebrations, opening wide 
the purse strings of her fortune, and making her home like an orchard filled with 
guests. All the wealth she had accumulated—the cloth and royal gems, the Arab 
horses with their golden gear, the armor, helmets, javelins, swords, and belts— 
she held nothing back, but had it all loaded on camels, which she sent to her 
son’s court with a message of congratulation on his accession to the throne. 

After Feraydun had received the homage of his people, he made a tour of the 
world to become acquainted with its news and secrets. Wherever he saw 


injustice, or an area that was not flourishing, he tied the hands of evildoers as a 
king should, making the world an earthly paradise and planting cypresses and 
roses in the place of thorns and weeds. 


Feraydun Sends Jandal to the Yemen 

After fifty years had passed Feraydun was the father of three fine sons, all 

worthy to wear the crown. They were As tall as cypresses, fair as the spring, 
The image of their father and their king. 


Even before their father had named them they could hold their own against 
elephants. The two older boys were sons of Shahrnaz, the youngest the son of 
Arnavaz. When Feraydun saw their worth, he asked his advisor Jandal to search 
the world for three princesses born from the same mother and father, who would 
be worthy brides for his sons. 

Jandal was a wise and discerning man, and immediately he began to make 
inquiries as to which kings in which countries had marriageable daughters. He 
found no one in Iran who was worthy of this honor, but then he came before 
Sarv, the king of the Yemen, as splendid as a pheasant strutting among spring 
flowers; he kissed the ground and showered flattery on this subject king. The 
king said to him, “May you never cease to be praised; what orders do you have 
for me, what instructions do you bring?” Jandal replied, “May you live in 
happiness and the hand of evil never touch you. I am a lowly Persian subject and 
bring you Feraydun’s wishes for your wealth and prosperity as the undimmed 
star of the Arabs. Feraydun says that there is nothing dearer to a man than his 
sons, that his three sons are sweeter to him than his sight, and that he seeks 
brides for them. I made inquiries, and have heard that you have three unnamed 
daughters who are worthy of our princes. These two noble families should be 
joined; this is Feraydun’s message, and may you answer as you see fit.” 

When the king of the Yemen heard this he withered like a water-lily that is 
plucked from the water. He said to himself, “If I don’t see my three lovely 
daughters at my bedside, the brightness of the day will be like night’s darkness 
to me. But I should keep my lips sealed about this; I must be in no hurry to give 
an answer. I’I] consult with my advisors, and see what they say.” 

He had a suitable lodging prepared for Feraydun’s messenger. Then he 
summoned his advisors and put the matter before them. He said, “I have three 
daughters, bright as lit tapers in their loveliness, and because of them Feraydun 
had laid a trap for me. He wants to separate me from these girls, who are as dear 


to me as my sight. His messenger proposes that Feraydun’s three princes take 
my three girls as brides. If I say I am pleased at this development, I will not be 
telling the truth, and it is unfitting for a king to lie; besides, if I hand my 
daughters over to him, how will I endure the fire in my heart and the tears in my 
eyes? But if I reject his request, my life will be harried by his rage. It would be 
no light undertaking to provoke his wrath; he is the lord of the world, and you 
have heard how he dealt with Zahhak. Now, what do you propose that I do?” 
The chieftains replied, “We do not see why you should twist and turn with 

every breeze that blows. Feraydun may be the lord of the world, but we are not 
slaves to do his bidding: To give good counsel’s our appointed task, 

But spears and steeds are all the faith we ask; 

With daggers we will make the earth blood red 

And crowd the day with lances overhead. 


If you approve of Feraydun’s sons, make them welcome and keep silent. But if 
you want to find a way out of this and are still afraid of Feraydun, demand 
conditions that it will be difficult for him to fulfill.” The king heard them out, 
but remained unsure what he should do. 


The King of the Yemen’s Answer to Jandal 
He summoned Feraydun’s messenger and spoke eloquently to him. “I am your 
king’s subject, and will obey whatever he orders me to do. Tell him I said, “You 
are a great man, and your sons are dear to you, especially as they are worthy to 
succeed you on the throne. My daughters too are dear to me, and if the king 
asked for my eyes, or for sovereignty over the Yemen, these sacrifices would 
hurt me less than never seeing my daughters again. But if this is the king’s wish 
I cannot oppose it, and my three daughters will leave my kingdom when I have 
seen the king’s princely sons. Their visit here will brighten the darkness of my 
days; and once I see the justice in their hearts, I shall grasp their hands in 
friendship, and give my daughters to them according to our customs, then 
quickly send them to back to you.’” When Jandal had heard his answer, he 
kissed the throne as was fitting and, calling down blessings on the king, he left 
the court and made his way back to the lord of the world. There he recounted all 
that he had seen and heard. 

Feraydun called his sons to him and told them of Jandal’s search. He said, 
“The king of the Yemen is a fine warrior; he has no sons, but his three virgin 
daughters are as his crown to him, and if the angel Sorush were to receive them 


in marriage, he would kiss the ground before them in homage. I have asked for 
these three as your brides and said all that is fitting; now you must go to him and 
speak eloquently on your own behalf. You must be wise and cautious, and listen 
carefully to all he tells you. Speak well when you answer him, and address his 
questions intelligently. You have been brought up as princes and must act 
appropriately. Be eloquent, perspicacious, and pure in your deeds; see that you 
are worthy of praise in any company. Tell the truth when you speak, and choose 
your words wisely. The king of the Yemen is a shrewd man, and he has few 
equals; he must not think of you as weak, because if he does, he will try to trick 
you. On the first day there will be a feast at which you will be honored. His three 
beautiful daughters will be there in their splendor, seated on thrones, each of 
them equal to the full moon in her beauty. The youngest will sit in front, the 
oldest will sit further back, and the middle one between them. The youngest will 
be placed next to the oldest of you, and the oldest next to the youngest, with the 
middle one between them. But you should be aware of this, and when he asks 
you which is the oldest, which is the middle one, and which is the youngest, you 
must be able to answer correctly. Say that the one who has been given the place 
of honor is the youngest, and the oldest is the one who has been placed lowest, 
with the middle one in her true place: in this way the business will turn out well 
for you.” The three pure young princes heard their father’s words, and when they 
left his presence they knew how they should act. They prepared for their 
journey, taking priests and an escort of warriors that glittered like the stars in 
heaven. 


Feraydun’s Sons at the Court of the King of the Yemen When Sarv 
heard of the princes’ approach, he had his army drawn up as 
splendidly as a pheasant’s feathers and sent a welcoming party 
composed partly of members of his own family, partly of strangers. 
As the princes made their way forward, men and women came out to 
greet them, scattering jewels and musk mixed with saffron before 
them; their horses’ manes were smeared with wine and musk, and 
their hooves trod on gold coins. The palace had been prepared for 
the princes and was like a paradise: filled with precious goods, its 
bricks were of gold and silver, and its walls were draped with 
brocade. As they dismounted before it their hearts swelled with 


confidence, and night seemed turned to day. The three daughters 
were presented by the king, and they were as Feraydun had 
predicted; each of them was as radiant as the full moon, and they sat 
as Feraydun had said they would. The king turned to the princes 
and said, “Which of these shining stars is the youngest, which is the 
middle one, and which is the oldest? You must indicate to me which 
is which.” The princes answered as they had been instructed, and in 
this way seeled the eyes of deceit. The king immediately realized that 
his trick had failed and said, “The truth is as you say,” and he gave 
the youngest to the youngest, the oldest to the oldest. And so they 
plighted their troth, with the three princesses blushing for shame at 
their father’s behavior. Then the princesses returned to their own 
palace, their faces filled with beauty and charm, their lips with soft 
speech. 


The King of the Yemen Casts a Spell on Feraydun’s Sons Now wine 
triumphed over wisdom, so that the princes were ready for sleep, and 
the three were conducted to a rose garden were they lay down on 
beds scented with rosewater. Then the Arab king practiced magic 
against them. He left the rose garden and raised a cold wind, 
intending that the young men would die of exposure; the plain and 
the garden froze and became so cold that even the crows did not 
dare fly there. The three princes sprang up in the cold, but with their 
knowledge of magic and their prayers they were able to overcome 
the king’s spells, so that the cold did not harm them. 

When the sun rose over the dark mountains, the deceitful king came quickly 
to the garden, expecting to find the faces of his sons-in-law blue with cold and 
their bodies frozen in death, so that his three daughters would stay with him. 
This was how he hoped to see them, but the sun and moon did not favor him; 
instead he discovered the three seated in princely glory and knew that his spells 
had failed. He gave an audience to the nobles of his country and opened the 
doors of his ancient treasuries, revealing long-hidden wealth. His three 
daughters, as lovely as the gardens of paradise, were brought before him, and he 
bestowed jewelry and crowns on them that were so heavy they were a torment to 


wear. Then he handed these three moons over to the princes’ safekeeping and 
said before the assembled nobles and priests, “According to our customs, I give 
these three daughters of mine to these princes, who are worthy to marry them, 
and may they cherish them as their own sight, and hold them as dear as their 
own souls.” 

Then he had the brides’ baggage strapped on spirited camels, and all the 
Yemen glittered with jewels. And so the train of embroidered litters wound 
through the countryside, and the young princes’ caravan set off for Feraydun’s 
court. 


Feraydun Tests His Sons 


News came of their return: without delay 

King Feraydun set out to block their way. 

He longed to know their hearts, and by a test 
Lay all his mind’s anxieties to rest. 

He took a dragon’s form, one so immense 

You’d say a lion would have no defense 

Against its strength; and from its jaws there came 
A roaring river of incessant flame. 

He saw his sons; dust rose into the sky, 

The world re-echoed with his grisly cry. 

First he attacked the eldest prince, who said, 
“No wise man fights with dragon foes,” and fled. 
Seeing his second son, he wheeled around. 

The youth bent back his bow and stood his ground, 
Shouting, “If combat’s needed I can fight 

A roaring lion or an armored knight.” 

Lastly the youngest son approached and cried, 
“Out of our path, fell monster, step aside. 

If you have heard of Feraydun, then know 

That we’re his valiant, lion-like sons—now go, 
Or I’Il give you a crown that you’ll regret!” 

He saw how each son took the test he’d set 

And disappeared. He left them there, but then 
Came out to greet his princes once again— 
Their king now, and the father whom they knew, 


Surrounded by his royal retinue. 


He came forward with the ox-headed mace in his fist, accompanied by the din of 
drums and his warlike elephants, with the chieftains of the army ranged behind 
him. When the princes saw their father they dismounted and kissed the ground 
before him. Their father took them by the hand and made much of them, and 
together they made their way to the palace, where Feraydun prayed, 
acknowledging that all good and evil come from the Creator. Then he 
summoned his sons to him, sat them on thrones, and said, “The dragon that 
wanted to consume the world with the fire of his breath was your father, out to 
test your manliness, and when he had seen your reactions he returned as himself, 
in his kingly state. Now I have decided on suitable names for you. You, the 
oldest, shall be called Salm, and may the world be as you would wish it: you 
sought safety (Salamat) when the monster threatened and did not hesitate to flee. 
You should call a warrior who does not fear elephants and lions a fool, not a 
brave man. Our middle son began impetuously, and the fire increased his 
bravery, and we will call him Tur; he is a brave lion who is able to bring down a 
raging elephant. Bravery in its place is a fine attribute, and the coward does not 
deserve a place of honor. As for our youngest son, a man who has both dignity 
and fierceness, who weighs matters carefully and is eager to fight, who chooses 
the middle way between earth and fire, as is right for an intelligent man, he is the 
most praiseworthy warrior in the world and will be called Iraj. May he remain 
magnanimous in all his doings, since from the outset he was like a lion and 
showed bravery in adversity. And now I am happy to name these beautiful 
young Arab women.” 

He called Salm’s wife Arezu (Desire), Tur’s wife he called Mah-e Azadeh 
Khui (A Free-Spirited Moon), and Iraj’s wife, whose loveliness exceeded that of 
Canopus, he called Sahi (Tall and Slender). Next, astrological tables were 
brought, and Feraydun studied his sons’ horoscopes. In Salm’s he found the 
planet Saturn in Sagittarius; Tur’s stars showed Mars soaked in blood, in Leo: 
when he looked at Iraj’s stars he saw the Moon in Aries. These evil stars showed 
that trouble and warfare were in store for them. 


THE STORY OF IRAJ 


Feraydun Divides the World Between His Three Sons Then 
Feraydun brought into the open a plan he had kept secret. He 
divided the world into three parts: one part consisted of the West, 
another of China and the land of the Turks, and the third of Persia, 
the land of warriors. The first area he gave to Salm, whom he 
ordered to select an army and set off to the West, where he was 
enthroned and acclaimed as the Lord of the Western Lands. He 
made Tur the master of Turan, and gave him sovereignty over the 
Turks and the land of China. Tur selected his army and marched to 
his new home, where he was enthroned and his nobles showered 
him with jewels and acknowledged him as the Lord of Turan. When 
the affairs of these two had been settled Feraydun turned to Iraj, on 
whom he bestowed Persia and the lands of the Arabs. He gave him 
the crown and sword, the seal and ivory throne, because he was 
worthy of them. Each of the three princely brothers sat in state in 
his own kingdom, and wise men proclaimed Iraj as the Lord of 
Persia. 

Time passed, and Fate kept its secrets hidden. Feraydun grew old, and dust 
covered the garden of spring. Strength lessens as age creeps on, and as 
Feraydun’s days darkened, so his sons grew stronger. Salm’s heart leaped up in 
his breast, and his moods and manner changed: his spirit was overwhelmed by 
greed and desire, and he plotted with his counselors. He was dissatisfied with the 
portion his father had allotted him, and with the fact that the golden throne of 
Persia had been given to the youngest brother. His heart seething with fury and 
his face filled with frowns, he sent a messenger to his brother, the king of China. 
The message wished him long life and happiness and went on: “Look well at our 
story, the like of which no one has ever heard. We were three brothers, all 


worthy of the throne, and the youngest of us has been blessed by good fortune. 
As I am the oldest and the most experienced, Fate should have favored me. And 
if I am left aside, shouldn’t the crown and throne belong to you, my lord? He 
gave Persia, the land of heroes, and the Yemen, to Iraj; the Western Lands to me; 
and the Turks and China to you. The youngest of us is the lord of Persia, and 
there is no sense in this. There is no wisdom in our father’s plans. We two 
should grieve at his decision, which has done us a great wrong.” 

The envoy quickly made his way to the court of Turan, where he suavely 
repeated all he had heard and filled the king’s head with vain thoughts. When 
brave Tur heard these words he leaped up like a raging lion and said, “Tell your 
master this, ‘Remember, my just lord, that our father deceived us in our youth, 
that he planted a tree whose sap is blood and whose fruits are poisonous. We 
must not hesitate to act; it would be foolish to delay.’” The envoy brought back 
this message, and once the secret was out between them, the two brothers, one 
from China and the other from the West, met together and mingled poison with 
their honey, discussing how they should act. 


Salm’s and Tur’s Message to Feraydun 
They chose a priest, an active, eloquent, perceptive man who would remember 
whatever he was entrusted with. Salm spoke first, washing his eyes of all shame 
before his father: “Let neither wind nor swirling dust delay 

Your journey as you hasten on your way. 

When you arrive at court, see that you tell 

King Feraydun his two sons wish him well: 

And then remind him of his age, that he 

Should fear God here and for eternity; 

A young man hopes for future joys, but men 

Whose hair is white will not see youth again. 

Tell him, ‘God gave you all the earth to rule 

But you have acted like an evil fool; 

You had three sons, all valiant and brave, 

You favored one of them, to him you gave 

The crown of sovereignty—the other two 

Were disregarded and despised by you. 

We are not less than him by birth; if he 

Deserves the imperial dais, so do we, 

And God will never look with favor on 


Your preferential treatment of this son. 
Snatch the crown off his worthless head, and give 
Him some dark corner of the earth to live. 
If you do not, we’ll bring armed warrior bands 
From China, Turkestan, and Western lands 
To turn Iraj’s day to dusty night 
And humble Persia with our armies’ might.’” 
When the priest heard this harsh message, he kissed the ground and set off as 
quickly as wind-borne fire. He reached Feraydun’s castle, which towered above 
him like a mountain, its battlements hidden among the clouds. Courtiers sat in 
the throne room, and beyond a curtain were the nobility; on one side lions and 
leopards were tethered, and on the other raging war elephants. The assembled 
waliriors gave a roar like a lion’s; it seemed to the messenger as though this were 
a celestial court, and that the warriors standing there were angelic beings. 
Feraydun was told of the envoy’s arrival and had the curtain drawn back so 
that his horse could enter. The envoy saw that Feraydun’s face filled all eyes and 
hearts; that he was like a cypress in stature, that his visage was like the sun’s, 
and that his hair was like white camphor about a red rose: his lips were all 
smiles, his gaze was modest and welcoming, kingly words adorned his lips. The 
envoy prostrated himself and covered the ground with kisses. Feraydun 
motioned him to rise and sat him on a worthy seat. First he asked about his two 
sons’ health and welfare, then enquired solicitously as to the long, hard road the 
messenger had traveled. The envoy answered, “Great king, may the throne never 
be without you! Those you ask about live for your wellbeing; but I am merely a 
slave and not master of my own body. I have brought a harsh, angry message to 
the king, although I am guiltless of its contents. Tell me, my lord, if you would 
hear the young men’s foolish words.” 


Feraydun’s Answer to His Sons 

Feraydun ordered him to speak, and he repeated the words he had heard. As 
Feraydun listened his mind seethed in anger, and he said, “You are a wise man, 
and there is no need for you to apologize for what you have said. My own eyes 
have foreseen this, and my heart suspected it. Tell those two corrupt and 
worthless fools, those two whose brains have been led astray by Ahriman: ‘The 
king is pleased that you have shown your natures and says your greetings are 
worthy of you. You have forgotten the advice I gave you, and no trace of 


wisdom remains in your minds. Have you no fear or shame before God? Once 
my hair was as black as pitch, my stature was like the cypress’s and my face 
shone like the full moon. But the skies turn, and have bent my back; they will 
bend yours too, and what is bent becomes unstable. 


I swear in God’s name, by the earth, the sun, 

The moon, the crown, and throne; what I have done 
To you was just. I summoned men who are wise, 
Who know the stars and understand the skies, 

I spent long days in weighing up your worth, 
Apportioning the countries of the earth: 

The fear of God was in me, and I sought 

For justice on the earth and in my court. 

‘T’ll give the world to my three sons’, I said, 

But Ahriman has filled your heart and head. 

Ask yourselves now, Will God look kindly on 

The plans you’ve made, the evil things you’ve done? 
Listen: this story’s one you ought to know, 

You’ll reap the consequence of what you sow. 

This fleeting world is not the world where we 

Are destined to abide eternally: 

And for the sake of an unworthy throne 

You let the devil claim you for his own. 

I’ve few days left here, I’ve no heart for war, 

I cannot strive and struggle any more, 

But hear an old man’s words: the heart that’s freed 
From gnawing passion and ambitious greed 

Looks on kings’ treasures and the dust as one; 

The man who sells his brother, as you’ve done, 

For this same worthless dust, will never be 
Regarded as a child of purity. 

The world has seen so many men like you, 

And laid them low: there’s nothing you can do 

But turn to God; take thought then for the way 

You travel, since it leads to Judgment Day.’” 


The envoy heard his words, kissed the ground, and turned away, leaving 
Feraydun’s court as quickly as the wind. 

When Salm’s messenger had gone, Feraydun called Iraj to him and told him 
of what had happened. He said, “My two warlike sons are attacking from the 
west. Their stars have foretold their joy in evil, and the countries they were 
allotted are barren. Your brother will not be a brother to you while you wear the 
crown. From the ends of the earth, my two sons have declared open war: if you 
are ready to fight, open your treasuries and equip your men. Grasp this cup while 
it is still dawn, or at night supper will be at your expense. Look for no allies in 
this world; righteousness and innocence are your only friends.” 

The noble Iraj gazed at his reverend father and said, “Our lives pass from us 
like the wind, and why 

Should wise men grieve to know that they must die? 
The Judas blossom fades, the lovely face 

Of light is dimmed, and darkness takes its place. 
The world is pleasure first, then grief, and then 
We leave this fleeting world of living men— 

Our beds are dust, for all eternity, 

Why should we plant the tree we’ll never see? 
The starry heavens turn, and turn again, 

And all they bring mankind is blood and pain. 
The earth has seen so many men who wore 
Kings’ robes and crowns, and will see many more: 
Vengeance has never been the royal way, 

And I shall not do evil, come what may. 

What are the crown and throne to me? Unarmed, 
I'll greet my brothers, whom I’ve never harmed, 
And tell them to forget their enmity. 

‘Remember Jamshid,’ I shall say, ‘how he 

Was driven from this world he’d ruled, alone, 
Bereft of all his sovereignty and throne. 

My brothers, we’ll endure this fate; we too 

Will taste the destiny that Jamshid knew.’ 

I’Il speak to them in kindness; this will be 

Better than angry words and enmity.” 


Feraydun replied, “My wise son, your brothers look for war, while you look for 
reconciliation. I am reminded of the saying that one should not be surprised that 
the moon radiates moonlight: your answer is noble and your heart is filled with 
love. But what will happen to a man who knowingly places his head in the 
dragon’s maw? Surely poison will destroy him, since this is the dragon’s nature? 
My son, if this is your decision, prepare yourself, and choose a few companions 
from your troops to accompany you. In my heart’s agony I will write a letter to 
these brothers of yours, in the hopes that I shall greet you once more with your 
body unharmed, since my soul’s joy is in seeing you.” 


Iraj Visits His Brothers 
The king wrote letters to the lord of the West and the king of China. He began 
with praise of eternal God and continued: “This letter is to advise two suns who 
shine in the heavens, two lords of war, two jewels among kings, and it is from 
one who has experienced the world, who has uncovered its secrets and turned 
night to day, who has wielded mace and sword and overcome all manner of 
difficulties. I no longer wish to wear the crown, to amass treasures, or to occupy 
the throne: I have suffered enough, and desire only the wellbeing of my three 
sons. Your brother with whom you are vexed, even though he has never breathed 
a word against anyone, has come to me disturbed by your anger. He prefers you 
to his sovereignty, and has acted nobly; he has left his throne and rides to you 
now, humbly, as your younger brother. Respect him and treat him well, and 
when he has been with you for a few days, return him to me safe and sound.” 
The king’s seal was placed on the letter, and Iraj rode out from the palace. He 
went with a few companions, both young and old, the minimum necessary to 
accompany him on the journey, and as he drew near his brothers, he had no 
notion of their dark plans. They went out to welcome him as usual, and paraded 
their troops before him; when he saw their apparent kindness, Iraj’s face relaxed. 
Two of them were filled with hatred, one with benevolence, and as they 
questioned one another, the conversation was to no one’s satisfaction. Two men 
whose hearts were filled with a longing for vengeance, one whose heart was at 
peace, made their way to the commanders’ camp. The army’s eyes were fixed on 
Iraj, and the troops saw that he was worthy of the throne and crown. Their hearts 
were stirred by the sight of the young prince, and they turned to one another, 
praising him, saying Iraj deserved to be an emperor, and that no one but he 
should reign. Salm saw this from the sidelines and was troubled by the soldiers’ 
behavior. He rode with his heart filled with rancor; blood suffused his liver, and 


his face was knotted with frowns. He cleared his pavilion of strangers and sat to 
consult with Tur. They talked about every aspect of the affair, about sovereignty 
and who reigned over which lands. In the midst of their conversation Salm said 
to Tur, “Why are our men huddled in pairs? As we returned here they were 
different from when we went out to welcome Iraj; the whole way back they all 
had their eyes fixed on him. My heart is darkened by this business of Persia, and 
the more I consider it the more my heart aches at it. | watched the men of our 
two armies, and they won’t call anyone but him king from now on. If you don’t 
uproot this upstart now, he’!l drag you down from your throne.” 


Iraj Is Killed by His Brothers 

They came to their decision, and throughout the night talked about how to 
accomplish it. When the veil was drawn back from the sun and dawn broke, 
dispelling sleep, their two worthless hearts were set on this, and they washed all 
shame from their eyes. They strode from their pavilion toward Iraj’s tent; when 
he saw them approaching, kindness suffused his heart and he ran to greet them. 
The three brothers entered Iraj’s tent, and the conversation ranged back and 
forth. Tur said, “If you are younger than us, why were you given the most 
important crown? You get Persia, its wealth, and the Kayanid throne and crown, 
while I have to make do with ruling Turks, and my younger brother has to suffer 
in the West. Our father favored you, the youngest son, when he made this 
division, but I will not allow this; neither the Kayanid crown, nor its throne, nor 
sovereignty, nor Persia should be yours.” 

When Iraj heard Tur’s words, he answered him simply and straightforwardly: 
“You are my older brother and ambitious for glory; if you would be happy you 
must calm yourself. I don’t want Persia, or the West, or China, or sovereignty, or 
authority over any country. Greatness that brings evil in its train is something for 
which we should weep. And if the heavens raise your saddle up to glory, finally 
your pillow will be the dust. I sat on the throne of Persia, it’s true, but now I am 
tired of both the crown and the throne: I hand them both over to you, and may 
you harbor no hatred for me from now on. I’ve no desire to quarrel with you, and 
your heart should not be upset by anything I do. If it troubles you, and it means I 
cannot see you, I have no wish to rule in this world. I don’t want anything except 
to be a subject, and may greed and the longing for grandeur never sway my 
heart!” 

But Tur, who lacked all sense of righteousness, was annoyed by his brother’s 
words, and frowned at them. He leapt up and grasped the golden throne on 


which he had been sitting and brought it crashing down on Iraj’s head. Iraj 
begged him to spare his life and said, “Have you no fear of God, no shame 
before our father? Is this your decision? Don’t kill me, because my blood will be 
upon your head. 


You have a soul yourself; how can you say 

That you will take another’s soul away? 

Pity the ants that toil beneath your feet— 

They have their souls; to them their souls are sweet. 


Don’t make yourself a murderer. You’ ll never see me again; I will be content 
with a corner of the world, there to earn my bread in sorrow. How can you long 
to spill your brother’s blood and torment our father’s heart with such a crime? 
You wanted the world and now you have it; don’t spill my blood, turning against 
God in this way.” Tur heard his words but made no answer. He drew a dagger 
from his boot and split Iraj from head to foot, so that his body was veiled in 
blood. He plunged the poisoned dagger into his brother’s trunk. Iraj’s body 
buckled, the noble cypress was felled, and the blossoms of his face ran with 
blood. This is how the young prince died. 


O world, you nurtured him, but offered no 
Protection when his brother laid him low: 

I don’t know whom you favor secretly, 

But we should weep for all we hear and see. 
And you, who murder kings, who live in fear, 
Learn from these criminals whose tale you hear. 


Tur severed the mammoth warrior’s head and had it filled with camphor and 
musk, and sent it with this message to their aged father, who had divided the 
world between them: “Here is the head of your darling, to whom you gave our 
ancestors’ crown. Give him the crown now, and the throne if you wish; but this 
branch of the royal tree is no more.” Then the two unjust brothers returned to 
their kingdoms, one in China, and one in the West. 


Feraydun Learns That Iraj Has Been Killed 
Feraydun watched the road, and the army watched with him, anxious for the 
return of the young king. When it was time for him to appear, his father prepared 


a turquoise throne for him, and a jewel-studded crown; wine and musicians were 
made ready, war drums were strapped on elephants, and the whole town was 
decorated. As Feraydun and his army busied themselves with these preparations, 
a cloud of dust rose above the road; from it emerged a camel on which sat a 
grieving, wailing messenger, and strapped to the animal’s side was a coffin. This 
man rode up to Feraydun, sighing, weeping, and ashen-faced. Appalled by his 
words and manner, the king’s companions removed the coffin lid and drew back 
the coverlet of silk within it, to reveal the severed head of Iraj. Feraydun fell 
from his horse into the dust, and the soldiers with him rent their clothes in grief. 
Their faces were blackened, their eyes rolled back in despair, and only the 
whites were visible. 

The prince’s return in such a manner threw the welcoming party into 
disarray; the banners were torn, the drums turned upside down, the nobles’ faces 
became the color of ebony. The elephants and drums were draped in black cloth, 
the Arab horses in deep blue. The king walked, as did his soldiers, heaping dust 
on their heads; the nobles cried out in an agony of sorrow, clawing at their flesh 
as they mourned for the prince. 








Brokenhearted, their king wailing in grief, the army made its way to the 
garden of Iraj; here the young prince had held court and presided over festivities. 
Clasping his young son’s head to his breast, Feraydun entered the garden 
weeping. He looked at the imperial throne, and at his son’s head which would 
never wear the crown again, at the garden’s royal pool, the blossoming trees, the 
willows, and the quince trees. He saw this place of celebrations and ceremony 
emptied of its nobility, and a cloud of dust rising up to the heavens. He burned 
the garden and clawed at his cheeks, wept, and tore his hair. His waist was 
girdled with blood, and he spread fire through the pleasure grounds, uprooted the 
flowerbeds, gave the cypresses to the flames, and with this act seeled tight the 
eyes of happiness. He cradled Iraj’s head in his arms, and turned his face toward 
God. He said, “Lord of justice, look at this slaughtered innocent, his head 
severed by a dagger, his body devoured by lions. Burn the hearts of his two 
unjust brothers, and may they see nothing but sorrow in their lives. Burn their 
vitals, and have them suffer such agony that the wild beasts will pity their pain. I 
ask only that I be given a little time, my lord, until I see a child from Iraj’s seed, 
who will bind on his belt for vengeance. When I have seen this, it is right that I 
lie where earth will be the measure of me.” 

He wept so long in this manner that the grass grew up to his chest; the earth 
was his bed, the dirt his pillow, and the bright world was dimmed before him. 
The doors to the court were closed, and Feraydun loosed his tongue, saying, “My 
young prince, my noble warrior, no one who wore the crown has died as you 
have died: your head severed by Ahriman, your body’s shroud the lion’s maw; 
the beasts mourn for you and find no rest or sleep. All the country’s men and 
women have gathered together and sit weeping, their eyes wet with tears, their 
hearts filled with sorrow; their clothes changed to black and blue, they sit 
grieving for their king’s death. What a day is this for them, in which they see all 
life as death.” 

Time passed, and in Iraj’s harem Feraydun saw that one of his women, 
named Mah-Afarid, whom Iraj had greatly loved, was pregnant. The king was 
happy to see her secret, hoping that her child would be a means to vengeance for 
his son’s death. When the time for her delivery came she gave birth to a girl, 
who was brought up in comfort and with tenderness. Had you surveyed this 
lovely girl from head to foot, you would say she was Iraj himself. When she had 
grown and the time came for her to marry, her face was as lovely as Canopus 
and her hair as black as pitch. Her grandfather promised her to Pashang, and 
married her to him after an appropriate time had passed. 


THE VENGEANCE OF MANUCHEHR 


The Birth of Manuchehr 
Mah-Afarid gave birth to a splendid child, one worthy of the crown and throne. 
As soon as the boy had been born a servant took him to Feraydun and said, 
“Good news, your majesty; look, here is Iraj.” The king laughed, since it was 
indeed as if Iraj were alive again; he took the child in his arms and prayed to 
God, “May this day be remembered as auspicious, and may our enemies’ hearts 
be defeated.” Then he looked down at the child’s face again and said, “Sprung 
from a pure mother and father, a noble branch has born fruit. Wine has been 
poured from a splendid goblet; he has a clear, open face (Manachehreh), and 
may his name be Manuchehr.” Feraydun had the child brought up so attentively 
that the winds of heaven never touched him. The nurse who cared for him did 
not walk on the earth; her feet trod on musk, and a silk parasol shaded her head. 
Throughout his childhood, no harm came to Manuchehr from the stars. 
Feraydun had him taught the arts of kingship, and his heart revived as 
Manuchehr grew. The army too favored the young man, and the king gave him a 
golden throne, a heavy mace, and a turquoise-studded crown. Then he handed 
over to him the keys to all his treasuries, as well as a royal enclosure made of 
brocade in various colors, within which were tents of leopard skin. He freely 
gave him Arab horses with golden bridles, Indian swords in golden scabbards, 
armor and helmets, bows from Chach, arrows of poplar wood, javelins and 
Chinese shields. He loved him so much that he thought it appropriate to give all 
these treasures, accumulated with such toil, to Manuchehr. Then he ordered the 
champions of the army and the country’s nobles to come before him to acclaim 
the young man as king and to sprinkle emeralds over his crown. Great festivities 
were held, and it became clear who were wolves and who sheep. Qaren of the 
Kaviani clan was there, as well as Shirui the army commander, and Andian; the 
armies assembled, and Manuchehr dominated them as his flock. 


Salm and Tur Learn of Manuchehr 


News that the imperial crown shone once more came to Salm and Tur. Their 
unjust hearts feared the stars were turning against them; the evildoers’ days were 
darkened, and they took counsel together. They agreed they had to seek a 
remedy for their situation, and the only thing they could think of was to send 
someone to Feraydun apologizing for their past behavior. They sought out an 
envoy who would be able to speak well and sincerely, and spoke flatteringly to 
him. Then, in fear of what fate would bring them, they opened the treasury of the 
West and chose from this ancient store a golden crown. They had elephants 
richly caparisoned and filled chariots with musk and ambergris, gold and silver 
coins, silks, and furs, and when all this had been made ready the envoy presented 
himself before them, prepared for the journey. They gave him a message to give 
to Feraydun, beginning with praise of God and invoking blessings on Feraydun, 
wishing him long life, health, and glory. Then they told him to say, “The eyes of 
these two sinners are filled with tears of shame before their father; their hearts 
burn with regret, and they beg for forgiveness. Wise men say that a man is 
punished for his sins, that he suffers and his heart is filled with anguish, and they 
say to the king that their hearts are tormented in this way. But these things were 
written in our fates, they say, and our actions have done no more than bring what 
was written to pass; even lions that terrify the world, and dragons, cannot escape 
the snare of fate. And then an evil and audacious demon emptied our hearts of all 
fear of God, and made our minds his dwelling place. But we hope that the king 
will pardon us, even though our sin is great, that he will put it down to our 
ignorance, to the workings of the heavens, which now save us and now destroy 
us, and thirdly to the demon who scurries about the world and is ready for every 
mischief. If the king will not look for revenge against us, our ways will be 
purified; let him send Manuchehr to us, his suppliants, with a mighty army, so 
that we may present ourselves before him, on foot, as his slaves. May we wash 
away with our eyes’ tears the tree of vengeance that has grown from all this 
hatred. As the crown is renewed, we hasten to offer our tears and sufferings, and 
we send treasure as an earnest of our good faith.” 


The Message of Salm and Tur Arrives at Feraydun’s Court 

His heart filled with words that had neither rhyme nor reason to them, 
accompanied by elephants and treasure, the envoy came in splendor to the court. 
When Feraydun heard of his approach he had the imperial throne draped in 
Chinese brocade and the Kayanid crown made ready. He sat on the turquoise- 
studded throne, like a cypress topped by the full moon, wearing the crown, the 


royal earrings and torque, as befits a king. Prince Manuchehr sat beside him 
wearing the royal diadem, and the country’s nobles stood ranged on each side, 
dressed in gold from head to foot, bearing golden maces and shields. Wild 
animals were tethered there with golden chains and collars, on the one side lions 
and leopards, and on the other war elephants. 

The warrior Shapur left the castle to welcome Salm’s messenger, who 
dismounted and ran toward the doorway. When he approached king Feraydun 
and saw him crowned high on his throne, he bowed his head and placed his face 
against the ground. The king motioned him to a place on a golden throne, and 
the messenger began his speech: “Great king, ornament of the crown, the throne, 
and royal seal, whose throne transforms the world into a rose garden, and whose 
good fortune illumines the air, we are all slaves of the dust beneath your feet, 
and live only for you.” The king smiled on him and made him welcome, and the 
envoy repeated Salm’s and Tur’s message, that disguised truth with lies. The 
king listened to his fluent talk asking pardon for the two brothers and suggesting 
that Manuchehr visit them, when, as his slaves, they would welcome him and 
transfer to him their crowns and thrones, paying the blood-price they owed their 
father with silks and gold, crowns, and royal belts. The envoy spoke and the king 
listened, and his answer was as a key that opens a lock. 


Feraydun’s Answer to His Sons 

When the world’s king had heard his evil sons’ message, he answered the envoy 
point by point. He said, “How can you hide the sun? The hidden workings of 
their evil hearts are clearer than the sun in the heavens. I’ve heard all you said, 
and now pay attention to my answer. Tell those two fearless, shameless, unjust, 
malevolent wretches, that idle talk counts for nothing, and I will not indulge in 
it. If they feel such love for Manuchehr now, where is Iraj’s body? It has been 
devoured by wild beasts, and his head was sent to me in a coffin. And now 
you’ve finished with Iraj, you wish to start on Manuchehr? You will only see 
him accompanied by an army, with an iron helmet on his head, bearing a mace 
and the Kaviani banner, the ground blackened by his horses’ hooves. He will 
have the commander Qaren with him, and Shapur, Nastuh’s son, will command 
the rear of his army. Sarv, the king of the Yemen, will be there in the vanguard 
to advise him. We look to wash the leaves and fruit of the tree of vengeance for 
Iraj in blood. Previously, we did not seek vengeance for him because we did not 
think the times were propitious; it would not have been suitable for me to fight 
against my two sons. But now that a noble branch has sprung from the tree that 


his enemies uprooted, you will find that a savage lion longs for vengeance for 
his grandfather’s death, and that he comes with our champions, Sam the son of 
Nariman, and Karshasp, who is descended from Jamshid, that their army 
stretches from one mountain to another and pounds the earth beneath its feet. As 
for their demand that the king should wash all thoughts of revenge from his heart 
and forgive them, because this was the doing of the heavens, because their 
wisdom was clouded and their love overshadowed, I have heard all these futile 
excuses, and respond with the saying of a wise man, ‘The man who sows the 
seeds of evil never sees one happy day, or the joys of paradise.’ If God has 
forgiven you, why are you so afraid of your brother’s blood? Have you no shame 
before God, with your black hearts and your tongues filled with lying words? 
You will be punished for this evil in both worlds; this act will not remain hidden. 
And then this sending an ivory throne, war elephants, and a turquoise-studded 
crown is supposed to make me give up my longing for revenge? I’m to sell 
princes’ lives for gold? I’d rather my throne, crown, and glory were destroyed 
than do such a thing. Perhaps some dragon’s spawn would accept a price for a 
priceless life, but who says that an aged father would do such a thing for his 
son’s life? I’ve no need of this wealth you’ve sent, and there is no point in my 
talking any more on the subject. This father will never cease to long for 
vengeance while he lives. I’ve heard your message; hear my answer.” Then to 
the envoy he said, “Spell this out to them, sentence by sentence. Now go!” 

The envoy heard these terrifying words and observed Manuchehr seated on 
the throne. He withered away in fear, and rose trembling from his seat; there and 
then he sat in the saddle to depart. This noble young man saw in his soul all that 
was destined to happen, and that it would not be long before the heavens 
frowned on Tur and Salm. He sped like the wind, his head filled with the king’s 
answer, his heart with foreboding. 

When he reached the West, he saw a silken tent pitched on the plain, where 
the two kings waited for him. They made a space for him to sit and asked about 
the new king. They questioned the envoy concerning the crown and the imperial 
throne, King Feraydun and his army, the assembled warriors, and the state of the 
country. And then they wanted to know how the turning heavens had favored 
Manuchehr, who among the nobility was there, who the vizier was, the state of 
the treasury and who the treasurer was, how many cavalry were assembled there, 
who their leader was, and who the army commanders were. 

The envoy said, “Let the man who has never seen the glories of spring see 
Feraydun’s court. It is a place of spring-like joy, a heaven; the dust there is 


ambergris, the earth is gold. The heavens smile down on his palace; no mountain 
is as tall, no garden as vast. As I approached, the palace summit seemed hidden 
among the stars; there are elephants tethered on one side, lions on the other, and 
all the world bows before his good fortune. His elephants bear golden howdahs, 
his lions’ collars are studded with jewels; drummers stand before the elephants, 
and the blare of brazen trumpets sounds from every side—the world seems to 
seethe, and the earth roar to the heavens. I entered the court and saw a king as 
radiant as the moon, seated on a turquoise-studded throne, his crown surmounted 
by shining rubies. His head was as white as camphor, his cheeks like rose petals; 
his heart seeks peace and his words are kindly. The world’s hope and fear are in 
his hands, and you would say that Jamshid lives again in him. On his right sat 
Manuchebr, as tall and elegant as a cypress tree, as kingly in his heart and 
language as Tahmures the binder of demons. The warrior Qaren stood before 
him, and to his left was Sarv the king of the Yemen. Sarv is his vizier, victorious 
Karshasp is his treasurer, and no one has ever seen such wealth as is in his 
treasury. Two ranks of warriors line the palace walls, bearing golden maces and 
with golden diadems. Qaren, Andian, Shirui the destroyer of lions, and Shapur 
who is like a war elephant in his rage, are his commanders. The air is darkened 
when the war drums sound from their elephants’ backs, and if they attack us, our 
mountains will be flattened like a plain, our plains encumbered like mountains; 
their hearts are filled with hatred, their faces with frowns, and war is their one 
desire.” 

He told them all he had seen, and the words he had heard from Feraydun. The 
hearts of the two criminals writhed in anguish, and their faces darkened. They 
sat and looked for some remedy, but their words had neither head nor tail to 
them. Then Tur said to Salm, “We must forget about peace and tranquility: that 
lion cub must not sharpen his teeth and become brave. How can he be devoid of 
talents, when his teacher is Feraydun? When grandfather and grandson conspire, 
something extraordinary will come of it. We must prepare for war, and make up 
for lost time.” 

They gathered forces from China and the West and led their cavalry out. The 
world was filled with rumors, and men flocked to their banners, but though their 
armies were limitless, their stars were already declining. The two armies made 
for Iran; their soldiers were hidden in helmets and armor, and war elephants and 
wealth accompanied the murderous brothers, whose hearts were bent on 
destruction. 


Salm and Tur March Against Feraydun 
Feraydun received news that their forces were nearing Persia and ordered 
Manuchehr to lead his army out on to the plain. He said: “A young man of good 
fortune wins the day 

By patience; wisdom will entrap his prey— 

He lets the leopard follow him to where 

He has already laid his cunning snare.” 


Manuchehr replied, “Great king, fortune has frowned on whoever opposes you 
with hatred in his heart, and his body and soul will soon be severed from one 
another. I have bound on my armor for battle and shall not loosen its knots until 
the battlefield’s dust has obscured the sun. I have contempt for all their warriors; 
how can they dare to fight against me?” 

He ordered Qaren to lead their troops out. The king’s pavilion was pitched on 
the plain, with the royal banner fluttering in front. The warriors advanced in 
companies, and the plains and mountains were like heaving waves of the sea. 
The dust obscured the sun and darkened the bright day. Deafening war cries 
went up from every side, the Arab horses neighed, and the war drums resounded. 
For two miles elephants were drawn up before the camp; sixty of them bore 
golden howdahs studded with jewels, three hundred were loaded with baggage, 
three hundred were covered in iron armor with only their eyes visible. The 
king’s tent was struck, and the army marched out from Tammisheh. Three 
hundred thousand armored cavalry, led by the warlike Qaren, each of them like a 
raging lion, and eager to avenge the death of Iraj, followed the Kaviani banner, 
their swords glittering in their fists. Manuchehr and Qaren emerged from the 
forests of Narvan to lead the army onto the open plain; the prince placed 
Karshasp in command of the left flank, Sam and Qobad had charge of the right. 
Outshining all others, Manuchehr, accompanied by Sarv, was as splendid as the 
full moon in the center of his forces. Qaren and Sam drew their swords from 
their scabbards, Qobad led the advance troops, and men from the clan of 
Taliman lay hidden to ambush the enemy. The army with its lion warriors and 
resounding drums was as splendid as a bride in all her finery. 

Salm and Tur learned that an army intent on revenge was preparing for war. 
The two brothers led their troops out from among the trees, and the blood from 
their livers appeared as foam on their lips. The murderers advanced their troops, 
their minds filled with hatred; behind them lay the sea and the territory of the 
Alans. Qobad came forward to spy out the land, and when Tur heard of this, he 


rushed forward like the wind and said to him, “Go back to Manuchehr and say, 
‘And who 

Bestowed this armor and this sword on you? 

You have no father; from Iraj’s race 

A girl was born, so who gave you the mace 

That signifies the royal sovereignty, 

Young king? Who gave you this authority?’” 


Qobad answered, “Don’t worry, I’ll take your message exactly as you’ve said it. 
But if you reflected on this long and wisely, you’d know this is a terrifying 
business you’ve embarked on, and you’d be afraid to say these foolish words of 
yours. Don’t be surprised if the wild animals weep for you day and night, 
because from the forests of Narvan to China the land is filled with our horsemen 
and warriors, flourishing their swords when they see the Kaviani banner. Your 
heart and brain will split with terror when you see them, and you will not know 
the peaks of this land from its valleys.” 

Qobad went to the king and told him what he had heard from Tur. Manuchehr 
laughed and said, “No one but a fool would say such things. Thanks be to the 
God of this world and the next, who knows what is plain and what is hidden, and 
who is aware that Iraj is my grandfather and that the great Feraydun is my 
witness in this. When I fight, my lineage will be plain enough. I swear by the 
might of the God of the sun and the moon, that I will not let Tur rule for long; in 
the blinking of an eye, I shall display his severed head before the army. I shall 
have my revenge for Iraj’s death, and trample Tur’s reign beneath my feet.” 


Manuchehr Attacks Tur’s Army 

Manuchehr gave orders that tables be made ready for a feast, and that a place be 
set aside for wine and music. As darkness fell, he sent out sentries onto the plain. 
Qaren stood before the troops with Sarv, the king of the Yemen, and addressed 
them: “Nobles and lions loyal to the king, know that this is a war against 
Ahriman; keep yourselves ready, and live in the knowledge of God’s protection. 
Whoever is killed in this battle will be received into Paradise, and his sins will 
be washed away. Whoever spills the blood of these warriors from China and the 
West and seizes their territory, his name will live forever, and he will earn the 
glorious praise of our priests. He will be given a diadem and throne from our 
king, who is the lord of strength and the dispenser of justice. When day dawns 
and two watches of the morning have passed, prepare to fight; ready your maces 


and Kaboli daggers. Keep to your ranks, and see that none advances his feet 
before the others.” The commanders ranged themselves before the king and said 
with one voice, “We are your slaves, and live in this world only for the king. 
Whatever he orders we shall do immediately; for him we shall turn this plain to 
an Oxus of blood.” Then each man returned to his own tent, meditating on the 
battle to come. 

As dawn broke and darkness was dispelled, Manuchehr rose up in the midst 
of his forces, dressed in his armor, wearing a Rumi helmet, and grasping his 
sword; as one man, the troops thrust their lances into the air. They covered the 
face of the earth, their heads filled with fury, their foreheads with frowns. The 
king skillfully deployed the flanks and center of the army, and the ground 
seemed to heave like a floundering ship on the sea, or seethe like the waters of 
the Nile. The war drums on the elephants’ backs were beaten, more drums were 
beaten before them, and the noise of trumpets resounded as if the battle were to 
be a festive celebration. The army moved forward like a mountain, and the two 
sides met in close combat. The plain became a sea of blood, as if red tulips had 
sprung up everywhere, and the elephants’ legs glowed like pillars of coral. Until 
night came, and the sun disappeared, all the advantage was with Manuchehr, 
because the world’s soul loved him. 

Manuchehr Kills Tur Tur’s and Salm’s hearts seethed with fury, 
and they plotted an ambush, so that when night turned to day, the 
two warriors held back, and none of their men advanced to battle. 
When half the day had passed, their hearts were filled with hatred, 





and they hatched one useless plot after another. They said, “When 
night comes, we’ll ambush them, and fill the mountains and plains 
with their blood.” 

Night came and day disappeared; darkness covered all the earth, and the two 
unjust brothers readied their soldiers for a night attack. But Manuchehr’s spies 
had news of this and hurried to tell him what they had heard. Manuchehr handed 
his men over to Qaren, who took three thousand brave warriors and hid them 
where they would be able to waylay the enemy. 

Tur set off with a hundred thousand troops in the darkness of the night; but as 
they neared the camp they came on the Persian forces drawn up behind their 
banner, ready for war. They had no choice but to attack, and the war cry went up 
from their midst. The sky was clouded by the cavalry’s dust, and swords 
glittered in the dark like lightning; it was if the air itself caught fire, flashing like 
diamonds and burning the ground. The din of weapons deafened the fighters, and 
fire ascended into the heavens. The king lifted his head from where he had been 
lying in wait, and Tur had no means of escape. He tugged at his reins and turned 
to flee, as his soldiers’ cries re-echoed around him. Manuchehr sped after him 
and, as he closed on him, flung a spear at his back. The sword dropped from 
Tur’s hand, and Manuchehr grasped him, lifting him from the saddle and hurling 
him to the ground. There and then he severed his head and left his body for the 
animals to devour. Then he returned to his own camp, his mind filled with the 
turnings of fate, which bring now prosperity and now defeat. 


Manuchehr’s Letter to Feraydun 

Manuchehr wrote a letter to King Feraydun, telling him of how the battle had 
gone. He began by invoking God, the lord of righteousness, purity, and justice, 
who is man’s only protection against hardship, and called down his blessings on 
Feraydun, lord of the crown and mace, to whom belong justice, faith, and glory, 
from whose good fortune all righteousness comes, and from whose throne all 
splendor and beauty emanate. He continued, “I reached Turan successfully, and 
we prepared our army for war. We fought three battles in two days, both at night 
and under the shining sun. They tried a night attack but we were ready for them, 
because I had heard that they were going to attempt this trick as a last resort. We 
waylaid them, and I saw to it that their fists closed on nothing but air. As Tur 
retreated I pursued him and flung a spear after him, which pierced his armor, and 
then like the wind I lifted him from his saddle. I hurled him to the ground as if 


he were a monster and severed his head from his worthless body. I send you his 
head, as he once sent that of Prince Iraj in a golden casket. And now I shall deal 
with Salm.” 

He sent a swift messenger with the letter, and when the man arrived his face 
was filled with shame, his eyes with tears, since he wondered how he could 
show the severed head of the king of China to the Persian king, because no 
matter how evil a son might be, or how terrible his crimes, a father’s heart would 
be wrung by such a sight. But he boldly came before the king and set Tur’s head 
down before him. Feraydun called down blessings from the lord of justice on 
Manuchehr. 


Qaren Captures the Castle of the Alans 

News of the battle, and of the darkness that had obscured the moon, reached 
Salm. There was a castle to the rear of his forces, whose walls reached up into 
the blue heavens, and he decided to retreat there, to see how events would 
unfold. Qaren thought that if Salm were to avoid battle and reach this castle, it 
would be a refuge for him, as it was filled with all manner of wealth, and its 
granite walls rose out of the sea and reached up to the clouds, so that it could not 
be over flown even by the legendary homa. Qaren decided to make all haste and 
cut him off before he could do so. 

He hurried to King Manuchehr and said, “If your majesty wishes, and will 
give authority and men to the humblest of his soldiers, I shall corner Salm, who 
can either fight us or attempt to flee. I shall need the royal banner and Tur’s seal 
ring, and with them I shall be able to take Salm’s castle. I and the warrior 
Karshasp, in the darkness of the night, will deal with this matter; but see that you 
say nothing to anyone.” 

When the air turned the color of ebony, they bound the war drums on their 
elephants, and the warriors set off toward the ocean. Qaren gave the command to 
Shirui and said, “I shall go in secret to the castle’s commander, pretending to be 
a messenger. I’1l show him Tur’s seal, and as soon as I’m in the castle, I’ Il 
display the royal banner and draw my sword. You make for the castle, and my 
war cry will be the signal for your attack.” The army waited near the castle, 
while Qaren went forward and showed the castle’s commander Tur’s seal. He 
said, “I’ve come from Tur, who told me to give up all thoughts of comfort and to 
travel night and day until I reached this place, where I am to make common 
cause with you, and take over the defense of the castle. If Manuchehr sends an 
army here with his banner, I’m to hold the castle, and if possible destroy his 


forces.” When the castle’s commander heard these words and saw Tur’s seal 
ring, he opened wide the castle gates, believing what he heard and unaware of 
any subterfuge. He trusted the stranger, and his carelessness cost him his castle 
and his life. 

As day began to dawn, Qaren unfurled the royal banner, as bright as the full 
moon, and uttered his war cry as signals for Shirui and his warriors. Shirui made 
for the castle gates, attacking the defenders, and bestowing crowns of blood on 
them. On the one side stood Qaren, on the other Shirui, above fire flashed from 
swords, beneath lay the waters of the sea, and by the time the sun attained the 
heaven’s summit, the castle was in an uproar and its commander was not to be 
found. It was as if the castle itself had disappeared, and not a ship was to be seen 
on the sea; all that was visible was smoke rising up to the clouds. Fire flared, a 
wind rose, the cries of prisoners suing for quarter could be heard, and as the sun 
went down the sky, the castle was indistinguishable from the surrounding plain. 
Twelve thousand of the enemy were killed, and pitch black smoke billowed up 
from the fire. The whole surface of the sea turned as black as tar, and the plain 
was a river of blood. 


The Attack by Kakui, Zahhak’s Grandson 

Qaren came to Manuchehr and told him of the battle he had fought. Manuchehr 
congratulated him, saying “May you live for ever as lord of your horse, saddle, 
and mace! As soon as you left me another army appeared; I’ve heard that it’s led 
by the evil champion Kakui, a fearsome demon from Dezh Hukht Gang, and a 
grandson of Zahhak. He attacked with a hundred thousand men and cavalry and 
killed some of my lion warriors. And now Salm thinks of fighting, because this 
ally of his has arrived. I haven’t faced him on the battlefield yet, but when he 
attacks I shall know what to make of him.” 

Qaren replied, “My prince, who can oppose you in battle? A leopard’s skin 
will split with terror at the thought of it. Who is this Kakui, what is he? The 
wisdom of my heart, the purity of my mind, will fashion a scheme to deal with 
him, and no one like Kakui will set out against us from Dezh Hukht ever again.” 

Then the blare of trumpets and bugles, the cavalry’s cries, and the din of war 
drums, were heard in the camp. The air turned the color of pitch, the ground that 
of ebony. It was as if diamonds were alive, like tongues of flame flickering in 
the darkness; cries from the give and take of combat sounded on all sides, and 
the air was filled with arrows’ feathers, like a vulture’s maw. Blood congealed 
on the warriors’ hands as they gripped their swords, dripping down from the 


darkened blades; the earth seemed about to heave, like a cresting sea, when 
Kakui sprang forward, yelling his war cry and making straight for Manuchehr 
like a demon. The two faced one another like massive elephants, ready for 
combat. Kakui thrust a spear at Manuchehr’s body; the king’s helmet shuddered 
as the point passed through his armor and exposed his flesh. But Manuchehr 
struck at Kakui’s neck with his sword and split his breastplate. For half the day 
these two blood-soaked men fought, until the sun sank in the sky. They attacked 
like leopards, and their blood was mixed with the dust, so that the plain and 
mountainside were drowned in blood, beyond all measure. Now Manuchehr was 
weary of battle, but he urged his horse forward with his thighs and grasped 
Kakui by the belt, lifting the mammoth warrior from his saddle, and hurled him 
down on the warm ground. He thrust his sword into Kakui’s body, and so the life 
of this headstrong Arab, whose mother had borne him for this evil day, was 
dispersed on the wind. 


Salm Flees and Is Killed by Manuchehr 
Salm’s head was emptied of all thoughts of vengeance, and he and his men fled 
toward the castle. Manuchehr’s army came after them, but the way was so 
clogged with dead and wounded warriors that they had a hard time going 
forward. Mounted on his white charger, the young king was filled with rage; he 
cast off his horse’s barding, to make better speed, and urged his mount into the 
retreating army’s dust. He closed on the king of the West and cried out, “You 
unjust wretch, who killed your brother, who 

Desired his crown, that crown has come to you: 

I’ve brought your crown for you, I’ve brought your throne— 

The splendid tree you planted then has grown: 

Wait for our sovereign Feraydun’s reward, 

Don’t try to flee from me, my noble lord. 

The tree you planted has borne fruit, you’ll see 

Its fruits served up to you immediately: 

You nurtured them, you spun the silk that made 

The thread by which your wretched life’s betrayed.” 


As he shouted he rode forward, drawing level with Salm, and struck at his neck 
with his sword, so that Salm’s body was split in two. He gave orders that the 
head be spitted on a spear and then he raised it into the clouds. Salm’s army was 
astonished at the strength of his arm and dispersed like a flock without a 


shepherd, wandering aimlessly in groups in the plains, mountains, and caves. 
One of their number was a man of some eloquence, and they asked him to go to 
Manuchehr and say, “We are your subjects, and do not tread on the earth but at 
your command. Some of us owned flocks, and some farms and houses, and we 
were forced to join this army. Now we are all the king’s slaves, and our hearts 
and souls are filled with love for him. If he wishes to fight against us and spill 
our blood, we lack the strength to oppose him: we lay our innocent heads before 
the king, at his mercy. He can do whatever he wishes with us, since he is the lord 
of our sinless souls.” 

The wise man repeated all this and Manuchehr listened in astonishment. His 
answer was, “I trample on all unjust desires, and renounce whatever is from 
Ahriman and not from God. Leave my sight, and may evil afflict all demons. 
Whether you are my enemies or my allies and well-wishers, the lord of victory 
has given me authority over you, and the innocent are distinguished from 
evildoers. Today is a day of justice, injustice is no more, and the heads of your 
commanders are safe. Follow the ways of love, and cast away your weapons.” A 
herald cried from the royal pavilion, “Great champions, whose thoughts are 
noble, from now on do not spill blood thoughtlessly, since those who are 
tyrannical suffer an evil fate.” 

The enemy warriors touched their heads to the ground, and then took their 
weapons, armor, helmets, barding, maces, and Indian swords to Pashang’s son, 
heaping them up before him like a mountain. 


Manuchehr Writes a Letter to King Feraydun Manuchehr 
dispatched a messenger bearing the head of the king of the West. He 
wrote a letter to his grandfather, describing his battles and the 
stratagems he had used. He began with praise of the Creator, from 
whom come victory and ability, beneath whose command all good 
and evil occur, who guarantees all oaths, calling down his blessing 
on the wise Feraydun, the king of the earth, destroyer of the plots of 
the wicked, possessed of knowledge and the divine farr. He 
continued, “By the king’s strength I have destroyed the plots of 
those two sorcerers; I have cut off their heads and purified the land 
with my sword’s steel. I shall come after this letter like the wind and 
recount all that has happened.” 


He ordered the warrior Shirui to gather the war booty into one place, load it 
onto elephants, and take all of it to the king. Then he had the brazen drums and 
trumpets sounded, and led his army from the seashore by the Chinese fortress to 
the court of Feraydun. As he approached Tammisheh, his grandfather longed to 
see him; the blare of brass trumpets rang out, and the army stirred in readiness. 
Elephants were loaded with turquoise thrones, and golden howdahs draped with 
Chinese brocade, banners, and fine stuffs, so that the world glittered with scarlet, 
gold, and purple. Like a moving black cloud the army marched from the sea of 
Gilan to Sari; their saddles, shields, and belts were of gold, their stirrups of 
silver. So they went forward, with elephants and treasure, to greet the young 
prince. Men from Gilan followed the army; they were like lions, with golden 
torques and hair as black as musk; in front of the king there were lions and 
elephants, followed by his warriors. 

When Feraydun’s banner appeared, Manuchehr’s army formed its ranks. The 
prince dismounted, like a young sapling that has born new fruit, kissed the 
ground, and made his obeisance to the royal crown, throne, and seal ring. 
Feraydun ordered him to mount his horse, kissed him, and fondled his face with 
his hand. Then he turned his face to the skies and said, “Great lord of justice, 
you have said, ‘I am the just lord, the succor of those who are oppressed.’ You 
have dispensed justice and aided me, bestowing on me this crown and the 
imperial seal ring.” Then he gave commands that Manuchehr sit on the royal 
throne and wear the crown. Shirui brought the captured wealth to the king’s 
court, and Feraydun ordered that it be distributed to the soldiers. 


Having done this he bowed to Fate’s decree— 
The leaf was withered on the royal tree. 

He lived his life in mourning: ceaseless tears 

And constant grief consumed his final years. 
Weeping, the great king said, “My heart’s delight, 
My sons, have turned my day to endless night— 
My sons slain wretchedly before my eyes, 

Since all my plans were evil and unwise . . .” 

And so, heartbroken, weeping for the past, 

He lived tormented till Death came at last. 

O world, from end to end unreal, untrue, 

No wise man can live happily in you— 

But bless’d is he whose good deeds bring him fame; 


Monarch or slave, he leaves a lasting name. 


THE TALE OF SAM AND THE SIMORGH 


The Tale of Sam and the Simorgh 
Now I shall tell an astonishing tale, taken from the stories our ancestors told. See 
what strange events Fate unfolded for Sam: listen well, my son. 

Sam had no child, and his heart grieved at this. There was a beautiful woman 
living in his private quarters; her cheeks were like rose petals, her hair like musk. 
Her face was as splendid as the sun, and Sam had hopes that she would bear him 
a child. And this happened; after some time she gave birth to a beautiful boy, 
whose radiance lit the world, but although his face was as bright as the sun, his 
hair was completely white. Given how the child looked, Sam was not told of his 
birth for a week; all the women of his household wept over the boy, and no one 
dared tell Sam that this beautiful woman had given birth to a son who was an old 
man. Then a courageous wet nurse, who had a lion’s spirit, came bravely before 
Sam and said, “May Sam’s days be prosperous, and the hearts of those who wish 
him ill be torn out. In your women’s quarters, a fine boy has been born from 
your beloved. His body is like pure silver, his face like paradise, and you will 
find no ugly spot on him. His one fault is that his hair is white; such is your fate, 
my lord.” 

Sam descended from his throne and went into the women’s quarters. When 
he saw his son’s white hair he despaired of the world, and lifting his face to the 
heavens, he complained bitterly. “O God, who is above all failings and faults, 
whatever you command is good. If I have committed a grave sin, if I have 
followed the ways of Ahriman, I repent and pray that God will grant me 
forgiveness. My grieving soul writhes with shame, and the hot blood boils in my 
heart. What shall I say about this ill-omened child when men ask about his black 
body, and his hair as white as jasmine? Shall I say he is a demon’s child? He is 
like a leopard, whose skin is of two colors. No longer shall I call down blessings 
on Persia; I shall quit this land for shame.” 

He gave orders that the child be taken far away, to the place where the 
Simorgh has her home. They took the boy and laid him down in the mountains, 


then returned to the court. The day ended, and the champion’s innocent son had 
no knowledge of white or black; his father had cast all kindness from his heart 
and acted evilly toward his unweaned child. 

When the Simorgh’s chicks grew hungry, she flew up from her nest; she saw 
an unweaned, crying baby lying on the ground; his cradle was of thorns, his wet 
nurse was the earth, he was naked, and no milk touched his lips. The black earth 
surrounded him, and above his head the sun shone in the summit of the heavens. 
Would that his mother and father had been leopards; they at least would have 
shaded him from the sun. The Simorgh flew down from the clouds, stretched out 
her claws and clutched him, lifting him up from the hot stones on which he lay. 
She flew with him back to her nest in the Alborz mountains, where she intended 
to take him to her chicks, thinking they could feed off him and pay no attention 
to his cries. But God had other plans, so that when the Simorgh and her chicks 
looked at the little child weeping bitter tears, something wonderful to relate 
happened: they took pity on him, staring in astonishment at his lovely face. She 
sought out the most delicate morsels of the chase for the boy, touching them to 
his lips, and in this way many days passed and the child grew into a fine young 
man. Men with caravans passing through the mountains would catch sight of this 
noble youth, whose body was like a cypress tree, whose chest was like a 
mountain of silver, and whose waist was as slim as a reed. Rumors of him spread 
through the world, since neither good nor evil ever remain hidden, and news of 
this glorious youth reached Sam, the son of Nariman. 


The Dream of Sam, the Son of Nariman 

One night Sam was asleep, his heart wearied with the cares of the world. He 
dreamed of a man from India, galloping toward him on an Arab horse, who 
brought him good news of that noble sapling his son. When he woke he 
summoned his priests and told them of the dream and of the rumors he had 
heard. “What do you say to this?” he asked. “What does your wisdom make of 
The” 

Young and old, all those present, said to Sam, “Lions and leopards in their 
stony lairs, the fish and the monsters of the sea, all love and nourish their 
children and give thanks to God for them; you have broken this bond of 
benevolence in casting out your innocent child. Turn to God and repent, since he 
is the guide to good and evil.” 

When dark night came and Sam slept again, his heart was filled with turmoil. 
In his dream he saw a banner fluttering on a mountain in India. Then a beautiful 


slave appeared, leading a mighty army; a priest was on his left, and a wise sage 
on his right. One of these two came forward and said coldly to Sam, 
“Presumptuous and immoral man, you have washed shame before God from 
your heart and eyes; what kind of a hero are you, if a bird has nourished your 
son? If it is a fault to have white hair, look at yourself, whose beard is white and 
whose hair is like the leaves of the willow. You despised your son, but God has 
been his protector, loving him more than a wet nurse would, while you were 
devoid of affection for him.” Sam cried out in his sleep, like a lion caught in a 
trap. 

When he woke, Sam called his counselors and the leaders of his army and set 
off for the mountains to reclaim what he had rejected. He saw a mountain whose 
peak reached the Pleiades, and on it a great nest woven from ebony and 
sandalwood. Sam stared at the granite slopes, at the terrifying Simorgh, and at its 
fearsome nest, which was like a palace towering in the clouds, but one not built 
by men’s hands or from clay and water. He bowed his face down to the dirt, 
praising God who had created this bird, and this mountain whose slopes reached 
to the stars, acknowledging him as just and all powerful. He looked for a way to 
climb the mountain, seeking out wild animals’ tracks, and said, “O you who are 
higher than all high places, than thought itself and the sun and moon, if this 
youth is indeed from my loins, and not the seed of some evil demon, help me to 
climb this mountain.” 

The Simorgh said to Sam’s son, “You have endured the hardship of growing 
up in this nest, and now your father, great Sam, who is a champion among 
heroes, has come to this mountain searching for his son; he honors and values 
you now. I must give you back, and return you to him safe and sound.” Listen to 
the youth’s answer: “You have tired of my friendship, then? Your nest has been 
a noble home for me, and two of your feathers have been a glorious crown for 
me.” The Simorgh replied, “When you see the throne and crown and the 
ceremonial of the Kayanid court, this nest will mean nothing to you. Go, see 
what fate has in store for you. Take these feathers of mine with you, so that you 
will always live under my protection, since I brought you up beneath my wings 
with my own children. If any trouble comes to you, if there is talk of good and 
ill, throw one of my feathers into the fire, and my glory will at once appear to 
you. I shall come to you in the guise of a black cloud and bring you safely back 
here.” 

Then she hardened her heart for their parting and lifted him up, soaring into 
the clouds, and set him down before his father. The youth’s hair reached below 


his chest, his body was like a mammoth’s, and his cheeks were as fresh as the 
spring. When his father saw him he wept, bowing his head before the Simorgh 
and paying homage to her. He stared at the youth, from head to foot, and saw 
that he was worthy of the Kayanid crown and throne. His chest and arms were 
like a lion’s, his face like the sun, his heart was a champion’s, and his arm was 
that of a swordsman. His eyebrows were pitch black, his lips like coral, and his 
cheeks the color of blood. Sam’s heart felt the happiness of paradise, and he 
called down blessings on his son. He draped the boy’s body in a champion’s 
cloak, and they set off down the mountain. When they reached its base, Sam had 
a horse and royal clothes brought for his son; the army ranged itself before Sam, 
their hearts filled with happiness, and they set off on the return journey, 
preceded by elephants bearing drummers. The air filled with dust as they 
traveled, and the blare of trumpets, the din of drums, the clash of Indian 
cymbals, and the cavalry’s cries accompanied them as they joyfully entered the 
city. 


Manuchehr Hears of Sam’s Expedition 

The king heard that Sam had returned from the mountains in splendor: 
Manuchehr was pleased and thanked God for this good news. He sent Nozar 
hurrying to Sam to offer his congratulations and to tell Sam to come to the king 
so that he might see the face of this youth who had been brought up in a nest; 
then he could return to Zavolestan, to serve the king there. 

Nozar reached Sam and saw the hero’s son with him; Sam dismounted and 
the two embraced. He asked for news of the king and his warriors, and Nozar 
handed over his message. Sam kissed the ground and immediately set off for the 
court, as his king had commanded. Manuchehr came out with his entourage to 
greet him, and as soon as Sam saw Manuchehr’s banner he dismounted and went 
forward on foot. Manuchehr ordered him to mount his horse, and the two set off 
together for the Persian court. Manuchehr sat in state on the throne and placed 
the royal crown on his head; on one side of him sat Qaren, on the other Sam. 
Then the chamberlain ushered in Sam’s son, Zal, splendidly dressed, with a 
golden crown on his head, and bearing a golden mace. The king stared in wonder 
at his fine stature and handsome face, which seemed made to delight all hearts. 
He said to Sam, “Look after him well, for my sake; never cross him, rejoice in 
no one but him; he has the royal farr, the strength of a lion, a wise heart, and a 
sage’s manner.” 


And then Sam told the king of how and why 

He had decided that his child should die; 

He told him of the Simorgh and her nest, 

Of his regret, and his belated quest 

To find his son; throughout the world men heard 
Of Sam and Zal, and of this wondrous bird. 


The king gave orders that sages, astrologers, and priests should inquire into Zal’s 
horoscope, to see what the stars decreed for him. The astrologers studied the 
stars and said, “May you live forever in prosperity; he will be a famous 
champion, proud and intelligent, and a fine horseman.” The king rejoiced to hear 
these words, and Sam’s heart too was freed from sorrow. Manuchehr gave Sam a 
robe of honor which drew praise from everyone, as well as Arab horses with 
golden saddles, Indian swords in golden scabbards, brocades, silks, fine carpets, 
rubies, and gold; slaves from the west dressed in Western brocade with jeweled 
designs on a golden ground; trays of emeralds, golden and silver goblets set with 
turquoise and filled with musk, camphor, and saffron; cuirasses, helmets, 
barding, spears, arrows, bows, and maces; thrones worked in turquoise and 
ivory, ruby seal rings, and golden belts. And then he wrote and sealed a charter 
full of celestial praise for Sam, bestowing on him lordship over Kabol, Danbar, 
Mai, and India, the Sea of China as far as the Sea of Send, as well as Zavolestan 
as far as Bost. 

When he had received the charter and these gifts, Sam called for his horse, 
rose and said to the king, “Kind king, lord of justice and righteousness, in this 
world, from the realm of the fish to the sphere of the moon, no one like you has 
ever reigned; no one has had your generosity, justice, nobility, and wisdom. The 
world is at peace because of you, you treat its treasures with contempt, and may 
the day never come when only your name remains to us.” He bowed and kissed 
the throne, and then had the drums strapped on his elephants. All the town turned 
out to watch as he and Zal set off for Zavolestan. As he approached, news of his 
investiture preceded him, and the inhabitants decorated Sistan as though it were 
a paradise; the ground was of musk, the bricks of gold, and as Sam passed, 
people tossed musk, saffron, and gold and silver coins over him. The world was 
filled with rejoicing, with both the nobles and the common people joining in. All 
the nobility came before Sam saying, “May the young man’s arrival here be 
auspicious,” and then they called down blessings on Zal and showered him with 
gold coins. 


Then Sam took his ease with wine and music, bestowing robes of honor on 
the wise and the noble, and all his courtiers competed to be honored the most. 


Sam Bestows His Realm on Zal 

Sam summoned the experienced men of the country to speak with them. “Noble 
and prudent advisors,” he said, “the wise king’s orders are that I lead an army to 
invade the Gorgsaran and Mazanderan. However, my heart and soul, my son, 
will remain here, while my eyes weep bitter tears at our separation. In my youth 
and arrogance I acted unjustly. God gave me a son and I abandoned him; in my 
ignorance I did not realize his worth. The great Simorgh took him, God assigned 
him to her care, and she brought him up until he was like a lofty cypress; I 
reviled him, she valued him. When the time had come for me to be pardoned, 
God returned him to me. Know that this youth is my refuge, and I leave him 
among you to remind you of me. Treat him well, advise him well, show him the 
path to a noble life.” 

Then Sam turned to Zal and said, “Act justly and generously; this is the way 
to seek happiness. Know then that Zavolestan is your home; all this realm is 
under your command. See that the land flourishes beneath your reign, and that 
you make your friends’ hearts rejoice. The keys of the treasury are yours, and 
my heart will be glad or sorrowful according to how you prosper or fail.” Young 
Zal said to Sam, “How can I live without you now? Now that we have been 
reconciled, how can you contemplate separation again? If ever a man was born 
in sin, I am that man, and it is right that justice is denied me. I ate dirt and tasted 
blood once, held in the great bird’s claws; now I am far from my protector, and it 
is Fate that protects me. Of the world’s flowers, my share is only thorns, but one 
cannot fight against God’s decrees.” 

Sam said, “It is right to say what is in your heart like this; say it, say whatever 
you wish. But the astrologers have seen that a good star guides you, and they 
have said that here is your home, here is your army, and here is your crown. We 
cannot quarrel with the heavens, and it is here that your love must flourish. Now, 
gather a group of companions about you, horsemen and men eager for 
knowledge; learn from them, listen to them, gain all kinds of knowledge, and 
taste the pleasures they bring. Enjoy life and be generous, seek knowledge and 
be just.” He spoke, and the din of drums rang out; the air turned pitch black, the 
ground was the color of ebony, and the ringing of bells and the clash of Indian 
cymbals was heard before the king’s pavilion. Sam gathered his forces and set 
off for war. Zal accompanied him for two stages of the way, and then his father 


clasped him tightly in his arms and wept extravagantly. He commanded his son 
to return with happiness in his heart to the crown and throne. Zal took the 
journey home, pondering on how he could live so that he would leave a good 
name behind him. 

He took his place on the ivory throne and placed the glittering crown on his 
head, resplendent with armbands and an ox-headed mace, a golden torque and 
golden belt. He was eager to learn and summoned knowledgeable men from 
every province, astrologers and priests as well as warriors and horsemen, and 
discussed all manner of subjects with them. Day and night he was closeted with 
them, discussing both weighty and trivial matters. Zal grew to be so learned that 
he was like a shining star; in all the world, no one had ever seen another man 
with his knowledge and understanding. And so the heavens turned, spreading a 
canopy of love over Sam and Zal. 


THE TALE OF ZAL AND RUDABEH 


Zal Visits Mehrab in Kabol 

One day Zal decided to travel about his kingdom, and he set out with an 
entourage of like-minded companions. They traveled toward India, Kabol, 
Danbar, Morgh, and Mai. They built palaces as they went, and called for wine 
and musicians to entertain them; they spent liberally, driving away all thoughts 
of sorrow, as is the way of those who live in this fleeting world. They reached 
Kabol, traveling in splendor, laughing, and with happiness in their hearts. The 
king there was Mehrab, a shrewd, wealthy man, who was fortunate in his 
dealings. He was as tall and elegant as a cypress tree, his face was as fresh as the 
springtime, and his gait was like a pheasant’s. His heart was wise, his mind 
prudent; his shoulders were those of a warrior, and his mind that of a priest. 
When he heard of Zal’s approach he left Kabol at dawn, taking treasure, richly 
caparisoned horses, slaves, and various other kinds of wealth such as gold coins, 
rubies, musk, ambergris, brocades woven with gold, silks, and samites, a crown 
encrusted with royal jewels, and a golden torque set with emeralds. 

Hearing that a splendid welcoming party was coming to greet him, Zal went 
forward to receive them and entertained them with all due ceremony. He sat 
Mehrab on a turquoise-studded throne, a marvelous feast was spread before the 
two princes, and as the wine steward poured their wine, Zal took stock of 
Mehrab. He liked what he saw, and his heart was attracted by the king’s 
behavior: when he stood up from the table, Zal saw how well built he was and 
said to his courtiers, “What finer man binds on a nobleman’s belt than this?” 
One of the courtiers spoke: “In purdah, and unseen by anyone, 

He has a daughter lovelier than the sun. 
Lashes like ravens’ wings protect a pair 

Of eyes like wild narcissi hidden there; 

If you would seek the moon, it is her face; 
If you seek musk, her hair’s its hiding place. 
She is a paradise, arrayed in splendor, 
Glorious, graceful, elegantly slender.” 


Zal’s heart began to seethe, and all peace and good sense departed from him. 
Night came and Zal sat plunged in thought, unable to sleep or eat for thinking of 
this girl whom he had never seen. 

When the sun’s sword touched the mountain tops, and the world’s surface 
became the color of pale topaz, Zal held court and Mehrab came to visit him. As 
he approached, a cry of “Clear the way” went up, and Mehrab entered, like a tree 


that bears fresh fruit. Zal was pleased to see him and made much of him, 
honoring him more than anyone else present. He said, “Ask me for anything you 
wish, be it thrones, seal rings, swords, or crowns.” Mehrab replied, “My king 
whom all obey, you are noble and victorious, and I have only one wish from 
you, one that will not be hard for you to fulfill, which is that you come as a 
happy guest to my palace, which you will illuminate like the sun itself.” 

Zal answered, “This is not advisable, your palace is not a place for me. Sam 
would not approve, and neither would King Manuchehr if he heard of it, if I 
became drunk with wine in the house of someone who worships idols. I’ll listen 
favorably to anything else you ask.” Mehrab made his obeisance before Zal, but 
in his heart he called him a faithless wretch. He strode from the court, calling 
down blessings on his host. Zal watched him go, and praised him according to 
custom, but because they were of different faiths, he kept his remarks to a 
minimum. None of the Persians looked kindly on Mehrab, since they considered 
him to be an idolatrous demon, but when they saw Zal speaking to him in such a 
friendly fashion, they one by one said favorable things about him, in particular 
that his women’s quarters housed someone who was incomparable in her stature, 
beauty, dignity, and all that pertained to loveliness. Zal’s heart was suddenly 
seized by the madness of longing, wisdom fled from his mind, and love 
flourished there. The chief of the Arabs, the lord of righteousness, has said of 
such matters, “Whilst I’m alive my partner is my horse, 

Beneath the heavens my life will take its course, 
I'll never marry, to hear wise men speak 
Of me as one who’s wanton, frail, and weak.” 


Zal’s heart became weary with the thoughts that beset him; his heart writhed at 
the thought of the gossip that was said of him, and the shame his passion might 
bring. And so the heavens turned, and Zal’s heart became filled to the brim with 
love. 


Rudabeh Talks with Her Slave Girls 

At dawn one day Mehrab went to his women’s quarters, where he saw two suns; 
one was his wife, Sindokht, and the other his lovely daughter, Rudabeh. Their 
apartments were decked out like a colorful garden in spring, filled with sweet 
perfumes and elegance. Mehrab was astonished at how lovely Rudabeh had 
grown, and he repeated the name of God over her as a blessing. She was like a 
cypress tree topped by the full moon, a moon that was crowned by her musky 


hair. She was dressed in brocade and jewels, and she seemed like a paradise 
filled with everything desirable. Sindokht said to her husband, “May evil never 
harm you; open your lovely lips and tell us where have you been today. Tell us 
what kind of person Sam’s son is, this visitor who has an old man’s hair. Does 
he belong on a throne, or in that nest where he was raised? Does he seem like a 
man at all? Does he follow in the footsteps of famous men who do noble deeds?” 
Mehrab replied, “My silver cypress, no hero in the world is worthy to follow in 
Zal’s footsteps: You’ll see no other horseman to compare 

With Zal, he has no equal anywhere. 

As ruddy as the pomegranate flower— 

Youthful, and with a young man’s luck and power; 

Fierce in revenge, and in the saddle he’s 

A sharp-clawed dragon to his enemies; 

Possessed of mammoth strength, a lion’s guile, 

His arms are mighty as the flooding Nile; 

He scatters gold when he’s in court, and when 

He’s on the battlefield, the heads of men. 

He has one fault—which after all’s so slight 

No one remarks on it—his hair is white.” 


Rudabeh had five kind Turkish slaves who were her confidantes. She said to 
these shrewd girls, “All five of you are my friends and know my heart and I wish 
all of you luck in your lives. I’m going to tell you a secret: I’m in love, and my 
love is like a wave of the sea that’s cresting up toward heaven. My bright heart is 
filled with thoughts of Sam’s son, and even when I sleep he never leaves me. 
The place in my heart where I should feel shame is filled instead with love, and 
day and night I think of his face. Now, help me, what do you think, what do you 
advise? You must think of some scheme, some way to free my heart and soul 
from this agony of adoration.” 

Her slave girls were astonished at this behavior from someone of Rudabeh’s 
rank. They rose up like Ahriman and answered her forthrightly: “You are the 
crown of all the princesses in the world, praised from India to China, the jewel 
of your father’s household; no cypress has your stature, the Pleiades are not as 
lovely as your face, your portrait has been sent from Qanuj to the king of the 
western lands. Have you no shame, have you considered what this would mean 
to your father? Do you want to embrace someone who has driven your father 
from his embrace, someone who was brought up by a bird in the mountains, who 


is a byword among men for his strangeness? No one has ever been born from his 
mother as an old man, and such a person will not have descendants. How can a 
young girl, whose lips are the color of coral, want to marry an old man? The 
world is filled with love for you, and your portrait is found in every palace; your 
face and hair and form are so lovely that the sun itself should descend from the 
fourth sphere to be your husband.” 

When Rudabeh heard their words, her heart beat fast, like a fire fanned by the 
wind. She shouted at them in fury, screwing up her eyes, her face trembling, her 
forehead filled with frowns, her eyebrows bent like a bow. “It’s pointless to 
listen to such foolish talk; I don’t want the Chinese emperor, nor the king of the 
West, nor the king of Persia. Sam’s son, Zal, is the man I want; with his lion-like 
strength and stature, he is my equal. Call him old or young, he will be body and 
soul to me.” The slave girls were taken aback by her response and said with one 
voice, “We are your slaves. Our hearts are filled with our love for you. We await 
your orders, from which nothing but good can come. May a hundred thousand 
like us sacrifice their lives for you, and may all the wisdom in the world come to 
your aid. May your black-eyed servants be filled with humility, and their faces 
blush with shame. If we must learn magic we will learn it, flying with birds and 
running with deer, seeling our eyes with spells and incantations, so that we can 
bring this prince to your side.” Rudabeh’s red lips smiled, and turning her 
saffron cheeks to them, she said, “If you bring us to one another’s arms, and 
keep the promise you have made, you will be planting a noble tree whose daily 
fruit will be rubies.” 


Rudabeh’s Slaves Go to See Zal 

Then her slaves set about thinking of some way to help their helpless princess. 
They dressed themselves in Rumi brocade and wore chaplets of flowers in their 
hair. The five of them went down to the river bank, and in their tints and scents 
they were as lovely as the spring. It was the month of Farvardin, when the sun 
moves into Aries, and the year is renewed. Zal had come to the riverside to hunt; 
on the opposite bank the slave girls paused to pick flowers, and their own faces 
were like flowers as they gathered the blossoms into their arms. Zal watched 
from his throne and asked, “Who are those girls, who seem so fond of flowers?” 
A courtier answered, “They are from Mehrab’s palace; his daughter, whom 
people call the moon of Kabol, has sent them to gather flowers.” Zal went closer 
to the girls and asked for his bow. On foot he approached the ducks swimming in 
the river and drew back the string from his bow; he watched for when one of the 


birds flew up from the river and then loosed an arrow at it. He brought it down in 
mid-flight, and its blood dripped into the river, reddening the water. One of the 
girls said to Zal’s servant boy, who went to fetch the bird, “Who is that lion of a 
man? What kind of a man is he who shot that arrow, and whose king is he? Who 
would dare oppose such a warrior? We haven’t seen a finer knight than he is, or 
a better shot with a bow.” The handsome boy bit his lip and said, “Don’t talk 
about the king like that. He’s the king of Zabolestan, Sam’s son, and his name is 
Zal. The heavens don’t turn above a finer knight, and the world will never see 
anyone more noble than he is.” The girl smiled at the handsome boy and said, 
“Don’t be so sure. There’s a princess in Mehrab’s palace who is finer by far than 
your king. Her stature is like a teak tree’s, her color is that of ivory, and she 
wears on her head the crown of musk that God has given her. Her eyes are like 
two dark narcissi, her eyebrows are like a bow, her nose is like a silver reed, her 
mouth is small, like the contracted heart of a desperate man, and her hair falls in 
ringlets to her feet. Her mouth is so tiny that her breath can scarcely find passage 
there, and there is no one in all the world who is her equal for beauty. We have 
come here so that her ruby lips can become acquainted with the lips of Sam’s 
son.” 

The boy left them and returned to Zal, who asked him what the girl had said 
that had made him smile so much and show his silver teeth in his blushing face. 
The boy told Zal what he had heard, and the hero’s heart grew young at his 
words. He said to his handsome page, “Go and tell the girls to wait for a 
moment, so that they can take jewels with them as well as flowers.” He asked for 
gold and silver coins, and jewels from his treasury, as well as five sets of clothes 
made of golden brocade. He told the boy to take these to the girls, but to do so 
secretly and tell no one, and to say to them that they shouldn’t go back to the 
castle just yet because he had a message he wished to send. Slaves took the gifts 
to the girls and told them what Zal had said. One of the girls said to the page, 
“Words never remain secret for long unless they are between just two people. 
With three people they are no longer a secret, and four is like a crowd. Tell your 
prince that if he has a secret to impart, he should tell me face to face.” Then the 
girls said to one another, “The lion has walked into the trap; now Rudabeh will 
have her heart’s desire, and Zal shall have his, and everything has turned out for 
the best.” 

Zal’s black-eyed treasurer, who was also his confidant in this matter, returned 
to the prince and told him all he had heard from the girls. Zal made his way to 
the beds of flowers on the riverbank, in hopes of arranging a meeting with 


Rudabeh. The princess’s beautiful slave girls presented themselves and made 
their obeisance to him. Zal questioned them about their mistress, asking about 
her stature and beauty, her manner of speaking and wisdom, wanting to know if 
she was worthy of him. “Tell me everything,” he said, “and see that you don’t 
try to deceive me. If I find that you’ve spoken honestly, you’|l be honored and 
rewarded, but if I find that you’ve lied in even the smallest detail, I’Il have you 
trampled beneath the feet of elephants.” The girls’ faces turned the color of red 
juniper berries, and they kissed the ground before him. One of them said, “No 
noble mother has ever borne a man as fine as Sam, not in looks or stature, 
knowledge or purity of heart; and who is there to compare with you, brave lord, 
with your massive frame and lion strength? And thirdly, there is Rudabeh, whose 
face is like the moon, whose body is a silver cypress tree adorned in tints and 
scents; she is a rose, a jasmine flower, from head to foot, and her face is as 
radiant as Canopus shining above the Yemen. From the silver dome of her 
forehead her hair cascades in fragrant coils, looped with rubies and emeralds, 
down to her feet, her curls are links of musk entwined one with another, her ten 
fingers are silver reeds steeped in civet. You will see no idol as beautiful as she 
is in all of China; the moon and the Pleiades bow down before her.” 

The prince spoke urgently, but sweetly and gently, to a slave girl. “Tell me 
some way that I can reach her; my heart and soul are filled with love for her, and 
I long to glimpse her face.” The slave girl answered, “With your permission, we 
shall return to the castle; we are all smitten with your glory, your handsomeness, 
and your words’ sincerity. We shall report everything, changing nothing. We 
shall bring her musky head into your trap; we shall bring her lips to the lips of 
Sam’s son. May the prince come to the castle walls with a lariat; he can loop it 
on the battlements, and so like a lion happily pursue his prey.” 


The Slave Girls Return to Rudabeh 

The girls went on their way, and Zal returned to his camp; as he waited for the 
night it seemed to him that a year passed by. The girls reached the castle, each of 
them holding two posies of flowers. When the doorman saw them he grumbled; 
impatient words came from his troubled heart: “This is no time to be gadding 
about away from the castle. I’m astonished at your behavior.” The girls 
responded in just as lively a fashion: “Today is different from any other day. 
There are no demons lying in wait among the blossoms. Spring has come and we 
have been to pick flowers; we have gathered these hyacinths.” The doorman 
said, “This is no day to be doing such things. Zal’s tents are no longer in 


Zabolestan; didn’t you see the king of Kabol ride out from the castle to greet 
him? If he should come across you with these flowers in your hands, he’d knock 
you to the ground there and then.” 

The girls entered the castle and went to the princess, where they sat to tell her 
their secrets. They showed her the brocade and jewels Zal had given them, and 
Rudabeh asked about every detail of their encounter. “How did your meeting 
with Zal go?” she asked. “Has people’s gossip exaggerated his qualities, or is he 
even better when you see him face to face?” The five girls all began to speak at 
once, vying for who should tell the princess what they had seen. “He’s like a tall 
cypress tree; everything about him is elegant, and he radiates royal glory. The 
colors he wears, the perfumes, his height and build; he’s a knight with a slim 
waist and a noble chest. His eyes are like two pitch-black narcissi, his lips are 
like coral, his cheeks ruddy as blood. His shoulders and trunk are like a lion’s, 
his thighs are massive, his heart is learned, and he has a king’s dignity. His hair 
is completely white; this is his only fault, and really it’s nothing to be ashamed 
of; his curls are like silver links coiled together about his face, which is like the 
blossoms of the Judas tree. You think, ‘He’s just as he should be; and if he 
weren’t like this he wouldn’t inspire such love.’ We told him he could see you, 
and he went back to his camp with his heart filled with hope. Now you must get 
ready to receive your guest, and tell us what answer we should take back to 
him.” 

The princess said to her slaves, “Then he’s different from what people say. 
This Zal, who was brought up by a bird and was a youth who had withered 
away, with the head of an old man, has become as lovely as the blossoms of a 
Judas tree, tall and elegant, with a handsome face, from head to foot a hero. So, 
you boasted about my face to him, and reaped the reward for your words.” As 
she spoke her lips broke into smiles, and her cheeks blushed the color of 
pomegranate blossoms. The slave girls said, “But now get ready, because God 
has granted your desires, and we pray that everything will turn out well.” 

Rudabeh’s palace was as pleasant as springtime, and on its walls there were 
portraits of famous men. She had one of its room decorated with Chinese 
brocade, and she placed golden trays heaped with agates and emeralds there. 
Then she mixed wine, musk, and ambergris together and decorated the area with 
violets, narcissi, the blossoms of the Judas tree, branches of jasmine, and 
hyacinths. The drinking vessels were of gold set with turquoise, and held rose 
water. Rudabeh’s face was as radiant as the sun, and the scents in her room rose 
up to the sun’s sphere. 


When the shining sun set, the doors to the private quarters of the castle were 
locked, and the keys hidden away. One of the slave girls went to Zal and said, 
“Everything is ready: come.” The prince set off for the castle with all the haste 
and anxiety of a man going to meet his beloved. Rudabeh went onto the roof and 
stood there like a cypress tree topped by the full moon. When she saw Zal in the 
distance, she called out to him, “Welcome, bold young man. God’s blessings be 
upon you, and may you tread on the heavens. I wish my slave girls happy hearts, 
because from head to foot you are as they described. But you have walked here 
from your pavilion, and I am afraid your royal feet have been irked by this.” Zal 
heard her voice and, looking up, caught sight of her face; the roof shone with its 
light, and the earth glowed like a ruby. He answered her, “Heaven’s blessings be 
upon you; your face is as lovely as the full moon. How many nights I have 
passed gazing at the stars, crying out to God, asking that he grant me a glimpse 
of your face. Now your voice and your sweet words have made my heart happy. 
But find some way for us to meet; how can I stay down here when you are on the 
battlements?” 

Hearing his words, she loosened her hair, which cascaded down, tumbling 
like snakes, loop upon loop. She said, “Come, take these black locks which I let 
down for you, and use them to climb up to me.” Zal gazed in astonishment at her 
face and hair, and said, “This would not be just. May the day never dawn when I 
strike at my soul like this, thrusting my spear into a wounded heart.” He took a 
lariat from his page, looped it, and hurled it upwards without saying another 
word; the lariat caught on the battlements, and Zal quickly climbed up its sixty 
cubits. As he stepped onto the roof Rudabeh made her obeisance before him, 
then grasped his hands in hers. As if they were in a drunken stupor, they clasped 
hands and descended from the roof to Rudabeh’s golden chamber, which glowed 
like a paradise. Rudabeh’s slave girls stood before their houri, and Zal stared in 
wonder at her face, her hair, her stature, her splendor, her bracelets, her necklace 
and earrings, at her brocade dress woven with jewels like a garden in spring 
dotted with flowers. Her cheeks were like red tulips surrounded by jasmine, her 
face was surmounted by curl upon curl of musky hair. A sword-belt across his 
chest and wearing a diadem of rubies, Zal sat in princely splendor beside this 
glorious moon of beauty. For a while there was nothing but kisses, embraces, 
and wine; but then Zal said to Rudabeh, “If Manuchehr hears of this he will not 
agree to it, and Sam too will be loud in his opposition. But I despise their 
opinions and am ready to die if need be. I swear by almighty God that I shall 
never break faith with you. I shall pray before God as his slave, asking that he 


wash all anger and thoughts of vengeance from Sam’s and Manuchehr’s hearts. 
God will grant my request, and all the world will know you as my wife.” 
Rudabeh replied, “And I too swear before God, and may he witness what I say, 
that no one shall be my master but Zal, the world’s hero, the crowned prince on 
his throne, the lord of beauty and royal splendor.” 


From moment then to moment their desire 

Gained strength, and wisdom fled before love’s fire; 
Passion engulfed them, and these lovers lay 
Entwined together till the break of day. 

So tightly they embraced, before Zal left, 

Zal was the warp, and Rudabeh the weft 

Of one cloth, as with tears they said goodbye 

And cursed the sun for rising in the sky. 

Zal let himself down from the battlements, 

And made his way back to his army’s tents. 


Zal Consults with His Priests About Rudabeh 

When the glittering sun rose above the mountain peaks, the warriors visited their 
prince and then each went his own way. Zal sent a messenger to summon 
knowledgeable men and priests to his court, and when they arrived he smiled, 
and with his heart filled with happiness he gave thanks to God who had woken 
his sleeping good fortune. Then he said, “Our hearts are filled with hope and fear 
of God; we hope for his grace and we fear sin, praising him to the best of our 
abilities, praying before him night and day. It is he who guides the sun and moon 
and leads our souls in the path of righteousness, who maintains the world which 
gives us such pleasure, who administers justice in this world and the world to 
come, who brings spring, summer, and autumn, who burdens trees with fruit and 
vines with grapes, who gives young men their power and beauty and old men the 
frowns on their faces, whose commands no man can gainsay since not an ant 
treads the earth without him. The world’s peoples increase by coming together 
as couples, since a single person can produce no offspring. Only God is alone, 
having neither companion nor mate nor friend. All of creation lives in couples, 
and this is how being emerges from the hidden realm; this is so throughout the 
world, this is the heavens’ will. If there were no couples in the world, authority 
would remain hidden; we see that no young man lives alone, and this is 
especially true if he is of good family, since then his might would pass from him. 


What is sweeter in the world than for a hero’s soul to be gladdened by his 
children? And when the time comes for him to die, his life is renewed in his 
child; his name remains behind, so that men say, “This is the son of Zal’ and 
‘That is the son of Sam.’ A son is an ornament to the crown and the throne; the 
man dies but his fortune lives on in his son. 

“All this is my story; this is the rose, the narcissus, the flower at the heart of 
my tale. My heart has been snatched from me, my wisdom has fled; look at me 
now and tell me what medicine can cure me. I have not said this lightly, my 
mind is deeply troubled; my love is centered on Mehrab’s palace, his land is like 
the heavens to me, and my heart is fixed on Sindokht’s daughter. Now, what do 
you say to this? Will Sam agree to it? Will King Manuchehr? Will he consider it 
to be youthful impetuosity, or a sin? When a man seeks a wife, be he a 
commoner or a nobleman, he does what religion and custom demand; this is the 
way of faith, it is not a matter for shame, and no wise man quarrels with it. You 
are sages and learned priests, what do you say to me, what do you advise?” 

But the priests and sages said nothing, their lips remained sealed, because 
Zahhak was Mehrab’s grandfather, and the king had no love for him in his heart. 
No one said anything openly, but they thought, “How can wholesome food be 
joined with poison?” When Zal heard nothing from them, he was angered and 
tried another tactic. He said, “I know that when you consider this you blame me, 
but any man who makes a decision will hear himself blamed. If you will guide 
me in this, and free me from these chains, I shall do such things for you as no 
prince has ever done for his subjects.” 

Then the priests answered that they wished him well and desired his 
happiness. They said, “We are all your slaves, and it’s our surprise that has 
silenced us. Mehrab is a nobleman, a warrior, and not to be taken lightly. He is 
descended from Zahhak, who was a demon, but even so he was the king of the 
Arabs. If Mehrab’s ancestry doesn’t trouble you, his family is not one to be 
ashamed of. You must write a letter to Sam—in this matter your wisdom is 
greater than ours and you will know what to say—so that he in turn will write to 
King Manuchehr, giving his opinion; Manuchehr will not ignore Sam’s advice 
on such a matter.” 


Zal Writes a Letter to His Father Sam 

Zal called for a scribe and poured out the contents of his heart. He began with 
praise of the world’s just Creator, from whom come happiness and strength, who 
is the lord of the evening star, of Saturn and of the sun, of all that is and is not, 


who is one and whose slaves we are. He went on, “I invoke his blessing on Sam, 
the lord of the mace, the sword and helmet, who makes his grey horse curvet on 
the battlefield and leaves food there for the vultures, whose presence is a mighty 
wind in war, who rains down swords from the storm clouds, who distributes 
crowns and royal belts and places kings on their golden thrones; a man of all 
able qualities, and the greatest of these is his wisdom. I am as a slave to him, and 
my heart and soul are filled with love for him. I was born as he saw me to be, 
and the heavens dealt unjustly with me. While my father lived in comfort, in 
silks and samites, the Simorgh bore me to the mountains of India where she 
treated me as one of her squabs, and I depended on the food she hunted. My skin 
was burned by the wind, my eyes were blinded by dust, and though men said I 
was the son of Sam, he lived in glory while I lived in a nest, because God had 
ordained this. No one can escape God’s justice, even though he fly beyond the 
clouds. A warrior’s teeth can be like anvils, he might be able to crush a lance 
with them, his voice might make a lion’s skin split with terror, but still he must 
obey God’s will. Something heartbreaking has happened to me, something 
which men will not praise me for. But if my father, who is a brave man and a 
dragon in his wrath, will hear me out, all will be well. 

“T weep for the daughter of Mehrab, I burn in the fire of my love for her. In 
the dark night the stars are my companions, my heart seethes in turmoil like the 
sea, I am beside myself with grief, and all men weep for me. My heart has seen 
injustice but I breathe only to obey you. You are the world’s hero, what do you 
command? Free me from this pain, this agony of soul; let me marry Mehrab’s 
daughter, according to our rites and customs. When you brought me from the 
Alborz mountains, you swore before your courtiers that you would never oppose 
me in my desires, and this is the one desire of my heart.” 

An envoy took three horses and set off as swiftly as fire from Kabol. Zal gave 
him his orders: “If one horse stumbles, you should not delay for an instant; 
mount another and press onward, until you’re in Sam’s presence.” The 
messenger sped off like the wind, and when he reached the land of the 
Gorgsaran he saw Sam in the distance, hunting with his cheetahs on the 
mountain slopes. Sam caught sight of him and said to his companions, “A 
horseman is riding here from Kabol, and the mount he’s riding is from 
Zavolestan. He must be an envoy from Zal; we should find out what he has to 
say, and ask him about Zal, Persia, and the king.” At that moment the envoy, 
clutching a letter in his hand, reached Sam; he dismounted, kissed the ground, 
and called down God’s blessings on the king. Sam questioned him and took the 


letter, and the envoy gave him Zal’s greetings. Sam began to make his way down 
the mountain and opened the letter to read Zal’s message; as soon as he had done 
so he stood rooted to the spot in astonishment. Zal’s request did not please him; 
this was not how he had hoped his son would be. He said, “His words fit his 
nature, which has now become plain to me. These are the foolish whims a boy 
who was brought up by a savage bird would have,” and he made his way back 
from the hunting grounds to his camp, his mind filled with foreboding. He said 
to himself, “If I say to him, ‘This is not an advisable course of action; don’t sir 
up trouble like this, be sensible,’ I shall be known as one who gave his word idly 
and broke it. But if I say, ‘Yes, you must follow your desires and do what your 
heart tells you,’ then from that savage bird and this descendant of a demon, what 
kind of offspring will be born?” His heart was weighed down with worry, but he 
slept, and his sleep refreshed him. 


Sam Consults with His Priests Concerning Zal 

When he woke he summoned priests and wise men and consulted them. He 
began by questioning astrologers, and asked them what the outcome of a union 
between two who were as different as fire and water would be; surely it would 
produce a disaster like the war between Zahhak and Feraydun? He told them to 
consult the stars, and to see if any good could come of this. For many days the 
astrologers searched the skies, and when they came before him again they were 
smiling and said, “Fortune will join these two enemies as one.” The chief 
astrologer said, “I bring you good news of the union between Zal and Mehrab’s 
daughter: they will both prosper, and from these two will be born a great hero, a 
mammoth-bodied man who will conquer the world with his sword, who will lift 
the king’s throne beyond the clouds. He will extirpate the race of evil from the 
earth and cleanse the world with his heavy mace. He will be a comfort to those 
who suffer, and he will close the gate of war and the pathways to evil. 


“Persia will trust in him and in his fame, 
Her champions will rejoice to hear his name, 
Throughout his life the monarchy will thrive, 
In times to come his glory will survive; 
Before his name, inscribed on every seal, 
Persia and Rum and India will kneel.” 


Relieved by the astrologers’ words, Sam laughed and thanked them warmly, and 
gave them great quantities of gold and silver, because they had brought him 
comfort when he was afraid. 

He called for Zal’s envoy and said to him, “Speak kindly to Zal; tell him that 
this is a strange wish that he has, but that since I gave my word it would be 
unjust for me to look for some way to refuse him. At dawn I shall leave for 
Persia.” Then he gave the messenger some silver coins and said, “Don’t delay on 
your journey for an instant.” When two watches of the night had passed, 
horsemen’s cries, the din of drums, and blare of trumpets announced Sam’s 
departure with his army for Persia. The envoy reached Zal with news of his good 
fortune, and Zal gave thanks to God for his happiness, distributing gold and 
silver coins to the poor, and being equally generous with his friends. 


Sindokht Learns of Rudabeh’s Behavior 

A sweet-voiced serving woman acted as a go-between for Zal and Rudabeh, 
taking messages from one to the other. Zal summoned her and told her what he 
had learned. He said, “Go to Rudabeh and tell her, ‘Purehearted moon of 
loveliness, when matters go from bad to worse, we soon see a key to open a way 
of escape. My envoy has returned from Sam with good news: Sam argued and 
blustered for a while, but finally he has agreed to our marriage.’” Then he gave 
the girl Sam’s letter, and she hurried like the wind to Rudabeh to tell her the 
good news. Rudabeh showered her with gold coins and sat her down on a gold- 
worked throne; she gave her a muslin headscarf that was so finely woven the 
weft could not be told from the warp; it was embroidered in red and gold, and 
the gold was almost hidden by jewels. She also gave her two valuable rings, 
which glittered like the planet Jupiter. Then she sent her back with many 
greetings and good wishes to Zal. 

As the woman emerged from Rudabeh’s apartments into the main hall of the 
palace, Sindokht caught sight of her. The woman blushed in fear, turning the 
color of red juniper berries, and kissed the ground before her queen. Sindokht 
became suspicious and said in a loud voice, “Where are you coming from? Tell 
me. You’re always going back and forth from Rudabeh’s apartments, and you 
avoid my eye when you do so. My heart suspects you of something. What are 
you up to? Are you the bowstring in this affair or the bow?” The woman replied, 
“T’m just a poor woman trying to earn my daily bread as best I can. Rudabeh 
wanted to buy some jewelry, and I brought her a golden diadem and a splendid 
ring set with precious stones.” Sindokht said, “Show them to me and put my 


heart at rest.” She replied, “I left both of them with Rudabeh; she wanted some 
other things, so I’m going to fetch them.” Sindokht said, “Show me the money 
she paid you for them, and pour cold water on my anger.” But the woman 
replied, “Rudabeh said she would pay me tomorrow; you can’t ask to see 
something I haven’t received yet.” 

Sindokht knew the woman was lying, and she hardened her heart against her. 
She began to search her roughly, looking in her bosom and sleeves, and when 
she found the fine headscarf embroidered by Rudabeh, she was enraged, and 
ordered her daughter to come before her. She clawed at her cheeks and wept, and 
said, “You are a noble woman and as beautiful as the moon, what whim has 
made you choose to act like someone from the lowest depths rather than 
someone who occupies a throne? What do you lack? Why are you behaving like 
a criminal? Now, tell your mother whatever secrets you are hiding, especially 
why this woman keeps coming to you. What is going on? Who is the man this 
scarf and rings were intended for? The Arab’s wealth and crown have brought us 
both good and ill fortune, and you want to fling our standing and reputation to 
the winds like this? What mother ever gave birth to a daughter like you?” 

Rudabeh was ashamed and stared at the ground. She began to weep, and tears 
coursed down her lovely cheeks. She said to her mother, “I wish I’d not been 
born, and then you would 

See nothing evil in me, nothing good. 

You’re wise, but love has made my heart its prey, 
I think of Zal, Zabol’s king, night and day; 

I burn for him in love’s tormenting fire, 

My heart’s consumed by passion and desire. 

I weep my life away, without him I 

Have no desire to live, I long to die. 

He came to me, and hand in hand we swore 
Our mutual love will last forevermore. 

His envoy went to Sam, who angrily 

Declared at first that he would not agree 

To Zal’s request, but bit by bit relented, 
Argued, and stormed, and finally consented. 
The letter that he sent to Zal was brought 

To me here, by the woman whom you caught.” 


Sindokht was astonished at her words, and at first said nothing, but then thought 
that she liked the idea of Zal as a son-in-law. However, she said, “This isn’t 
wise. There’s no noble warrior who can compare with Zal; he’s a great man, and 
the son of a hero, who has a fine reputation and is an intelligent, clear-sighted 
man. Zal has many virtues and only one fault, but that fault diminishes his 
splendor. The king of Persia will be angered by this, and he’II raise the dust of 
battle over Kabol. He has no desire for someone from our family to rule.” 
Sindokht released the go-between and spoke kindly to her, saying she now knew 
what had been hidden from her. She saw that her daughter had lived cut off from 
the world and without anyone’s advice. Then she lay down alone, filled with 
such anxiety that her skin felt bruised and broken. 


Mehrab Learns of His Daughter’s Love 

Mehrab came from the court in good spirits, because Zal had been very attentive 
to him. He saw Sindokht lying down frowning and seeming troubled, and he said 
to her, “What’s the matter? Why is your flower-like face filled with frowns?” 
She said, “I’ve been thinking for a long time about our palace and wealth, our 
Arab horses, our pageboys who have sworn loyalty to you, our gardens and royal 
enclosures, the beauty of our daughter, our reputation, knowledge, and prudence. 
Little by little the freshness and force of our lives leave us; misfortune will 
come, our enemies will inherit what is ours, our troubles will have been as vain 
as the wind. A narrow coffin will be our lot, and the fruit of the tree we have 
planted will be poison: we have watered it and labored over it, hung crowns and 
treasures in its branches, it has grown upwards to the sun and spread its shade, 
and now it is to be felled. This will be our end, and who knows where our peace 
is to found?” 

Mehrab said to Sindokht, “You speak as if this were a new thing, but the 
fleeting world was ever thus, and wise men have always feared its ways. It raises 
one and casts another down, and heaven’s will cannot be opposed. There is no 
point in agonizing over this, it won’t change, we cannot fight against God’s 
decrees.” Sindokht said, “A priest will tell his child this parable of the tree to 
explain the ways of the world to him. I said it so that you would pay attention to 
what I have to say.” She hung her head, and her rosy cheeks were wet with tears. 
“The heavens do not always turn as we would wish. Know then, that Zal, Sam’s 
son, has set who knows what snares in secret to catch Rudabeh. He has captured 
her pure heart, and we must consider what to do about this. I have talked to her 


at length, but to no avail; her face is sallow with grief, and I can see that her 
heart is in turmoil.” 

When Mehrab heard this he sprang up and grasped his sword hilt; his body 
trembled, his face darkened, blood surged in his heart, his lips were cold with 
sighs, and he said, “I shall make a river of blood of Rudabeh this moment.” 
Sindokht stood and, grasping him by the waist, said, “I am your slave, listen to 
me first, then do whatever you wish, and may wisdom guide your soul.” But he 
twisted from her grasp and pushed her away, roaring like a maddened elephant. 
He shouted, “I should have cut that girl’s head off when she was born. I didn’t, I 
didn’t do as my grandfather would have done, and now she comes up with this 
sorcery to destroy me. I could be killed for this and my reputation destroyed, 
why do you want to stop me from punishing her? If Sam and Manuchehr march 
against us, smoke from the sack of Kabol will cloud the sun, and neither the 
town nor our fields or crops will survive.” 

Sudabeh said, “Calm yourself, don’t talk so wildly. Sam already knows, and 
there’s no need to be so fearful and anxious. He’s traveling from the land of the 
Gorgsaran to Manuchehr’s court. The matter is not a secret any more, it’s out in 
the open.” Mehrab said, “Don’t tell me such lies, woman; the wind does not 
obey the dust. If you could show me some way to manage this then I wouldn’t 
be so worried. Who is there from Ahvaz to Qandahar who wouldn’t like to be 
allied to Sam?” Sindokht answered, “My lord, may I never need lies to help me. 
What harms you obviously harms me, and I am devoted to your heart’s well- 
being. I’ve told you the truth; this is the matter that’s been troubling me. But if 
this marriage should happen, it wouldn’t be so amazing after all, and the 
prospect should not worry us so much. Feraydun became king of Persia with the 
help of Sarv, king of the Yemen, and Zal is trying to do something similar. The 
world will not shine with splendor from earth, air, and water alone; fire must be 
there too, the elements have to mix. When a stranger joins your family, those 
who wish you ill are discomfited, because it makes you stronger.” 

As Mehrab listened to Sindokht his heart was filled with fury, his head with 
confusion. He said, “Bring Rudabeh to me.” But Sindokht was afraid that he 
would harm her in his anger, and she answered, “First you must swear to deliver 
her back to me safe and sound; Kabol must not be deprived of her; she is a 
paradise, a rose garden, in her loveliness.” She made him promise to renounce 
all thoughts of violence against their daughter, and Mehrab solemnly swore that 
he would not hurt her, but added, “The king will be furious with us for this; there 
won’t be any country or mother or father or Rudabeh left when he has finished 


with us.” Sindokht bowed before him and went smiling to her daughter, her face 
shining like the sun beneath the night of her black hair. She said, “Good news, 
the leopard has sheathed his claws and let the wild ass go free. Now, put on 
some fine clothes and go to your father, and see that you cry in front of him.” 
Rudabeh replied, “What use are fine clothes? What are such worthless things 
when I lack the one precious thing I want? My soul longs for Sam’s son; why 
should I hide what’s obvious?” 

But when she went before her father, as lovely as the sun rising in the east, 
she seemed drowned in rubies and gold; she was arrayed like a paradise, and as 
splendid as the sun in springtime. Her father stared at her in wonder and silently 
invoked God’s blessings. Then he stormed at her, “You senseless child, when 
was such behavior ever right for a noblewoman? How can a fairy being like you 
marry that Ahriman?” She lowered her black eyelashes over her dark eyes, and 
did not dare draw breath. Her angry father raged at her like a roaring leopard, his 
heart filled with fury. She returned to her apartments heartbroken, and her face 
was as Sallow as saffron. Both the daughter and the king prayed to God to aid 
them. 


Manuchehr Learns of Zal’s Engagement to Mehrab’s Daughter 
When Manuchehr learned that this diverse pair, Zal and Rudabeh, intended to 
marry, he said to his priests and sages, “This will bring an evil day to us. By war 
and policy I have delivered Persia from the clutches of lions and leopards, and 
Zal’s impetuous love must not be allowed to raise up this defeated race so that 
they are our equals. By the union of Mehrab’s daughter and Sam’s son a sharp 
sword will be unsheathed, who on one side will not be of our people; this will be 
like mingling poison and its antidote together. If their offspring follows in his 
mother’s footsteps, his head will be filled with malevolence toward us; Persia 
will seethe with sedition and trouble, as he hopes to gain her crown and wealth.” 
All the priests approved his speech, and said, “You are wiser than we are, and 
more able to do what is necessary. Do what wisdom demands.” 

He summoned Nozar and his nobles to him and said, “Go to Sam and ask him 
how the war has gone. Then tell him to come here before he returns home.” 
Nozar and his entourage set off with their elephants and war drums. When they 
arrived at Sam’s camp, he was pleased to see them, and Nozar handed over his 
father’s message. replied, “I shall do as he commands, and my soul will find 
peace in seeing him.” They set out tables for a feast, and the name of Manuchehr 
was the first they remembered when they drank. They passed the long night in 


pleasure until the bright sun reappeared; then, to the din of drums, their mounts 
seemed to take wing as they sped toward the court as Manuchehr had 
commanded. 

When Manuchehr heard of their approach, a great cry went up from Sari and 
Amol, and the army set off, filling the valleys with their heavy lances, their 
shields woven in red and gold, their drums, trumpets, and cymbals, their Arab 
horses, elephants, and treasure. In this manner, with its banners and drums, the 
army went to welcome Sam. 


Sam Comes to Manuchehr 

Sam dismounted as he drew near the court, and a way was cleared for him to 
approach the king. Sam kissed the ground and went forward. Manuchehr rose 
from his ivory throne, a crown set with shining rubies on his head, and motioned 
Sam to a throne near him. He treated him with appropriate kindness, asking him 
sympathetically about the war with the Gorgsaran and the demons of 
Mazanderan, and Sam answered all his questions one by one, recounting the 
story of his battles, the rout of their enemies, and the killing of Zahhak’s 
descendant Kakui. As Manuchehr listened his crown seemed to reach to the 
moon with pleasure. He gave orders for wine and a banquet, to celebrate the 
extirpation of his enemies from the world. They passed the night feasting, and 
Sam’s name was continually on the courtiers’ lips. 

When day broke Sam returned to Manuchehr’s side. The king said to him, 
“Choose some chieftains and go from here to India; spread fire and sword there, 
burn Mehrab’s castle and Kabol to the ground. Don’t let him escape; he’s 
dragon’s spawn, always raising his war cry against someone, filling the peaceful 
world with war and trouble. Sever the heads of his allies, cleanse the earth of 
Zahhak’s tribe.” Sam replied, “I shall do this and satisfy the king’s anger.” He 
kissed the throne and touched his face to the king’s seal ring. Then he and his 
army set off on their galloping horses for home. 


Sam and Zal Meet 

News of what Manuchehr and Sam were planning reached Mehrab and Zal. Zal 
was enraged; he flung back his shoulders and his lips quivered with anger. He 
left Kabol, saying, “If a dragon comes burning the world with his breath and 
wishes to conquer Kabol, he will have to cut my head off first.” Angrily he made 
for his father’s camp, his heart filled with anxieties, his head with the words he 
would say. As the lion cub approached the camp, all the army rose to greet him; 
the banner of Feraydun was set before them, and the elephants were draped in 
red, yellow, and purple cloths. 

When Zal saw his father’s face, he dismounted and walked forward. The 
chieftains on both sides dismounted, and Zal kissed the ground. His father spoke 
to him and Zal remounted his charger, whose saddle glittered with gold. The 
chieftains came forward anxiously, saying “Your father is angry with you; 
apologize, don’t act stubbornly.” Zal assured them, “There’s no fear of that; I 
have blood in my veins, not dirt. If my father is wise, he won’t bandy words with 
me, and if he speaks angrily to me, I shall be ashamed and weep.” They rode 
cheerfully into Sam’s camp, where Sam dismounted and welcomed his son. Zal 
kissed the ground and began. 

He invoked God’s blessings on Sam, and tears fell from his eyes. He said, 
“May Sam be prudent and happy, and his soul incline toward justice. Diamonds 
are shattered by your sword, the earth weeps when you ride out to battle, the 
world flourishes with your justice, and wisdom and prudence are your soul’s 
foundation. I alone have no part in this justice of yours, even though I am your 
kin. I was raised by a bird, when I ate dirt, but I have no quarrel with anyone in 
the world. I do not know what crime I have committed—unless it is that the hero 
Sam is my father—or whom I have harmed. When my mother bore me, you 
rejected me and had me exposed in the mountains. You gave your son over to 
grief, consigning me to the fire. Your quarrel is with God; isn’t it he who has 
created the colors black and white? I have nobility, courage, and a hero’s sword, 
and the lord of Kabol is my friend. He is wealthy, prudent, and just, possessed of 
a throne, crown, and the mace of sovereignty. I went to Kabol because you told 
me to; I did as you commanded, taking your place when you went to the wars, 
and harvesting the fruit of the tree you had planted. Is this the present you bring 
me from Mazanderan and your wars with the Gorgsaran, that you will destroy 
the place I have chosen to live? Is this the justice you bring me? I stand before 


you now as your slave and I deliver my body to your anger. Cut my body in two 
with a saw if you wish, but do not speak to me about Kabol.” 


Sam listened to his son, and hung his head: 

“All that you’re telling me is true,” he said. 

“All that I did was wrong; your miseries 
Gladdened the hearts of all our enemies. 

And now, heart sore, you’ve come here as my guest 
To know if I will grant this last request. 

Be patient, while I find a way to bring 

Your cause persuasively before the king: 

I'll write a letter to him, you will be 

My trusted envoy to his majesty: 

I'll teach you what to say, and when you speak 
King Manuchehr will grant you what you seek. 

If God’s our friend, what we’re about to do 

Will hand your longed-for heart’s desire to you.” 


Sam Writes a Letter to King Manuchehr 

They summoned a scribe and dictated a detailed letter. Sam began with praise of 
God, invoking his blessings on King Manuchehr, and continued: “As your slave 
I have reached the sixtieth year of my life: the sun and moon have crowned my 
head with white camphor. I bound on my sword belt as your slave and made war 
on sorcerers; the world has never seen anyone ride his horse or wield his mace as 
I have done. I obliterated the splendor of Mazanderan’s warriors, and only I was 
able to defeat the dragon that emerged from the River Kashaf, massive as a 
mountain, broad as a valley, filling the earth with the foam from its lips, 
terrifying the world’s inhabitants. Its spittle burned vultures’ wings, its venom 
scorched the earth; it snatched monsters from the sea and eagles from the air; the 
earth was emptied of people and flocks, every living thing retreated before it. 
When I saw that no one dared oppose it, I emptied my heart of fear and bound on 
my sword in God’s name. Seated on my massive mount, my ox-headed mace on 
my saddle, my bow slung over my shoulder, my shield at the ready, I attacked 
like a ravening monster: everyone who heard that I would try my mace against 
this dragon bade me farewell as if I went to my death. I approached and saw it 
was like a great mountain, with its hair trailing on the ground, its tongue like a 
black tree, its gullet breathing fire, its eyes like bowls of blood. It caught sight of 


me and roared and came forward in fury. I felt there was a fire burning before 
me, the world swam like a sea before my eyes, smoke rose up to the clouds. The 
ground trembled at its roar, the earth swam with its poison. I too roared, like a 
lion, and shot a diamond-tipped arrow, pinning one side of its mouth shut with 
the tongue still hanging out. Another arrow pinned the other side of its mouth, 
and a third went into its gullet. Blood bubbled up from its entrails, and, invoking 
God’s power, I struck my ox-headed mace down on its head. I smashed it as I 
would an elephant’s, and poison flowed from the wound like the river Nile. The 
river Kashaf brimmed with blood and turned yellow, and the earth was at peace 
again and could rest. The world witnessed this combat; afterwards I was known 
as ‘Sam who kills with one blow,’ and they showered me with gold and jewels. 
When I came back from that battle my armor had been burned from my body 
and I was left naked, my horse’s barding had been stripped away, and for years 
the countryside there was covered with nothing but burned thorns and scrub. 

“T have placed my foot on the heads of chieftains and led my horse where 
lions had their lairs: for many years now the saddle has been my throne, and I 
have subdued Mazanderan and the Gorgsaran, never thinking of my home, but 
always mindful of your glory and happiness. But now my shoulders and the 
blows of my mace are not what they were, and I am bent with age. My son Zal, a 
hero who is worthy to fight on your behalf, has taken my place, and he has one 
secret request, which he will come to ask of you. In Kabol he has seen a 
beautiful young woman, as elegant as a cypress tree, as lovely as a rose garden, 
and he has become crazy with love for her. The king should not be angry with 
him, since anyone who sees him pities his despair: he comes before your throne 
with a heavy heart, and I ask that you treat him as befits a nobleman. It is not for 
me to teach you wisdom or how to behave.” 

When the letter had been written, Zal took it, and the trumpets blared as he 
mounted his horse. 


Mehrab’s Anger with Sindokht 

Once all this became known in Kabol, Mehrab was filled with fury. He 
peremptorily summoned Sindokht and vented his anger with Rudabeh against 
her. He said, “I don’t have the forces to stand up against Persia’s king; I’ve no 
choice but to kill you and your vile daughter in public, in the hope that that will 
placate him.” At his words, Sindokht sank down, and her resourceful heart was 
filled with foreboding. Then she ran to the radiant king, her arms folded 
submissively over her breasts, and said, “Hear me out, and if you want to do 


something other than I suggest, do it. If you have wealth that you’re prepared to 
give up in order to save your life, then bring it, and something good may come 
of this night. No matter how long the night lasts, its darkness must finally come 
to an end: day will dawn, and when the sun rises the world will glitter like a 
ruby.” Mehrab replied, “Don’t talk old wives’ tales to a warrior. Say what you 
know, fight for your life, or prepare for your body to be veiled in blood.” 

Sindokht said, “My lord, I hope you will have no need to shed my blood. I 
must go to Sam, it’s I who must draw this sword from its sheath. I shall risk my 
life and you, your wealth; give me treasure to take to him.” Mehrab replied, 
“This is the key; we shouldn’t worry about wealth. Take slaves, horses, thrones, 
and crowns, and be on your way. It may be that Kabol won’t burn over our 
heads, and that his clouded heart will shine on us again.” Sindokht said, “My 
lord, value your life rather than your wealth. But when I go looking for some 
solution to all this, you must not treat Rudabeh harshly. I care for her more than 
for anything in the world, and you must swear not to harm her.” When her 
husband had sworn to this, she prepared to set out on horseback. 

She dressed herself in gold-worked brocade, sewn with pearls and precious 
rubies. Then she poured out thirty thousand gold coins from the treasury, to 
which she added ten horses with golden trappings, fifty slaves with golden belts, 
fifty silver bridles and saddles for Arab and Persian horses, sixty slaves with 
golden torques, each bearing a goblet, one of which was filled with rubies, 
another with sugar, and the rest with musk, camphor, or gold. There were forty 
bolts of brocade with designs in gold and sewn with various jewels; two hundred 
Indian swords worked in silver and gold, the blades of thirty of which had been 
treated with poison; a hundred red-haired female camels, a hundred more to 
carry loads, a crown set with jewels, together with earrings, armbands and a 
torque, a golden throne studded with gems and as beautiful as the heavens, and 
four war elephants weighed down with carpets and clothes. When all this had 
been made ready she quickly mounted her horse and proceeded in state to Sam’s 
court. 


Sam Puts Sindokht’s Mind at Rest 

When she arrived she did not call out or give her name; instead she told the 
guards to say that someone had come as an envoy from Kabol, bringing a 
message from the warrior Mehrab to the world conqueror Sam. The chamberlain 
presented her news and was told to admit her. Sindokht dismounted and hurried 
before the king; she kissed the ground and made her obeisance before Sam and 


his noblemen. Then she had the slaves, horses, and other forms of wealth 
displayed one by one before Sam, and the column of gifts stretched for two 
miles. Sam was astonished at the sight and sat brooding on it, like aman ina 
drunken stupor; his arms were folded over his chest and he hung his head. He 
said to himself, “Where did all this come from, and why has it been brought here 
by a woman? If I accept these things from her, Manuchehr will be angry with 
me, and if I return them, Zal will rise up in fury like the Simorgh.” Finally, he 
said, “Give these to our treasurer, as gifts sent in the name of a beautiful woman 
from Kabol.” Sindokht was reassured. She had three lovely girls with her, pale 
skinned and as elegant as cypresses; each of them held a goblet filled with 
rubies, pearls, and other jewels, and they poured these out pell-mell before the 
king, then exited from the court. 

Sindokht said, “Young men become as wise as old men listening to your 
advice: great men are instructed by you, and your glory illuminates the dark 
world. Evil’s hands are bound by your goodness, and the path to God is opened 
by your mace. If Mehrab has sinned, his eyelashes are wet with tears. The 
inhabitants of Kabol are innocent; what has their leader done that they should be 
destroyed? They are slaves beneath the dust of your feet, the whole town lives 
for you. Fear the Creator of reason and might, of the evening star and the sun; he 
will not approve of such an act from you; do not bind on your belt for 
bloodshed.” 

Sam said, “Answer whatever I ask you, and don’t try to evade my questions. 
Are you Mehrab’s servant or his wife, whose daughter Zal has seen? Tell me 
about this girl’s face and hair, her character and wisdom, so that I can see 
whether she’s worthy of him. Describe her stature to me, how she looks, and her 
manner; tell me everything about how she seems to you, point by point.” 
Sindokht replied, “My lord, greatest of lords, first you must swear with such 
solemnity that the ground will tremble at it, that no harm will come to me or to 
any of those I love. I own castles and palaces, treasure and slaves: when I know 
that I am safe here, ask me what you wish and I will answer, and so preserve my 
honor. Then I shall bring all the treasure hidden in Kabol to Zavolestan.” 

Then Sam took his hand in hers, gently caressed it, and swore as she had 
requested. Sindokht kissed the ground and told him what had been hidden. She 
said, “I am from Zahhak’s family and married to Mehrab: I am the mother of the 
beautiful Rudabeh, for whom Zal is ready to sacrifice his soul. Throughout the 
night until day dawns, all of us call down God’s blessings on you and on King 
Manuchehr. Now I have come to know what you wish, and to find out who your 


friends and enemies are in Kabol. If we have sinned and are unworthy to rule 
there, I stand before you here in my misery: kill those who are worthy to die, 
imprison those who should be imprisoned, but do not burn the hearts of the 
innocent inhabitants of Kabol, an act which will only brings dark days upon 
you.” 

Sam saw that he was dealing with a clear-sighted and intelligent woman, 
whose face was as lovely as the springtime, who had the stature of a cypress 
tree, whose waist was a slim as a reed, and who had the gait of a pheasant. He 
answered her, “I swear on my life that I shall keep faith with you. I approve of 
Zal’s choice of Rudabeh as his wife, and may you, Kabol, and all who are dear 
to you live in safety and happiness. Although you are of another race than us, 
you are worthy of the crown and throne. This is the way of the world; there is no 
shame in it and there is no fighting with God’s decrees: one is raised up and 
another cast down, one lives in wealth and another in want, one in happiness and 
another in misery. I have written a letter begging Manuchehr to look favorably 
on us, and Zal has taken it to him. He set off so quickly that it seemed he had 
grown wings, vaulting into the saddle without seeing it, and his horses’ hooves 
seemed to take no account of the ground. The king will give him an answer; a 
smile will mean he agrees to our request. This prince who was brought up by a 
bird is in despair, the tears from his eyes moisten the earth at his feet, and if, in 
her love for him, his bride suffers as he does, it would be no surprise if the two 
of them died of grief. Show me the face of this child born of a dragon’s race, and 
you will be rewarded.” 

Sindokht replied, “If you would make your slave’s heart happy, ride to my 
palace. It will raise my head to the heavens in joy to bring a king like you to 
Kabol, where every one of us will be ready to sacrifice his life for you.” 
Sindokht saw that Sam’s face was all smiles, and that thoughts of revenge had 
been uprooted from his heart. She sent a messenger who rode as quickly as the 
wind to Mehrab, bearing the good news. “Forget all your suspicions and 
wotries,” she wrote. “Be happy in your heart and prepare to receive a guest. I 
shall come immediately after this letter and will not halt on the way.” 

The next day, as sunlight flowed into the world and men woke from sleep, 
Sindokht made her way to Sam’s court, where she was greeted as the best of 
queens. She came before Sam and made her obeisance, and then spoke with him 
for a long time about her journey back to Kabol’s king, and the preparations to 
receive Sam there as a guest. Sam said, “Go back, and tell Mehrab what you 
have seen here.” Then he had a present prepared for her, consigning to her all 


that he owned in Kabol, including palaces, gardens, and farmland, and he also 
gave her flocks, carpets, and clothes. Then he took her hand in his and swore 
friendship with her, accepting her daughter, and giving her his warrior son, Zal. 
He concluded, “Stay in Kabol and be happy; have no fear of anyone who wishes 
you ill.” Her face, which had been so downcast, blossomed again, and she set off 
home under a fortunate star. 


Zal Delivers Sam’s Letter to King Manuchehr 

Manuchehr learned that Zal was approaching, and the nobles of his court went 
out to welcome him. A way was quickly cleared for him, and when he entered 
the court he kissed the ground and called down blessings on the king. For a long 
time he kept his eyes lowered, until the king bade him welcome and he 
approached the throne. The king asked him how he had endured the wind and 
dust of his journey, and he answered, “By your grace everything is made easy, 
and all troubles are a comfort.” The king took the letter he carried, smiled, and 
acted affably toward him. 

When he had read the letter Manuchehr said, “An ancient matter troubles my 
heart, and you have added to it. But your father Sam has written this letter with 
such anxiety and grief that I agree to your request and will think no more of the 
matter. I will see that you have your heart’s desire, if this is what you wish, even 
though my heart is unsettled by it.” Stewards brought in a golden table, and 
Manuchehr sat down before it with Zal and ordered the nobles to take their 
places beside them. When the king had finished eating, another area was 
prepared for them to drink together. Zal drank wine with the king, and then sat in 
his golden saddle and departed; throughout the night his heart was filled with 
thoughts, his lips with murmured words. 

At daybreak he came to pay his respects to Manuchehr, who greeted him 
warily, and, after he left, praised him in private. Then the king summoned 
priests, astrologers, and sages before the throne and commanded them to search 
the heavens. They spent three days with their astrolabes, laboriously studying the 
stars to know their secrets, and on the fourth they came before the king and said: 
“Our calculations show the water here 

Will be a mighty current, strong and clear: 
The son of Zal and Rudabeh will be 

A hero famed for all eternity. 

Strength will be his, and swords, and praise, 
Battles and banquets will fill all his days, 


No eagle will outsoar him, and no lord 

Will be his equal; with his glittering sword 

He’ll make the air weep, and his food will be 

A roasted wild ass, spitted on a tree. 

Prompt in his monarch’s service, prompt to fight, 
Persia’s protector and stout-hearted knight.” 


The king said to them, “Keep what you have told me a secret.” Then he 
summoned Zal so that they could question him. 


Zal Is Tested 

The sages sat with Zal and questioned him, to test his wisdom. One of them said, 
“There are twelve flourishing, splendid cypress trees, each of which has thirty 
branches.” 

Another said, “There are two fine, swiftly galloping horses, one black as a sea 
of pitch, the other white as clear crystal. They struggle and strive, but neither can 
overtake the other.” A third said, “This is a wonder: there is a group of riders 
who pass by the prince, and sometimes there are thirty of them when you look, 
sometimes twenty-nine. One is not there, and then you count again and there are 
thirty.” A fourth said, “You see a beautiful meadow filled with green plants and 
threaded with streams. A man comes there, holding a huge scythe, and he cuts 
down the plants, whether they are fresh or dry, never swerving aside as he does 
so.” Another said, “There are two cypresses rising from the ocean, and a bird has 
built nests there. He sits on one at night and on the other during the day. When 
he flies up from the one its leaves wither and dry, and when he sits on the other 
it exhales the scent of musk. One is always withered, the other always fresh and 
fragrant.” Another said, “In the mountains I discovered a flourishing city, but 
people left it, preferring a thorny waste, where they built houses towering up to 
the moon; they forgot the flourishing city and never mentioned it. Then an 
earthquake came, and their houses disappeared, and they longed for the city they 
had left. Now, explain these sayings to us: if you can do so, you will be turning 
dust to musk.” 

Zal sat deep in thought for a while; then he threw back his shoulders, 
breathed deeply, and answered the priests’ questions, saying, “First, the twelve 
tall trees, each of which has thirty branches, are the twelve months of the year; 
twelve times the moon is renewed in her place, like a new king seated on his 
throne, and each month has thirty days; this is how time passes. As for the two 
horses who gallop swiftly as fire, the white and the black striving to overtake 
one another, they are night and day which pass over us across the heavens. 
Third, the thirty horsemen you spoke of who pass before the prince—of whom 
one is lacking, and then when one counts there are thirty again—these signify 
the fact that in some months one night is sometimes lacking. Now I shall 
unsheathe the sword of my speech and explain the two trees on which the bird 
builds its nests. From the sign of Aries to that of Libra the world lies in darkness 
until it passes into the sign of Pisces, and the two cypresses are the two halves of 
the heavens, of which one half is always withered and one fresh. The bird is the 


sun, which keeps the world in hope and fear. The city in the mountains is the 
eternal world, and the thorny waste is the fleeting world, which gives us now 
caresses and riches, and now pain and suffering. God counts your breaths and 
prolongs or breaks off your days; a wind arises and the earth shakes, and the 
world is filled with cries and lamentation. The man with the sharp scythe who 
cuts down both the fresh and withered plants, and who listens to no entreaties, is 
time the reaper and we are like the plants who are cut down, grandfather and 
grandchild alike, since he looks at neither young nor old but cuts down all in his 
path. This is the way of the world, and no man is born from his mother but to 
die.” 

When Zal finished his explanation, everyone there was astonished at his 
understanding. Manuchehr’s heart was pleased; he enthusiastically applauded 
him and gave orders that a banquet as splendid as the full moon be held. They 
drank wine until the world grew dark and their wits were befuddled: the 
courtiers’ cries resounded about the court, and when they left they did so happy 
and drunk, grasping one another’s arms. 


Zal Shows His Skill 

When the sun’s rays appeared above the mountains, and men woke from sleep, 
Zal came before the king like a ravening lion and asked permission to leave the 
court and rejoin his father. He said to the king, “I long to see Sam’s face again, 
now that I have kissed the foot of your ivory throne and my heart has been 
gladdened by the sight of your crown and splendor.” The king said to him, 
“Young hero, you must grant us one more day. It’s love for Mehrab’s daughter 
that makes you so eager to be off; what’s this talk about missing Sam and 
Kabol?” Then he gave orders that cymbals, Indian bells, and trumpets be 
sounded in the great square. 

Warriors gathered cheerfully there, bringing spears, maces, arrows, and bows. 
There was a huge tree that had flourished for many months and years in the 
square. Zal grasped his bow and urged his horse forward; he shot an arrow at the 
tree and the royal shaft pierced the great trunk. Then men bearing javelins set 
shields down; Zal asked his squire for a shield, squared his shoulders, and again 
urged his horse forward. He flung his bow aside, and grasped a javelin, which he 
hurled at three stacked shields with such force that it passed straight through 
them. The king turned to his noble warriors and said, “Which of you will fight 
him in single combat? One of you should challenge him.” The warriors donned 
their armor, and their hearts were angry despite the cheerful remarks they made. 
They twitched their horses’ reins and rode onto the square, grasping spears and 
shining lances. Zal charged forward, the dust rising from his horse’s hooves, 
watching for which proud warrior would oppose him. Like a monster he 
galloped out of the dust, bearing down on a warrior and grasping him by the belt; 
he snatched him from the saddle with such ease that the king and his army stared 
in wonder. The assembly cried out that no one had ever seen his equal, and that 
the mother of any warrior who opposed him on the battlefield would be sure to 
wear the dark colors of mourning. No lion had ever given birth to such a hero; 
indeed he should not be considered a mere hero but a monster of war. And they 
said how fortunate Sam was, that he would leave such a brave horseman in the 
world as his heir when he died. The king congratulated him, as did the courtiers, 
and the company retumed to the palace. There Manuchehr prepared such gifts 
for Zal that they astonished the noblemen present: there were valuable crowns 
and golden thrones, armbands, torques, and golden belts, as well as splendid sets 
of clothes, slaves, horses, and many other things. 


Manuchehr Answers Sam’s Letter 

Manuchehr dictated an answer to Sam’s letter: “Brave warrior, victorious as a 
lion in all your ventures: the heavens have not seen your like in battles and 
banquets, in policy and beauty. Your fine son has come to me, and I have 
learned of his wishes and the nature of his desire. I have granted all he has asked 
for and spent many happy days in his company. A lion like you, who has 
leopards as his prey, what else would he sire but a warlike lion cub? I send him 
back to you with a happy heart, and may evil keep its distance from him.” 

Zal left the court and dispatched an envoy to Sam with this message: “I am 
returning from the king; my heart is happy and I come with royal gifts, crowns, 
armbands, torques and ivory thrones.” Sam was so overjoyed to receive this 
message that despite his age, his youth seemed to return to him. He dispatched 
an envoy to Kabol, telling Mehrab of Manuchehr’s kind treatment of Zal, of the 
happiness that prevailed between them, and saying that both he and Zal would 
visit him as soon as Zal returned. 

The envoy galloped to Kabol, and shouts of joy rose into the skies when he 
gave his news. The king of Kabol was beside himself with pleasure that he was 
to be related to the ruler of Zabolestan; musicians and entertainers were 
summoned, Mehrab’s heart was cleared of all anxieties, and there was a 
perpetual smile on his lips. He called Sindokht to him and spoke kindly to her, 
saying, “You are a splendid wife, and your advice has brought us from darkness 
to light. You have planted such a sapling in the earth that princes pay homage to 
it. What you planned for has happened, and all my wealth is at your disposal, be 
it thrones or crowns or treasure.” When Sindokht heard him she went to her 
daughter to tell her the news, and said, “Good news, you will soon see Zal; you 
have gained a husband who is worthy of you. A wife and husband with your 
nobility of spirit will not endure the world’s reproaches. You rushed to fulfill 
your heart’s desire, and now you have found everything you sought.” Rudabeh 
replied, “You are the king’s consort, and worthy of praise from everyone; the 
dust beneath your feet is my pillow, and your commands are my soul’s comfort. 
May the eye of Ahriman be far from you, and your heart and soul always be 
filled with joy.” 

Sindokht heard her, and then she set about preparing the palace for their 
visitors. She had the audience hall decorated like a paradise, and rose water, 
wine, musk, and ambergris were placed there. She laid down a carpet worked in 
gold and sewn with emeralds, and another whose design was made of pearls, 
each of which shone like a drop of water. Then she placed a golden throne there, 


with Chinese patterns on it, studded with jewels that framed carved reliefs, and 
its feet were made of rubies. Next she turned her attention to Rudabeh, adorning 
her like a paradise and writing magical incantations to the sun to protect her. She 
confined her in her golden apartments and gave no one access to her. All of 
Kabol was made beautiful with colors, fine fragrances, and precious objects. 
Wine was brought, and the elephants’ backs were draped with Rumi brocade, on 
which musicians sat, wearing golden diadems. The welcoming party was put 
together and slaves went ahead scattering musk and ambergris, and spreading 
silk and samite in the way. Musk and gold coins were scattered on the 
procession, and the ground was wet with rose water and wine. 


Zal Returns to Sam 

Meanwhile Zal made all speed homeward, like a flying eagle or a skiff 
skimming the water. No one was aware of his approach, and so no one went out 
to meet him, and suddenly a cry went up from the palace that Zal had arrived. 
Sam went happily out to greet him and clasped him in his arms, holding him 
close for a long time. When Zal had freed himself from his father’s embrace, he 
kissed the ground, and then recounted all he had seen and heard. Sam and Zal sat 
on thrones beside one another, and their lips were all smiles as they talked of 
Sindokht’s visit to Sam. Sam said, “A message came from Kabol, and the envoy 
was a woman Called Sindokht. She wanted a promise from me that I would not 
act badly to her, and I gave her this, and then she asked for everything so 
charmingly that I granted all of it. First she wanted Zavolestan’s prince to marry 
the princess of Kabol, then that you and I visit her as guests, as recompense for 
the distress she had been through. Now a messenger has come from her saying 
that this business of her daughter has been settled; now, what should we tell this 
messenger? What answer should we send Mehrab?” Zal was so happy that he 
blushed like a tulip from head to foot, and he answered, “If you think it’s 
suitable, send a detachment of troops, and we’|l come after them; we can visit 
them, because we have a lot to discuss together.” Sam looked at Zal, and he 
understood very well what his son wanted; he knew that Zal could not sleep at 
night and had no interest in any conversation that did not concern Mehrab’s 
daughter. 

Sam gave orders that bells and Indian chimes signal their departure; the royal 
pavilion was struck and a messenger was sent on ahead to announce to Mehrab 
that Sam, Zal, and a detachment of warriors and elephants would soon arrive. 
Mehrab had the drums sounded and trumpets blown, and drew up his army so 
that it glittered like a rooster’s eye. The elephants and musicians, and the various 
banners of red, white, yellow, and purple silk, made the earth seem like a 
paradise: with the blare of trumpets and the sound of harps, the squeal of bugles 
and the ringing of bells, it seemed as if Judgment Day had come. This was the 
manner in which Mehrab went forward to welcome Sam, and when he saw him 
he dismounted from his horse and walked forward. Sam embraced him and 
asked him how fate had dealt with him: Mehrab for his part called down 
blessings on both Sam and Zal and then mounted his swift charger again, like the 
new moon rising above the mountains. He placed a golden crown studded with 
jewels on Zal’s head, and the group arrived in Kabol happily laughing and 


chatting together. The town was so full of the sounds of Indian chimes, lutes, 
harps, and trumpets that it seemed to be transformed; the horse’s manes were 
soaked in musk, wine, and saffron, and drummers and trumpeters were mounted 
on elephants. Three hundred slaves carrying golden goblets filled with musk and 
jewels called down blessings on Sam and then scattered their goblets’ jewels 
before him, and whoever came to the festivities wanted for nothing. 

Sam smiled and said to Sindokht, “How long are you going to keep Rudabeh 
hidden?” In the same manner Sindokht replied, “And where is the gift you will 
give, if you wish to see the sun?” Sam answered, “Ask me for whatever you 
wish.” They went to the golden apartments, in which the happiness of spring 
awaited them. There Sam looked at Rudabeh and was overcome with wonder; he 
did not know how to praise her adequately, or how to keep his eyes from being 
dazzled by her splendor. Then he commanded Mehrab to come forward, and the 
marriage was solemnized according to ancient custom. Zal and Rudabeh were 
sat side by side on one throne, and agates and emeralds were scattered over 
them. Rudabeh wore a splendid diadem and Zal, a jewel-studded crown. A list of 
the treasures he was giving them was brought by Mehrab, and as it was read out, 
it seemed men’s ears could not listen until its end. From there they went to a 
banqueting hall, where they sat with wine cups in their hands for a week, and 
then returned to the palace where the festivities went on for three more weeks. 

At the beginning of the following month Sam began his journey home to 
Sistan, together with Zal, their elephants and drums, and the troops who had 
accompanied him. Zal had howdahs and litters made for Mehrab’s women folk, 
and a palanquin for Rudabeh, and she, Sindokht, Mehrab and their family set out 
for Sistan. They traveled happily, praising God for his gifts, and arrived in high 
spirits, laughing and smiling. Then Sam bestowed sovereignty over Sistan on Zal 
and unfurled his auspicious banner to lead his troops once again toward the land 
of the Gorgsaran and Bactria. 


ROSTAM, THE SON OF ZAL-DASTAN 


The Birth of Rostam 
It was not long before Rudabeh’s cypress-slim form began to change; her belly 
filled out, her body grew heavy, and the Judas blossoms of her face turned as 
sallow as saffron. Her mother said to her, “My soul, what’s happened that you 
look so yellow?” She replied, “My lips moan day and night; my time has come, 
and I cannot give birth to the burden within me. My skin feels as though it were 
stuffed with stones, or that it contained a mass of iron.” Rudabeh endured this 
until the time for her to give birth came closer, and she could neither sleep nor 
rest. Then one day she fainted, and a cry went up from Zal’s palace; Sindokht 
was informed, and she clawed at her face and tore out her musky hair. The news 
reached Zal that the leaves of his noble cypress tree had withered away, and he 
came to her pillow, sick at heart and with tears in his eyes. Then he remembered 
the Simorgh’s feather and smiled, and he told Sindokht to take heart. He brought 
a brazier and lit a fire, in which he burned a little of the Simorgh’s feather. 
Immediately the air darkened, and the bird appeared, ready to do his bidding, 
like pearls raining down from a dark cloud; I say pearls, but it was peace to the 
soul that she brought. Zal made his obeisance before the bird and praised her. 
The Simorgh said to him, “Why are you sad, why are the lion’s eyes wet with 
tears? A cub eager for fame will be born to you from this silver cypress: He’Il 
master all the beasts of earth and air, He’ll terrify the dragon in its lair; 

When such a voice rings out, the leopard gnaws In anguished terror its 

unyielding claws; 
Wild on the battlefield that voice will make The hardened hearts of iron 
warriors quake; 
Of cypress stature and of mammoth might, 
Two miles will barely show his javelin’s flight. 


“For him to be born into the world, you must bring a glittering knife, and a man 
familiar with spells. First, make the beautiful Rudabeh drunk with wine, and so 


drive fear and worry from her heart. Don’t watch as the sorcerer begins his 
incantations to bring out this lion from within her body: he will cut open the 
cypress’s belly, and she will feel no pain. Then, driving all fear and anxiety from 
your heart, you must sew up the wound where the sorcerer cut her. Pound the 
herb I will describe to you in milk and musk, and dry the mixture in the shade. 
Massage this into her wound, and you will see it heal within the day. After this, 
stroke her body with my feather, since its shadow will be auspicious. You should 
rejoice at this and give thanks to God; it was he who gave you this royal tree, 
which every day brings you greater good fortune. Do not be sad at this turn of 
events; your noble sapling is about to bear fruit.” She plucked a feather from her 
wing and let it fall, then flew upwards and was gone. Zal retrieved the feather, 
and did as the Simorgh had told him. This was a wonder, and the world watched, 
weeping and apprehensive. Sindokht cried desperate tears, wondering when the 
baby would be delivered from her daughter’s body. 

A skilled priest came, and made the lovely Rudabeh drunk with wine. She felt 
no pain as he cut open her side, and turned the baby’s head toward the opening. 
He brought the child forth so painlessly that no one in the world had ever seen 
such a wonder. 


The child was like a lion, a noble son, Tall and handsome, lovely to look 
upon; 

And all who saw this mammoth baby gazed 

In wonder at him, murmuring and amazed. 


For a day and a night the mother slept from the effects of the wine, and her heart 
knew nothing of what happened. They sewed up her wound and massaged the 
scar with the mixture the Simorgh had described. When she woke from her sleep 
and spoke to Sindokht the onlookers gave thanks to God and showered her with 
jewels and gold coins. She smiled when she saw her noble child, because she 
saw the signs of royal glory in him, and said, “I escaped (rastam) from my peril, 
my pain came to an end,” and so they named the boy Rostam. 

They sewed a doll of silk, that was the same height as this lion who had not 
yet tasted milk, and stuffed it with sable fur. Its face shone like the sun and the 
evening star. They traced a dragon on its bicep, placed a lion’s paw in its hand, 
tucked a lance beneath its arm, and put a mace in one hand and reins in the other. 
Then they sat it on a charger surrounded by servants, scattered gold coins over 
the group, and sent this image of Rostam with his mace to Sam. 


Festivities were held from Zavolestan to Kabol; all the plain was filled with 
the sound of trumpets and the drinking of wine, and there was a banquet for a 
hundred guests in every comer of the kingdom. Musicians were everywhere in 
Zavolestan, and commoners and noblemen sat together as intimately as the warp 
and weft of one cloth. They took the image of the unweaned Rostam to Sam, 
whose hair prickled with pleasure. “This silken doll resembles me, and if his 
body is half this size, his head will touch the clouds.” Then he called for the 
messenger to come forward, and showered gold coins over him till they covered 
his head. The joyful din of drums rang out from the court, and the royal square 
glittered like a rooster’s eye. Sam called for wine and musicians, distributed gold 
coins to the poor, and held such a banquet that the sun and moon gazed down in 
wonder. He answered Zal’s letter, beginning with praise of Creator and the good 
fortune that had come to them; next he praised Zal, the lord of the sword and 
mace, and then turned to the silken doll, who displayed the shoulders of a 
watrior and the glory of a king. He told Zal that he should preserve it so 
carefully that no breath of wind could harm it, and added that he had prayed 
night and day that he would live long enough to see a hero grow from Zal’s seed, 
and now that this child had been born to them, their chief duty was to pray for 
his life. 


Sam Comes to See Rostam 

So the world went forward, and things that had been hidden were revealed. Ten 
wet nurses were set to suckle Rostam, since it is milk that gives a man his 
strength. When he was weaned, his food was oak apples and meat; he ate enough 
for five grown men and people were astonished at his appetite. When he was 
eight spans high, he seemed like a noble cypress tree, and his face shone like a 
star, at which the world stared in wonder. He seemed to be Sam himself, in his 
stature, appearance, opinions, and behavior. When news reached brave Sam that 
Zal’s son had grown to be like a lion and that no one in the world had ever seen 
such a young man with his warrior-like qualities, Sam’s heart beat faster and he 
longed to see the boy. He entrusted his army to a commander and went with a 
detachment of experienced fighters toward Zavolestan, led there by the love he 
felt for Zal’s son. 

When Zal heard of his father’s approach, he had drums strapped on elephants 
and the earth turned the color of ebony beneath the cavalry’s hooves. He and 
Mehrab and the governor of Kabol set out as a welcoming party; a pebble was 
thrown into a goblet, which was the signal for the soldiers to mount, and a great 


cry went up on all sides. All the valley was filled with troops, the earth turned as 
black as pitch and the air was dark with dust. The neighing of Arab horses and 
the trumpeting of elephants could be heard for five miles. One elephant bore a 
golden throne, on which sat Zal’s son, with his cypress-stature and huge 
shoulders and chest. On his head was a crown, he wore a belt about his waist, 
and carried a shield in front of his body and a heavy mace in his hand. When 
Sam appeared in the distance, the army divided into two columns, and Zal and 
Mehrab, the youth and the warrior of many years, dismounted and bowed their 
heads to the ground, calling down blessings on the hero Sam. As Sam caught 
sight of the lion cub on the elephant’s back his face opened like a blossom; they 
led the boy forward on his elephant and Sam stared at him, taking in his crown 
and throne. Brave Sam called down blessings on him, saying “My lion cub, 
incomparable child, may you live long and happily!” 
Rostam kissed the throne and, what was wonderful, praised his grandfather in 

anew way: “Live happily, my lord, the sturdy root 

From which I, Rostam, am the newest shoot. 

I’m Sam’s devoted slave, and while I live 

The pleasures feasting, sleep, and comfort give 

Will not beguile me. Helmets, armor, bows 

That I can draw against our country’s foes, 

My saddle and my horse, my mace and sword, 

These will be all my life, my noble lord. 

My face resembles yours, and when I fight 

May I resemble you in dauntless might.” 


Then he climbed down from the elephant’s back, and Sam took him by the hand, 
kissing his eyes and head, and the elephants and drums stayed still and silent. 
They set off for Gourabeh, smiling and chatting as they rode, and when they 
arrived they sat in the palace on a golden dais, feasting in happiness. They spent 
a month in this manner, untroubled by hardship, and music accompanied their 
feasting, with each of them singing in turn. In one corner of the dais sat Zal, in 
the opposite corner Rostam, with his mace in his hand, and between them was 
Sam, with the feathers from the lammergeyer, signifying royal glory, depending 
from his crown. He stared in awe at Rostam, and from time to time he would call 
down blessings on the youth’s arms and shoulders, his reed-like waist and noble 
chest. Then he turned to Zal and said, “You could question a hundred 
generations and never hear of one who was born in such a manner. There is no 


one in the world who is as handsome as he is, or who has his stature and 
shoulders. Come, let us drink wine in celebration of this happiness, and may it 
drive all sorrow from our hearts, since the world is fleeting; we arrive and 
depart, and as one grows old another is born.” 


They drank their wine, and in their cups they praised 
Zal after Rostam. But Mehrab was dazed 

With drink, and in his drunkenness he said 

The arrogant ideas that filled his head. 

“IT don’t consider Zal as anything,” 

He said, “and Sam’s as worthless as the king. 
Rostam and me, we are the heroes here, 

The clouds daren’t pass above us, out of fear. 

And I?ll renew Zahhak’s power, you’ll soon see, 
And all of you will have to bow to me.” 


But Zal and Sam laughed at Mehrab’s boastful words. 

At the beginning of the month of Mehr Sam set off once more. He said to Zal, 
“My son, see that you act justly, with your heart ready to serve your kings, 
choosing wisdom over wealth, always keeping your hands from evil deeds, and 
striving to do God’s will. Know that the world tarries for no man; take care of 
what I say, follow my advice, and tread only in the path of righteousness. I feel 
in my heart that my time here is coming to an end.” Then he said farewell to his 
son and grandson, admonishing them not to forget his words. Chimes sounded 
from the court, and the blare of trumpets was heard from the elephants’ backs. 
Sam left for Bactria; his heart was filled with love and he spoke kindly to his son 
and grandson, whose faces were stained with tears, and whose hearts were filled 
with his precepts, as they accompanied him for three stages of the way. Then 
they turned back, and Sam continued on his long journey. 


THE BEGINNING OF THE WAR BETWEEN 
IRAN AND TURAN 


The Last Days of Manuchehr 

Manuchehr had lived for one hundred and twenty years, and the time had come 
for him to prepare for his last journey. His astrologers came to him and told him 
of the evidence of the skies; they could not see that his days would continue, and 
he should be ready to leave the world. They gave him the bitter news that the 
glory of his sovereignty was dimmed, and said to him, “You will go to another 
place, and may you meet with God there. There is no fighting against death; you 
must do now whatever is necessary before your departure.” 

When he heard the astrologers’ advice, Manuchehr altered his court’s 
customary procedures. He summoned priests and sages and opened his heart 
before them. He had Nozar brought before him, and spoke with him at length. 
He said, “This royal throne is an illusion, a wind, and you should not tie your 
heart to it for eternity. I have striven with dangers and difficulties for a hundred 
and twenty years, known great happiness and success, and faced my enemies in 
battle. The glory of Feraydun inspired me, and with his advice I turned all 
injuries to my advantage. I fought against Salm and savage Tur, and took 
revenge for the death of my grandfather, Iraj. I rid the earth of misery, founded 
cities and fortresses. But now it is as if I had never seen or known the world; the 
reckoning has passed and gone into darkness. Life has less potency than death; it 
is a tree whose leaves and fruits are poison. I have endured pain and sorrow, and 
now I bestow the imperial throne and treasure on you: I give you the royal 
crown, as Feraydun gave it to me. Know that when you have experienced the 
world and it has gone by, you must return to a better place, but the traces you 
leave behind you will last for long years. They must be such that they bring you 
praise, and men say of you that you were a man of pure race who enacted the 
pure faith. See that you do not swerve aside from God’s faith; it is this which 
brings good counsel. Never leave God’s way, since both good and bad come 
from him. After I have gone, an army of Turks will come and they will decide 
who sits on Persia’s throne and who wears her crown. You have hard work 
ahead of you, and those you confront will sometimes be wolves, sometimes 
sheep.” 

When he had finished speaking tears stained his cheeks, and Nozar wept 
bitterly for him. 


He closed his royal eyes, coldly he sighed, 
And Manuchehr, Iran’s great sovereign, died. 
All that remains now is his royal name, 


And words are all that constitute his fame. 


The Reign of Nozar 

After the period of mourning for his father had ended, Nozar lifted the Kayanid 
crown above Saturn. He sat on Manuchehr’s throne and held court, summoning 
his people and distributing wealth among them. But not many days passed 
before his mind turned toward injustice. Murmurings were heard on every side, 
and the world grew weary of this new king whose heart lived only for wealth 
and money, who had abrogated his father’s customs, acted cruelly toward his 
priests and advisors, and despised all men. Peasant revolts sprang up, and 
pretenders to the throne appeared; when the cries of protest spread and all the 
world was in turmoil, this unjust king was afraid and sent an envoy to Sam, who 
was fighting against the Gorgsaran, with a message filled with flattery and 
asking for his help. 

When this letter reached Sam, he heaved a cold sigh. At cockcrow, the din of 
drums and bugles was heard, and from the land of the Gorgsaran advanced an 
army whose size would put the green oceans to shame. As he drew near Persia, 
her nobles went out to greet him; they gathered quickly when they heard of his 
approach and came before him on foot. They spoke at length about the injustices 
of Nozar, a king who had foolishly forsaken his father’s ways. They said, “The 
world has been ruined by his depredations, and his good fortune sleeps. He does 
not follow the ways of wisdom, and the royal farr has departed from him. There 
would be nothing wrong if the hero Sam were to take his place on the royal 
throne. The world would flourish beneath his justice; Persia and her people 
support him, we are all his slaves, our souls live for him, and we will be obedient 
to his will.” 

But Sam answered them: “How could this please God? While Nozar, who is 
of royal lineage, sits on the throne, how could I wear the crown? Such a thing is 
impossible, and no one should listen to such talk. If even a daughter of 
Manuchehr occupied the throne and wore the royal crown, my pillow would still 
be the dust and my eyes would rejoice to see her. If Nozar’s heart has departed 
from his father’s ways, this has not been going on for long. The iron is not yet so 
rusted that its splendor cannot be restored. I shall restore his divine farr and 
make the world look for his love again. Give up these ideas, and reaffirm your 
loyalty to the king. If you do not obtain God’s mercy and the king’s love, 
Nozar’s anger will engulf the world in flames.” 

The nobles regretted what they had said and reaffirmed their loyalty, and the 
world was restored to peace by Sam’s presence of mind. The nobles went before 


Nozar and expressed their contrition, and reaffirmed their status as his subjects. 
The glory of Nozar’s reign was restored, his royal farr returned, and once more 
he ruled in peace. Sam advised Nozar on how to act justly and then received the 
king’s orders to return to battle. He left the court with fine gifts from Nozar: 
thrones, crowns, rings, slaves, horses with golden bridles, and two golden 
goblets filled with red rubies. 


Pashang Learns of Manuchehr’s Death 

And so the heavens turned, dissatisfied with Nozar and feeling no love for him. 
News of Manuchehr’s death reached the army of the Turks, and those who 
wished Persia ill talked of the troubles that beset Nozar’s reign. When the 
Turkish commander Pashang heard of this, he decided to invade Iran. He talked 
constantly of his father, Zadsham, and sighed bitterly over what had happened to 
Tur, remembering all that Manuchehr and his army had done. He called the 
chieftains and nobles of the country together, men like Akhvast, Garsivaz, 
Barman, and Golbad, who was a ravening lion in battle, as well as Viseh, who 
had command of his armies. His favored champion was his son Afrasyab, who 
came quickly at the summons. He talked of Salm and Tur and said, “We should 
not hide our desire for revenge against the Persians beneath our robes. Whose 
mind is not incensed to think of their actions? 


Everyone knows what they have done to us, 
How evil they have been, how infamous. 
But we must dry our eyes—it’s time now for 
Revenge, rebellion, and relentless war!” 


When Afrasyab heard his father’s words he forgot all thoughts of rest, food, or 
comfort. He stood before his father, his heart filled with the longing for revenge, 
and said: 


“Against wild lions I can stand and fight, 

Iam the match for Persia’s monarch’s might. 
If Zadsham had but drawn his warlike sword 
The world would not be ruled by Persia’s lord: 
If he’d been eager for a warrior’s fame 

Turan would not be overwhelmed with shame, 
But his descendants can wage war, and we 


Will crush these Persians with our victory.” 


Pashang’s ambition flared up when he saw Afrasyab, with his lion’s shoulders 
and mammoth’s might, his shadow that seemed to stretch for miles, his tongue 
like a cutting sword, and his heart like a foaming sea. He ordered him to 
unsheathe his sword and lead the army against Iran. He saw his son as a worthy 
commander, someone fit to raise his head up to the sun, who after his own death 
would inherit the kingdom. When Afrasyab left his father’s presence, his head 
was filled with the longing for vengeance, his heart with impatience for battle. 

While preparations for war were being completed, Afrasyab’s brother, 
Aghriras, came to their father full of foreboding. He said, “My father, you are an 
experienced man, and you are the chief of the Turks, but consider: it is true that 
Manuchehr is gone, but Sam still commands their armies, and they have warriors 
like Karshasp and Qaren as well as many others. You know what that ancient 
wolf did to Tur and Salm. My grandfather Zadsham was the king of Turan and 
the leader of the Turkish armies, his helmet touched the moon’s sphere, but he 
never talked as Afrasyab is now doing, and never read in the book of vengeance 
during a time of peace. It would be better if we gave up these thoughts of 
rebellion, which will bring disaster on us.” 

Pashang said to his son, “Afrasyab is like a male lion set on the hunt, a war 
elephant ready for battle, and a grandson who does not seek revenge for his 
grandfather’s shame is not worthy of his lineage. You should go with him to 
give him good advice. When the clouds loose their burden on the plains, and the 
mountain slopes and deserts turn to good pasturage for our horses, and plants 
grow to the height of heroes, when the world turns green with spring’s 
vegetation, that is the time to pitch your tents on the plains. When your heart 
rejoices in the spring’s verdure and flowers, you should lead our army to Amol. 
Trample Dehestan and Gorgan beneath your cavalry’s hooves, and make their 
rivers’ waters ruby-red with blood. That was where Manuchehr set off from on 
his war of vengeance against Tur. See if you can confront Qaren or Karshasp 
there and overcome them; make our ancestors’ souls happy by your victories, 
and burn in the fires of chagrin the hearts of those who wish us ill.” And 
Aghriras said to his ambitious father, “I shall make their rivers flow with the 
blood of vengeance.” 


Afrasyab Invades Persia 

When spring’s new growth gave the plains the appearance of silk, the Turks 
prepared for battle. Armies gathered from Turan and China, and joined with 
warriors armed with maces from the west. So massive were their forces that they 
had neither center nor edge, and Nozar’s fortunes began to fade. The news that a 
Turkish army was approaching the Oxus reached Feraydun’s successor, and the 
Persian armies left the imperial palace to gather on the plain. Under Qaren’s 
command, they set off for Dehestan, with Nozar following in the rear. The world 
was filled with rumors, and as the army came near Dehestan, the sun was 
obscured by their dust. Nozar’s pavilion was pitched in front of the town; he had 
no desire to fight within the city walls and did not delay there for long.

Campaigning in Arman, Afrasyab chose two Turkish chieftains, one named 
Shamasas and the other Khazbaran, gave them a force of thirty thousand cavalry, 
and sent them to march on Zavolestan, where they were to attack Zal. News had 
come that Sam was dead and that Zal was building him a tomb; Afrasyab was 
overjoyed at this, since he saw that the Persians’ fortunes were declining. He 
marched on Dehestan and pitched his pavilion opposite the town. Who could 
count his forces? But multiply four hundred by a thousand and you will have 
some notion of their army’s size. The very mountains and sands seemed to 
seethe with their presence, and all the desert was filled with warriors. On King 
Nozar’s side there were a hundred and forty thousand men, all mounted and 
ready for war. Afrasyab surveyed his army, and at nightfall sent a messenger 
with a letter to Pashang, saying, “We have sought to conquer the world and it is 
within our grasp; if we reckon up the forces at Nozar’s disposal, we see they are 
mere prey for us, and we shall hunt them down. And Sam is no longer there to 
fight for his king; Zal is busy building him a tomb and does not have the strength 
to fight against us. Shamasas has taken Zavolestan and wears their glittering 
crown. It is good to strike at the right moment and to consult with those who are 
friendly and wise. If a man hangs back when he should act, he will not have such 
an opportunity again.” The messenger seemed to grow wings as he sped toward 
the king of Turan, whose splendor was like that of the sun. 


The Combat Between Barman and Qobad; Qobad Is Killed 

When dawn showed above the mountains, the advance troops of Afrasyab’s 
army reached Dehestan. There was a Turk among them named Barman, and he 
said, “I will shock these sleepers awake.” There were two parasangs between the 
armies, and all the weapons and machinery of war were ready. Barman surveyed 
Nozar’s army and saw Nozar’s pavilion. He went to the commander of the 
Turkish forces, told him of what he had observed, and said, “How long do we 
have to hide our prowess? If the king will permit, I will challenge one of their 
men to single combat; then they will see my valor and consider no one but me to 
be a warrior.” The wise Aghriras said, “And if Barman is defeated our frontier 
forces will be disheartened, and we shall suffer a setback. We must choose some 
anonymous warrior, and then we shall not be biting our nails waiting for the 
outcome.” Afrasyab’s face flushed with shame as he listened to Aghriras, and 
with a frown on his face he said to Barman, “Put on your armor and string your 
bow; you are the best of our warriors, and there will be no need to bite our nails 
when you fight.” 


Barman returned to the battlefield and shouted toward Qaren, the son of 
Kaveh, “What warrior from Nozar’s army will fight against me in single 
combat?” Qaren looked round at his men to see who would step forward to fight, 
but none of the famous fighters gave any answer, except for the ancient warrior 
Qobad. The wise commander frowned at this; Qobad was his brother and his 
words enraged him. He was so angry that tears stood in his eyes; how could it be 
that from all this great army and all these young warriors, an old man should be 
trying to fight? Qaren was upset by Qobad’s behavior and in front of the army he 
said to him, “You’ve reached the age when you should forget about fighting, 
particularly against someone fresh, young, and confident like Barman; he’s a 
horseman with the heart of a male lion, and he lifts his head above the sun in his 
pride. You are an important leader of this army and an adviser to the king. If 
your white beard is reddened with blood, all our warriors will lose heart; our 
army will be broken, and the hearts of our friends will despair.” 

Now listen to Qobad’s answer to the warlike Qaren. He said, “The turning 
heavens have allotted me my life. My brother, you must know that our bodies 
are born to die, and that warriors live to wear their helmets in war. From the time 
of the great Manuchehr until today my heart has lived in sorrow. A man cannot 
reach the heavens while he is alive; he is the prey of death, which pursues us all. 
One dies from a sword blow in the midst of battle; vultures and ravening lions 
devour his body, spears and swords slash his head. Another dies in his bed, but it 
is certain that we must all die. If I am to leave this splendid world, my strong 
brother will take my place here; he will build me a royal tomb, and perform the 
rites that love dictates. He will wrap my head in camphor, musk, and rose water, 
and lay my body down for its eternal rest. Allow me this, my brother; farewell, 
and may you flourish in the world.” 

When he had finished speaking he grasped his spear and went out to the 
battlefield like a maddened elephant. Barman said to him, “Time has delivered 
you to me: it would be better for you to wait, since fate itself is ready to demand 
your life from you.” Qobad replied, “The world has given me my time. A man 
will die when his time has come, and cannot die before then.” At that he urged 
his black horse forward, giving no respite to his warlike soul. From dawn until 
the sun cast lengthened shadows, the two tried their strength against one another. 


But Barman was victorious at last; 
He sped onto the battlefield and cast 
A lance that struck Qobad, piercing his back; 


His spine was smashed. Slowly he toppled, slack 
And lifeless, from the saddle to the ground; 
Thus died the hero, aged, and renowned. 


Barman returned to Afrasyab, his cheeks glittering with triumph, and he was 
given a robe of honor the like of which no nobleman or subject had ever seen. 

When Qobad was killed, Qaren led his forces out and the two armies met like 
the mingling of two mighty oceans, so that the earth seemed to shake with their 
encounter. Qaren rushed forward, and from the side of Turan, Garsivaz was 
equally quick to attack. The neighing of horses and the dust sent up by the 
armies obscured the sun and moon; the diamond glitter of steel weapons was 
dulled by blood. Dust swirled like rain clouds made vermilion by the sun, clouds 
reverberated with the din of drums, and swords ran with blood. Qaren urged his 
horse this way and that, wielding his sword like fire, as if diamonds rained down 
coral, except that the coral was men’s souls. When Afrasyab saw his prowess he 
led his men toward him, and the two fought until night appeared over the 
mountains, and still their desire for vengeance remained unsatisfied. 

As night fell Qaren led his forces before Dehestan and came to Nozar’s 
pavilion, his heart wrung by his brother’s death. Nozar saw him and wept tears 
from eyes that had been unable to sleep. He said, “My soul did not mourn like 
this even after Sam’s death: may Qobad’s soul be as resplendent as the sun, and 
may it be your fate to remain in this world eternally. There is no escape from the 
death we are born to, and the world is nothing but a cradle for the grave.” Qaren 
replied, “Since I was born I have dedicated my body to death: it was Feraydun 
who placed this helmet on my head, so that I could ride out to avenge Iraj. Since 
that day I have not loosened my sword-belt nor laid down my sword. Now my 
brother, a man filled with dignity and wisdom, has died, and this will be my end, 
too. May you live forever; today when battle overtook Pashang’s son, and part of 
his army was destroyed, he chose fresh troops, then saw me with my ox-headed 
mace and came after me eager to fight. I came so close to him that we looked 
one another in the eye, but then he wove a magical spell, and both light and color 
disappeared before my sight. Night fell and the world turned dark, and my arm 
was unable to strike. It seemed that time itself was ending, and that the sky had 
retreated beneath the earth, and we had to draw back from the battle in the dust 
and darkness.” 


Afrasyab’s Second Attack 


On both sides the army rested, and on the second day they renewed the battle. 
The Persian forces formed ranks as was customary during the Kayanid kings’ 
wars, and when Afrasyab saw them he had his army’s brazen drums beaten and 
their ranks drawn up. The sun seemed to go into hiding behind the dust sent up 
by the armies’ cavalry, the give and take of battle from both sides began, and the 
plains became indistinguishable from the mountain slopes. The two armies 
clashed with such force that blood flowed like a river: wherever Qaren attacked, 
blood mingled with the dust, and where Afrasyab’s dust rose up, the plain 
streamed with blood. From the center of his troops Nozar rode out against 
Afrasyab, and the two leaders 


Then flung such spears at one another, each 
Writhed like a snake in twisting out of reach. 


The battle lasted until nightfall, when Pashang’s son began to gain the upper 
hand. Most of the men in the Persian army had been wounded, and the forces of 
Turan carried the battle into their positions. The Persian troops turned back 
helplessly and fled across the plain. Nozar’s heart was grief-stricken, since the 
stars had clouded his crown with dust. When the din of drums died away on the 
battlefield he summoned Tus, who came together with Gostahm, their lips filled 
with sighs, their souls with sorrow. He said, “What pain there is in my heart!” 
and he wept even as he spoke. Blood seemed to fill his heart, cold sighs escaped 
from his lips, and he remembered his great father’s words: “From Turan and 
China a mighty army will invade Iran; your heart will be wrung by them, and 
your army broken.” “Now,” he said, “the king’s words have been borne out, and 
the day he predicted has come. No one has ever read in a book chronicling the 
famous and their deeds of such a huge army as has been led here from Turan. 
You must go to Pars and collect my family and take them to Rabeh-kuh in the 
Alborz mountains. Hide your departure from your troops, because if they find 
out, their hearts will break; it will be like further wounding a wounded man. But 
in this way one or two people of Feraydun’s seed might be saved from this 
innumerable host of enemies. I do not know if we shall see one another again; 
tonight we shall make a last effort at resistance. Keep a watch day and night, and 
stay aware of what is going on in the world. If you hear bad news about our 
army, and that our imperial glory has been darkened, do not fall into despair, 
because the heavens have ever been thus, killing one man in battle, and giving 
another happiness and a crown. A man who has been killed is like one who has 


died; he quivers for a moment, and then is at rest.” Then he embraced his sons 
and wept. Tus and Gostahm left Nozar’s presence, their cheeks wet with tears, 
and their souls filled with anxiety. 


Nozar and Afrasyab Fight for a Third Time 

The army rested for two days, and on the third, as dawn broke, Nozar was forced 
to fight. Afrasyab descended on his forces like a seething ocean, and shouts 
mingled with the blare of trumpets, and the sound of Indian chimes rose up from 
the royal pavilion. The din of drums was heard in the tents and the warriors 
donned their iron helmets. No one had slept in Afrasyab’s camp; the night had 
been spent in preparing the army and sharpening swords and javelins. The valley 
was filled with troops advancing with their heavy maces; the mountain slopes 
and plains disappeared, and troops were deployed from sea to sea. Qaren placed 
himself in the center of his forces, so that they would protect the king; Taliman 
commanded the left flank, and Shapur, Nastureh’s son, the right. From dawn till 
dusk neither the mountains, nor the sea, nor the plains could be seen. But when 
the spears’ shadows lengthened, the Persian forces were broken, and as their 
luck declined, so the Turks gained the upper hand. Shapur’s troops were routed, 
and Shapur himself lay dead. The Persians fled from the Turks toward Dehestan 
and occupied the citadel; there were only a few approaches to the fortress and 
they fought hard throughout the day and night to defend them. In this way they 
gained some respite. Nozar established himself there, and the way was blocked 
to the enemy’s cavalry. 

Afrasyab dispatched a Turk called Qarakhan to Pars, telling him to go bya 
desert road and cut off the Persian baggage train. When Qaren heard that 
Afrasyab had sent out a detachment of troops in the night, his fury knew no 
bounds and he came to Nozar like a leopard, saying: “Look what this deceitful 
king has done to you; he has sent innumerable troops against our army’s 
womenfolk, and if he captures them, our nobles will be in despair; they will hide 
their heads in shame. I must pursue this Qarakhan; you have provisions here and 
flowing water, and the troops are loyal to you. Wait here, and keep up your 
spirits, as befits a brave king.” But Nozar replied, “This is not advisable; none of 
my commanders can compare with you. Gostahm and Tus left to see to the 
baggage train when the drums sounded at dawn. They will catch up with the 
women and look after them appropriately.” 

They sat to their food and called for wine, and for a while they dispelled 
sorrow from their hearts. Then soldiers gathered in Qaren’s quarters, and their 


eyes were as filled with tears as winter clouds are with rain. They spoke of this 
and that, and then said, “We must go to Pars; we cannot accept this decision. If 
the Persian womenfolk are captured by our enemies, if they take our wives and 
children prisoner without our putting up a fight, who will ever dare lift a lance 

again in these plains, who will be able to rest or sleep?” 

Shirui, Keshvad, and Qaren discussed this at length and finally, when half the 
night had passed, decided to leave. Gazhdahom was holding a fortress to which 
Barman had laid siege with his elephants, blocking the way forward. It was he 
who had inflicted a wound on Qaren when he killed his brother, and Qaren 
longed for vengeance. He attacked like a lion and gave Barman no chance to 
retreat, hurling a spear into his waist and shattering his spine; Barman’s forces 
lost heart and fled from one another in disorder, and Qaren and his troops pushed 
on toward Pars. 


Nozar Is Captured by Afrasyab 

When Nozar learned that Qaren had left, he came hurrying after him, hoping to 
escape the evil fate that threatened to trample him underfoot. As soon as 
Afrasyab heard about Qaren’s flight across the desert, he gathered his troops and 
set off in pursuit. They made good speed and closed on the Persians, pursuing 
him through the night until dawn. The world was darkened with the dust sent up 
by the galloping riders, and finally it was Nozar who was captured, together with 
one thousand two hundred of his troops. The captives were led in chains before 
Afrasyab. 

Then Afrasyab gave orders that his men were to search the caves, mountains, 
deserts, and rivers to prevent Qaren from escaping. But he was told that Qaren 
had already departed, because he was worried about what would happen to the 
Persian women, and had killed Barman. Afrasyab said to Barman’s father, 
Viseh, who grieved for his son’s death, “Leopards hesitate to attack Qaren, but 
you must take troops and go after him, to avenge your son’s death.” 


Viseh Finds His Son Dead 

Viseh set off with a detachment of soldiers, but before he caught up with Qaren, 
he saw his son sprawled dead on the battlefield and countless warriors of Turan 
lying there dead with him. Their banners were torn, their drums overturned, their 
shrouds were red as tulips, their faces vermilion with blood. 

Qaren learned that Viseh was advancing against him; he sent a detachment of 
his men on Arab horses to Zavolestan, and with the rest he went out from Pars 
onto the plain, illuminating the world with his splendor. To his left he saw an 
army approaching, and a black banner emerged from the dust; at the head of the 
troops he saw Viseh, the Turkish commander. The two armies drew up their 
ranks and advanced on one another, and from the center of his men Viseh called 
out: “The wind has swept away your crown and your great throne. All the lands 
from Qanuj to the borders of Zavolestan, and from there to Bost and Kabol, are 
in our hands now; it is our portraits that are painted on the walls of their castles. 
Where will you find a resting place now that your king has been captured?” 
Qaren replied, “I am Qaren, and water will not wash away my prowess. I did not 
leave out of fear, or because of rumors; I fought with your son, and now that you 
are looking to avenge his death, I shall fight with you.” 

The left and right flanks of the armies went forward, and the sun and moon 
were dimmed by dust. The armies clashed, and a river of blood flowed across the 
ground. Qaren’s forces prevailed over Viseh’s, and Viseh turned back from the 
battle. Many of his men were killed when he fled, but Qaren did not pursue him. 
Viseh made his way back to Afrasyab, weeping for his son’s death. 


Shamasas Attacks Zavolestan 

The Armani leader whom Afrasyab had sent against Zavolestan was Shamasas. 
He and Khazbaran led thirty thousand warlike troops across the Oxus and 
marched with their swords and maces as far as the River Hirmand. 

At this time Zal was in mourning and building a tomb for his father, and 
Mehrab was diligently carrying out the functions of government for him. He sent 
a envoy to Shamasas with a message: “May the commander of Turan’s army 
wear the crown of sovereignty forever. I am descended from the Arab king 
Zahhak, and I have no great love for Zal’s rule. I allied myself with his family 
because I had no choice, in order to preserve my life. Now this castle is the 
center of my power, and all Zavolestan is in my hands. Zal is in mourning for his 
father, and my heart is cheered by his grief; I would be happy if I never saw his 
face again. Give me time, and let me send a messenger to Afrasyab, so that he 
can know the secrets of my heart, and in this way silence those who speak 
against me. I shall send him appropriate gifts, whatever is fitting for a king, and 
if he orders me to appear before him I shall stand before his throne ready to 
serve him. I shall hand over my sovereignty to him, and my heart will be content 
with his approval. I shall send him the wealth I have accumulated and cause no 
trouble for his warriors.” 

In this way he snared the Turanian warriors’ hearts, while at the same time he 
sought for a way to escape from the threat they presented. He sent an envoy to 
Zal, saying, “Fly as quickly as a bird, open your wings; tell Zal what you have 
seen and tell him to lose no time in getting here. Say that two champions like 
leopards have come here from Turan to make war on us. Their army is 
encamped on the banks of the Hirmand, and so far the gold I have bribed them 
with has tangled their feet and impeded their progress. But if you delay in your 
response, our enemies will achieve what they desire.” 


Zal Comes to Mehrab 

The envoy reached Zal, whose heart flared up like fire at the news. He set off 
with his army to join Mehrab, and when he saw Mehrab and considered how 
prudently he had acted, he said to himself, “Why should I fear Turan’s army? 
What’s this Khazbaran to me? No more than a fistful of dirt.” He said to 
Mehrab, “You have acted wisely, and I applaud all you’ve done. Now, in the 
darkness of the night, I shall go and show them what I’m capable of. They will 
know soon enough that I have returned, and that my heart longs to fight against 
them.” 

Zal slung a bow over his shoulder, and each of the arrows he took was as 
massive as the bough of a tree. He spied out the enemy encampment and then 
shot the arrows into three different areas of the camp. Uproar ensued, and when 
night turned to day, the troops gathered round the arrows. 


They said, “These arrows must be Zal’s, since no 
Brute force but his could match them to the bow.” 


Shamasas said, “Khazbaran, if you had not been so eager for wealth, there would 
be no Mehrab left by now, no army, no more treasure to plunder, and no Zal to 
terrify you like this.” Khazbaran replied, “He is one man, he’s not Ahriman, and 
he’s not made of iron; don’t worry about fighting with him, I’1] deal with him 
when I find him.” 

When the shining sun began to climb in the sky, the din of drums rang out on 
the plain; within the city could be heard drums and trumpets, as well as the 
clashing of cymbals and Indian chimes. Zal led his men onto the plain, together 
with their tents and elephants; rank upon rank gathered there, and from a 
distance the dust sent up made the plain look like a black mountain. Khazbaran, 
armed with his mace and shield, attacked Zal, swinging his mace against Zal’s 
chest. His breastplate shattered, Zal turned back, and the warriors from Kabol 
followed him. He donned new armor and returned to the fray like a lion; his 
father’s mace was in his hand, his head was filled with fury, and blood welled in 
his heart. He brought his ox-headed mace down on Khazbaran’s head, and the 
ground was spotted with his blood like a leopard’s hide. Zal flung him down and 
left him sprawled lifeless, then went onto the plain between the two armies. He 
called for Shamasas: “Come out and fight; the man who daren’t come out has no 
heart for a fight.” But when Shamasas saw Zal’s mace he hid himself away 


among his troops. In the dust of battle Zal came on Golbad encased in armor; he 
fitted an arrow to his bow and it struck Golbad’s waist, piercing his body armor, 
and pinning Golbad to his saddle. The army watched in horror, and Shamasas in 
particular lost heart, and his face turned sallow. Shamasas and his troops fled in 
disorder, and Zal and Mehrab came after them in hot pursuit. So many men were 
killed that it seemed there was no earth left for the soldiers to tread upon, and the 
Turkish troops flung down their armor and fled toward their king. 

When Shamasas reached the desert, Qaren, Kaveh’s son, appeared in the 
distance; he was returning from his encounter with the troops of Viseh, whose 
son he had killed with such contempt. Qaren realized who he was facing and 
why they had come to Zavolestan. He had the trumpets sounded, and the two 
armies came face to face. Dust obscured the sun as many of Shamasas’s men 
were wounded and others taken prisoner. Shamasas escaped with a few men, 
fleeing from the dust of battle. 

Afrasyab learned of the death of his chieftains; his heart filled with the fire of 
grief and his cheeks were stained with tears. He sprang up in anger and said, 
“Where is Nozar? Viseh can take his revenge on him.” When Nozar heard this, 
he knew that his days were numbered. A group of soldiers came gossiping and 
shouting to find him and dragged him with his arms bound in front of Afraysab. 
As soon as he saw Nozar approaching, Afraysab thought of his ancestors and of 
his desire to avenge their humiliation. He said to Nozar, “You deserve whatever 
evil comes to you,” and called for a sword. He severed King Nozar’s head with a 
blow to his neck and flung his lifeless body to the ground. So perished 
Manuchehr’s heir, and the throne of Iran remained empty. 

The captives were dragged in, and they pleaded for their lives. Aghriras came 
forward to intervene on their behalf and began to argue with Afrasyab. He said, 
“To kill so many unarmed captives is not a noble act but a base one. It would be 
better if they were not harmed; hand them over in chains to me, and I’1] imprison 
them in a cave and have them well guarded. They will die wretchedly there, but 
you should not shed their blood.” Afrasyab responded to his brother’s request 
and handed the prisoners over to him; they were taken weeping and wailing to 
Sari. 


Afrasyab’s Rule in Persia 

Afrasyab made all speed from Dehestan to Rey, his horses sweating with 
exhaustion. There he placed the Kayanid crown on his head and held open court, 
distributing gold coins. 


Gostahm and Tus received news that the glory of the imperial crown had 
dimmed, and that the king’s head had been severed with a sharp sword. They 
tore out their hair and clawed at their faces, and lamentation was heard 
throughout Iran. These chieftains’ heads were smeared with dust, their eyes were 
filled with tears, and their clothes torn. They made for Zavolestan, speaking of 
the king, and longing for him in their souls. They went mourning to Zal, and 
said: 


“Alas for Nozar and his bravery, 

His might, his crown, his magnanimity; 
Protector of Iran, prop of the state, 

King of the world, most glorious of the great, 
Scion of Feraydun, of unmatched worth, 
Whose horses’ hooves subdued the willing earth; 
We’ll dip our swords in poison and avenge 
His unjust death, relentless in revenge. 

The heavens weep to see our wretched fate, 
And you must put aside your robes of state 
To mourn beside us, to lament and keep 

This vigil with us while we grieve and weep.” 


The whole company joined them in their weeping, groaning as if they were 
burning in fire. Then Zal said, “Until the Day of Judgment my sword shall not 
see its scabbard; my horse beneath me will be my throne, my feet will be 
nowhere but in the stirrups, and my crown will be my helmet. I shall not sleep or 
rest until I have taken my revenge; the rivers flow with less water than my eyes 
flow with tears. May the king’s soul be resplendent among his glorious peers, 
and may you comfort yourselves with the knowledge of God’s justice, so that 
your hearts find peace. We are all born for death; we belong to death, and we 
have given our heads into its keeping.” 

News reached the Persian captives in Sari that Zal and his companions were 
preparing an attack. They were disturbed by this, and in their anxiety they could 
not eat or sleep. They were afraid of what Afrasyab would do and they sent a 
message to Aghriras, saying: “You are a great lord, famed for your goodness, 
and we live only because of your words: we are all your slaves. You know that 
in Zavolestan Zal reigns and that the king of Kabol is with him there, together 
with other warriors like Barzin, Qaren, Kherdad, and Keshvad, the destroyer of 


armies. These are great heroes who will not hesitate to use their strength in 
Persia’s defense, and when they ride out to war they can pierce a man’s eye with 
a lance thrust. Afrasyab will be infuriated by their attacks, and he will turn his 
anger on his prisoners. For the sake of his crown he will have all our heads roll 
in the dust, even though we are innocent of any crime. If Aghriras will agree to 
set us free, we shall scatter throughout the world, and we shall praise him before 
chieftains and nobles, and pray that God protect him.” 

The wise Aghriras replied, “I cannot do this. My enmity toward the king will 
be plain, and that Ahriman will be enraged with me. But I shall try to help you in 
another way, one which will not provoke my brother. If Zal attacks, when he 
comes close to Sari I shall hand you over to him, and then evacuate Amol 
without fighting, and so bring shame on my head.” The Persian nobles bowed 
their faces to the ground, and when they had expressed their gratitude to him, 
they sent an envoy from Sari with a message for Zal. The message said, “God 
has been merciful to us; the wise Aghriras has become our ally. He swears that if 
two men come here as Zal’s representatives from Iran he will not fight, but 
evacuate the area around Amol and lead his army to Rey; if this isn’t done, not 
one of us will escape from the claws of that dragon Afrasyab.” When the 
message was read to Zal, he said, “Now, my warlike leopards, which of you 
whose heart is blackened by war will undertake this mission and so raise his 
head to the sun?” Keshvad slapped his hand to his chest and said, “I am prepared 
to do this.” Zal called down blessings on him and said, “May you live happily 
for as long as the sun and moon exist.” 

An army set off from Zavolestan to Amol, and news of this reached Aghriras, 
who had the brazen trumpets blown and led his men toward Rey, leaving all the 
prisoners in Sari. When Keshvad reached Sari he freed them, and gave each of 
them a horse, and the group set off on its journey from Amol to Zavolestan. At 
the news of Keshvad’s return in triumph, Zal distributed money to the poor and 
gave the messenger one of his own robes. Zal went out to welcome Keshvad, as 
was appropriate, and wept over the captives who had escaped from the lion’s 
clutches. He brought them into the city with great honor and had palaces allotted 
to them, so that they lived again as they had done under Nozar, with their own 
wealth, thrones, and crowns. 


Aghriras Is Killed by His Brother 
When Aghriras arrived in Rey from Amol, Afrasyab learned what he had done 
and said to him, “What do you think you are up to, mixing honey and bitter 


colocynth like this? I told you to kill them, and that this was no time for caution 
or high-mindedness. It’s not for a warrior to worry about wisdom, that’s not 
what brings him glory in battle; a fighting spirit and wisdom have nothing to do 
with each other.” Aghriras replied, “A little shame and a sense of honor are not 
out of place; whenever you think of acting evilly, fear God and do no harm to 
anyone. The crown and royal belt have seen many like you, but they stay in no 
one’s possession for long.” The king sprang up like a maddened elephant, and 
for an answer drew his sword. And then this faithless fool slashed his brother in 
two with a blow to the waist. 

Zal heard about what had happened to Aghriras and said, “His good fortune 
grows dim, and his throne desolate.” He had the brazen trumpets blown, and 
drums strapped onto his war elephants, and he drew up his army that glittered as 
splendidly as a rooster’s eye. He led his men toward Pars, seething with anger as 
he marched. From sea to sea the plains were filled with men, and the faces of the 
sun and moon were obscured by dust. When Afrasyab learned that Zal had 
mobilized his forces, he prepared for the defense of Rey. The advance troops of 
the two armies fought day and night, and many warriors and chieftains were 
killed on both sides. 

One night Zal talked at length about Afrasyab, and his own warriors’ battles 
and those of his allies. Then he said, “If a king is to be fortunate and his soul to 
be luminous, he must be of royal lineage, and also he must be someone who is 
aware of tradition and the past. The army is like a ship, and the king on his 
throne is both the wind and the ship’s pilot. Although both Gostahm and Tus are 
fine warriors, neither is worthy of the crown and throne; we need a king who is 
fortunate, who is endowed with the divine farr, and with wisdom.” They 
searched among Feraydun’s descendants for someone who would be worthy of 
the throne. They could find no one but Zav, the son of Tahmasp, to renew the 
glories of Feraydun’s crown. Qaren, together with priests and the lords of the 
marches, took the good news to him that he would inherit the crown, since Zal 
and all the army wished him to be king. Zav accepted their choice and took his 
place on the throne. 


The Reign of Zav, the Son of Tahmasp 

Zav ascended the throne on an auspicious day, and Zal swore loyalty to him. An 
old man in his eightieth year, Zav reigned for only five years. In that time he 
made the world young again with his justice and goodness; he stopped the army 


from committing crimes and prevented them from arbitrarily arresting people 
and killing them, and he communicated in his heart with God. 

At that time the world was suffering from a famine; the ground was 
desiccated and the plants withered, no winds blew, no rain fell from the heavens, 
and bread was worth its weight in gold. For eight months the two armies faced 
one another but did not fight, because their strength had been broken by the 
famine. People said to one another, “It is our fault that this evil has fallen on us 
from the heavens.” From both armies cries of hunger could be heard, and a 
messenger from Afrasyab came to Zav saying, “Our fate in this fleeting world is 
nothing but pain and grief. Let us divide our lands and invoke God’s blessings 
on one another. Our nobles are exhausted by war, and this famine means we 
must not delay in making peace.” They swore that they would not harbor hatred 
for one another in their hearts, that they would divide their lands justly and 
according to precedent, and that they would bear no grudge against one another 
for the past. Beyond the Oxus, and into China and Khotan, was to belong to 
Afraysab, and Zav and Zal had no power beyond the border where the Turks’ 
tents were pitched; for their part the Turks would not advance into Iran. 
Although Zav was an old man, the world was renewed under his rule; he led his 
army to Pars, and Zal returned to Zavolestan. 

Then the mountain tops echoed with thunder; the world flourished again with 
the colors and scents of flowers, and the land filled with streams, gardens, and 
flowing water. The earth was as lovely as a young bride, because when men do 
not have tigerish natures she is not harsh and grudging to them. Zav called his 
nobility together to give thanks to God, saying, “Abundance has replaced 
famine, and God held the keys to this change.” Everywhere festivities were held, 
and men emptied their hearts of all anger and enmity. So five years passed 
without suffering, but when Zav reached the age of eighty-six, his sun-like face 
faded; this kind, just man died, and the good fortunes of Iran faded. 


Afrasyab Learns of Zav’s Death 

Afrasyab evacuated Rey and crossed the Oxus. But Pashang, whose heart was 
filled with hatred and his head with thoughts of war, sent him no greetings. 
Afrasyab dispatched a messenger to him, but for months, for a year, Pashang 
would not receive him. Pashang’s heart was sated with the throne and crown, he 
felt like a rusted sword, and he grieved for the death of Aghriras. He sent an 
envoy to Afrasyab saying, “You should have been a friend to Aghriras, but you 


shed your brother’s blood and fled from that savage brought up by a bird. I want 
no more to do with you, and you will never see me again.” 

Time passed, and the tree of calamities bore bitter fruit. Information reached 
the Turks that Zav had died and that the Persian throne was empty. All the 
world’s ears were filled with the news, “The imperial throne lies idle.” Pashang 
sent Afrasyab a letter saying, “Cross the Oxus and lead an army into Persia; do 
not wait until someone occupies their throne. I am sending you into war against 
our enemy; so far it is only your brother whom you’ve harmed.” Afrasyab 
mustered troops and led them from the plain of Sepinjab to the Oxus, and the 
earth seemed like a heaven raining down Indian swords. When news reached 
Iran that Afrasyab claimed the throne, the Persians turned to Zal and addressed 
him harshly: “Gaining control of the world was an easy matter for you, then? 
Since Sam died and you have been our champion, we have not known one day of 
happiness. An army has crossed the Oxus and is bearing down on us, obscuring 
the sun with the dust it sends up. If you have a solution to this crisis, put it into 
effect, because the Turkish leader will be here soon enough.” Zal said to the 
nobles, “Since I have bound on my belt to fight, no horseman like me has ever 
sat in the saddle; no one can wield my sword or mace, and I have fought night 
and day. I have feared nothing but old age, and now that my back is bent and I 
cannot flourish my Kaboli dagger as I once did, Rostam has grown to be like a 
tall cypress and deserves the diadem of greatness. He needs a war horse, and 
none of our Arab horses are equal to the task. We must find him a mammoth 
mount, and I will inquire everywhere for one. I shall ask Rostam if he agrees to 
my plan and remind him that he was born to fight against the seed of Zadsham. I 
shall see if he is ready for the task.” All the cities of Iran rejoiced to hear his 
words; Zal sent out messengers in every direction, and had armor manufactured 
for his horsemen. 


ROSTAM AND HIS HORSE RAKHSH 


Rostam Chooses a Horse 


Zal said to Rostam, “You have grown so tall, Your cypress body towers 
above us all. 

The work that lies ahead of us will keep 

Our restless spirits from their food and sleep; You’re still a boy, not old 
enough to fight, Your heart still looks for pleasure and delight, Your 
mouth still smells of milk, how can I ask You to take on this seasoned 
warrior’s task, To fight with lion warriors, and beat 

Them back until they scatter in defeat? 

What do you say to this? What will you do? 

May health and greatness always partner you!” 

And Rostam answered Zal: “Pleasure and wine, Feasting and rest, are 
no concern of mine— Hard-pressed in war, or on the battlefield, With 
God to aid me, I shall never yield. 

I need to capture with my noose a horse 

Of mountain size and weight, of mammoth force, I need a crag-like mace 
if I’m to stand 

Against Turan, defending Persia’s land. 

I'll crush their heads with this tremendous mace And none shall dare 
oppose me face to face— Its weight will break an elephant, one blow 
From it will make a bloody river flow.” 

Zal was so moved by his son’s words that his soul seemed about to leave his 
body. 


Rostam Chooses Rakhsh Zal had all the herds of horses that were in 
Zavolestan, as well as some from Kabol, driven before Rostam, and 
the herdsmen explained to him the royal brands that they bore. 
Whenever Rostam selected a horse, as soon as he pressed down on 


it, the horse’s back would buckle beneath his strength, so that its 
belly touched the ground. But then a herd of horses of varying 
colors from Kabol was driven past him, and a gray mare galloped 
by; she had a chest like a lion’s, and was short-legged; her ears were 
pricked like glittering daggers, her fore and hindquarters were 
plump, and she was narrow-waisted. Behind her came a foal, of the 
same height and breadth of chest and rump as his mother, black 
eyed and holding his tail high, with black testicles, and iron hooves. 


His body was a wonder to behold, 
Like saffron petals, mottled red and gold. 


Rostam watched the mare go by, and when he saw the mammoth-bodied foal he 
looped his lariat, and said, “Keep that foal back from the herd.” The old 
herdsman who had brought the horses said, “My lord, you can’t take other 
people’s horses.” Rostam asked who owned the horse, since its rump bore no 
trace of any brand. The herdsman said, “Don’t look for a brand, but there are 
many tales told about this horse. No one knows who owns him; we call him 
‘Rostam’s Rakhsh’, and that’s all I know. He’s been ready to be saddled for 
three years now, and a number of nobles have chosen him; but whenever his 
mother sees a horseman’s lariat she attacks like a lioness.” Rostam flung his 
royal lariat, and quickly caught the horse’s head in its noose; the mother came 
forward like a raging lioness, as if she wanted to bite his head off. But Rostam 
roared like a lion, and the sound of his voice stopped the mare in her tracks. She 
stumbled, then scrambled up again and turned, and galloped off to join the rest 
of the herd. Rostam tightened the noose and pulled the foal toward himself; he 
pushed down with all his hero’s strength on the foal’s back, but the back did not 
give at all, and it was as if the foal was unaware of Rostam’s hand. Rostam said 
to himself, “This will be my mount; now I can set to work. He will be able to 
bear the weight of my armor, helmet, and mace, and my mammoth body.” He 
asked the herdsman, “Who knows the price of this dragon?” The herdsman 
replied, “If you are Rostam, then mount him and defend the land of Iran. The 
price of this horse is Iran itself, and mounted on his back you will be the world’s 
savior.” Rostam’s coral lips smiled, and he said, “It is God who does such good 
works.” 


He set a saddle on Rakhsh, and his head whirled with thoughts of war and 
vengeance. He opened Rakhsh’s mouth and saw that he was a swift, strong, 
courageous horse. Each night Rostam burned wild rue before him to ward off 
evil; from every side Rakhsh seemed to be a magical creature, swift in battle, 
with large haunches, alert and foaming at the mouth. 


Rakhsh and his noble rider seemed to bring To Zal’s reviving heart the 
joy of spring. 
Zal opened the doors to his treasury and distributed gold coins, careless of today 
and tomorrow. 


ROSTAM AND KAY QOBAD 


Zal Leads His Army Against Afrasyab 

Then from the back of an elephant he threw a pebble in a goblet as a sign to 
mount and gave a shout that could be heard for miles. The din of drums and 
blare of bugles mingled with the sounds of Indian bells and the trumpeting of 
elephants: the Day of Judgment seemed to have come to Zavolestan, as if the 
earth were crying out to its dead, “Rise.” Rostam led the army, followed by the 
land’s experienced warriors; it was spring time as they set out, and the world 
was filled with blossoms and flowers. 

Afrasyab learned of Zal’s approach, and from then on he could neither rest 
nor eat in his anxiety. He led his army toward the river at Rey, where the marshy 
reed beds are. The Persian army left the desert and made for the battlefield, until 
only two parasangs separated the two sides. Zal called a council of his 
experienced advisors and said to them: “You have seen the world and are wise in 
its ways; we have drawn up our army here and hope for a favorable outcome. 
But we are not of one mind as we were, and this is because the throne lacks a 
king; everything is unsure now, and the army has no leader. We need someone 
of royal lineage to take his place on the throne and bind on the belt of authority. 
A priest has told me of such a king, one who possesses the royal farr, and whose 
good fortune is still young. This is Kay Qobad, who is descended from 
Feraydun; he is an imposing man, wise, and just.” Then Zal turned to Rostam 
and said, “Take your mace now and throw back your shoulders; choose a group 
of companions and ride quickly to the Alborz mountains. Greet Kay Qobad 
respectfully but do not delay your return; you must be back here in two weeks, 
so do not rest for any reason along the way. Say to him, “The army is asking for 
you, and it has prepared the royal throne in your honor.’” Quick as the wind, 
Rostam bound on his belt and set off to fetch Kay Qobad. He brought him to Zal 
during the night, saying not a word to anyone about his arrival, and Zal sat with 
him and his advisors for a week, discussing what should be done. 


The Reign of Kay Qobad 

On the eighth day the ivory throne was made ready, and the royal crown 
suspended above it. Kay Qobad seated himself there and placed the jeweled 
crown on his head. The chieftains were gathered—men like Zal and warlike 
Qaren, Kherdad, Keshvad and Barzin—and they scattered jewels over the newly 
crowned king. He listened to what they had to say about Afrasyab and reviewed 
his troops. On the following day the noise of preparations was heard from the 
royal pavilion, and Qobad led his army out. Rostam put on his armor, and the 
dust he raised made him seem like a maddened elephant. The ranks of the 
Persian army marched to war, ready for bloodshed: one wing was led by 
Mehrab, the king of Kabol, and the other by Gazhdahom. Qaren was in the 
center, together with Keshvad, the breaker of armies. Zal followed them, with 
Kay Qobad, and it was as if there were fire on the one side of him, wind on the 
other. In front of the troops the Kaviani banner fluttered, dyeing the world 
scarlet, yellow, and purple, like a ship lifted on a wave above the Sea of China. 
The plains and mountain slopes were a mass of shields, and swords glittered like 
torches; from end to end the world was like a sea of pitch over which twinkled a 
hundred thousand candles. You would think the sun would lose its way, with the 
squeal of the trumpets and din of the army. 


Rostam’s Combat with Afrasyab 

Once battle was joined, Qaren was involved in every charge, sometimes riding to 
the left, sometimes to the right, everywhere eager for bloodshed. When Rostam 
saw how he fought, he went to his father and said, “Tell me what position the 
evil Afrasyab keeps during battle. What does he wear? Where does his banner 
flutter above the troops? Is that shining purple banner his? I will grasp him by 
the belt today and drag him down from his saddle.” Zal answered, “Listen to me, 
my son, look after yourself today; that Turk is a fire-breathing dragon in combat, 
a cloud that rains down disaster. His banner is black, as is his armor; his arms are 
encased in iron, and his helmet is of iron. All the surface of his iron armor is 
chased with gold, and his black banner is affixed to his helmet. Keep yourself 
safe from him, because he is a brave man, and fortune favors him with victory.” 
Rostam said, “Don’t trouble your soul about me; the world’s creator is my ally, 
and my heart, my sword, and my arm are my refuge.”

Then as the trumpets sounded Rostam urged his brazen-hoofed Rakhsh 
forward, and when Afrasyab caught sight of him he paused in wonder at this 
immature youth. He said to his warriors, “Who is that dragon who has escaped 
from his bonds? Who is he? I don’t know his name.” One of his men replied, 
“That is Zal’s son. Can’t you see that he has come here with Sam’s mace? He’s 





young, and eager to win a name for himself.” Like a vessel lifted high on a 
wave, Afrasyab went ahead of his army, and when Rostam saw him he gripped 
his thighs against Rakhsh and lifted his heavy mace to his shoulders. As he drew 
level with Afrasyab he brought his mace crashing down on the king’s saddle, 
then reached out and grasped at his belt, lifting him from his leopard-skin saddle. 
He wanted to take him back to Qobad, as a trophy from his first day of battle, 
but his strength and the weight of Afrasyab between them were too much for the 
belt, which split, so that Afrasyab’s head lay in the dirt, and his cavalry quickly 
gathered about him and hid him in the dust they sent up. When the king slipped 
out of his grasp like this, Rostam bit the back of his hand in anger. “Why,” he 
said, “didn’t I tuck him under my arm, instead of hanging on to his belt?” 

Bells rang out from the elephants’ backs, and the din of drums could be heard 
for miles, when they brought the good news to Qobad, that Rostam had broken 
the center of the Turks’ army. They said, “When Rostam reached the Turkish 
king, his black banner disappeared; Rostam grasped him by his belt and flung 
him down to the ground, so that a cry of consternation went up from the Turks.” 
Qobad sprang to his feet, and his army surged forward like a sea whipped up by 
the wind. Everywhere was the sound of weapons clashing, the glitter of daggers, 
the shock of wood against armor. Protected by their golden helmets and golden 
shields, men’s heads became dazed by the shock and din of blows. It was as if a 
cloud had rained vermillion down by magic, staining the earth with red dye. One 
thousand one hundred and sixty brave warriors were killed at a stroke, and the 
Turks fled before the Persians, retreating to Damghan; from there they made 
their way to the Oxus, sick at heart and weary, filled with rumors and 
reproaches, their armor shattered and their belts loosened, unheralded by 
trumpets or drums, bereft of their strength. 


Afrasyab Sees His Father 

From the river bank Afrasyab went to his father in despair, his tongue filled with 
words. He said, “Exalted king, you sinned when you looked for vengeance in 
this way. First, no one in the past ever saw great kings break their word. And 
Iraj’s seed has not been eradicated from the land, and no antidote has been found 
for this poison. When one goes, another takes his place, and the world will not 
remain without a leader. Qobad has come forward and placed the crown on his 
head, and has opened up a new way to warfare. And a horseman has appeared of 
Sam’s race; Zal named him Rostam. He came forward like a hideous monster, 
and the ground seemed scorched by his breath. He attacked everywhere, striking 


with his sword and mace; the air was filled with the sound of his mace’s blows, 
and my soul was not worth a fistful of dirt before his might. He shattered our 
army, and no one in the world had ever seen such a wonder. He caught sight of 
my banner and brought his mace down on my leopard-skin saddle; then he 
grasped at my belt and lifted me up as if I weighed no more than a mosquito. My 
belt split, and I fell from his grasp on the ground, and my men dragged me away 
from him. I see no alternative to making peace, because your army cannot 
withstand his onslaught. The lands which Feraydun bestowed on Tur have been 
given to me, and you should renounce this ancient longing for revenge. You 
know that being told about something is not the same as seeing it; something is 
always lacking when you only hear about a subject. War with Iran seemed like a 
game to you, but this has proven to be a hard game for your army to play. 
Consider how many golden helmets and golden shields, how many Arab horses 
with golden bridles, how many Indian swords with golden scabbards, and how 
many famous warriors Qobad has ruined. And worse than this, your name and 
reputation, which can never be restored, have been destroyed. Don’t think of 
past resentments, try to be reconciled with Kay Qobad. If you decide on any 
other course of action, armies will converge on you from four directions; from 
one side Rostam, a blazing sun against whom there is no defense, will attack; 
from another Qaren, who has never looked on defeat; from a third Keshvad, with 
his golden diadem, who has attacked Amol; and from a fourth Mehrab, the lord 
of Kabol, who leads Zal’s armies.” 


Pashang Sues for Peace 

The king of the Turks’ eyes filled with tears as he listened in silence to 
Afrasyab’s words. He told a scribe to bring paper and ink made from musk; the 
calligraphy of the letter this man wrote was so beautiful that it was worthy of a 
master, and it was decorated with colors and images. Pashang dictated: “In the 
name of the lord of the sun and moon, who has bestowed authority on us; may 
his blessings be on the soul of Feraydun, who is the warp and weft of our 
ancestry. If, in his ambition for the crown and throne, Tur acted evilly toward the 
Iraj, and there is much to be said about this, their quarrel must now be put to rest. 
Manuchehr has taken revenge for what happened to Iraj, and Feraydun showed 
us the true way when he divided the lands into separate realms. We should 
commit our hearts to this division and not ignore the customs and wisdom of our 
ancestors. At that time Tur’s imperial tents were pitched in Transoxiana, and the 
River Oxus marked the border. Iraj did not covet this area; he was given the land 


of Persia by Feraydun. If we break this agreement and go to war, we make life 
hard for ourselves, we wound ourselves with our own swords, and provoke 
God’s wrath, so that we shall inherit nothing, neither in this world nor the world 
to come. We should respect the division that Feraydun made between Salm, Tur, 
and Iraj, and renounce all thoughts of vengeance, for these lands are not worth 
the disasters we have brought on ourselves. Our heads have grown as white as 
snow, and the ground has been dyed vermilion with Kayanid blood, but in the 
end a man owns only the earth in which he lies; five cubits of ground are all we 
inherit, linen covers us, and we lie in the grave. Ambition’s door leads to sorrow 
and suffering, and our hearts remain heavy while we live in the fleeting world. If 
Kay Qobad will accept our terms, if his wise mind will incline to justice, none of 
our men will think even in their dreams of crossing the Oxus, and the Persians 
will not come here, except to bring greetings and a message of peace; in this way 
our two countries will live prosperously and happily.” 

The king sealed the letter and dispatched a detachment of men to take it to 
Kay Qobad. The messengers handed over the letter, and also spoke at length. 
Kay Qobad answered, “We did not attack first. It was Tur who committed the 
first crime by destroying Iraj, and in our own time Afrasyab crossed the Oxus 
and invaded Iran. You have heard what he did to King Nozar, so that even the 
beasts of the field grieved for him. And the way he acted with the wise Aghriras 
was not worthy of a chivalrous man. If you regret these evil acts, and will renew 
our treaties, I harbor no ambitions or desire for revenge, since I am prepared to 
leave this fleeting world. I grant you your side of the Oxus, in the hopes that 
Afrasyab will be content with this.” And he wrote out a new treaty, planting a 
tree in the garden of greatness. 

But Rostam said to him, “Your majesty, do not look for reconciliation in 
place of war; peace is not what they deserve; let them see what I can do with my 
mace in their land.” The king replied, “I have never seen anything better than 
justice: Pashang is Feraydun’s grandson, and he and his son have had enough of 
warfare. A wise man should not seek to be underhanded or unjust. I have written 
a charter on silk granting you suzerainty over Zavolestan, as far as the Sea of 
Sind. May you wear the crown and sit on the throne there, illuminating the 
world. Give Kabol to Mehrab, but keep your spear points dipped in poison, for 
wherever there is a kingdom, there is warfare, however great the realm may be.” 
He placed a golden crown on Rostam’s head and a golden belt about his waist, 
as a sign that he gave these territories into his keeping. Rostam kissed the ground 
before him. Then Qobad said, “May the throne never be without Zal; the world 


is not worth one of his hairs, and he serves to remind us of the great men of the 
past.” He sent Zal clothes of royal cloth of gold, and a belt and crown set with 
rubies and turquoises. On five elephants they placed howdahs set with turquoises 
that glittered more splendidly than the waters of the Nile, and draped the 
howdahs in cloth of gold. Qobad sent Zal treasures the like of which no man had 
ever seen, with the message, “I wished to send you a more splendid present, and 
if I live a long life I will see that you want for nothing in this world.” He 
distributed suitable gifts to Qaren, Keshvad, Barzin, Kherrad, and Pulad, and 
these included gold and silver coins, swords, shields, crowns, and belts. 


Kay Qobad Travels to Estakhr in Pars 

Then he set out for Pars, where the key to all his treasures lay. His palace was at 
Estakhr, where the Kayanid kings ruled in glory. The world paid him homage as 
he ascended the throne, ruling with wisdom and splendor and according to 
custom. He said to his nobles, “From end to end the world is mine, and if an 
elephant fights with a mosquito, this is a breach of justice and faith. I want 
nothing but righteousness in the world, because to provoke God’s anger will 
bring want to our land. Ease comes from effort, and wherever there is water and 
earth, there is my treasure. The cities and armies are mine, and my kingdom 
depends on the army. Live safely, protected by the lord of the world; be wise and 
live at peace. May those who have wealth enjoy it and share it, and be grateful to 
me that I enable them to do this. And whoever is hungry and cannot feed himself 
by his labor, my court will be his pasture, and I will welcome all who come to 
me.” Then he remembered the example of past heroes and made the world 
flourish with his justice and generosity. 

In this way he lived at peace for a hundred years; what kings have there been 
in the world who can compare with him? He had four wise sons: the first was 
Kay Kavus, the second Kay Arash, the third Kay Pashin, and the fourth Ashkas. 
When he had reigned for a hundred years, his strength began to wane; he knew 
that death was near and that the green leaves of his life had withered. He 
summoned Kavus and spoke to him of justice and generosity. He said, “I am 
ready for my last journey. Lower my coffin into the ground and take your place 
on the throne, this throne that passes from us before we know, and whose 
servants are without wisdom: I feel I am still that man who came so happily with 
his companions from the Alborz mountains. If you rule justly and righteously, 
you will be on a journey to the heavens; and if greed and ambition snare your 
mind, you will be unsheathing a dark sword that will be used against you.” 


He finished speaking, and then departed from the splendid world, exchanging 
his palace for a coffin. This is the world’s way, which raises us from the dust and 
disperses us on the wind. 


KAY KAVUS’S WAR AGAINST THE DEMONS 
OF MAZANDERAN 


The Reign of Kay Kavus 

If a noble tree grows tall and is then damaged in some way, its leaves wither, its 
roots weaken, and its summit begins to droop; and if it snaps, it must give way to 
anew shoot that, when spring comes, will bud and blossom like a shining lamp. 
If a sickly branch grows from a good root, you should not curse the root for this. 
In the same way, when a father cedes his place to his son and acquaints him with 
the secrets of life, if the son then brings shame on his father’s name and glory, 
then call him a stranger, not a son. If he slights his father’s example, he deserves 
to suffer at the hands of fate. This is the way of the ancient world, and you 
cannot tell what will grow from a given root. 

When Kavus took his father’s place, all the world was his slave. He saw that 
he owned treasures of all kinds, and that the earth was his to command: the 
throne was his, the royal torque and earrings, the golden crown set with 
emeralds, and Arab horses with streaming manes, and he considered no one in 
the world to be his equal. 

One day he was in a pleasure garden, seated on a golden throne with crystal 
feet, drinking wine with the Persian chieftains and talking of this and that. A 
musician, who was in reality a demon, came asking for audience with the king. 
He said, “I’m renowned in Mazanderan for my sweet voice; if I’m worthy to 
appear before the king, let me approach his throne.” The chamberlain went 





behind the curtain and said to the king, “There is a musician at the gate with a 
lute; he sings very sweetly.” Kavus gave orders to admit him, and they sat him 
down with his instrument. He began to sing: “My country is Mazanderan—may 
she 
Abide forever in prosperity; 
Her gardens bloom with roses all year long, Wild hyacinths, a myriad 
tulips throng 
Her mountain slopes; her climate’s sweet and clear, Not hot, not cold, 
but springtime all the year; Her perfumed air revives the soul—it 
seems 
Rose water rushes in her mountain streams; 
In every month wild tulips can be seen 
Dotting the hillsides’ and the meadows’ green; Her serving girls are 
lovely to behold, 
And there’s good hunting there, and wealth, and gold.” 


While Kavus was listening to this song, he conceived the idea of conquering 
Mazanderan with his army. He said to his warriors, “We have spent our time 
feasting, and while a brave man idles his time away, weak enemies grow strong. 
My throne is greater than that of Jamshid or Zahhak or Kay Qobad, and my 
justice is greater than theirs. I should be greater than them in my 
accomplishments as well; a king should be ambitious to conquer the world.” 
When the nobles heard what he had to say, none of them approved. They 
frowned, and their faces turned sallow; none of them had any desire to make war 
on demons. No one said anything openly, but they sighed in silence. Tus, 
Gudarz, Keshvad, Giv, Kherrad, Gorgin and Bahram said, “We are your slaves 
and tread the earth at your command.” But later they sat together and discussed 
the king’s words: “What kind of a calamity is this? If what the king said in his 
cups isn’t forgotten, we and Iran are facing a disaster. There will be no country, 
water, or land left to us. Even Jamshid, with his crown and his seal ring by 
which he had birds and demons under his command, never thought of fighting 
against the demons of Mazanderan. And Feraydun, who had such knowledge 
and was skilled in magic, never considered this as a possibility.” Then Tus said, 
“Brave lords, experienced in battle, there is one solution, and it should not be 
hard to achieve what we desire. We must send a messenger to Zal saying, ‘Come 
immediately; if your head is smeared with mud, do not stop to wash it clean.’ He 
should be able to give the king wise advice, to tell him that it’s Ahriman who has 


put this idea in his mind, and that one should never open doors behind which 
demons wait. It may be that Zal can make him change his mind; if he cannot, 
then our fortunes, good and bad, are at an end.” 

After they had discussed the matter at length, they dispatched a courier. He 
made good speed, and when he reached Zal he passed on his message: “The 
nobles send greetings to Zal, the son of Sam. A strange event has happened, and 
our minds are unable to deal with it. If you are not prepared to help us, no one 
here will be left alive and our land will disappear. Ahriman has led our king 
astray; he has no intention of living as our ancestors did, he wastes the wealth he 
took no pains to accumulate, and he intends to attack Mazanderan. If you pause 
even long enough to scratch your head, the king will have left and thrown to the 
winds all the trouble you took in Kay Qobad’s service. Evil thoughts have 
twisted the king’s soul, so that everything that you and your lion cub Rostam 
have done seems so much wind to him.” 

Zal was deeply troubled to hear that the leaves of the royal tree had turned 
yellow in this way. He said, “Kavus is an arrogant man who has not experienced 
the heat and cold of this world. A king should be someone over whose head the 
sun and moon have passed for many years. He thinks nobles and commoners 
alike tremble before his sword, and it will be no surprise if he pays no attention 
to my advice. It will hurt me if he doesn’t listen to me, but if I make light of this 
in my heart and forget my loyalty to the king, neither God, nor the king, nor 
Iran’s heroes will approve of me. I will go to him and give him what advice I 
can. It will be best for him if he accepts it; but, if he insists on what he has 
decided, the roads are open, and Rostam will be there with the army.” 

Zal spent the long night deep in thought, and when the sun raised its crown 
above the horizon he set off with his chieftains to the king. News reached Tus, 
Gudarz, Giv, Bahram, Gorgin, and Roham that Zal was approaching Iran, and 
that his banner was now visible. The army’s commanders went out to meet him, 
calling down blessings on him and conducting him to the court. Tus said to him, 
“We are grateful that you have decided to help Iran’s nobles and are going to 
this trouble on our behalf. We all wish you well and are filled with respect for 
the glory of your crown.” Zal replied, “When a man has lived for some years he 
remembers the advice of his elders, and this is why the heavens deal justly with 
him. We should not withhold our advice from Kavus, because he certainly needs 
it. If he ignores the wisdom of what we suggest, he will live to regret it.” With 
one voice they replied, “We are yours to command, and consider no one else’s 
advice to be of any value compared with yours.” 


The group entered the court, with Zal going ahead and the other nobles with 
their golden belts following him. When Zal saw Kavus sitting in state on the 
throne, he bent his arms submissively across his chest and lowered his head. He 
said, “Lord of the world, whose head is lifted higher than those of all other 
noblemen and chieftains, no one has seen a king like you occupying the throne, 
or a crown like yours, and the heavens have never heard of good fortune like 
yours. May all your years be filled with victory and prosperity, your heart 
always filled with knowledge, your head with wisdom.” The king made much of 
him and sat Zal beside himself. He asked him about the difficulties of his 
journey, about news of the heroes of his land, and about Rostam. Zal said to the 
king, “May you live victoriously and happily; your good fortune makes all of 
them prosperous, and they rejoice proudly in your patronage.” Then he began to 
speak respectfully of the matter at hand, and said, “The days pass over us, and 
the heavens revolve over the dark earth: Manuchehr has left this splendid world, 
leaving behind treasures and palaces, and we also remember Zav, Nozar, and 
Kay Qobad. These kings, with their great armies and commanders, never thought 
of attacking Mazanderan: It is a land of demons, wizardry, 

Smooth lies, and spells, and secret sorcery; 

If you attack them, you won’t see again 

The gold you throw away there, or the men; 

No one has conquered them—no, not by stealth, Or by invasion, or 
corrupting wealth; 

Forget the conquest of Mazanderan, 

No king has ever thought of such a plan. 

These chieftains are your subjects, but like you They are the slaves of 
God in all they do. 

Don’t shed their noble blood, or out of greed Plant in the ground 
ambition’s evil seed, 

Because it grows into a tree whose roots 

And lofty branches nourish loathsome fruits.” 


Kavus replied, “I don’t need your thoughts on this matter. I have more strength, 
glory, and wealth than Jamshid or Feraydun, and I have a greater army and more 
courage and treasure than Manuchehr or Kay Qobad, who never considered 
attacking Mazanderan. The world is ruled by my sharp sword; you drew your 
sword and conquered the earth, and why should I not show the world what I can 
do? They will submit to me or I shall force them to do so with the power of my 


sword; either I shall empty Mazanderan of inhabitants, or I shall impose heavy 
taxes on them. They are contemptible in my eyes, sorcerers and soldiers they are 
all alike, and you shall hear that the world has been cleared of them. Stay behind 
then with Rostam and be Persia’s protector. The world’s creator is my ally, and 
those demons’ heads are my prey. If you will not help me in this war, at least do 
not tell me to reconsider my plans.” 

Zal could see no sense in the king’s words and said, “You are the king and 
we are your slaves, and we spoke only out of our hearts’ concern for you. 
Whether you speak justly or unjustly, we must breathe and walk according to 
your will. I have said the things I should say, the things that were in my heart. A 
man cannot draw death forth from his own body, or seel up the world’s eyes 
with a needle, or escape from necessity by holding back from it; even the king 
cannot do these three things. May the shining world favor you, and may you 
never recall my advice; may you not regret your actions, and may your heart be 
wise and bright with faith.” 

Then Zal quickly bade the king farewell, his heart clouded with anxiety by 
this news of the king’s departure. When he left the court, the sun and moon were 
dark before his eyes. Tus, Gudarz, Bahram, and Giv accompanied him. Giv said 
to Zal, “I hope God will guide Kavus, because if God does not, we may as well 
consider him lost. May greed and necessity and death be far from you, and your 
enemies be unable to harm you. Wherever we go we hear only praise of you, and 
after God Iran places her hopes in you. You made this hard, thankless journey 
for the sake of her heroes.” One by one they embraced Zal as he set out on his 
return to Zavolestan. As soon as he had gone, Kavus gave orders that Tus and 
Gudarz should prepare the baggage train and lead the army toward Mazanderan. 


Kavus Reaches Mazanderan 

When night turned to day and the warriors set off for Mazanderan, Kavus 
entrusted Iran to Milad’s keeping, giving him his seal ring and authority and the 
keys to his treasury. He said, “If enemies appear, then draw the sword of 
warfare; Rostam and Zal will be your refuge from any evil.” On the next day the 
din of drums rang out, and Gudarz and Tus marched at the head of the army. 
Kavus accompanied them, lending luster to the army’s march, and as the sun set 
he pitched his camp before Mount Aspruz. This place, where Kavus had decided 
to rest and sleep, was the home of monstrous demons; it was a place that even 
elephants feared. Kavus had cloth of gold draped over his throne, and the air was 
filled with a delicious scent of wine. All the chieftains sat before Kavus, and 


they spent the night with wine and companionable talk. At dawn they rose and 
came belted and helmeted before the king, who ordered Giv to take a thousand 
warriors with maces and to lead the way into Mazanderan. “Whoever you see,” 
he said, “young or old, separate their souls from their bodies; burn any buildings 
you come across, turn the day into night, so that these demons will understand 
that the world is to be emptied of sorcery.” Giv bound on his belt, left the king’s 
presence, and selected a group of men from the army. He marched with them to 
the borders of Mazanderan, and there rained down swords and maces on the 
inhabitants. Neither men, nor women, nor children were spared by his sword; he 
bumed and plundered the towns and brought poison instead of healing into the 
inhabitants’ lives. He had come to a city that was like a paradise, filled with all 
manner of pleasure. In every street and building there were more than a thousand 
serving girls wearing torques and earrings, and even more whose faces were as 
radiant as the moon, wearing diadems; there was golden treasure scattered 
everywhere, with here gold coins and there jewels, and there were countless 
flocks of animals in the surrounding countryside. You would say that it was a 
veritable paradise. They took news to Kavus of the glory and splendor of this 
place, saying that Mazanderan was the partner of heaven, that all of this city was 
adorned like an idolater’s temple with Chinese brocade and flowers, that the 
women there were like houris, and their faces were like the blossoms of the 
pomegranate tree. 

The Iranians had been looting the area for a week before the news reached the 
king of Mazanderan, and his heart was filled with pain, his head with anxiety. 
One of the demons of his court was called Sanjeh, and his soul and body were 
lacerated by this news. The king said to him, “Go as the sun traverses the sky to 
the White Demon; tell him that a huge army led by the Iranian king Kavus has 
arrived here and is looting Mazanderan. Say that if he does not come to our aid, 
he will soon see no one left alive here.” Sanjeh took the warlike king’s message 
to the White Demon, who replied, “Do not despair of fate; I will come 
immediately with a mighty army and drive them out of Mazanderan.” 

When night came, a black cloud spread over the army, making the world as 
dark as an African’s face. The earth seemed like a sea of pitch, from which all 
light had gone into hiding. There seemed to be a huge tent of smoke and pitch 
looming over them, and men’s eyes were baffled by the darkness. When night 
had passed and day came, the eyes of half the men in the Persian army were 
darkened, and their leaders’ heads were filled with fury against the king. Many 
men perished because of this; the army had never known such a disaster. The 


king was also blinded, and his actions brought evil on his army: their wealth was 
looted, and his soldiers led into captivity. In his misery Kavus said, “A sensible 
advisor is more valuable than treasure.” The Persians suffered in this way for a 
week, and now none of their army was able to see. On the eighth day the White 
Demon roared: “Kavus, you’re like a willow, fruitless and afraid. 

And you once thought your army could invade 

Mazanderan, and that your strength is like 

A maddened mammoth’s when you choose to strike! 

Since you have occupied the Persian throne, 

Wisdom’s deserted you, good sense has flown. 

Here is the end of everything you sought, 

Here is the punishment for which you fought!” 


Then he chose twelve thousand demons armed with daggers and set them to 
guard the Persians, filling their chieftains’ minds with grief. The demons fed 
them on a handful of bran, so that their days were filled with suffering, and took 
all the king’s treasures, including his crown set with rubies and turquoises, and 
gave them to Mazanderan’s army commander, Arzhang. The White Demon said 
to him, “Tell the king that he need talk no more about Ahriman; the Persian king 
and his army will never look on the bright sun and moon again. I have not killed 
them, but only so that they will know how pain differs from pleasure. They will 
die slowly, groaning in despair, and no one will pay any attention to their 
complaints.” When Arzhang heard this message, he set off for the king of 
Mazanderan, taking the Persian warriors as prisoners and their treasures and 
horses with fine trappings as plunder. 


King Kavus Sends Word to Zal of What Has Happened Then, sick at 
heart, Kavus sent a warrior to go as quickly as a flying bird or wind- 
borne smoke to Zal and Rostam in Zavolestan, and to say to them, 
“Fortune has dealt me a heavy blow, and dust has dimmed my 
throne and crown. The turning heavens have given my wealth and 
my army of famous warriors, as splendid as roses in springtime, to 
the demons; the wind you said would come has borne everything 
away. Now my eyes are darkened and my fortunes are confused; my 
royal head is bowed with weariness: wounded, and in Ahriman’s 
clutches, my wretched body gives up its soul. When I remember the 


advice you gave me, cold sighs rise up from within me. I did not act 
wisely, I did not follow your advice, and my lack of wisdom has 
brought disaster on me. If you do not come to my help now, all that 
we have gained will be lost.” 

The messenger told Zal all he knew and all he had seen and heard. Zal clawed 
at his skin in grief, but he said nothing, either to friends or to enemies. In his 
heart he saw clearly the evils that Kavus was suffering far away. He said to 
Rostam, “We must neither eat nor drink nor delight in our sovereignty, because 
the king of the world has been snared by Ahriman, and disaster has come to the 
Persian army. You must saddle Rakhsh and grasp your sword for vengeance. 
Fate has brought you up for this day. In this battle against Ahriman you must not 
rest or draw breath; cover your chest with your tiger skin, and drive all thoughts 
of sleep from your mind. What man who has seen your lance can feel easy in his 
soul? If you fight against the sea, it is turned to blood, and at the sound of your 
voice, mountains crumble to the plains; Arzhang and the White Demon must 
have no hope of escaping from you with their lives. Your heavy mace must 
smite the neck of the king of Mazanderan and shatter it to pieces.” 

Rostam replied, “The way is long, how shall I go without soldiers to 
accompany me?” Zal said, “There are two ways there from this kingdom, and 
both are filled with difficulties and dangers. One is the way that Kavus took; the 
other lies through the mountains and will take two weeks. You will meet with 
lions and demons and darkness, and your eyes will be bewildered by what they 
see. If you take the shorter way, you will come on monstrous things, and may 
God come to your aid then. It is a hard way, but set Rakhsh along it and you will 
survive its perils. In the dark night, until daybreak, I shall pray to God that I shall 
see your shoulders and chest again, and your sword and mace in your hand, and 
if God wills that a demon turn your days to darkness, can any man avert this 
from you? What comes to us must be endured. No one can stay in this world 
forever; and even if he remains here for a long time, he is finally summoned to 
another place. If a man leaves behind him a noble reputation, he should not 
despair when he has to depart.” 

Rostam replied to his father, “I have bound my belt on in readiness to obey 
you. The great warriors of the past did not choose to walk into hell, and those 
who were not tired of life did not choose to face ravening lions, but I am 
prepared for whatever I encounter and I ask for no ally but God. I shall sacrifice 
my body and soul for the king and smash these sorcerers and their talismans. I 
shall rescue the Persians who are still living, and I will leave neither Arzhang, 


nor the White Demon, nor Sanjeh, nor Kulad Ghandi, nor Bid, alive. I swear by 
the one God who has created the world, that Rostam will not dismount from 
Rakhsh until he has bound Arzhang’s arms in a rock-like knot and placed a yoke 
on his shoulders, and Rakhsh has trampled Kulad’s head and brains beneath his 
hooves.” Zal embraced Rostam and invoked many blessings on his head, and 
Rostam, with his cheeks flushed and his heart firm in its resolve, mounted 
Rakhsh. Rudabeh came to her son, her face wet with tears, and Zal too wept 
bitterly over him. They bade him farewell, not knowing whether they would ever 
see him again. So passes the world, and a wise man knows of its passage, and 
with every day that goes by, your body becomes more free of the earth’s evil. 


THE SEVEN TRIALS OF ROSTAM 


The First Trial: Rakhsh’s Combat with a Lion Rostam rode out 
from Sistan in high spirits, his face flushed with joy. By riding 
Rakhsh through the dark night as well as the bright day, he covered 
two days’ journey in one. He became tired and hungry, and he saw a 
plain ahead of him filled with wild asses. He urged Rakhsh forward 
with his thighs, and the ass he fixed on was unable to outrun him; 
no animal could escape Rakhsh’s speed and Rostam’s lariat 
together. The lion Rostam threw his lariat, and its noose dropped 
over the brave ass’s head. Then he lit a fire with the point of an 
arrow and piled thorns and scrub onto the blaze, and after he had 
killed and skinned the beast, he cooked it in the flames. He needed 
neither a table nor cooking pot, but simply ate the flesh and threw 
away the bones. He removed Rakhsh’s reins, and let him wander in 
the meadow there; then he made himself a bed of reeds and trusted 
in the safety of a place where he should have been afraid. The reed 
bed hid a lion’s lair, and no elephant dared disturb the reeds nearby. 

When one watch of the night had gone by, this ravening lion returned to its 
lair. He saw a mammoth warrior sleeping among the reeds, and a horse awake 
and standing in front of him. He said to himself, “First I must bring down the 
horse, if I’m to get my claws on its rider.” He charged toward Rakhsh, whose 
spirit flared up like fire. Rakhsh brought his front hooves down on the lion’s 
head and sank his sharp teeth into his back. He threw it down on to the ground, 
tore it to pieces, and rendered this savage animal harmless. When Rostam woke 
he saw that this lion’s world had indeed become dark and comfortless, and he 
said to Rakhsh, “You are an intelligent animal, who told you to fight with lions? 
If you had been killed, how could I have ridden to Mazanderan with this heavy 
mace and helmet and this bow and lariat of mine? If you had woken me, I would 
have made short work of your combat with this lion.” 


Rostam’s Second Trial: Rostam Finds a Spring of Water When the 
sun rose above the mountain’s summit, Rostam woke uneasily from 
a sweet sleep. He rubbed Rakhsh down, put his saddle on him, and 
prayed to God. A hard road lay ahead of him, and he had to go 
forward unsure of what he might encounter. Rakhsh’s legs became 
weary, and his rider’s tongue was afflicted by the heat and his thirst. 
Rostam dismounted, and with his lance in his hand, staggered 
forward like a drunken man. He looked for some way to save 
himself and raised his face to the heavens, saying, “Just lord, you 
bring all pains and difficulties to an end, and if my pains are 
pleasing to you, my treasure is amassed in another world. I travel in 
the hopes that God will have mercy on King Kavus, and that I will 
be able to free the Persians from the clutches of demons, according 
to God’s commands. They are sinners and abandoned by you, but 
they worship you and are your slaves. Many of their mammoth 
bodies have been bruised and broken, they are weakened and 
maddened by thirst.” Then Rostam fell on the hot earth, and the 
flesh of his tongue was split open with thirst. At that moment he saw 
a ram with fat haunches running in front of him, and he thought, 
“Where does this ram find water for itself? Surely this is God’s 
mercy, to show this animal to me at such a moment?” He gripped 
his sword in his right hand, and invoking God’s name, rose to his 
feet. Holding his sword he followed the ram, leading Rakhsh by the 
reins with his other hand. The ram led him to a stream, and Rostam 
turned his face to the skies and said, “Whoever turns away from the 
one God has no wisdom in him; when difficulties hem us in, he is 
our only source of help.” Then he called down blessings on the ram 
and said, “May your pastures always be green and cheetahs never 
consider you as prey; may the bow of any man who shoots an arrow 
at you be broken and his arrows lost, because Rostam has survived 
through you, and if it were not for you he would now be thinking of 
his shroud, and preparing to be the prey of dragons or wolves.” 
Then he lifted off Rakhsh’s saddle and washed all his body in the 


clear water, so that he glittered like the sun. When he had drunk his 
fill, he turned his mind to hunting; his quiver was full of arrows, 
and with his bow he brought down a wild ass with a body as massive 
as an elephant’s. He stripped it of its hide, and when he had lit a fire 
he dragged it from the stream and cooked it in the flames. He fell to 
his meal, tearing out the bones with his hands, then went back to the 
stream and drank copiously again. He was now ready to sleep and 
said to Rakhsh, “No fighting with anyone tonight. If an enemy 
appears, wake me up; don’t look for a confrontation with any 
demons or lions.” Then he lay down and slept with his lips sealed, 
and Rakhsh wandered here and there cropping the grass till 
midnight. 


Rostam’s Third Trial: Combat with a Dragon 

A dragon, from which no elephant had ever escaped, appeared on the plain. Its 
lair was nearby, and even demons were afraid to cross its path. As it approached 
it saw Rostam asleep and Rakhsh standing awake, alert as a lion. He wondered 
what had lain down here in his sleeping place, because nothing ever came this 
way, neither demons nor elephants nor lions; and if anything did come, it didn’t 
escape this dragon’s teeth and claws. It turned toward Rakhsh, who trotted over 
to Rostam and woke him. Rostam was immediately alert, ready to fight, but he 
gazed about him in the darkness, and the fearsome dragon disappeared. In his 
annoyance Rostam chided Rakhsh for waking him. He slept again, and again the 
dragon emerged from the darkness. Rakhsh stamped on Rostam’s pillow and 
pawed at the ground, and once more Rostam woke. He sprang up, his face 
sallow with apprehension, and gazed about him, but he saw nothing except the 
darkness. He said to his kind, wise horse, “You should sleep in the night’s 
darkness, but you keep waking me up; why are you in such a hurry for me to be 
awake? If you disturb me again like this, Ill cut your feet off with my sword. I’ll 
go on foot, dragging my lance and heavy mace to Mazanderan.” For a third time 
he lay his head down to sleep, using Rakhsh’s barding as his mattress and 
bedcovers. The fearsome dragon roared, his breath seeming to flicker with 
flames, and Rakhsh galloped away, afraid to approach Rostam. His heart was 
split in two, fearing both Rostam and the dragon. But his agitation for Rostam 
urged him back to the hero’s side; he neighed and reared up, and his hooves 


pawed violently at the ground. Rostam woke from a sweet sleep, furious with his 
horse, but this time God produced a light so that the dragon could not hide, and 
Rostam made him out in the darkness. He quickly drew his sword, and the 
ground flashed with the fire of combat. He called out to the dragon, “Tell me 
your name, because from now on you will not see the world to be as you wish. 
It’s not right for me to kill you without my learning your name.” The fearsome 
dragon said, “No one ever escapes from my claws; all of this plain is mine, like 
the sky and air above it. Eagles don’t dare fly over this land, and even the stars 
don’t look down on it.” It paused, and then said, “What is your name, because 
your mother must weep for you?” The hero replied, “I am Rostam, the son of 
Zal, who was the son of Sam, of the family of Nariman.” Then the dragon leaped 
at him, but in the end he could not escape from Rostam, because when Rakhsh 
saw the strength of its massive body bearing down on Rostam, he laid back his 
ears and sank his teeth into the dragon’s shoulders. He tore at the dragon’s flesh, 
and the lion-like Rostam was astonished at his ferocity. Rostam smote with his 
sword and lopped the dragon’s head off, and poison flowed like a river from its 
trunk. The ground beneath its body disappeared beneath a stream of blood, and 
Rostam gave a great sigh when he looked at the dragon, and saw that all the dark 
desert flowed with blood and poison. He was afraid, and stared in horror, 
murmuring the name of God over and over again. He went into the stream and 
washed his body and head, acknowledging God’s authority over the world. He 
said, “Great God, you have given me strength and intelligence and skill, so that 
before me demons, lions and elephants, waterless deserts and great rivers like the 
Nile, are as nothing in my eyes. But enemies are many and the years are few.” 
When he had finished his prayer, he saddled Rakhsh, mounted, and went on his 
way through a land of sorcerers. 


Rostam’s Fourth Trial: He Kills a Witch 

He rode for a long time, and when the sun went down in the sky he saw a 
landscape of plants and trees and running streams, as if it were a garden 
belonging to a young man. He saw a stream that glittered like a pheasant’s eye, 
and next to it a golden goblet filled with wine. There was also a roasted chicken, 
and bread, with a saltcellar and candied fruits nearby; it was a feast for sorcerers, 
who had quickly disappeared when they heard him approaching. Rostam 
dismounted and lifted the saddle from Rakhsh’s back. He was astonished to see 
the chicken and bread, and sat down beside the stream. He lifted the golden 
goblet filled with wine, and next to it was a lute, as if the desert were a hall that 


had been made ready for a feast. Rostam picked up the lute and began to play it, 
composing a song about himself as he did so: “This is the song of Rostam, who’s 
been given 

Few days of happiness by Fate or heaven. 

He fights in every war, in every land; 

His bed’s a hillside, or the desert sand. 

Demons and dragons are his daily prey, 

Devils and deserts block his weary way. 

Fate sees to it that perfumed flowers, and wine, 

And pleasant vistas, are but rarely mine— 

I’m always grappling with an enemy, 

Some ghoul or leopard’s always fighting me.” 


His song reached the ears of one of the sorcerers, a witch, who disguised herself 
as a young girl, as beautiful as the spring and lovelier than any painting. She 
came to Rostam, full of tints and scents, and sat down next to him and 
questioned him. Rostam silently gave thanks to God that on the plains of 
Mazanderan he had found this feast and wine, and now he had found a beautiful 
young wine stewardess too. He didn’t know that she was a villainous sorcerer, 
an Ahriman disguised in spring’s colors. He placed a bowl of wine in her hand 
and praised God who is the author of all good things. But as soon as he 
mentioned God’s kindness, the witch’s face changed; her soul had no 
comprehension of such things, and her tongue could not utter such praise. She 
turned black at the sound of God’s name, and when Rostam saw this, as quick as 
the wind he looped his lariat about her, and before she was aware, had trapped 
her head in its coils. He said to her, “What are you? Tell me. Show me yourself 
as you are.” Suddenly there was a withered old woman in his lariat’s coils, ugly, 
deceitful, and vicious. Rostam slashed her in two with his dagger, and the other 
sorcerers’ hearts were terrified when they saw this. 


Rostam’s Fifth Trial: The Capture of Olad 

From there he journeyed on, like a man anxious to reach his goal, galloping 
onward till he came to a place that had never seen the brightness of the sun. Dark 
night fell, as black as an African’s face, and neither the stars nor the sun nor the 
moon were visible. It was as if the sun were chained somewhere, and the stars 
caught in the coils of a lariat. He let his reins go slack, since he could see neither 
slopes nor streams in the darkness, and then emerged into the light, and the 


ground was like green silk, bright with young wheat shoots. The ancient world 
seemed to have grown young again, covered in green growth, and with streams 
flowing here and there. Rostam’s clothes were soaked with sweat, and he was 
sorely in need of rest and sleep. He stripped his tiger skin from his chest and 
took off his helmet, which also felt drowned in sweat. He lay both of them down 
in the sun and prepared to rest. He removed Rakhsh’s bridle, and let him wander 
at will in the young wheat. When his tiger skin and helmet had dried he put them 
on again, then lay down on a pile of vegetation, like a lion. 

But a man who had been sent there to keep animals out of the wheat saw 
Rakhsh and ran shouting toward him. Then he saw Rostam and slashed at his 
legs with a stick, and when Rostam woke the man yelled at him, “You Ahriman, 
why did you let your horse wander in the wheat, spoiling the property of 
someone who’s never done you any harm?” Rostam was infuriated by his words; 
instead of answering, he sprang up and seized the man by the ears, twisting 
them, and tearing them off his head. The man quickly retrieved his ears from the 
ground, screaming in astonishment at what Rostam had done. The owner of this 
land was a man called Olad, a fine, brave young man, and the injured servant 
went wailing to him, carrying his bloody ears in his hand. He said, “I went to get 
a horse out of the wheat and the streams; it belonged to a man like a black devil, 
wearing a leopard skin corselet and an iron helmet, an Ahriman or a sleeping 
dragon, and when he saw me he jumped up and said not a word but ripped my 
ears off and flung them on the ground.” Olad was with a group of noblemen, out 
hunting in the meadows, and they had come on a lion’s spoor, but when he heard 
this astonishing tale from his servant he tugged at his reins and made for where 
the man indicated Rostam was. As Olad and his companions approached him, 
Rostam mounted Rakhsh and drew his glittering sword and rode toward them 
like a threatening cloud. Olad said to him, “What’s your name? What kind of a 
man are you, and which king have you sworn loyalty to? Quarrelsome lions 
can’t pass this way.” 

Rostam said, “My name is cloud, if a cloud can fight like a lion; it'll rain 
down spears and sword blows and lop noblemen’s heads off. If my name 
penetrates your ears, it’ll freeze your blood. Have you ever heard, in any 
company, of the bow and lariat of Rostam? You know what I call a mother who 
bears a son like you? A sewer of shrouds, or a mourner at a wake. Bringing your 
cronies here against me is as pointless as throwing walnuts at a dome in the hope 
that they’ ll stick there.” Then he looped his lariat on his saddle and drew his 
death-dealing sword, and every blow he made with it lopped off two heads; he 


was like a lion that descends on a flock of lambs, and the ground was soon 
strewn with the dead. The plain filled with the dust of scattering horsemen, as 
they fled to the mountains and caves. Rostam went after them, the dust turned 
the day to night, and as he caught up with Olad he flung his lariat and noosed his 
head with it. He dragged him down from his horse and bound his arms and said 
to him, “If you tell me the truth, if I find no lies in you, you’! tell me where the 
White Demon is and how to find Kulad Ghandi and Bid, and where Kavus is 
imprisoned, and you’! show me who did this evil act. Do this, and you won’t 
regret it; with this mace I’1l depose the king of Mazanderan, and you’ll rule here 
in his place, as long as you don’t lie to me.” 

Olad said, “Drive anger from your heart, and for once look at what you are 
doing. Don’t separate my soul and body for no reason; you’!l get from me 
everything you wish. I’ll show you where the White Demon lives and, what 
you’re really hoping for, the place where Kavus is imprisoned; I’1l show you the 
way there. From here to where Kavus is held is a hundred parasangs; from there 
to where the Demons are, it’s another hundred, and the way is a difficult one. In 
those two hundred parasangs you’!l see an immeasurable cavern; it’s a horrific 
place between two mountains, and even that auspicious bird the homa couldn’t 
fly over those summits. There are twelve thousand warlike demons living there 
and keeping watch at night; Kulad Ghandi is their leader, and Bid and Sanjeh are 
their guards. You will see one of them with a body like a mountain, with a chest 
and shoulders ten cubits wide. Despite your great strength and horsemanship, 
and the way you wield your mace and sword, it will go badly for you if fight 
against demons like this. After you pass this area you’|l come to a plain so 
strewn with rocks that a deer could not pick its way across it; a demon is lord of 
the marches there, and all the other demon warriors there are under his 
command. Once you leave his territory you’!l come to a river which is two 
parasangs across, and beyond it is the land of dog-headed men and those who 
have soft feet, and it is like a huge building three hundred parasangs in width. 
The area is called Bargush, and from there to where the king of Mazanderan has 
his seat is an ugly and difficult journey. More than six hundred thousand 
horseman roam the land there; they are all wealthy and have fine armor, and not 
one of them is wretched or poor. They have one thousand two hundred war 
elephants, and there is no room for them in the cities. Even if you’re made of 
iron, you can’t survive in that land alone; Ahriman’s file will wear you down!” 

Rostam laughed and said: 


“Just show me how to get there, then you’Il see How all these warriors 
fare when faced with me. 

You’ll find out what one mammoth man can do 

Against their king’s demonic retinue; 

Protected by the world Creator’s will, 

Helped by my sword and arrows and my skill. 

When first they glimpse my body’s strength and might, And see the 
massive mace with which I fight, 

Their skins will split with fear: headlong they’Il ride, Routed, with 
tangled reins and terrified. 

All that I want is that you’Il show me how 

To reach Kavus: come on, get moving now!” 


Rostam’s Sixth Trial: Combat with Arzhang 

Rostam rested neither in the bright day nor the dark night, but pushed on toward 
Mount Aspruz, where Kavus had led his army and been defeated by the demons’ 
magic. When half of the night had passed, a wild noise could be heard on the 
plain, and fires and candles could be seen burning all over Mazanderan. Rostam 
said to Olad, “Where is this place, with fires burning to the left and right?” Olad 
replied, “It’s the border with Mazanderan, where the inhabitants only sleep for 
two watches of the night; their leader Kulad, Arzhang, and Bid, as well as all the 
warriors who follow the White Demon, are making those wild cries and shouts.” 
Rostam slept again, and when the sun rose he used his lariat to tie Olad tightly to 
a tree. Then he hung his grandfather’s mace from his saddle and rode into 
Mazanderan, his heart filled with schemes of conquest. He wore a royal helmet 
on his head, and his cuirass of tiger skin was soon soaked with sweat. He set off 
to find Arzhang, and when he came on the demon’s army he gave a great cry 
that seemed to split the sea and mountains. Arzhang heard this shout and came 
rushing out of his tent: Rostam saw him and urged his horse forward, bearing 
down on him like fire. He grabbed him by the head and ears, and holding on to 
his shoulders with his other hand tore the demon’s head off, like a ravening lion, 
and flung it covered in blood into the crowd of warriors. When the demons saw 
his mace, their hearts and claws split with terror, and, careless of their homes 
and homeland, fathers stumbled over sons in their efforts to flee. Rostam drew 
his sword and slaughtered many of them, and as the sun went down in the sky he 
galloped back to Mount Aspruz. 


He freed Olad from the lariat’s coils, and they sat together at the foot of a tall 
tree. Rostam asked him the way to the city where King Kavus was, and then he 
immediately set off, following Olad as his guide. As they entered the city, 
Rakhsh neighed like a cloud growling thunder. Kavus said to the Persians, “Our 
troubles are over, I heard Rakhsh’s neigh, and it has refreshed my heart and 
soul.” At that moment Rostam appeared, and as he approached Kavus, the other 
Persians gathered round him. They made their obeisance before him, lamenting 
their lot and questioning him about the perils of his journey. King Kavus 
embraced him and asked after Zal. Then he added, “Rakhsh will have to gallop 
unseen by those sorcerers; if the White Demon hears the earth has been cleared 
of Arzhang, your troubles will be numberless, and the earth will be filled with 
the demons’ armies. Go to the White Demon’s home now, exert yourself, use 
your sword and arrows, and may God help you to bring these demons’s heads 
down to the dust. You’re going to have to cross seven mountains, and at every 
stage you’ll see a band of demons. A horrifying cave will appear before you, 
I’ve heard it’s like a pit, and filled with terrors. Its entrance is crowded with 
watrior demons who fight like leopards. The White Demon lives in that cave, 
and he is both the hope and fear of those warriors, but if you can destroy him, 
they too will be destroyed, because he is their leader. Our warriors’ eyes are 
darkened with sorrow, and I live sightless and bewildered in the darkness; 
doctors have told us there is hope of a cure if we use a balm made from the 
blood and brains of the White Demon. This is what a learned doctor told us, that 
if we drop three droplets of this balm into our eyes, like tears, the darkness will 
clear completely.” 

Rostam prepared to leave, to do battle with the White Demon, and he said to 
the Persian captives, “Stay vigilant till I return. I am going to fight with the 
White Demon; if he bends my back in defeat, you will remain here a long time 
in misery, but if the lord of the sun grants me success under a lucky star, you 
will see your homes again, and your thrones, and the royal tree will bear fruit 
once more.” 


The Seventh Trial: Combat with the White Demon 

Rostam set out prepared for battle, longing for revenge and his mind focused on 
the coming combat. When Rakhsh reached the seven mountains and the bands of 
warrior demons, they saw an army of demons crowded about the entrance to a 
bottomless cavern. Rostam said to Olad, “You have answered honestly all I have 
asked you; but now the battle begins in earnest, and you must reveal to me the 


secrets of how to proceed.” Olad said, “When the sun becomes warm, the 
demons sleep; then you can overcome them, but you must wait until then. Now, 
you won’t see any of them even sitting down, except for some of their guards 
who are sorcerers, but then you will be victorious over them, if God is your 
ally.” 

Rostam was in no hurry to go forward, and he waited until the sun was high 
in the sky. Then he tied Olad up in the coils of his lariat, mounted Rakhsh, drew 
his sword from its scabbard, and roared out his name like thunder. He descended 
on the demons and severed their heads with his sword blade; none of them stood 
against him in battle, none of them was eager to make a name for himself by 
fighting with him. Then he went forward looking for the White Demon, his heart 
filled with fear and hope. He saw a pit like hell, and in the darkness the demon’s 
body was still invisible. Rostam stood there for a while, his sword gripped in his 
hand; he couldn’t see anything, and this was not a time to run away. He rubbed 
his eyes and peered into the pit’s darkness, and made out a mountain there, 
hiding the pit behind its bulk. It was the color of night, its hair was white like 
snow, and the world seemed to be filled with its stature and breadth. It moved on 
Rostam like a black mountain, wearing an iron helmet, its arms protected by iron 
armor. Rostam’s heart was filled with fear, and he thought that this might be one 
situation from which he would not escape. But he sprang forward like a 
maddened elephant and slashed with his sharp sword at the demon’s trunk. The 
force of his blow severed a leg at the thigh, but the wounded demon attacked 
him, and the two locked together like an elephant and a lion. Each repeatedly 
tore flesh from the other’s body, and the ground beneath them was turned to mud 
with their blood. Rostam said to himself, “If I survive today I shall live forever,” 
and the White Demon said to himself, “I despair of my sweet life, and even if I 
escape from the clutches of this dragon, with a leg severed and my skin 
lacerated, I shall have no authority left in Mazanderan with either the nobility or 
their subjects.” Then Rostam gave a great roar and clutched the demon by the 
neck, and threw him to the ground. He plunged his dagger into him and hacked 
out his heart and liver. All the cave was filled with the demon’s great bulk, and 
the world seemed like a sea of blood. 

Rostam came out of the cave, freed Olad from his bonds, and tied his lariat to 
his saddle. He gave Olad the Demon’s congealed liver, and the two of them set 
off to Kavus. Olad to him, “You are a lion in war and have conquered the world 
with your sword. My body still bears the marks of your lariat where I bowed my 
neck in your bonds, but you gave my heart hopes of a reward, which I now ask 


for. To break your word would not be worthy of a lion warrior blessed with good 
fortune like yourself.” Rostam replied, “I shall bestow Mazanderan on you, from 
border to border, but there are still long, difficult days of struggle ahead, in 
which we will see both good and bad fortune. We have to drag the king of 
Mazanderan down from his throne and fling him into a pit, and our daggers have 
to sever the heads of thousands upon thousands of demons. When these things 
have been done I shall make you the lord of this earth and not betray my 
promise.” 


Kavus’s Sight Is Restored 

Then the great champion reached King Kavus and said to him: “You are a king 
who loves knowledge; now delight in the deaths of those who wish you ill. I 
ripped open the belly of the White Demon, and his king can repose no more 
hopes in him. I have torn the demon’s liver from his side; what are the victorious 
king’s orders for me now?” Kavus called down blessings on him, and said, “May 
the crown and royal seal ring never be without your help. The mother who bore 
you should be blessed; my good fortune has increased because of your two 
parents, since now the elephant who defeats all lions is my subject.” 

When they brushed the king’s eyes with the White Demon’s blood, the 
darkness there cleared. An ivory throne was brought, with a crown suspended 
above it, and the king took his place there as the ruler of Mazanderan, 
surrounded by Rostam and his other chieftains, men like Tus, Fariborz, Gudarz, 
Giv, Roham, Gorgin and Bahram. So a week passed with wine and music, and 
Kavus gave himself over to pleasure and enjoyment. On the eighth day the king 
and his chieftains mounted their horses, shouldered their massive maces, and 
dispersed into Mazanderan. They rode according to the king’s orders, as quickly 
as fire burns through dry reeds, bringing fire and the sword to the cities there. 
Then the king said to his men, “The just punishment for sin has been meted out, 
and now you must hold back from slaughter. We must send an intelligent, 
dignified man, someone who knows when to act quickly and when to delay, to 
the king of Mazanderan, to wake up his heart and trouble his mind.” Rostam and 
the other chieftains were pleased at the notion of sending a message to this king, 
one that would bring light into his dark soul. 

Kavus Writes a Letter to the King of Mazanderan 


On white silk, a wise scribe wrote a letter filled with promises and threats, with 
sweetness and ugliness. It began, “Praise to God, from whom virtues are made 
manifest in the world, who has given us wisdom and created the turning 
heavens, who has created travail and difficulty and love, who has given us the 
power to do good and evil, the lord of the turning sun and moon. If you are just 
and follow the true faith, you will only hear blessings from men, but if you 
harbor evil and do evil, punishment will come to you from the turning heavens. 
Do you not see how God has dealt with you, raising the dust of battle over your 
demons and sorcerers? If you are aware of what fate brings, if wisdom is your 
teacher, then keep the crown of Mazanderan, and come to my court as my 
subject. You will not be able to withstand Rostam if he makes war on you, and 
you have no choice but to pay me taxes. If you do what I say, you can keep your 
sovereignty over Mazanderan, and, if you do not, what happened to Arzhang and 
to the White Demon will happen to you, and you should despair of life.” 

The king summoned Farhad, a warrior famous for the way he wielded his 
steel sword, and told him, “This letter is filled with good advice; take it to that 
demon who has escaped from the captivity he deserves.” Farhad kissed the 
ground and took the letter to the land of the Gorgsaran, fierce warriors who 
fought with daggers, where men dwelt whose feet were made of leather; the king 
of Mazanderan held court there, surrounded by his warlike chieftains. When he 
heard that a messenger from Kavus was approaching on horseback, he chose a 
few men from his retinue and told them that this was the time to show their 
mettle. He said, “Today we can’t separate what is demonic from what is human: 
be like leopards when you welcome him, see that you provoke him in such a way 
that even the wisest of men would fight back.” They went out to greet him with 
their faces filled with frowns, but nothing went according to their plan. One of 
them took Farhad’s hand and squeezed it, mangling the muscles and bones, but 
Farhad’s face did not even turn sallow, and he showed no sign of feeling any 
pain. They took Farhad to their king, who questioned him about Kavus and the 
difficulties of his journey, and then handed the letter, written on silk with musk 
mingled with wine, to a scribe, who read it aloud. When the king heard of 
Rostam’s battle against the White Demon, his eyes reddened with blood and his 
head filled with roars of lamentation. In his heart he said, “The sun will hide 
away, night comes, rest and sleep will leave me: the world will never be at rest 
because of this Rostam, whose name will not remain obscure.” He grieved for 
Arzhang and the White Demon, and for the deaths of Kulad Ghandi and Bid. 


When he had heard the king’s letter through, his eyes were wet with bitter tears, 
and he sent his answer to Kavus: “Can wine replace the waters of the sea? 

And you imagine you can threaten me? 

Your throne cannot match mine, and I command 

A thousand thousand warriors in this land. 

When they attack like savage lions they’Il keep 

Your Persians’ heads from their refreshing sleep, 

The dust of battle I send up will hide 

The plains and hills and every mountainside. ” 


When Farhad heard his belligerent language, he did not wait for a letter to be 
written, but tugged at his reins and galloped back to the Persian king, where he 
recounted what he had seen and heard, tearing the veil aside from what had been 
hidden before. He said, “Their king is higher than the heavens, and his high 
hopes are no lower. He turned his head aside at my message, and the world is 
contemptible in his eyes.” Rostam said to Kavus, “I will deliver our people from 
this shame. I must take him a message, and its words must be like a sword drawn 
from its scabbard. A letter as cutting as a sword blade must be written, a 
message like a roaring thunder cloud; I will go as the messenger and my words 
will make blood flow in the rivers there.” King Kavus answered, “The crown 
and royal seal ring are resplendent because of your deeds; when you bear 
someone a message, elephants’ hearts and lions’ claws split with terror.” 


King Kavus Writes a Second Letter to the King of Mazanderan He 
summoned a scribe, who dipped his pen in black ink, and the king 
dictated this message: “Your words are foolish, and a man who’s 
wise 

Will not resort to such unworthy lies: 

Empty your mind of all such talk, and bow 

Down like a slave; you are my subject now. 

And if you don’t, my men from sea to sea 

Will celebrate another victory; 

The dead White Demon’s soul will haunt your plains 

And feed the hungry vultures with your brains.” 


When the king had sealed the letter, Rostam hung his massive mace from his 
saddle and set off for the king of Mazanderan. As he was approaching, news 
reached the king that Kavus had sent another messenger, one who was like a lion 
or a war elephant, with a lariat of sixty loops fixed to his saddle, and a fast 
galloping horse under him. The king of Mazanderan chose a few of his chieftains 
and sent them out to welcome the new messenger. When Rostam caught sight of 
them, he saw a tree with huge branches at the roadside and tore it up by the 
roots, flourishing it in his fist like a lance. The welcoming party stopped where 
they were in astonishment, and Rostam flung down the tree and rode up to them. 
There was a lengthy exchange of greetings, and then one of the party gripped 
Rostam’s hand and squeezed it, attempting to hurt the hero. Rostam smiled, and 
the group stared in wonder at him. Then Rostam squeezed the hand in his, and 
its owner turned pale, fainted from the pain, and fell from his horse to the 
ground. When he revived he quickly made his way to the king of Mazanderan 
and there recounted everything he had seen, from beginning to end. 

There was a horseman whose name was Kolahvar; he tyrannized over 
Mazanderan, his nature was like a savage leopard’s, and his dearest wish was to 
fight in wars. The king had him summoned and said to him, “Go to this 
messenger and show him what you’re made of. Do such things that his face is 
filled with shame, and he weeps hot tears.” Like a ravening lion Kolahvar went 
to the champion, his face filled with frowns and growling questions like a 
leopard. He gave Rostam his hand and squeezed Rostam’s hand so hard that it 
was bruised from the pain. Rostam remained impassive, then squeezed 
Kolahvar’s hand in return, and the nails fell from Kolahvar’s fingers like leaves 
from a tree. With his hand hanging uselessly at his side, Kolahvar reported back 
to his king, showed him his hand, and said, “A man can’t hide his pain from 
himself: it would be better if you made peace with this warrior than went to war 
with him. Don’t overreach yourself; you won’t be able to withstand men like 
him, and your best course is to agree to pay them taxes. If you accept their terms 
you’ll be doing the best thing for Mazanderan, both for its chieftains and the 
common people; this way we’|I get rid of the danger, and that’s better than being 
terrified out of our wits.” 

At that moment Rostam entered the court like a savage lion. The king looked 
at him, then motioned him to a suitable seat and questioned him about king 
Kavus and his army. Then he said, “Are you Rostam? You have his heroic 
strength.” Rostam replied, “I don’t know if I’m worthy even to be Rostam’s 
servant. I can’t do the things he does; he is a champion, a hero, a great 


horseman.” Then he handed over the willful king’s letter, adding that his sword 
would bear fruit when it lopped off chieftains’ heads. The king was astonished 
and angry when he heard the letter, and said to Rostam: “Tell your king this, 
“Your arrogant attempt 

To cow me with your words provokes contempt. 

If you are Persia’s sovereign lord, if you 

Are like a lion in all you think and do, 

Iam Mazanderan’s great king, my throne 

And golden crown and army are my own, 

And you’re a fool to summon me, to say 

I should submit to you; kings don’t display 

Such pride to other kings, or try to seize 

The thrones of others by such strategies. 

Pride comes before a fall. Now turn around, 

Go back to Persia, to familiar ground, 

Because if I and my great army once attack, You’Il be defeated, routed, 

driven back, 
And if I meet you face to face, you’ll find 
How vain the words are in your foolish mind.’” 


Rostam looked directly at the king, his warriors, and his chieftains; he hardly 
heard what the king was saying, he simply felt more eager to fight him. He 
refused to accept the king’s gift of clothes, horses, and gold; the crown and belt 
he was offered excited his contempt. His heart filled with rage and the longing 
for battle, he returned to Kavus and described for him all he had seen and heard 
in Mazanderan, then added, “Think nothing of them, take courage, and prepare 
for war against these demons. I feel only disdain for their horseman and heroes.” 


The King of Mazanderan Makes War on Kavus and the Persians 
When Rostam left Mazanderan, the king of sorcerers began to 
prepare for war. He had the royal pavilion taken from the city and 
led his armies onto the plain. The dust they sent up obscured the 
sun, and neither the sea nor the mountains nor the plains were 
visible. The elephants’ feet trampled the ground as the army set off, 
and no one hesitated. When King Kavus heard that the demons’ 
forces were approaching, he first commanded Rostam to prepare for 


battle, and then turned to Tus, Gudarz, Giv, and Gorgin, with orders 
that that the army prepare and make ready its spears and shields. 
The chieftains’ pavilions were pitched on the plain of Mazanderan, 
and Nozar’s son Tus commanded the right flank, while Gudarz 
commanded the left. The mountains re-echoed with the blare of 
brazen trumpets, and the warriors gathered there made the whole 
hillside seem like a mass of iron. Kavus was in the center, with 
ranks of soldiers around him on every side, and Rostam, who had 
never known defeat in war, was at the army’s head. 

There was a famous warrior in Mazanderan who carried a heavy mace on his 
shoulders when he went into battle. His name was Juyan, and he was ambitious, 
a good fighter with his mace, and had an imposing voice. His cuirass glittered on 
his body, and the sparks from his sword blows burned the ground. He came in 
front of the Persian army, and the mountains and plains echoed as he roared, 
“Who will fight with me, who will draw forth dust from water?” King Kavus 
said to the Persians, “Aren’t you ashamed, that no one responds to his challenge? 
Are your hearts and eyes so abashed and downcast by this demon’s voice?” 
None of his brave warriors answered him, and it was as if the whole army had 
withered at the sight of Juyan. Then Rostam tugged at his reins and rode up to 
the king flourishing his lance. He said, “Give the order, your majesty, and let me 
confront this demon.” Kavus replied, “No Persian wants to fight him; the task is 
yours.” 

Rostam grasped his death-dealing lance in his fist and urged Rakhsh forward. 
He went onto the battlefield like a maddened elephant, pulled on his reins, gave 
his war cry that made the whole plain tremble, and a cloud of dust rose into the 
sky. He called out to Juyan, “You are ugly and evil, and your name will be 
struck from the list of warriors. Your fate is decided now; the woman who bore 
you will weep for you.” Juyan replied, “Don’t be so sure of yourself when you 
confront Juyan and his cold dagger; your mother’s heart will break, and she will 
weep over that cuirass and helmet of yours.” When Rostam heard Juyan’s reply 
he raged like a savage lion and rode straight at him, flinging his lance at Juyan’s 
waist, where it cut through the coat of mail, severing the fastenings of his armor 
and piercing his trunk. Rostam dragged him from his saddle, spitted like a hen, 
and hurled him to the ground, his armor cut to pieces, his mouth filled with 
blood. The warriors of Mazanderan were appalled to see this, their hearts gave 
way within them, their faces turned sallow, and all the battlefield was filled with 


talk of Rostam’s feat. The king of Mazanderan called out to his army, “Take 
courage and fight, attack like leopards.” 

The din of drums and blare of trumpets rang out on both sides, the sky was 
darkened and the ground turned the color of ebony. The sparks struck by swords 
and maces were like lightning flashing from dark clouds, and the air was filled 
with the scarlet, black, and purple of banners. 


The demons’ cries, the darkened atmosphere, 

The din of drums, the horses’ neighs of fear 

Shook the firm land—no man had seen before 

Such fury, or such violence, or such war; 

The clash of weapons filled the air, and blood 

Flowed from the heroes like a monstrous flood— 

The earth became a lake, a battleground Where waves of warriors broke 

and fell and drowned; 
Blows rained on helmets, shields, and shattered mail Like leaves whirled 
downward in an autumn gale. 

The battle raged for a week, and on the eighth day King Kavus took his crown 
from his head and stood weeping before God. He bowed down, rubbed his face 
in the dust, and said, “Great lord of truth, creator of justice and purity, grant me 
victory over these fearless demon warriors, and renew my imperial throne.” 
Then he put a helmet on his head and came before his troops. A cry went up, and 
the blare of brazen trumpets rang out, and Rostam rushed forward like a 
mountain. Kavus ordered Tus to bring forward the war elephants from the rear of 
the army, and Gudarz, Zangeh-Shavran, Gorgin, and Roham strode forward like 
wild boar, with their great banners seven cubits high streaming above them, 
while Farhad, Kherrad Borzin, and Giv accompanied them. First Rostam 
launched an attack on the center of the enemies’ forces, soaking the ground with 
their warriors’ blood, then like a wolf bearing down on sheep, Giv crossed over 
from the right flank to the left, and on the right Gudarz brought forward armor, 
shields, drums and other equipment. From dawn until the sun sank in darkness, 
blood flowed in the rivers like water, faces lost all trace of shame, courtesy and 
kindness, and the sky seemed to rain down maces. Piles of the dead lay on every 
side, and the plants were smeared with men’s brains. Trumpets and drums 
resounded like thunder, and the sun disappeared behind an ebony cloud. Rostam 
and a large detachment of troops made for where the king of Mazanderan fought, 
but for a long time the king held out, refusing to give ground. The ambitious 


hero, the killer of kings, called on God’s help and handed his squire his lance; 
then he flourished his mace, filling the air with his war cry, leaving elephants 
dead and demons senseless, so that elephants with their massive trunks lay 
lifeless for miles. Now Rostam called for lances again and rode straight toward 
the king of Mazanderan; he flung a lance at his belt where it dislodged his spine, 
but in sight of the Persian warriors, the king used magic to transform his body 
into a mountainous crag, and Rostam bit on his lance in astonishment. 

At that moment King Kavus and his men, accompanied by their elephants 
and war drums, rode up. He said to Rostam, “Great hero, what’s happened to 
make you stand staring for so long?” Rostam replied, “When the worst of the 
fighting was over, and my fortunes had begun to shine with success, I saw the 
king of Mazanderan with his massive mace on his shoulders. I gave brave 
Rakhsh the reins and flung a spear that struck the king’s waist. I thought I’d see 
him fall from the saddle, blood streaming from his body, but he turned into that 
crag of granite, and so escaped from the perils of war and my prowess.” 

Every man in the Persian camp who had any strength in his grip tried to lift 
the granite rock that enclosed the king of Mazanderan, but it could not be shifted 
from its place. Then Rostam opened his arms, and without testing its weight, 
lifted the rock, while the army looked on in wonder. He walked with the craggy 
mass, while a crowd of men followed him, calling down blessings on him, and 
scattering gold coins and jewels over him. He carried it to the space in front of 
the king’s pavilion, where he flung it down and placed it at the Persians’ 
disposal. He addressed the rock, “Either come out from hiding behind cowardice 
and sorcery, or I shall batter this rock to pieces with steel crowbars and an ax.” 
When he heard this, the king of Mazanderan transformed himself into a cloudy 
mass, wearing a steel helmet and encased in body armor. Rostam seized him by 
the arm, and laughed as he dragged him before king, to whom he said, “I’ve 
brought that mountainous crag, whose fear of axes has made him tired of 
fighting with me.” Kavus looked at the king of Mazanderan’s face and saw 
nothing there that was worthy of a throne or crown. He remembered the 
suffering he had been through and his heart ached at the thought of it; his mind 
filled with wind, and he told his executioner to hack the man to pieces with a 
sharp sword. 

He sent someone to the enemy encampment with orders that whatever wealth 
was there, including coins, thrones, crowns, belts, horses, armor, and gold, 
should be piled into heaps. Then he had the soldiers come in groups, and he 
rewarded each man appropriately, giving the most to those who had undergone 


the most. He gave orders that the demons who were still recalcitrant, and of 
whom the people still went in terror, should have their heads cut off, and their 
bodies were to be scattered on the common highway. Then he went to a place of 
prayer and prayed privately to God; he remained there for a week, prostrating 
himself in supplication and praise. On the eighth day he opened the doors to his 
treasury and distributed goods to all who needed them; he spent a week in this 
way, giving men freely whatever they required. Now that justice had been 
served, he delayed for a third week in Mazanderan, calling for the music of the 
harp, his drinking companions, and wine served in goblets set with rubies. 
During this time, Rostam said to the king, “Every man has his uses, and I asked 
Olad to be an honest guide for me, which he was. I encouraged him to hope for 
Mazanderan as a reward for his honesty. It would be right for the king to bestow 
a robe of honor on him and have his chieftains swear allegiance to him for as 
long as he lives.” When the king heard his loyal champion’s words, he placed his 
hand on his heart as a sign of agreement and summoned Mazanderan’s chieftains 
to come before him. After he had spoken with them about Olad for a while, he 
had Olad enthroned, and then set off on the return journey to Pars. 


Kavus Returns to Iran and Dismisses Rostam 

As Kavus entered Iran, the army’s dust obscured the sky, and the noise of men 
and women celebrating his return rose up to the sun. All the land was decorated 
in his honor, and everywhere men called for wine and musicians. The world was 
renewed by the king’s renewal, and a new moon rose above Iran. When Kavus 
took his place on the throne, victorious and happy, he opened the doors to his 
ancient treasuries and had paymasters come from every area to receive gold for 
their people. The army commanders arrived before the king, clamoring to see 
Rostam, and when the hero entered the court he wore a crown and was seated on 
a throne next to Kavus, who arranged for gifts that were worthy of him: a throne 
set with turquoise and ornamented with rams’ horns, a royal crown set with 
gems, a set of imperial clothes made of cloth of gold, splendid bracelets and 
torques, a hundred maidservants as lovely as the moon and wearing golden belts, 
a hundred more with musky hair and fine clothes and jewelry, a hundred Arab 
horses with golden trappings, a hundred black-haired camels with golden bridles, 
royal brocade from Rum, China, and Persia, a hundred purses of gold coins, a 
goblet set with rubies and filled with pure musk, another set with turquoises and 
filled with rose water, and all manner of tints and scents and other goods. 


A scribe wrote a charter on silk, using ink made from musk, wine, and aloes, 
in which Rostam was confirmed in his sole lordship over Sistan. Kavus praised 
him, and said, “May the crown and royal seal ring never lack your support, may 
kings value you in their hearts, and may your soul be filled with humility and 
obedience.” Rostam bent forward and kissed the throne. Then the city was filled 
with the din of drums, and everyone took part in the festivities; decorations were 
hung on the houses, and the noise of cymbals and brazen trumpets filled the air. 
And so Rostam departed and the king sat on his throne, making the world bright 
with his righteousness and observance of ancient ways. With the sword of justice 
he smote the neck of sorrow, and in his heart there was no thought of death. The 
earth was filled with green growth and streams, and all the world was as lovely 
as the garden of Aram. The king grew powerful through his just ways and faith, 
and the hands of Ahriman were tied. The world learned that King Kavus had 
returned from Mazanderan and once again sat crowned on the throne. Everyone 
was astonished that he had attained such magnanimity of soul, and men lined up 
outside his court with offerings and gifts. 


The world seemed heaven then, on every side, 
Justice prevailed, and riches multiplied. 


THE KING OF HAMAVERAN AND HIS 
DAUGHTER SUDABEH 


The Barbary Kingdom 

Kavus decided to tour the borders of his kingdom. First he traversed the marches 
of Turan and China, and then, preceded by the blare of trumpets and the din of 
drums, he entered the land of Makran, where the country’s nobility greeted him 
with tribute and presents. From there he went on to Barbary, whose king decided 
to give battle rather than pay tribute. So many troops were at his command that 
the sun was darkened by the dust sent up by their horses’ hooves, and in the 
gloom a man could not distinguish his own hand from the reins he held. The 
king of Barbary’s men came forward in countless bands, surging one after 
another like the waves of the sea. 

Gudarz saw their forces, readied his mace for battle, and, with a thousand 
armored horsemen flourishing lances and bows, bore down on the enemy troops. 
The onslaught broke the center of the enemy’s line; their troops were routed and 
their king fled from the battlefield. 

When the old men of the city saw how the wind of battle blew, they came, 
contrite and wretched, before Kavus, saying: “We are your humble servants, and 
we bring The tribute we’ve collected to our king; 

Grateful, obedient to your rule, behold 
In place of coins we offer jewels and gold.” 


Kavus made much of them and forgave them and conferred new laws upon 
them. Then, to the noise of cymbals, chimes, and trumpets, he proceeded toward 
Bactria and the Caucasus. When news reached these areas that King Kavus was 
approaching, the nobles came out to greet him, bearing presents and tribute. 
From there he went on to Zabolestan, where Dastan’s son Rostam was his host. 
The king stayed with him for a month, spending the time either feasting with 
music and wine, or hunting with hawks and cheetahs. 


But in the rose garden a thorn appeared; when all the world seemed ordered 
and at peace, dissension arose among the Arabs. A rich nobleman raised the 
standard of revolt in Syria and Egypt and the people turned from Kavus. When 
the king learned that a rival for the throne was challenging him, the thunder of 
war drums rang out and preparations to leave Zabolestan began. Kavus led his 
army to the seashore and there innumerable boats were built and launched. A 
thousand leagues the army sailed and made landfall where three countries meet; 
on the left was Egypt, on the right Barbary, and ahead the waters of Zareh, 
beyond which lay Hamaveran. News reached these areas that King Kavus had 
entered the waters of Zareh, and the three countries joined their armies with one 
another on the Barbary Coast. 

The combined forces of these allies covered the deserts and mountains; the 
lion had no place for his lair, the wild ass found no way through the plains; the 
leopard on his crag, the fish in the depths, the eagle in the clouds—all were 
displaced, there was no room for any animal in all that mighty mass of soldiers. 

When Kavus disembarked his men, mountain and desert disappeared, the 
world seemed nothing but swords and armor; the very stars drew their light from 
glittering lances. The mountains shook with the blare of trumpets, the earth 
trembled beneath horses’ hooves, and such a din of drums thundered out that the 
land of Barbary seemed to have become one enormous army encampment. 

A tucket sounded from the Persian lines, and Gorgin, Farhad, and Tus rode 
forward. Further down the line, Gudarz, Giv, Shidush, and Milad also rode out; 
their lances dipped in poison, they let their reins fall slack on their horses’ necks 
and, bent low over the pommels of their saddles, they charged the enemy. War 
cries and the clash of arms resounded; Kavus attacked from the army’s center, 
and his troops followed close behind him. The world was darkened by their dust, 
and crimson blood rained down, spattering the ground as thick as dew, until it 
seemed red tulips had sprung up between the rocks. Sparks sprang from the 
clashing blades, the ground was awash with blood, and the three armies were so 
overwhelmed by the Persian forces that they fell back in utter confusion. 

The first to capitulate was the king of Hamaveran; he flung away his sword 
and massive mace and sent a courier asking for quarter. He said he would deliver 
weighty tribute in the form of horses, weapons, thrones, and crowns if Kavus 
would not lead his army against Hamaveran itself. And having heard the 
message, Kavus answered that, as his former enemy now acknowledged Kavus’s 
crown and authority, he would live safely, under the Persian monarch’s 
protection. 


The Tale of Sudabeh 


Then someone took Kavus aside and said: “This king Has sired a 
daughter lovely as the spring, 

More stately than a cypress tree, and crowned 

By hair like black musk, like a noose unbound, 

Her tongue is like a dagger lodged between 

Lips sweet as sugar cane; she is a queen 

Arrayed like paradise, a paragon 

As pure and splendid as the vernal sun, 

Fit for a monarch, if one should decide 

To choose this moonlike beauty as his bride.” 


Kavus’s heart leapt up within his breast; he chose a wise and subtle man from 
his retinue and ordered him to go to the king of Hamaveran and say from him: 
“Those nobles who best understand the ways of the world seek to be allied to 
me, since the sun draws its light from my crown and the earth is but a support for 
my ivory throne, and all who are not protected by my shadow wither away. Now 
I seek an alliance with you, washing my face with the waters of reconciliation. I 
have heard that you have in purdah a daughter who is worthy to be my wife, for 
she is pure in her lineage and pure in her body and praised in all cities by all 
people; and if you find a son-in-law like myself, the son of Qobad, then the light 
of heaven has indeed treated you with favor.” 

The courier hurried to the king of Hamaveran’s court; warmly and with 
eloquence he greeted the king on behalf of Kavus and delivered the message 
with which he had been entrusted. When he heard the courier’s words the king 
of Hamaveran’s heart grew heavy with sorrow and foreboding, and to himself he 
said, “He is a sovereign, world-conquering and victorious, but she is my only 
daughter in all the world, and to me she is dearer than life itself. But if I slight 
this courier and treat him contemptuously, I have no means to fight the war that 
will ensue. It is best that I should close my eyes to this effrontery and allay my 
heart’s anger.” Then he said to the courier, “These desires of your king have no 
end. He asks of me the two things I have held dearest, and there is no third to 
equal them. He has taken my wealth that was the prop of my rule, and he takes 
my daughter, who is the delight of my heart. My life is mine no more, and I 
resign to him all that he demands.” 


In sorrow he called his daughter Sudabeh to him and spoke to her about 
Kavus, saying, “An eloquent messenger has come here with a letter from the 
king: He wishes to snatch from me my heart, my rest, and my life, because he 
asks for you. What do you say to this? What are your wishes in the matter? What 
is your opinion?” Sudabeh answered, “Since we have no choice, it is better not 
to grieve at this. The lord of all the world can take whole countries if he so 
wishes. Why should you grieve at an alliance with him? This is a joyful 
development, not a cause for sorrow.” The king of Hamaveran saw that Sudabeh 
was not opposed to the match; he summoned Kavus’s messenger and motioned 
him to a place higher than that of all his courtiers. Then they drew up the 
alliance according to the rites and usages of their religion and time. 

The heavy-hearted king prepared the bridal procession: three hundred slaves 
and forty litters, a thousand mules and horses and a thousand camels loaded with 
brocade and gold coins, and, for the bride herself, a litter splendid as the moon, 
preceded and followed by beasts bearing her personal wealth. The troops 
accompanying her were dressed like denizens of Paradise; so colorful they were, 
the earth seemed covered by a carpet of wild flowers. When she came before 
Kavus he looked at her face and saw her smiling ruby lips, her two narcissus 
eyes, her nose fine as a silver reed. Lost in astonishment he stared and invoked 
God’s blessing on her. He called an assembly of wise men and priests; before 
them he acknowledged that Sudabeh was worthy to be his bride, and so the 
marriage was performed according to their rites and customs. 


The King of Hamaveran Plots Against Kavus 
But the king of Hamaveran was sick at heart and sought for some way to 
improve his situation. After a week had passed, on the eighth day he sent a 
messenger to Kavus saying, “If the king will come as my guest to my palace, the 
country of Hamaveran will be honored to entertain his splendor and majesty.” 
He secretly hoped to find a way both to regain his daughter and to escape from 
paying tribute. But Sudabeh realized that her father was planning some kind of 
violence during the festivities and said to Kavus, “This is not advisable, 
Hamaveran is no place for you. He is plotting to harm you during the festival, 
and you should not place yourself at his mercy. All this is on my account and 
will be a cause of sorrow to you.” 

But Kavus had no regard for the opinion of anyone from her country and did 
not believe her. He and his nobles set off for the promised festivities in 
Hamaveran. A whole city, called Shaheh, had been devoted to the celebration, 


and when Kavus entered it, all its inhabitants made their obeisance before him, 
scattering in his path jewels and saffron, gold coins and ambergris. The town 
was filled with the sounds of music and song, woven together like the warp and 
wett of fine cloth. Seeing Kavus, the king of Hamaveran dismounted, together 
with his courtiers, and, from the palace entrance to the audience hall, trays of 
pearls, rubies, and gold were emptied before Kavus, while musk and ambergris 
rained down upon his head. Within the palace Kavus was seated in triumph on a 
golden throne. He passed a week with the wine cup in his hand, happy and 
rejoicing, and day and night the king of Hamaveran stood before him like a 
servant ready to carry out his wishes, and in the same way the king’s courtiers 
served the Iranian nobles. And so the visitors felt safe and welcome and had no 
suspicion of any harm or trouble. But all this had been planned and foreseen by 
the king of Hamaveran and he sent the news to Barbary, whose leaders were of 
one mind with him. When their army arrived, the king of Hamaveran was 
overjoyed, and one night, when the Iranians were defenseless and unprepared, 
trumpets sounded the attack. Kavus was suddenly seized, together with Gudarz, 
Giv, Tus, and the rest of his entourage. 

There was in that country a mountain that rose from the depths of the sea; its 
peak pierced the clouds and on its slopes was a fortress so high that it seemed 
embraced by the heavens. Kavus and his nobles were sent in chains to this castle 
and flung within its walls, where they were guarded by a thousand warriors. 
Kavus’s royal pavilion was sacked, and the gold there and his crown were 
plundered by the nobles of Hamaveran. The pavilion itself was trampled 
underfoot. Two columns of veiled women were led out, and in their midst was a 
litter containing Sudabeh, who was to be taken back to her father’s court. When 
Sudabeh saw her women in this state, she ripped her royal clothes from her body 
and tore at her musky hair and scored her face with her nails. She wept, and 
screamed at her father’s envoys that they were dogs, and cried out to them: “No 
man who is a man will praise this act, You could not chain him when his troops 
attacked; Hearing his drums, your hearts were overthrown, Then he was armed, 
his warhorse was his throne, You quailed before Gudarz and Giv and Tus— 
Then was the time for you to chain Kavus! 

But no, you lie and break your oaths and cheat 
And ambush him with welcoming deceit. 

I will not part from him or leave his side; 
Though he should die I will remain his bride.” 


This outburst was reported to her father, who was enraged. He took her at her 
word and had her sent to the fortress where her husband was kept in chains, and 
there she comforted him, ministering to him in his sorrow and misfortune. 


Afrasyab Renews the War 
News spread throughout the world that the king of Iran was in captivity. Many 
claimants to the crown appeared, among them Afrasyab, who roused himself 
from his life of eating and sleeping and taking his ease, and once again attacked 
Iran. The war lasted for three months, at the end of which the Iranian army was 
routed; many men, women, and children were enslaved and the remaining 
Persians were gripped by despair. A number of fugitives made their way to 
Zabolestan, where they entreated Dastan’s son Rostam to save the country, 
saying: “You are our refuge, our last hope, our one Protection now that King 
Kavus has gone; 

Alas, Iran will be destroyed, a lair 

For leopards and wild lions will flourish there, Our land will be a 

wasted battleground Where evil kings will triumph and be crowned.” 

Rostam wept at their words, and his heart was filled with pain and sorrow. He 
answered them, “I and my army shall prepare for war, and I shall rid the land of 
Iran of these Turkish invaders.” 


Rostam’s Message 

Rostam sent messengers to the king of Hamaveran and, secretly, to Kavus. To 
the former he said: “You tricked the king of Iran and went back on your oath. To 
stoop to such ruses is not the way of chivalry. Either you release King Kavus or 
prepare to do battle with me.” But the king of Hamaveran answered, “King 
Kavus will never descend to the plains again, and if you come to Barbary your 
welcome will be swords and heavy maces; the chains and prison that hold him 
await you too. I and my army shall confront you; this is how we deal with 
invaders.” 

In response Rostam gathered an army together and took it over sea and dry 
land to the borders of Hamaveran. There he set about plundering the countryside, 
and all the land ran with rivers of blood. News reached the king of Hamaveran 
that Rostam had saddled Rakhsh and was laying his land waste and that this was 
no time for delay. He led his army out from the city to confront the Persians and 
the bright day was darkened by their dust. 


But seeing Rostam’s massive weight and height and the great mace he carried 
on his shoulder, the king’s troops’ hearts failed within them and they fled back 
toward the city. The king sat with his councillors and asked for two young men 
to go as couriers to Egypt and Barbary. The letters they bore said that the three 
countries were close and had always shared in joy and misfortune, and that if 
they came now to the aid of Hamaveran there was nothing to fear from Rostam, 
but that if they did not, Rostam would eventually bring disaster on their heads 
too. 

When they learned that Rostam’s army was nearby, their hearts quaked with 
fear. But they mustered troops and set out for Hamaveran; so great was their 
number that there was not space on the plain where they were drawn up for an 
ant to walk. Seeing these forces, Rostam secretly sent a message to Kavus: “The 
kings of three countries have risen against me, and if I fight their forces they will 
be routed in such utter confusion that they will not know their heads from their 
feet. But this war must not have bad consequences for you, and from such evil 
men we must expect an evil response. The throne of Barbary is nothing to me if 
its capture means harm to my king.” The courier heard the message and took it 
by hidden ways to Kavus, who answered, “Do not concern yourself about me; it 
was not for me that this world was created, and thus the heavens have ever 
turned, mingling poison with sweet draughts and war with peace. The world’s 
Creator is my support and his greatness and benevolence are my refuge. Give 
Rakhsh his head, and do not leave a single one of our enemies alive, in the open 
or in hiding.” When Rostam heard this message, he prepared for battle. 


Rostam Fights with the Three Kings 

The next day the armies were drawn up in battle order; on the side of Hamaveran 
there were a hundred war elephants; behind them were countless jostling banners 
—red, yellow, and purple—and the army stretched for two miles. When Rostam 
saw their lines, he said to his men, “You see their mounts’ necks and manes, but 
keep your eyes on the points of their lances; though they are a hundred thousand 
and we are but a hundred horsemen, it is not greater numbers that will win this 
battle.” Spears and arrows glittered in the air, the earth swam with blood like a 
wine vat; so many lances thronged the sky it seemed a bed of close-packed 
reeds, and abandoned armor and severed heads, still helmeted, lay scattered on 
the ground. Rostam urged Rakhsh forward but avoided combat with lesser men; 
instead he rode after the Arab king and flung his lariat, catching the king by the 
waist; he jerked him down from the saddle with the violence of a polo mallet 


striking the ball, and Farhad bound his arms. Sixty of this king’s noblemen were 
taken prisoner, and the king of Barbary was also captured along with forty of his 
watriors. The king of Hamaveran was defeated and promised to hand over 
Kavus and his noblemen to Rostam. 

Kavus, along with Giv, Gudarz, and Tus, was released from his fortress 
prison, and Rostam delivered to the Persian treasury the arms of three countries, 
the treasure of three kings, their pavilions, hosts, crowns, and thrones and 
whatever other things of value he saw. Then Kavus had brought before him a 
gold-caparisoned palfrey on which was a golden litter; the frame was of aloe 
wood studded with jewels and its couch was of Rumi brocade, worked with 
turquoise and rubies on a jet-black ground. He had Sudabeh sit within the litter, 
and when she took her place there, he saluted her sunlike splendor. He led his 
army out of the city to their camp, and, augmented by the forces of Egypt, 
Barbary, and Hamaveran, the number of his forces now exceeded three hundred 
thousand. 


Kavus Sends a Message to Afrasyab 

When Rostam had informed the king of Afrasyab’s new incursions into Iran, 
Kavus sent the Turanian leader a letter: “Leave the land of Iran, repent of your 
overreaching pride; I hear nothing but talk of you and your depredations. Turan 
is your homeland, and you rejoice in its wealth, but blindly you turn always to 
evil. You want for nothing, do not then strive for excess; such longings will 
bring you only pain and endless sorrow. Accept your subordinate status and so 
save your skin. You know well enough that Iran is my land and that the world 
trembles before my might. No matter how brave a leopard may be, it dare not 
confront the lion’s claws.” 

When this message reached Afrasyab, his mind was filled with hatred, his 
heart with rage. He sent his answer: “Such idle talk can come only from one who 
is low-minded; if Iran is your country as you claim, why did you long to conquer 
Mazanderan? Hear then the truth: Iran is mine for two reasons—first, that I am 
descended from the son of Feraydun, and second that I have overcome its 
inhabitants by the force of my sword. My sword will lop the summits from the 
mountains and bring down eagles from the dark clouds. My banners are 
unfurled, and I have come prepared for war.” 

Hearing his answer, Kavus put his vast army on a war footing and led them 
from Barbary into Syria; for his part, Afrasyab marched forward and his army 
clouded the heavens with their dust. The world was deafened by the blare of 


trumpets and the din of drums, the land was overspread with iron armor, the air 
was blackened by thick dust. In the shock of battle Afrasyab’s fortunes declined; 
two sections of the army of Turan were slain, and when he saw this, Afrasyab’s 
mind churned like fermenting wine that bubbles without fire beneath it. He cried 
out, “O my brave warriors, best of my troops, lions of Turan, it is for such a day 
that I have trained and nourished you; throw your hearts into the battle and drive 
back Kavus; with lances and swords fall on the Iranian troops. Capture the 
lionhearted Rostam, noose his head and haul him from his mount. I shall give 
my own daughter to whoever subdues Rostam; I shall exalt his glory higher than 
the moon’s sphere.” When they heard him, the Turanians attacked with renewed 
force, but all their efforts were in vain and Afrasyab fell back toward Turan, 
heartsick and with two parts of his army destroyed. Seeking sweetness and 
pleasure from the world, he had found only bitter poison. 


For his part, Kavus returned in triumph to Pars; he reigned in splendor, giving 
himself up to the pleasures of court life. He sent out great warriors, wise and just 
men, to confirm his rule in his possessions, in Merv and Nayshapur and Balkh 





and Herat; the world was filled with justice and the wolf turned harmlessly from 
the lamb. On Rostam, Kavus bestowed the title of Champion of all the World. 


Kavus Is Tempted by Eblis 

Then one morning the devil Eblis addressed a convocation of demons, in secret 
and unbeknownst to the king: “Under this king our lives are miserable and 
wretched: I need a nimble demon, one who knows court etiquette, who can 
deceive the king and wrench his mind away from God and bring his royal glory 
down into the dust; in this way the burdens he has placed upon us will be 
lightened.” The demons heard him, but none at first responded, out of fear of 
Kavus. Then an ugly demon spoke up, “I’m wily enough for this.” And so 
saying, he transformed himself into a handsome, eloquent youth, one who would 
grace any court. 

It happened that the king went out hunting, and the youth saw his 
opportunity. He came forward and kissed the ground; handing Kavus a bouquet 
of wild flowers, he said, “Your royal farr is of such splendor that the heavens 
themselves should be your throne. The surface of the earth is yours to command; 
you are the shepherd and the world’s nobles are your flock. There is but one 
thing remaining to you, and when this is accomplished your glory will never 
fade. The sun still keeps its secrets from you; how it turns in the heavens, and 
who it is that controls the journeys of the moon and the succession of night and 
day, these are as yet unknown to you.” 

The king’s mind was led astray by this demon’s talk, and his mind forsook 
the ways of wisdom: He did not know that the heavens are immeasurable, that 
the stars are many but that God is one, and that all are powerless beneath his law. 
The king was troubled in his mind, wondering how he could fly into the heavens 
without wings. He asked learned men how far it was from the earth to the 
heavens; he consulted astronomers and set his mind on a foolish enterprise. 

He gave orders that men were to go at night and rob eagles’ nests of their 
young; these squabs were to be placed in houses in pairs and reared on fowl and 
occasional lamb’s meat. When the eagles had grown as strong as lions and were 
each able to subdue a mountain goat, Kavus had a throne constructed of aloes 
wood and gold, and at each corner he had a lance attached. From the lances he 
suspended lamb’s meat; next he bound four eagles tightly to the structure. Then 
King Kavus sat on the throne, his mind deceived by the wiles of Ahriman. When 
the eagles grew hungry they flew up toward the suspended meat and the throne 
was lifted above the ground, rising up from the level plain into the clouds. The 


eagles strained toward the meat to the utmost of their capacity, and I have heard 
that Kavus was carried into the heavens as far as the sphere of the angels. Others 
say that he fought with his arrows against the sky itself, but God alone knows if 
these and other such stories are true. The eagles flew for a great while, but 
finally their strength gave out and their wings began to tire; they tumbled down 
from the dark clouds, and the king’s throne plummeted toward the ground. It 
finally came to rest in a thicket near Amol and, miraculously, the king was not 
killed. Hungry and humiliated, Kavus was filled with regret at his foolishness; he 
waited forlornly in the thicket, praying to God for help. 


Once Again King Kavus Is Rescued 
While he was begging forgiveness for his sins, the army was searching for some 
trace of him. Rostam, Giv, and Tus received news of his whereabouts and set off 
with a band of soldiers to rescue him. Gudarz said to Rostam: “Since I was 
weaned of mother’s milk I’ve known The ways of kings and served the royal 
throne; 

I’ve seen the world’s great monarchs and their glory, But never have I 

heard so mad a story 
As this we hear now of Kavus, this fool 
Who’s so unwise he’s hardly fit to rule.” 


The heroes reached Kavus and furiously reproached him. Gudarz said: “A 
hospital is where you need to be, 

Forget your palaces and sovereignty; 

You throw away your power, you don’t discuss 

Your plans and foolish fantasies with us. 

Three times disaster’s struck you down, but still You haven’t learned to 

curb your headstrong will: First you attacked Mazanderan, and there 

Captivity reduced you to despair; 

Then, trusting to your enemies, you gave 

Your heart away and so became their slave; 

And now your latest folly is to try 

Your strength against the ever-turning sky.” 


Shamefaced and humble, Kavus replied, “All that you say is true and just.” He 
was placed in a litter, and on his journey home humiliation and regret were his 
companions. When he reached his palace again, his heart remained wrung with 


sorrow, and for forty days he waited as a suppliant before God, his head bowed 
in the dust. His pride was humbled, and shame kept him locked within his 
palace. Weeping and praying, he neither granted audience nor feasted, but in 
sorrow and regret had wealth distributed to the poor. 

But when Kavus had wept in this way for a while, God forgave him. King 
Kavus reestablished justice in the world, and it shone equally on nobles and 
commoners alike. Justice made the world as rich and splendid as a fine brocade, 
and over all the king presided, majestic and magnificent. 


THE TALE OF SOHRAB 


If, when a strong wind springs up, there is found 
An unripe orange blown down to the ground, 
How do we name the deed that has been done— 
A noble act or an ignoble one? 

Do we say this is just? Unjust? If we 

Say death is just, what would injustice be? 

Why all this lamentation then, why must 

We weep and wail so much at what is just? 
Your soul cannot be privy to what lies 

Beyond this veil and hidden from your eyes; 
Men crowd about this door of wanting but 

To every man it stays securely shut— 

Until you travel to a better land 

And there perhaps, at peace, you’ll understand. 


Rostam Loses Rakhsh 

At dawn one day Rostam decided to go hunting, to drive away the sadness he 
felt in his heart. Filling his quiver with arrows, he set off for the border with 
Turan, and when he arrived in the marches he saw a plain filled with wild asses; 
laughing, his face flushed with pleasure, he urged Rakhsh forward. With his 
bow, his mace, and his noose he brought down his prey and then lit a fire of 
brushwood and dead branches; next he selected a tree and spitted one of the 
slaughtered asses on it. The spit was as light as a feather to him, and when the 
animal was roasted he tore the meat apart and ate it, sucking the marrow from its 
bones. He sank back contentedly and slept. Cropping the grass, his horse Rakhsh 
wandered off and was spotted by seven or eight Turkish horsemen. They 
galloped after Rakhsh and caught him and bore him off to the city, each of them 
claiming him as his own prize. 

Rostam woke from his sweet sleep and looked round for his horse. He was 
very distressed not to see Rakhsh there and set off on foot toward the closest 
town, which was Samangan. To himself he said, “How can I escape from such 
mortifying shame? What will our great warriors say, ‘His horse was taken from 
him while he slept?’ Now I must wander wretched and sick at heart, and bear my 
armor as I do so; perhaps I shall find some trace of him as I go forward.” 


Samangan 

The king of Samangan was told that the Crown Bestower, Rostam, had had his 
horse Rakhsh stolen from him and was approaching the town on foot. The king 
and his nobles welcomed him and enquired as to what had happened, adding, “In 
this town we all wish you well and stand ready to serve you in any way we can.” 
Rostam’s suspicions were laid to rest and he said, “In the pastures, Rakhsh 
wandered off from me; he had no bridle or reins. His tracks come as far as 
Samangan and then peter out into reeds and the river. If you can find him, I shall 
be grateful, but if he remains lost to me, some of your nobility will lose their 
heads.” 

The king responded, “No one would dare to have done this to you 
deliberately. Stay as my guest and calm yourself; tonight we can drink and 
rejoice, and drown our worries with wine. Rakhsh is such a world-renowned 
horse, he will not stay lost for long.” 

Mollified by his words, Rostam agreed to stay as the king’s guest. He was 
given a chamber in the palace and the king himself waited on him. The 
chieftains of the army and the city’s nobility were summoned to the feast; 
stewards brought wine, and dark-eyed, rosy-cheeked girls sought to calm 
Rostam’s fretfulness with their music. After a while Rostam became drunk and 
felt that the time to sleep had come; his chamber had been sweetened with the 
scents of musk and rosewater, and he retired there for the night. 


Tahmineh 
When one watch of the night had passed, and Venus rose into the darkened sky, 
a sound of muffled whispering came to Rostam’s ears; gently his chamber door 
was pushed open. A slave entered, a scented candle in her hand, and approached 
the hero’s pillow; like a splendid sun, a paradise of tints and scents, her mistress 
followed her. This beauty’s eyebrows curved like an archer’s bow, and her 
ringlets hung like nooses to snare the unwary; in stature she was as elegant as a 
cypress tree. Her mind and body were pure, and she seemed not to partake of 
earthly existence at all. The lionhearted Rostam gazed at her in astonishment; he 
asked her what her name was and what it was that she sought on so dark a night. 
She said: “My name is Tahmineh; longing has torn 

My wretched life in two, though I was born 

The daughter of the king of Samangan, 

And am descended from a warrior clan. 

But like a legend I have heard the story 

Of your heroic battles and your glory, 

Of how you have no fear, and face alone 

Dragons and demons and the dark unknown, 

Of how you sneak into Turan at night 

And prowl the borders to provoke a fight, 

Of how, when warriors see your mace, they quail 

And feel their lion hearts within them fail. 

I bit my lip to hear such talk, and knew 

I longed to see you, to catch sight of you, 

To glimpse your martial chest and mighty face— 

And now God brings you to this lowly place. 

If you desire me, I am yours, and none 

Shall see or hear of me from this day on; 

Desire destroys my mind, I long to bear 

Within my woman’s womb your son and heir; 

I promise you your horse if you agree 

Since all of Samangan must yield to me.” 


When Rostam saw how lovely she was, and moreover heard that she promised to 
find Rakhsh for him, he felt that nothing but good could come of the encounter; 
and so in secret the two passed the long hours of night together. 


As the sun cast its noose in the eastern sky, Rostam gave Tahmineh a clasp 
which he wore on his upper arm and said to her, “Take this, and if you should 
bear a daughter, braid her hair about it as an omen of good fortune; but if the 
heavens give you a son, have him wear it on his upper arm, as a sign of who his 
father is. He’ll be a boy like Sam, the son of Nariman, noble and chivalrous; one 
who’ |l bring down eagles from their cloudy heights, a man on whom the sun will 
not shine harshly.” 

Then the king came to Rostam and asked how he had slept, and brought news 
that Rakhsh had been found. Rostam rushed out and stroked and petted his 
horse, overjoyed to have found him; he saddled him and rode on his way, 
content with the king’s hospitality and to have found his horse again. 


Sohrab Is Born 

Nine months passed, and the princess Tahmineh gave birth to a son as splendid 
as the shining moon. He seemed another Rostam, Sam, or Nariman, and since 
his face shone bright with laughter, Tahmineh named him Sohrab (Bright- 
visaged). When a month had gone, he seemed a year old; at three, he played 
polo; and at five, he took up archery and practiced with a javelin. By the time he 
was ten, no one dared compete with him and he said to his mother, “Tell me 
truly now, why is it I’m so much taller than other boys of my age? Whose child 
am I, and what should I answer when people ask about my father? If you keep 
all this hidden from me, I won’t let you live a moment longer.” His mother 
answered, “Hear what I have to say, and be pleased at it, and control your 
temper. You are the son of the mammoth-bodied hero Rostam and are descended 
from Dastan, Sam, and Nariman. This is why your head reaches to the heavens; 
since the Creator made this world, there never has been such a knight as 
Rostam.” Secretly she showed him a letter that Rostam had sent, together with 
three rubies set in gold; then she said, “Afrasyab must know nothing of this, and 
if Rostam hears of how you’ve grown, he’ll summon you to his side and break 
your mother’s heart.” Sohrab answered, “This is not something to be kept secret; 
the world’s chieftains tell tales of Rostam’s prowess; how can it be right for me 
to hide such a splendid lineage? I’ll gather a boundless force of fighting Turks 
and drive Kavus from his throne; then I’1l eradicate all trace of Tus from Iran 
and give the royal mace and crown to Rostam, I’!l place him on Kavus’s throne. 
Next [ll march on Turan and fight with Afrasyab and seize his throne too. If 
Rostam is my father and I am his son, then no one else in all the world should 
wear the crown; when the sun and moon shine out in splendor, what should 
lesser stars do, boasting of their glory?” From every quarter swordsmen and 
chieftains flocked to the youth. 


War Breaks Out Again 

Afrasyab was told that Sohrab had launched his boat upon the waters and that, 
although his mouth still smelled of mother’s milk, his thoughts were all of 
swords and arrows. The informants said that he was threatening war against 
Kavus, that a mighty force had flocked to him, and that in his self-confidence he 
took no account of anyone. Afrasyab laughed with delight; he chose twelve 
thousand warriors, placed them under the command of Barman and Human, and 
addressed his two chieftains thus: “This secret must remain hidden. When these 
two face each other on the battlefield, Rostam will surely be at a disadvantage. 
The father must not know his son, because he will try to win him over; but, 
knowing nothing, the ancient warrior filled with years will be slain by our young 
lion. Later you can deal with Sohrab and dispatch him to his endless sleep.” 
Afrasyab sent the two to Sohrab, and he entrusted them with a letter encouraging 
the young warrior in his ambitions and promising support. 


The White Fortress 

There was an armed outpost of Iran called the White Fortress; its keeper was an 
experienced warrior named Hejir. Sohrab led his army toward the fortress, and, 
when Hejir saw this, he mounted his horse and rode out to confront him. Sohrab 
rode in front of the army, then drew his sword and taunted Hejir, “What are you 
dreaming of, coming to fight alone against me? Who are you, what is your name 
and lineage? Your mother will weep over your corpse today.” Hejir replied, 
“There are not many Turks who can match themselves against me. I am Hejir, 
the army’s brave commander, and I shall tear your head off and send it to Kavus, 
the king of all the world; your body I shall thrust beneath the dirt.” Sohrab 
laughed to hear such talk; the two attacked each other furiously with lances. 
Hejir’s lance struck at Sohrab’s waist but did no harm, but when Sohrab returned 
the blow, he sent Hejir sprawling from his saddle to the ground. Sohrab leapt 
down from his horse, intending to sever his enemy’s head, but Hejir twisted 
away to the right and begged for quarter. Sohrab spared him, and in triumph 
preached submission to his captive. Then he had him bound and sent to Human. 
When those in the fortress realized that their leader had been captured, both men 
and women wailed aloud with grief, crying out, “Hejir is taken from us.” 


Gordafarid 

But one of those within the fortress was a woman, daughter of the warrior 
Gazhdaham, named Gordafarid. When she learned that their leader had allowed 
himself to be taken, she found his behavior so shameful that her rosy cheeks 
became as black as pitch with rage. With not a moment’s delay she dressed 
herself in a knight’s armor, gathered her hair beneath a Rumi helmet, and rode 
out from the fortress, a lion eager for battle. She roared at the enemy’s ranks, 
“Where are your heroes, your warriors, your tried and tested chieftains?” 

When Sohrab saw this new combatant, he laughed and bit his lip and said to 
himself, “Another victim has stepped into the hero’s trap.” Quickly he donned 
his armor and a Chinese helmet and galloped out to face Gordafarid. When she 
saw him, she took aim with her bow (no bird could escape her well-aimed 
arrows) and let loose a hail of arrows, weaving to left and right like an 
experienced horseman as she did so. Shame urged Sohrab forward, his shield 
held before his head to deflect her arrows. Seeing him approach, she laid aside 
her bow and snatched up a lance and, as her horse reared toward the clouds, she 
hurled it at her opponent. Sohrab wheeled round and his lance struck Gordafarid 
in the waist; her armor’s fastenings were severed, but she unsheathed her sword 
and hacked at his lance, splitting it in two. Sohrab bore down on her again and 
snatched her helmet from her head; her hair streamed out, and her face shone 
like a splendid sun. He saw that his opponent was a woman, one whose hair was 
worthy of a diadem. He was amazed and said, “How is it that a woman should 
ride out from the Persian army and send the dust up from her horse’s hooves into 
the heavens?” He unhitched his lariat from the saddle and flung it, catching her 
by the waist, then said: “Don’t try to escape from me; now, my beauty, what do 
you mean by coming out to fight? I’ve never captured prey like you before, and I 
won’t let you go in a hurry.” Gordafarid saw that she could only get away by a 
ruse of some kind, and, showing her face to him, she said, “O lionhearted 
walrrior, two armies are watching us and, if I let them see my face and hair, your 
troops will be very amused by the notion of your fighting with a mere girl; we’d 
better draw aside somewhere, that’s what a wise man would do, so that you 
won’t be a laughing stock before these two armies. Now our army, our wealth, 
our fortress, and the fortress’s commander will all be in your hands to do with as 
you wish; I’ll hand them over to you, so there’s no need for you to pursue this 
war any further.” As she spoke, her shining teeth and bright red lips and 
heavenly face were like a paradise to Sohrab; no gardener ever grew so straight 


and tall a cypress as she seemed to be; her eyes were liquid as a deer’s, her 
brows were two bent bows, you’d say her body was a bud about to blossom. 

Sohrab said, “Don’t go back on your word; you’ve seen me on the battlefield; 
don’t think you’I!l be safe from me once you’re behind the fortress walls again. 
They don’t reach higher than the clouds and my mace will bring them down if 
need be.” Gordafarid tugged at her horse’s reins and wheeled round toward the 
fortress; Sohrab rode beside her to the gates, which opened and let in the weary, 
wounded, woman wairior. 

The defenders closed the gates, and young and old alike wept for Gordafarid 
and Hejir. They said, “O brave lioness, we all grieve for you, but you fought 
well and your ruse worked and you brought no shame on your people.” Then 
Gordafarid laughed long and heartily and climbed up on the fortress walls and 
looked out over the army. When she saw Sohrab perched on his saddle, she 
shouted down to him: “O king of all the Asian hordes, turn back, 

Forget your fighting and your planned attack.” 

She laughed; and then, more gently, almost sighed: 

“No Turk will bear away a Persian bride; 

But do not chafe at Fate’s necessity— 

Fate did not mean that you should conquer me. 

Besides, you’re not a Turk, I know you trace 

Your lineage from a far more splendid race; 

Put any of your heroes to the test— 

None has your massive arm and mighty chest. 

But news will spread that Turan’s army’s here, 

Led by a stripling chief who knows no fear; 

Kavus will send for noble Rostam then 

And neither you nor any of your men Will live for long: I should be sad 
to see 

This lion destroy you here—turn now and flee, 

Don’t trust your strength, strength will not save your life; 

The fatted calf knows nothing of the knife.” 


Hearing her, Sohrab felt a fool, realizing how easily he could have taken the 
fortress. He plundered the surrounding settlements and sulkily said: “It’s too late 
for battle now, but when dawn comes, I’ ll raze this fortress’s walls, and its 
inhabitants will know the meaning of defeat.” 


But that night Gazhdaham, Gordafarid’s aged father, sent a letter to Kavus 
telling him of Sohrab’s prowess, and secretly, before dawn, most of the Persian 
troops evacuated the fortress, traveling toward Iran and safety. 

When the sun rose above the mountains, the Turks prepared to fight; Sohrab 
mounted his horse, couched his lance, and advanced on the fortress. But as he 
and his men reached the walls, they saw very few defenders; they pushed open 
the gates and saw within no preparations for battle. A straggle of soldiers came 
forward, begging for quarter. 


Kavus Summons Rostam 

When King Kavus received Gazhdaham’s message, he was deeply troubled; he 
summoned his chieftains and put the matter before them. After he had read the 
letter to his warrior lords—men like Tus, Gudarz (the son of Keshvad), Giv, 
Gorgin, Bahram, and Farhad—Kavus said, “According to Gazhdaham, this is 
going to be lengthy business. His letter has put all other thoughts from my mind; 
now, what should we do to remedy this situation, and who is there in Iran who 
can stand up to this new warrior?” All agreed that Giv should go to Zabol and 
tell Rostam of the danger threatening Iran and the Persian throne. 

Kavus wrote to Rostam, praising his prowess and appealing to him to come to 
the aid of the throne. Then he said to Giv, “Gallop as quickly as wind-borne 
smoke and take this letter to Rostam. Don’t delay in Zabol; if you arrive at night, 
set off on the return journey the next morning. Tell Rostam that matters are 
urgent.” Giv took the letter and traveled quickly to Zabol, without resting along 
the way. Rostam came out with a contingent of his nobles to welcome him; Giv 
and Rostam’s group dismounted together, and Rostam questioned him closely 
about the king and events in Iran. After they had returned to Rostam’s palace 
and rested a while, Giv repeated what he had heard, handed over the letter, and 
gave what news he could of Sohrab. 

When Rostam had listened to him and read the letter, he laughed aloud and 
said in astonishment, “So it seems that a second Sam is loose in the world; this 
would be no surprise if he were a Persian, but from the Turks it’s unprecedented. 
I myself have a son over there, by the princess of Samangan, but he’s still a boy 
and doesn’t yet realize that war is the way to glory. I sent his mother gold and 
jewels, and she sent me back an answer saying that he’d soon be a tall young 
fellow; his mouth still smells of mother’s milk, but he drinks his wine, and no 
doubt he’ Il be a fighter soon enough. Now, you and I should rest for a day and 
moisten our dry lips with wine, then we can make our way to the king and lead 
Persia’s warriors out to war. It’s possible that Fortune’s turned against us, but if 
not, this campaign will not prove difficult; when the sea’s waves inundate the 
land, the fiercest fire won’t stay alight for long. And when this young warrior 
sees my banner, his heart will know his revels are all ended; he won’t be in such 
a hurry to fight anymore. This is not something we should worry ourselves 
about.” 

They sat to their wine and, forgetting all about the king, passed the night in 
idle chatter. The next morning Rostam woke with a hangover and called again 


for wine; this day too was passed in drinking and no one thought about setting 
out on the journey to Kavus. And once again on the third day Rostam ignored 
the king’s summons and had wine brought. On the fourth day Giv bestirred 
himself and said, “Kavus is a headstrong man and not at all intelligent; he’s very 
upset about this business and he can neither eat nor sleep properly. If we stay 
much longer here in Zabolestan, he will be extremely angry.” Rostam replied, 
“Don’t worry about that; there’s not a man alive who can meddle with me.” He 
gave orders that Rakhsh be saddled and that the tucket for departure be sounded. 
Zabol’s knights heard the trumpets and, armed and helmeted, they gathered 
about their leader. 


Rostam and Kavus 
They arrived at the king’s court in high spirits and ready to serve him. But when 
they bowed before the king, he at first made them no answer, and then, 
addressing Giv, he burst out in fury, “Who is Rostam that he should ignore me, 
that he should flout my orders in this way? Take him and string him up alive on 
the gallows and never mention his name to me again.” Giv was horrified at 
Kavus’s words and remonstrated, “You would treat Rostam in this way?” The 
courtiers stared, struck dumb, as Kavus then roared to Tus, “Take both of them 
and hang them both.” And, wildly as a fire that burns dry reeds, he sprang up 
from the throne. Tus took Rostam by the arm to lead him from Kavus’s presence 
and the warriors there watched in wonder, but Rostam too burst out in fury and 
addressed the king: “Smother your rage; each act of yours is more 

Contemptible than every act before. 

You’re not fit to be king; it’s Sohrab you 

Should hang alive, but you’re unable to.” 

Tus he sent sprawling with a single blow 

Then strode toward the door as if to go 

But turned back in his rage and said, “I am 

The Crown Bestower, the renowned Rostam, 

When I am angry, who is Kay Kavus? 

Who dares to threaten me? And who is Tus? 

My helmet is my crown, Rakhsh is my throne, 

And I am slave to none but God alone. 

If Sohrab should attack, who will survive ? 

No child or warrior will be left alive 

In all Iran—too late, and desperately, 

You’ll seek for some escape or remedy; 

This is your land where you reside and reign— 

Henceforth you’ll not see Rostam here again.” 


The courtiers were deeply alarmed, since they regarded Rostam as a shepherd 
and themselves as his flock. They turned to Gudarz and said, “You must heal 
this breach, the king will listen to no one but you; go to this crazy monarch and 
speak to him mildly and at length, and with luck we’ ll be able to restore our 
fortunes again.” Gudarz went to Kavus and reminded him of Rostam’s past 
service and of the threat that Sohrab was to Iran, and when he had heard him out, 


Kavus repented of his anger and said to Gudarz, “Your words are just, and 
nothing becomes an old man’s lips like wisdom. A king should be wise and 
cautious; anger and impetuous behavior bring no good to anyone. Go to Rostam 
and remind him of our former friendship; make him forget my outburst.” Gudarz 
and the army’s chieftains went in search of Rostam; finally they saw the dust 
raised by Rakhsh and caught up with him. They praised the hero and then said, 
“You know that Kavus is a brainless fool, that he is subject to these outbursts of 
temper, that he erupts in rage and is immediately sorry and swears to mend his 
ways. If you are furious with the king, the people of Iran are not at fault; already 
he regrets his rage and bites the back of his hand in repentance.” 

Rostam replied, “I have no need of Kay Kavus: My saddle’s my throne, my 
helmet’s my crown, this stout armor’s my robes of state, and my heart’s 
prepared for Death. Why should I fear Kavus’s rage; he’s no more to me than a 
fistful of dirt. My mind is weary of all this, my heart is full, and I fear no one but 
God himself.” Gudarz replied, “Iran and her chieftains and the army will see this 
in another way; they’!l say that the great hero was afraid of the Turk and that he 
sneaked away in fear; they’ ll say that if Rostam has fled, we should all flee. I 
saw the court in an uproar over Kavus’s rage, but I also saw the stir that Sohrab 
has created. Don’t turn your back on the king of Iran; your name’s renowned 
throughout the world, don’t dim its luster by this flight. And consider: The army 
is hard pressed, this is no time to abandon the throne and crown.” 

Rostam stared at him and said, “If there’s any fear in my heart I tear it from 
me now.” Shamefaced, he rode back to the king’s court, and when he entered, 
the king stood and asked his forgiveness for what had passed between them, 
saying, “Impetuous rage is part of my nature; we have to live as God has 
fashioned us. This new and unexpected enemy had made my heart grow faint as 
the new moon; I looked to you for help and when you delayed your coming, I 
became angry. But seeing you affronted by my words, I regretted what I had 
said.” Rostam replied, “The world is yours; we are all your subjects. I have come 
to hear your orders.” Kavus said, “Tonight we feast, tomorrow we fight.” 
Entertained by musicians and served by pale young slaves, the two then sat to 
their wine and drank till half the night had passed. 


The Persian Army Sets Out Against Sohrab 

At dawn the next day the king ordered Giv and Tus to prepare the army; drums 
were bound on elephants, the treasury doors were opened, and war supplies were 
handed out. A hundred thousand warriors gathered and the air was darkened by 


their dust. Stage by stage they marched till nightfall, and their glittering weapons 
shone like points of fire seen through a dark curtain. So day by day they went on 
until at last they reached the fortress’s gates, and their number was so great that 
not a stone or speck of earth was visible before the walls. 

A shout from the lookouts told Sohrab that the enemy’s army had come. 
Sohrab went up onto the city walls and then summoned Human; when Human 
saw the mighty force opposing them, he gasped and his heart quailed. Sohrab 
told him to be of good cheer, saying, “In all this limitless army, you’ ll not see 
one warrior who’ll be willing to face me in combat, no, not if the sun and moon 
themselves came down to aid him. There’s a great deal of armor here and many 
men, but I know of none among them who’s a warrior to reckon with. And now 
in Afrasyab’s name I shall make this plain a sea of blood.” Cheerful and fearless, 
Sohrab descended from the walls. For their part the Persians pitched camp, and 
so vast was the number of tents and pavilions that the plain and surrounding 
foothills disappeared from view. 


Rostam Spies on Sohrab 

The sun withdrew from the world, and dark night spread her troops across the 
plain. Eager to observe the enemy, Rostam came before Kavus. He said, “Let me 
go from here unarmed to see just who this new young hero is, and to see what 
chieftains are accompanying him.” Kavus replied, “You are the man for such an 
undertaking; take care, and may you return safely.” 

Rostam disguised himself as a Turk and made his way quickly to the fortress. 
As he drew near he could hear the sound of drunken revelry from the Turks 
within. He slipped into the fortress as a lion stalks wild deer. There he saw 
Sohrab seated on a throne and presiding over the festivities; on one side of him 
sat Zhendeh-Razm and on the other were the warriors Human and Barman. Tall 
as a cypress, of mighty limb, and mammoth chested, Sohrab seemed to fill the 
throne. He was surrounded by a hundred Turkish youths, as haughty as young 
lions, and fifty servants stood before him. In turn, all praised their hero’s 
strength and stature and sword and seal, while Rostam watched the scene from 
afar.

Zhendeh-Razm left the gathering on some errand and saw a warrior, cypress- 
tall, whom he did not recognize. He came over to Rostam and said, “Who are 
you? Come into the light so that I can see your face.” With one swift blow from 
his fist, Rostam struck out at Zhendeh-Razm’s neck, and the champion gave up 
the ghost there and then; he lay motionless on the ground, never returning to the 
feast. After a while Sohrab noticed his absence and asked after him. Retainers 
went out and saw him lying prone in the dirt; neither banquets nor battles would 
concern him again. They returned wailing and weeping, and told Sohrab that 
Zhendeh-Razm’s days of feasting and fighting were over. When Sohrab heard 
this, he sprang up and hurried to where the warrior lay, and the musicians and 
servants with tapers followed after him. He stared in astonishment, then called 
his chieftains to him and said,“Tonight we must not rest but sharpen our spears 
for battle: A wolf has attacked our flock, eluding the shepherd and his dog. But 
with God’s aid, when I ride out and loose my lariat from the saddle, I’ ll be 
revenged on these Iranian warriors for the death of Zhendeh-Razm.” And with 
this he returned to the feast. 

For his part Rostam slipped back to the Persian lines, where Giv waited on 
watch. Rostam told Giv of how he had killed one of the enemy, and then he went 
to Kavus and gave him news of Sohrab, saying that the new hero had no equal in 
either Turan or Iran, and that he was the image of Rostam’s own grandfather, 
Sam. He told Kavus of how he had killed Zhendeh-Razm, and then he and the 
king called for musicians and wine. 


Sohrab Surveys the Persian Camp 

When the sun had flung its noose into the sky, and rays of light shot through the 
empyrean, Sohrab armed himself and went up onto a tower on the city walls; 
from there he could see the Iranian forces spread out below. He summoned Hejir 
and, after promising wealth if he was truthful and prison if he was not, he said to 
him, “I want to ask you about the leaders and champions of the other side, men 
like Tus, Kavus, Gudarz, Bahram, and the famous Rostam; identify for me 
everyone I point out to you. Those multicolored pavilion walls enclosing tents of 
leopardskin; a hundred elephants are tethered in front of them, and beside the 
turquoise throne that stands there, a banner rises emblazoned with the sun and 
topped with a golden moon; there, right in the center of the encampment— 
whose place is that?” Hejir replied, “That is the Persian king’s court, and there 
are lions there as well as elephants.” 

Sohrab went on, “Over to the right, where all the baggage and knights and 
elephants are, there’s a black pavilion around which are countless ranks of 
soldiers; the banner there bears an elephant as its device, and there are gold-shod 
knights on guard before it; whose is that?” Hejir answered, “The banner 
embroidered with an elephant belongs to Tus, the son of Nozar.” “And the red 
pavilion that so many knights are crowded round, where the banner shows a lion 
and bears in its center a huge jewel, whose is that?” “The lion banner belongs to 
the great Gudarz, of the clan of Keshvad.” 

“And the green pavilion, where all the infantry are standing? Where the 
banner of Kaveh is; look, a resplendent throne shines there, and on it is seated a 
hero who’s head and shoulders taller than all those who stand in front of him. A 
magnificent horse, with a lariat slung across its saddle, waits next to him and 
neighs toward its lord every now and again. The device on the banner there is of 
a dragon, and its staff is topped with a golden lion.” Hejir answered, “That’s 
some lord from Tartary who’s recently joined forces with the king.” Sohrab 
asked the new lord’s name, but Hejir said, “I don’t know his name; I was here in 
this fortress when he came to our king.” Sohrab was saddened in his heart, 
because no trace of Rostam was to be seen. 

He questioned Hejir further, pointing out an encampment around a banner 
that bore the device of a wolf. “That belongs to the eldest and noblest of 
Gudarz’s sons, Giv,” Hejir replied. “And over toward where the sun is rising, 
there’s a white pavilion thronged about with foot soldiers; their leader’s seated 
on a throne of teak placed on an ivory pedestal and he’s surrounded by slaves?” 


“That is Prince Fariborz, the son of King Kavus.” “And the scarlet pavilion 
where the soldiers are standing round the entrance, where the red, yellow, and 
purple banners are; behind them towers a taller banner bearing the device of a 
wild boar and topped with a golden moon?” “That belongs to the lion-slaying 
Goraz, of Giv’s clan.” 

And so Sohrab sought for some sign of his father, while the other hid from 
him what he longed to know. Once again he asked about the tall warrior beneath 
the green banner, beside whom waited a noble horse bearing a coiled lariat. But 
Hejir answered, “If I don’t tell you his name it’s because I don’t know it 
myself.” “But this cannot be right,” Sohrab said. “You’ve made no mention of 
Rostam; the greatest warrior in the world could not stay hidden in this army 
camp; you said he was the foremost of their heroes, keeper of the country, and 
ward of the marches.” “Perhaps this great warrior has gone to Zabolestan, for 
now is the time of the spring festival.” Sohrab answered: “Don’t talk so 
foolishly; his king has led their forces into the field; if this world champion were 
to sit drinking and taking his ease at such a time, everyone would laugh at him. 
If you point out Rostam to me, I’ll make you a wealthy and honored man, you’ ll 
never want for anything again: But if you keep his whereabouts hidden from me, 
I’ll sever your head from your shoulders; now choose which it’s to be.” 

But in his heart the wily Hejir thought, “If I point out Rostam to this strong 
Turkish youth, who has such shoulders and who sits his horse so well, out of all 
our forces it’ll be Rostam he’! choose to fight against. With his massive strength 
and mighty frame, he could well kill Rostam, and who from Iran would be able 
to avenge the hero’s death? Then this Sohrab will seize Kavus’s throne. Death 
with honor is better than aiding the enemy, and if Gudarz and his clan are to die, 
then I have no wish to live in Iran either.” To Sohrab he replied, “Why are you 
so hasty and irritable? You talk of nothing but Rostam. It’s not him you should 
try to fight with; he would prove a formidable opponent on the battlefield. You 
wouldn’t be able to defeat him and it would be no easy matter to capture him 
either.” 


Sohrab Issues His Challenge 

When Sohrab heard such slighting words, he turned his back on Hejir and hid his 
face. Then he turned and struck him with such violence that Hejir sprawled 
headlong in the dirt. Sohrab went back to his tent and there donned his armor 
and helmet. Seething with fury, he mounted his horse, couched his lance, and 
rode out to the battlefield like a maddened elephant. None of the champions of 
the Persian army dared confront him: Seeing his massive frame, his martial 
figure on horseback, his mighty arm and glittering lance, they said, “He is 
another Rostam; who would dare look at him or oppose him in combat?” 

Then Sohrab roared out his challenge against Kavus, “What prowess have 
you on the battlefield? Why do you call yourself King Kavus when you have no 
skill or strength in battle? I’1l spit your body on this lance of mine and make the 
stars weep for your downfall. The night when I was feasting and Zhendeh-Razm 
was killed, I swore a mighty oath that I’d not leave a single warrior living in all 
Persia, that I’d string Kavus up alive on a gallows. Is there one from among all 
Persia’s fighting champions who’|l oppose me on the battlefield?” So he stood, 
fuming with rage, while not a sound rose from the Persian ranks in answer to his 
challenge. Sohrab’s response was to bend low in the saddle and bear down on 
the Persian camp. With his lance he severed the ropes of seventy tent pegs; half 
of the great pavilion tumbled down, the sound of trumpets rang in the air, and 
the army scattered like wild asses before a lion. Kavus cried out, “Have someone 
tell Rostam that our warriors are confounded by this Turk, that I’ve not one 
knight who dares confront him.” Tus took the message to Rostam, who said, 
“When other kings have unexpectedly 

Asked for my services, or summoned me, 

I’ve been rewarded with a gift, with treasure, 
With banquets, celebrations, courtly pleasure— 
But from Kavus I’ve witnessed nothing more 
Than constant hardships and unending war.” 


He ordered that Rakhsh be saddled and, leaving Zavareh to guard his 
encampment, he rode out with his warriors beside him, bearing his banner aloft. 
When he saw the mighty Sohrab, whose massive frame seemed so like that of 
Sam, he called to him, “Let’s move aside to open ground and face each other 
man to man.” Sohrab rubbed his hands together, took up his position before the 
ranks of waiting soldiers, and answered, “Don’t call any of your Persians to your 


aid, you and I will fight alone. But the battlefield’s no place for you, you won’t 
survive one blow of my fist, you’re tall enough and have a fine chest and 
shoulders, but age has clipped your wings, old man!” Rostam stared at the 
haughty young warrior, at his fist and shoulders, and the way he sat his horse, 
and gently said to him: “So headstrong and so young! Warm words, and bold! 

The ground, young warrior, is both hard and cold. 

Yes, Iam old, and I’ve seen many wars 

And laid low many mighty conquerors; 

Many a demon’s perished by my hand 

And I’ve not known defeat, in any land. 

Look on me well; if you escape from me 

You need not fear the monsters of the sea; 

The sea and mountains know what I have wrought 

Against Turan, how nobly I have fought, 

The stars are witness to my chivalry, In all the world there’s none can 

equal me.” 

Then Sohrab said, “I’m going to question you. 

Your answer must be honest, straight, and true: 

I think that you’re Rostam, and from the clan 

Of warlike Sam and noble Nariman.” 

Rostam replied, “I’m not Rostam, I claim 

No kinship with that clan or noble name: 

Rostam’s a champion, I’m a slave—I own 

No royal wealth or crown or kingly throne.” 

And Sohrab’s hopes were changed then to despair, 

Darkening before his gaze the sunlit air. 


The First Combat Between Rostam and Sohrab 

Sohrab rode to the space allotted for combat, and his mother’s words rang in his 
ears. At first they fought with short javelins, then attacked one another with 
Indian swords, and sparks sprang forth from the clash of iron against iron. The 
mighty blows left both swords shattered, and they grasped their ponderous 
maces, and a weariness began to weigh their arms down. Their horses too began 
to tire, and the blows the heroes dealt shattered both the horse armor and their 
own cuirasses. Finally, both the horses and their riders paused, exhausted by the 
battle, and neither hero could summon the strength to deliver another blow. The 
two stood facing one another at a distance, the father filled with pain, the son 


with sorrow, their bodies soaked with sweat, their mouths caked with dirt, their 
tongues cracked with thirst. How strange the world’s ways are! All beasts will 
recognize their young—the fish in the sea, the wild asses on the plain—but 
suffering and pride will make a man unable to distinguish his son from his 
enemy. 

Rostam said to himself, “I’ve never seen a monster fight like this; my combat 
with the White Demon was as nothing to this and I can feel my heart’s courage 
begin to fail. A young, unknown warrior who’s seen nothing of the world has 
brought me to this desperate pass, and in the sight of both our armies.” 

When their horses had rested from the combat, both warriors—he who was 
old in years and he who was still a stripling—strung their bows, but their 
remaining armor rendered the arrows harmless. In fury then the two closed, 
grasping at one another’s belts, each struggling to throw the other. Rostam, who 
on the day of battle could tear rock from the mountain crags, seized Sohrab’s 
belt and strove to drag him from his saddle, but it was as if the boy were 
untouched and all Rostam’s efforts were useless. Again these mighty lions 
withdrew from one another, wounded and exhausted. 

Then once more Sohrab lifted his massive mace from the saddle and bore 
down on Rostam; his mace struck Rostam’s shoulder and the hero writhed in 
pain. Sohrab laughed and cried, “You can’t stand up to blows, it seems; you 
might be cypress-tall, but an old man who acts like a youth is a fool.” 

Both now felt weakened by their battle, and sick at heart they turned aside 
from one another. Rostam rode toward the Turkish ranks like a leopard who 
sights his prey; like a wolf he fell on them, and their great army scattered before 
him. For his part Sohrab attacked the Persian host, striking down warriors with 
his mace. Rostam feared that some harm would come to Kavus from this young 
watrior, and he hurried back to his own lines. He saw Sohrab in the midst of the 
Persian ranks, the ground beneath his feet awash with wine-red blood; his spear, 
armor, and hands were smeared with blood and he seemed drunk with slaughter. 
Like a raging lion Rostam burst out in fury, “Bloodthirsty Turk, who challenged 
you from the Persian ranks? Why have you attacked them like a wolf run wild in 
a flock of sheep?” Sohrab replied, “And Turan’s army had no part in this battle 
either, but you attacked them first even though none of them had challenged 
you.” Rostam said, “Evening draws on, but, when the sun unsheathes its sword 
again, on this plain we shall see who will die and who will triumph. Let us return 
at dawn with swords ready for combat; go now, and await God’s will!” 


Sohrab and Rostam in Camp at Night 

They parted and the air grew dark. Wounded and weary, Sohrab arrived at his 
own lines and questioned Human about Rostam’s attack. Human answered, “The 
king’s command was that we not stir from our camp; and so we were quite 
unprepared when a fearsome warrior bore down on us, as wild as if he were 
drunk or had come from single combat.” Sohrab answered, “He didn’t destroy 
one warrior from this host, while I, for my part, killed many Persians and soaked 
the ground with their blood. Now we must eat, and with wine drive sorrow from 
our hearts.” 

And on the other side, Rostam questioned Giv, “How did this Sohrab fight 
today?” Giv replied, “I have never seen a warrior like him. He rushed into the 
center of our lines intending to attack Tus, but Tus fled before him, and there 
was none among us who could withstand his onslaught.” Rostam grew downcast 
at his words and went to King Kavus, who motioned him to his side. Rostam 
described Sohrab’s massive body to him and said that no one had ever seen such 
valor from so young a warrior. Then he went on, “We fought with mace and 
sword and bow, and finally, remembering that I had often enough pulled heroes 
down from the saddle, I seized him by the belt and tried to drag him from his 
horse and fling him to the ground. But a wind could shake a mountainside before 
it would shift that hero. When he comes to the combat ground tomorrow, I must 
find some way to overcome him hand to hand; I shall do my best, but I don’t 
know who will win; we must wait and see what God wills, for he it is, the 
Creator of the sun and moon, who gives victory and glory.” Kavus replied, “And 
may he lacerate the hearts of those who wish you ill. I shall spend the night in 
prayer to him for your success.” 

Rostam returned to his own men, preoccupied with thoughts of the coming 
combat. Anxiously, his brother Zavareh came forward, questioning him as to 
how he had fared that day. Rostam asked him first for food, and then shared his 
heart’s forebodings. He said, “Be vigilant, and do nothing rashly. When I face 
that Turk on the battlefield at dawn, gather together our army and accoutrements 
—our banner, throne, the golden boots our guards wear—and wait at sunrise 
before our pavilion. If I’m victorious I shan’t linger on the battlefield, but if 
things turn out otherwise, don’t mourn for me or act impetuously; don’t go 
forward offering to fight. Instead, return to Zabolestan and go to our father, 
Dastan; comfort my mother’s heart, and make her see that this fate was willed 
for me by God. Tell her not to give herself up to grief, for no good will come of 
it. No one lives forever in this world, and I have no complaint against the turns 


of Fate. So many lions and demons and leopards and monsters have been 
destroyed by my strength, and so many fortresses and castles have been razed by 
my might; no one has ever overcome me. Whoever mounts his horse and rides 
out for battle is knocking at the door of Death, and if we live a thousand years or 
more, Death is our destiny at last. When she is comforted, tell Dastan not to turn 
his back on the world’s king, Kavus. If Kavus makes war, Dastan is not to tarry, 
but to obey his every command. Young and old, we are all bound for Death; on 
this earth no one lives forever.” For half the night they talked of Sohrab, and the 
other half was spent in rest and sleep. 


Sohrab Overcomes Rostam 

When the shining sun spread its plumes and night’s dark raven folded its wings, 
Rostam donned his tigerskin and mounted Rakhsh. His iron helmet on his head, 
he hitched the sixty loops of his lariat to his saddle, grasped his Indian sword in 
his hand, and rode out to the combat ground. 

Sohrab had spent the night entertained by musicians and drinking wine with 
his companions. To Human he had confided his suspicions that his opponent was 
none other than Rostam, for he felt himself drawn to him, and besides, he 
resembled his mother’s description of Rostam. When dawn came, he buckled on 
his armor and grasped his huge mace; with his head filled with battle and his 
heart in high spirits, he came onto the field shouting his war cry. He greeted 
Rostam with a smile on his lips, for all the world as if they had spent the night in 
revelry together: “When did you wake? How did you pass the night? 

And are you still determined we should fight? 
But throw your mace and sword down, put aside 
These thoughts of war, this truculence and pride. 
Let’s sit and drink together, and the wine 

Will smooth away our frowns—both yours and mine. 
Come, swear an oath before our God that we 
Renounce all thoughts of war and enmity. 

Let’s make a truce, and feast as allies here 

At least until new enemies appear. 

The tears that stain my face are tokens of 

My heart’s affection for you, and my love; 

I know that you’re of noble ancestry— 

Recite your lordly lineage to me.” 


Rostam replied, “This was not what we talked of last night; our talk was of hand- 
to-hand combat. I won’t fall for these tricks, so don’t try them. You might be 
still a child, but I am not, and I have bound my belt on ready for our combat. 
Now, let us fight, and the outcome will be as God wishes. I’ve seen much of 
good and evil in my life, and I’m not a man for talk or tricks or treachery.” 
Sohrab replied, “Talk like this is not fitting from an old man. I would have 
wished that your days would come to an end peacefully, in your bed, and that 
your survivors would build a tomb to hold your body while your soul flew on its 


way. But if your life is to be in my hands, so be it; let us fight and the outcome 
will be as God wills.” 

They dismounted, tethered their horses, and warily came forward, each clad 
in mail and helmeted. They closed in combat, wrestling hand to hand, and 
mingled blood and sweat poured from their bodies. Then Sohrab, like a 
maddened elephant, struck Rostam a violent blow and felled him; like a lion 
leaping to bring down a wild ass, he flung himself on Rostam’s chest, whose 
mouth and fist and face were grimed with dust. He drew a glittering dagger to 
sever the hero’s head from his body, and Rostam spoke: “O hero, lion destroyer, 
mighty lord, 

Master of mace and lariat and sword, 

Our customs do not count this course as right; 
According to our laws, when warriors fight, 
A hero may not strike the fatal blow 

The first time his opponent is laid low; 

He does this, and he’s called a lion, when 
He’s thrown his rival twice—and only then.” 


By this trick he sought to escape death at Sohrab’s hands. The brave youth 
bowed his head at the old man’s words, believing what he was told. He released 
his opponent and withdrew to the plains where, unconcernedly, he spent some 
time hunting. After a while Human sought him out and asked him about the 
day’s combat thus far. Sohrab told Human what had happened and what Rostam 
had said to him. Human responded, “Young man, you’ve had enough of life, it 
seems! Alas for this chest, for these arms and shoulders of yours; alas for your 
fist, for the mace that it holds; you’d trapped the tiger and you let him go, which 
was the act of a simpleton! Now, watch for the consequences of this foolishness 
of yours when you face him again.” 

Sohrab returned to camp, sick at heart and furious with himself. A prince 
once made a remark for just such a situation: “Do not make light of any enemy 

No matter how unworthy he may be.” 


For his part, when Rostam had escaped from Sohrab, he sprang up like a man 

who has come back from the dead and strode to a nearby stream where he drank 
and washed the grime from his face and body. Next he prayed, asking for God’s 
help and for victory, unaware of the fate the sun and moon held in store for him. 
Then, anxious and pale, he made his way from the stream back to the battlefield. 


And there he saw Sohrab mounted on his rearing horse, charging after wild 
asses like a maddened elephant, whirling his lariat, his bow on his arm. Rostam 
stared at him in astonishment, trying to calculate his chances against him in 
single combat. When Sohrab caught sight of him, all the arrogance of youth was 
in his voice as he taunted Rostam, “So you escaped the lion’s claws, old man, 
and crept away from the wounds he dealt you!” 


Sohrab Is Mortally Wounded by Rostam 
Once again they tethered their horses, and once again they grappled in single 
combat, each grasping the other’s belt and straining to overthrow him. But, for 
all his great strength, Sohrab seemed as though he were hindered by the heavens, 
and Rostam seized him by the shoulders and finally forced him to the ground; 
the brave youth’s back was bent, his time had come, his strength deserted him. 
Like a lion Rostam laid him low, but, knowing that the youth would not lie there 
for long, he quickly drew his dagger and plunged it in the lionhearted hero’s 
chest. Sohrab writhed, then gasped for breath, and knew he’d passed beyond 
concerns of worldly good and evil. He said: “I brought this on myself, this is 
from me, 

And Fate has merely handed you the key 

To my brief life: not you but heaven’s vault— 

Which raised me and then killed me—is at fault. 

Love for my father led me here to die. 

My mother gave me signs to know him by, 

And you could be a fish within the sea, Or pitch black, lost in night’s 

obscurity, 

Or be a star in heaven’s endless space, 

Or vanish from the earth and leave no trace, 

But still my father, when he knows I’m dead, 

Will bring down condign vengeance on your head. 

One from this noble band will take this sign 

To Rostam’s hands, and tell him it was mine, 

And say I sought him always, far and wide, 

And that, at last, in seeking him, I died.” 


When Rostam heard the watrior’s words, his head whirled and the earth turned 
dark before his eyes, and when he came back to himself, he roared in an agony 


of anguish and asked what it was that the youth had which was a sign from 
Rostam, the most cursed of all heroes. 

“Tf then you are Rostam,” said the youth, “and you killed me, your wits were 
dimmed by an evil nature. I tried in every way to guide you, but no love of yours 
responded. Open the straps that bind my armor and look on my naked body. 
When the battle drums sounded before my door, my mother came to me, her 
eyes awash with tears, her soul in torment to see me leave. She bound a clasp on 
my arm and said, ‘Take this in memory of your father, and watch for when it 
will be useful to you’; but now it shows its power too late, and the son is laid 
low before his father.” And when Rostam opened the boy’s armor and saw the 
clasp he tore at his own clothes in grief, saying, “All men praised your bravery, 
and I have killed you with my own hands.” Violently he wept and tore his hair 
and heaped dust on his head. Sohrab said, “By this you make things worse. You 
must not weep; what point is there in wounding yourself like this? What 
happened is what had to happen.” 

The shining sun descended from the sky and still Rostam had not returned to 
his encampment. Twenty warriors came riding to see the battlefield and found 
two muddied horses but no sign of Rostam. Assuming he had been killed, they 
sent a message to Kavus saying, “Rostam’s royal throne lies desolate.” A wail of 
mourning went up from the army, and Kavus gave orders that the drums and 
trumpets be sounded. Tus hurried forward and Kavus told him to have someone 
survey the battlefield and find out what it was that Sohrab had done and whether 
they were indeed to weep for the fortunes of Iran, since if Rostam had been 
killed, no one would be able to oppose Sohrab and they would have to retreat 
without giving battle. 

As the noise of mourning rose from the army, Sohrab said to Rostam, “Now 
that my days are ended, the Turks’ fortunes too have changed. Be merciful to 
them, and do not let the king make war on them; it was at my instigation they 
attacked Iran. What promises I made, what hopes I held out to them! They 
should not be the ones to suffer; see you look kindly on them.” 

Cold sighs on his lips, his face besmeared with blood and tears, Rostam 
mounted Rakhsh and rode to the Persian camp, lamenting aloud, tormented by 
the thought of what he had done. When they caught sight of him, the Persian 
warriors fell to the ground, praising God that he was alive, but when they saw 
his ripped clothes and dust-besmeared head and face, they asked him what had 
happened and what distressed him. He told them of the strange deed he had 


done, of how he had slaughtered the person who was dearer to him than all 
others, and all who heard lamented aloud with him. 

Then he said to the chieftains, “I’ve no courage left now, no strength or 
sense; go no further with this war against the Turks, the evil that I have done 
today is sufficient.” Rostam returned to where his son lay wounded, and the 
nobles—men like Tus, Gudarz, and Gostaham—accompanied him, crowding 
round and saying, “It’s God who will heal this wound, it’s he who will lighten 
your sorrows.” But Rostam drew a dagger, intending to slash his own neck with 
it; weeping with grief, they flung themselves on him and Gudarz said, “What 
point is there in spreading fire and sword throughout the world by your death, 
and if you wound yourself a thousand times, how will that help this noble youth? 
If there is any time left to him on this earth, then stay with him and ease his 
hours here; and if he is to die, then look at all the world and say, ‘Who is 
immortal?’ We are all Death’s prey, both he who wears a helmet and he who 
wears the crown.” 

Rostam replied, “Go quickly and take a message from me to Kavus and tell 
him what has befallen me; say that I have rent my own son’s vitals with a 
dagger, and that I curse my life and long for death. Tell him, if he has any regard 
for all I have done in his service, to have pity on my suffering and to send me the 
elixir he keeps in his treasury, the medicine that will heal all wounds. If he will 
send it, together with a goblet of wine, it may be that, by his grace, Sohrab will 
survive and serve Kavus’s throne as I have done.” 

Like wind the chieftain bore this message to Kavus, who said in reply, 
“Which warrior, of all this company, is of more repute than Rostam? And are we 
to make him even greater? Then, surely he will turn on me and kill me. How will 
the wide world contain his glory and might? How will he remain the servant to 
my throne? If, some day, evil’s to come to me from him, I will respond with evil. 
You heard how he referred to me: ‘When I am angry, who is Kay Kavus? 

Who dares to threaten me? And who is Tus?’” 


When Gudarz heard these words, he hurried back to Rostam and said: “This 
king’s malicious nature is a tree 
That grows new, bitter fruit perpetually; 


You must go to him and try to enlighten his benighted soul.” Rostam gave orders 
that a rich cloth be spread beside the stream; gently he laid his wounded son 
there and set out to where Kavus held court. But he was overtaken on the way by 


one who told him that Sohrab had departed this world; he had looked round for 
his father, then heaved an icy sigh, and groaned, and closed his eyes forever. It 
was not a castle the boy needed his father to provide for him now, but a coffin. 

Rostam dismounted and removed his helmet and smeared dust on his head. 

Then he commanded that the boy’s body be covered in royal brocade—the 
youth who had longed for fame and conquest, and whose destiny was a narrow 
bier borne from the battlefield. Rostam returned to his royal pavilion and had it 
set ablaze; his warriors smeared their heads with dust, and in the midst of their 
lamentations they fed the flames with his throne, his saddlecloth of leopardskin, 
his silken tent of many colors. Rostam wept and ripped his royal clothes, and all 
the heroes of the Persian army sat in the wayside dust with him and tried to 
comfort him, but to no avail. 

Kavus said to Rostam, “The heavens bear all before them, from the mighty 
Alborz Mountains to the lightest reed; man must not love this earth too much. 
For one it comes early and for another late, but Death comes to all. Accept this 
loss, pay heed to wisdom’s ways, and know that if you bow the heavens to the 
ground or set the seas aflame, you cannot bring back him who’s gone; his soul 
grows old, but in another place. I saw him in the distance once, I saw his height 
and stature and the massive mace he held; Fate drove him here to perish by your 
hand. What is it you would do? What remedy exists for this? How long will you 
mourn in this way?” 

Rostam replied, “Yes, he is gone. But Human still camps here on the plains, 
along with chieftains from Turan and China. Have no rancor in your heart 
against them. Give the command, and let my brother Zavareh lead off our 
armies.” The king said, “This sadness clouds your soul, great hero. Well, they 
have done me evil enough, and they have wreaked havoc in Iran, but my heart 
feels the pain you feel, and for your sake I’|I think no more of them.” 
 
Rostam Returns to Zabolestan 

Rostam returned then to his home, Zabolestan, and when news of his coming 
reached his father, Zal-Dastan, the people of Sistan came out to meet him, 
mourning and grieving for his loss. When Dastan saw the bier, he dismounted 
from his horse, and Rostam came forward on foot, his clothes torn, with anguish 
in his heart. The chieftains took off their armor and stood before the coffin and 
smeared their heads with dust. When Rostam reached his palace, he cried aloud 
and had the coffin set before him; then he ripped out the nails and pulled back 
the shroud and showed the nobles gathered there the body of his son. A tumult of 
mourning swept the palace, which seemed a vast tomb where a lion lay; the 
youth resembled Sam, as if that hero slept, worn out by battle. Then Rostam 
covered him in cloth of gold and nailed the coffin shut and said, “If I construct a 
golden tomb for him and fill it with black musk, it will not last for long when I 
am gone; but I see nothing else that I can do.” 


This tale is full of tears, and Rostam leaves 
The tender heart indignant as it grieves: 

I turn now from this story to relate 

The tale of Seyavash and his sad fate. 


THE LEGEND OF SEYAVASH 


A Turkish Princess Is Discovered 

One day at cockcrow Tus, Giv, and a number of other knights rode out from 
their king’s court; taking along cheetahs and hawks, they set off for the plain of 
Daghui to hunt for wild asses. After they’d brought down a great quantity of 
game, enough for forty days, they saw that the land before them was black with 
Turkish tents. In the distance, close to the border between the Persian and 
Turkish peoples, a thicket was visible, and Tus and Giv, followed by a few 
others, rode over to it. To their astonishment, they discovered a beautiful young 
woman hiding there, and Tus said to her, “How is it a girl as radiant as the moon 
is in this thicket?” She answered, “Last night my father beat me; he came back 
drunk from a feast and, as soon as he saw me, he drew a dagger and began 
shouting that he would cut my head off, and so I fled from our home.” 

The knights asked her about her family, and she explained that she was 
related to Garsivaz who traced his lineage back to Feraydun. Then they asked 
how it was that she was on foot. She said that her horse had collapsed in 
exhaustion, that the quantity of gold and jewels she’d brought with her, together 
with her crown, had been stolen from her by bandits on a nearby hill, and that 
one of them had beaten her with the scabbard of his sword. She added, “When 
my father realizes what’s happened, he’! send horsemen out to find me, and my 
mother too is sure to hurry here to stop me going any further.” 

The knights could not help but be interested in her, and Tus said quite 
shamelessly, “I found this Turkish girl, I rode on ahead of the rest of the group, 
she’s mine.” Giv responded, “My lord, didn’t you and I arrive here together, 
without the others? It’s not fitting for a knight to get so argumentative about a 
slave girl.” Their words became so heated that they were ready to cut the girl’s 
head off, but to resolve the matter one of the company suggested they take her to 
the Persian king’s court, and that both should agree to whatever the king 
decided. 

And so they set out for the court, but when Kavus saw the girl he laughed and 
bit his lip and said to the pair of them, “I see the hardships of the journey were 
well worth it, and we can spend a day telling stories about how our heroes went 
hunting with cheetahs and snared the sun. She’s a delicate young doe, and prey 
like that’s reserved for the very best.” He turned then to the girl and said, “What 
family are you from, because your face is like an angel’s?” She answered, “My 
mother’s nobly born, and my father’s descended from Feraydun; my grandfather 
is Garsivaz, and his tent is always at the center of our encampment.” Kavus said, 
“And you wanted to throw to the winds such a fine lineage, not to speak of your 


lovely face and hair? No, you must sit on a golden throne in my harem and I’Il 
make you the first of all my women.” She answered, “My lord, when I saw you, 
of all heroes I chose you for my own.” 


Enthroned within his harem now—arrayed 
With rubies, turquoise, lapis, gold brocade— 
She was herself an unpierced, precious gem, 
A princess worthy of a diadem. 


The Birth of Seyavash 

When spring with all its glorious colors came, Kavus was told that his encounter 
with this radiant beauty had resulted in the birth of a splendid son. The 
loveliness of the boy’s face and hair was rumored throughout the world; the 
king, his father, named him Seyavash and had his horoscope cast. But the 
horoscope was not auspicious; taking refuge in the will of God, Kavus was 
saddened to see that the stars did not augur well for the boy’s future. 

Shortly afterwards Rostam came to the court and addressed the sovereign: 
“Tt’s I who should undertake the education of this lion cub; no courtier of yours 
is more suited to the task; in all the world you won’t find a better nurse for him 
than I shall be.” The king pondered the suggestion for a while and, seeing that 
his heart had no objection to it, he handed into Rostam’s arms his pride and joy, 
the noble infant warrior. Rostam took the boy to Zavolestan and there 
constructed a dwelling for him in an orchard. He taught him how to ride and all 
the skills appropriate for a horseman; how to manage bridle and stirrups, the use 
of bow and lariat; how to preside at banquets where the wine goes round; how to 
hunt with hawks and cheetahs; what justice and injustice are; all that pertains to 
the crown and throne; what wise speech is; what warfare is and how to lead his 
troops. He passed on to him all the arts a prince must know, toiling to teach the 
boy, and his labors bore good fruit. Seyavash became a prince without a peer in 
all the world. 

Time passed and now the youth was hunting lions with his lariat. He turned 
to Rostam and said, “I need to see my king; you’ve taken great pains in teaching 
me the ways of princes, and now my father must see the skills that Rostam’s 
taught me.” Rostam gathered presents for him—horses, slaves, gold, silver, seal- 
rings, crowns, thrones, cloth, carpets—and whatever his own treasury could not 
supply he sent for from elsewhere. He had Seyavash splendidly equipped, since 
the army would be observing him, and to keep the boy’s spirits up, he 
accompanied him part of the way. His people decked the road in splendor, 
mixing gold and ambergris and sprinkling the mixture on him as he passed. 
Every house and street was decorated and the world was filled with joy, gold 
coins were scattered beneath the horses’ hooves, their manes were smeared with 
saffron, wine, and musk; in all Iran there was not one sad soul. 

Seyavash was welcomed at the court with great pomp and ceremony; 
festivities were held and Kavus lavished gifts on his son, reserving only the royal 
crown, saying that the boy was as yet too young for such an honor. But after 


eight years had passed he made him lord of Kavarestan, the land beyond the 
Oxus, and the royal mandate was inscribed on silk according to ancient royal 
custom. 


Sudabeh’s Love for Seyavash 

Now when the king’s wife, Sudabeh, saw Seyavash, she grew strangely pensive 

and her heart beat faster; she began to waste away like ice before fire, worn thin 

as a silken thread. She sent someone to him saying, “If you were to appear in the 
royal harem one day it would cause no alarm or surprise.” Seyavash replied: 


“T don’t like harems and I won’t agree 

To plots and intrigues, so don’t bother me.” 
At dawn the following day Sudabeh hurried to the king and said, “Great lord, 
whose like the sun and moon have never seen, whose son’s a matchless paragon, 
dispatch this youth to your harem where his sisters and your women can set eyes 
on him; we’!l do him homage and give him presents, and the tree of loyalty will 
bear sweet fruit.” Kavus replied, “Your words are wise, your love is equal to a 
hundred mothers’ love.” He called Seyavash to him and said, “Blood ties and 
love will not stay hidden long; you’ve sisters in my harem, and Sudabeh loves 
you like a mother. God has created you in such a way that everyone who sees 
you loves you, and those who are your kin should not have to be content with 
glimpsing you from a distance. Pay a visit to my womenfolk, stay with them for 
a while and let them honor you.” But when Seyavash heard the king’s words, he 
stared at him in astonishment: He strove to keep his heart unstained and clean 

And pondered what it was the king might mean: 


Perhaps Kavus felt some uncertainty 

And meant to test his faith, or honesty. 

He knew the king was sly and eloquent, 

Watchful and warily intelligent. 

He thought, “And if I go there, Sudabeh 

Will corner me and pester me to stay.” 

He said, “Send me to men of proven sense, 

To councilors of deep experience, 

To those who’ll teach me how to fight, who know 
How I should wield a sword, or shoot a bow, 

Who know how kings hold court, how courtiers dine, 
The rules that govern music, feasts, and wine: 

What will I gather from your women’s quarters? 
Since when has wisdom lived with wives and daughters? 
But if these are your orders, I will do 

Whatever seems appropriate to you.” 


The king replied, “Rejoice, my son, and may wisdom always guide you; I’ve 
heard few speeches so eloquent and it does a man good to hear you talk like this. 
But don’t be so suspicious; be cheerful, drive away such gloomy thoughts. Now, 
your loving sisters and Sudabeh, who loves you like a mother, are all waiting for 
you in the harem.” Seyavash said, “I shall come at dawn and do as you 
command.” 

There was a man, whose heart was cleansed of all evil, called Hirbad, and he 
had charge of the king’s harem. To this wise man Kavus said, “When the sun 
unsheathes its sword, pay attention to what Seyavash tells you.” Then he told 
Sudabeh to prepare jewels and musk to scatter before his son. When the sun rose 
above the mountains, Seyavash came to his father and made his obeisance before 
him; Kavus talked to the boy for a while then summoned Hirbad and gave him 
his orders. He said to Seyavash, “Go with him, and prepare your heart for new 
delights.” 

The two went off together lightheartedly enough, but when Hirbad drew back 
the curtain from the harem’s entrance, Seyavash felt a presentiment of evil. The 
womenfolk came forward with music to welcome him; he saw bowls of musk, 
gold coins, and saffron on every side, and as he entered gold, rubies, and 
emeralds were scattered before his feet. He trod on Chinese brocade worked 
with pearls and saw facing him a golden throne studded with turquoise and 


draped in gorgeous cloth; there sat the moon-faced Sudabeh, a paradise of tints 
and scents, splendid as Canopus, a tall crown set on the thick black curls that fell 
clustering to her feet. Beside her stood a slave, her head humbly bowed, her 
mistress’s gold-worked slippers in her hands. 

As soon as she saw Seyavash enter, Sudabeh descended from the throne. She 
walked coquettishly forward, bowed before him, and then held him in a lengthy 
embrace. Slowly she kissed his eyes and face, gazing as if she could never grow 
weary of him. She murmured, “Throughout the day and for three watches of the 
night I thank God a hundred times for your existence. No one has ever had a son 
like you, no king has ever had a prince like you.” Seyavash knew what all this 
kindness meant, and that such friendship was improper; he hurried over to his 
sisters, who greeted him respectfully and sat him on a golden throne. After 
spending some time with them he returned to the king’s audience hall, and the 
harem buzzed with chatter: “That’s what I call a real prince, so noble and so 
cultivated ...,” “He seems an angel, not a man atall...,” “And his soul just 
radiates wisdom .. .” 

Seyavash went to his father and said, “I have seen your harem; all the 
splendor of the world is yours, and you can have no quarrel with God. In 
treasure and power and glory you surpass Jamshid, Feraydun, and Hushang.” 
The king was overjoyed at his words and had the castle decorated like a spring 
garden; father and son passed the time with wine and music, giving no thought 
to the workings of Fate. At nightfall Kavus made his way to the harem and 
questioned Sudabeh: “No secrets from me now, tell me what you thought of 
Seyavash, of his behavior, of how he looks, of his conversation. Did you like 
him? D’you think he’s wise? Is he better from report or when you see him face 
to face?” Sudabeh replied, “The sun and moon have never seen your equal, and 
who in all the world is like your son? This is not something to be secretive 
about! Now, if you agree, I’ll marry him to one of his own kin; I have daughters 
from you and one of them would surely bear him a noble son.” Kavus replied, 
“This is my desire exactly; the greatness of our name depends on it.” 

When Seyavash came to his father the following morning Kavus cleared the 
court and said: “I have one, secret, unfulfilled request of God: that my name 
should live through a son of yours, and just as I was rejuvenated by your birth, 
so you will know delight in seeing him. Astrologers have said you will father a 
great son, to keep our name alive in the world. Now, choose some noble girl as 
your consort; look in King Pashin’s harem, or there is King Arash’s clan; look 
about for someone suitable.” Seyavash said, “I am the king’s slave, obedient to 


his wishes; but Sudabeh shouldn’t hear of this, she won’t like it. And I’m having 
no more to do with her harem.” The king laughed at Seyavash’s words; he 
thought all was firm ground and had no notion of swampy water lurking beneath 
the straw. “You worry about choosing a wife,” he said, “and don’t give Sudabeh 
a thought. She speaks well of you and only wants what’s best for you.” Seyavash 
showed pleasure at his father’s words and bowed before the throne, but inwardly 
he still brooded over Sudabeh’s intentions. 


Sudabeh Tries Again 
The next day Sudabeh sent Hirbad to Seyavash, saying, “Tell him to put himself 
to the trouble of honoring us with his noble presence.” Seyavash came to the 
harem and saw her seated on her throne, her crown set on her bejeweled hair, her 
beautiful womenfolk standing by, as if the palace were a paradise. She 
descended from her throne and sat him there, then stood before him 
submissively, her arms folded across her chest, like a serving girl. She motioned 
to the young women, lovely as uncut jewels, and said, “Look on this place, and 
on these gold-crowned virgin girls whose characters are compounded of coyness 
and modesty. If one of them pleases you, tell me: go forward and examine her 
face and stature.” Seyavash glanced at the girls, but they were all too shy to 
return his gaze. One by one they passed before his throne, each silently 
reckoning her chances of being chosen. When the last had gone by, Sudabeh 
said, “How long will you stay silent? Won’t you tell me which one you like? 
Your face is like an angel’s, and anyone who glimpses you in the distance 
wishes you were hers. Look carefully at these girls, and choose whichever’s 
suitable for you.” But Seyavash sat there silent, thinking that it would be wrong 
to choose a wife from among his enemies; the story of what the king of 
Hamaveran had done to Kavus came to his mind, and the fact that Sudabeh was 
this man’s daughter and, like him, was full of wiles and hatred for the Persian 
people. As he opened his mouth to answer, Sudabeh removed her veil and said: 
“The moon’s of no account beside the sun, 

And now you see the sun. Come now, choose one 

Of these young virgins, and I’ll have her stand 

Before you as your servant to command. 

But first, swear me an oath you’ll never try 

To wriggle out of: King Kavus will die, 

And when that happens I will turn to you: 

Value me then as he was wont to do. 

I stand here now, your servant girl, I give 

My flesh to you, the soul by which I live; 

Take anything you want from me, I swear 

I won’t attempt to slip free from your snare.” 

She clutched his head and ripped her dress, as though 

All fear and shame had left her long ago. 

But Seyavash’s cheeks blushed rosy red, 


Tears filled his eyes, and to himself he said, 
“May God who rules the planets succor me 
And save me from this witch’s sorcery. 

If I speak coldly to her she’ll devise 

Some spell to make the king believe her lies. 
My best course is to flatter her; to calm 

Her heart with glozing chat and gentle charm.” 


And so he said to Sudabeh: “Who in all the world is your equal, who is fit for 
you except the king? Your daughter is enough for me, no better bride for me 
exists. Suggest this to the king and see what he replies. I swear I’1l look at no 
one else until she’s grown as tall as I am. As for this liking you’ve conceived for 
my face, well, God has made me as you see me; but keep this as our secret, tell 
no one, and I too will keep the matter dark. You are the first of all our 
womenfolk, and I think of you as my mother.” Then he left, with sorrow in his 
heart. 

When Kavus arrived in the harem, Sudabeh told him of Seyavash’s visit, 
saying that he had seen all the young women there but only her own daughter 
had pleased him. Overjoyed, the king had the treasury doors flung open and a 
great treasure prepared, while Sudabeh watched in wonder. She was determined 
to bend Seyavash to her will by any means possible, or, if she could not, to 
destroy his reputation. 

Once more she sat upon her throne arrayed in all her splendor and summoned 
Seyavash. She said, “The king has prepared treasures for you, crowns and 
thrones such as no man has ever seen, immeasurable quantities of goods, enough 
to weigh down two hundred elephants. And he’s going to give you my daughter 
as a bride. But look at me now; what excuse can you have to reject my love, why 
do you turn away from my body and beauty? I have been your slave ever since I 
set eyes on you, weeping and longing for you; pain darkens all my days, I feel 
the sun itself is dimmed. Come, in secret, just once, make me happy again, give 
me back my youth for a moment. I’! reward you with far more than the king has 
offered—bracelets, crowns, thrones. But if you refuse me and hold your heart 
back from my desires, Il] destroy you with the king and make him look on you 
with loathing.” 

Seyavash replied, “God forbid I should lose my head for the sake of my heart, 
or ever be so disloyal to my father as to forget all manliness and wisdom. You 
are the king’s consort, the sun of his palace; such a sin is unworthy of you.” 


Then Sudabeh sprang from her throne and stretched out her claws at him, crying, 
“T told you all the secrets of my heart and now you want to ruin me, to make me 
a laughingstock>” She tore her clothes, clawed at her cheeks, and screamed so 
loudly the sound was heard in the streets. A tumult of wailing went up from the 
palace and its gardens, and hearing it, Kavus sprang from his throne and hurried 
to the harem. When he saw Sudabeh’s scratched face and the palace abuzz with 
rumors, he asked everyone what had happened, never suspecting that his hard- 
hearted wife was the cause of all this. Sudabeh stood wailing and weeping in 
front of him, tearing at her hair, and said, “Seyavash came to my throne room 
and clasped me tightly in his arms, saying he had never wanted anyone but me; 
he flung my crown aside and tore my clothes from my breasts.” 

Kavus questioned her closely, and in his heart he said, “If she is telling the 
truth, and is not simply trying to stir up trouble, the only possible solution is for 
Seyavash to be executed. The wise say that, in cases like this, honor demands 
blood.” He cleared the harem of everyone but Sudabeh and Seyavash, and then, 
turning first to Seyavash, calmly said, “You must hide nothing from me. You 
didn’t do this evil, I did, and now I must bear the consequences of my own 
foolish talk; why ever did I order you to go to the harem? Now I must suffer 
while you tell me what happened. Keep your eye on the truth now, and tell me 
exactly what occurred.” 

Seyavash told him the story and of how wild with passion Sudabeh had been, 
but Sudabeh broke in, “This is not true, he wanted no one in the harem except 
me. I reminded him of all the king had given him, of our daughter and all the 
treasure that was to be his, and I said I’d add more in gifts to the bride; but he 
said he wanted only me, and that without me girls and treasure were nothing to 
him. He flung his arms about me, his embrace was unyielding as a rock, and 
when I wouldn’t do what he wanted, he yanked at my hair and scratched my 
face. I’m pregnant with a child of yours, my lord, and I suffered so much I 
thought I would lose our baby there and then; the world turned dark before my 
eyes.” 

Kavus said to himself, “I can’t trust what either of them says; this is not 
something to be decided quickly, crises and worry cloud a man’s judgment. I 
have to search out carefully which of the two of them is guilty and deserves to be 
punished.” To this end he sniffed at Seyavash’s hands and at his arms and body. 
Next he turned to Sudabeh, and on her he smelt the scents of wine, musk, and 
rosewater. There was no trace of such scents on Seyavash; there was no evidence 
that he had touched her. Kavus grew grim, despising Sudabeh in his heart, and to 


himself he said, “She should be hacked to pieces with a sword.” But then he 
thought of Hamaveran and of the outcry that would arise if Sudabeh were 
harmed, and also he remembered how when he had been in captivity there, alone 
and friendless, she had ministered to him day and night; the memory of this 
tormented him and he said nothing. Thirdly, she was a loving woman and he felt 
she should be forgiven for her faults. And fourthly, he had young children by 
her, and he could not bear the thought of their grief if anything should happen to 
their mother. But Seyavash was innocent, and the king recognized his 
righteousness. He said to him, “Well, think no more of all this; follow the ways 
of wisdom and knowledge. Mention this matter to no one; we mustn’t give 
gossip any kind of encouragement.” 


Sudabeh’s Plot Against Seyavash 

When Sudabeh realized that Kavus despised her, she began to plot against 
Seyavash, nourishing the tree of vengeance with her wiles. One of her intimates 
was a witch who was enduring a difficult pregnancy, and Sudabeh gave her gold, 
persuading her to take a drug that would abort the twins she carried. Sudabeh 
said she would tell Kavus the babies were hers, and that she had miscarried 
because of Seyavash’s evil behavior. The woman agreed; when night fell she 
swallowed the drug, and two ugly devil’s spawn were still-born from her. 
Sudabeh hid her and then lay groaning on her bed as if in labor. Her 
maidservants came running and saw the two dead devil’s spawn on a golden 
salver, while Sudabeh screamed and tore at her clothes. Kavus woke trembling at 
the noise and was told what had happened to his wife. He hardly drew breath for 
the rest of the night and at dawn he hurried to the harem, where he saw Sudabeh 
stretched out, her quarters in an uproar, and the two dead babies lying 
pathetically on the golden salver. Her eyes awash with tears, Sudabeh said, “See 
the work of this paragon of yours, and like a fool you believed his lies!” 

Kavus was sick at heart; he knew this was something he could not ignore and 
he brooded on how to resolve the situation. He had astrologers summoned; he 
told them of Sudabeh’s history and of the war with Hamaveran, then showed 
them the dead babies, and asked their opinion. The men set to work with their 
astrolabes and charts and after a week declared that poison did not turn to wine 
by being placed in a goblet, and that these two babies were not Sudabeh’s or the 
king’s, but the spawn of an evil race. For a week Kavus kept his own council, 
but then Sudabeh appealed to him again saying, “I was the king’s companion in 
adversity, and my heart’s so wrung with grief for my murdered babies I hardly 


live from one moment to the next.” But Kavus turned on her and said, “Be quiet, 
woman, enough of these sickening lies of yours.” Then he ordered the palace 
guards to search high and low throughout the city for the babies’ mother; they 
found her nearby and dragged her before the king. For days he questioned her 
kindly and made her promises, then he had her tied up and tortured, but she 
refused to confess. Finally, he gave orders that she was to be threatened with 
execution and that, if she still stayed silent, she be sawn in two; but her only 
reply was that she was innocent and did not know what to say. 

When Kavus was told of her response he went to Sudabeh and informed her 
of what the astrologers had said, but Sudabeh’s reply was that they only said this 
because they were afraid of Seyavash. She added that, even if he felt no grief for 
their dead children, she had no other recourse than him and was content to leave 
the resolution of this quarrel to the world to come. She wept more water than the 
sun draws up from the Nile, and Kavus wept with her. 

He dismissed her and summoned his priests and explained the situation. They 
advised that he try one of the two by fire, for the heavens would ensure that the 
innocent would not be harmed. He had Sudabeh and Seyavash called and said 
that in his heart he could trust neither of them unless fire demonstrated which of 
the two was guilty. Sudabeh’s answer was that she had demonstrated Seyavash’s 
guilt by producing the two miscarried babies, and that he should undergo the 
trial as he had acted evilly and sought to destroy her. Kavus turned to his young 
son and asked him his opinion. Seyavash replied that hell itself was less hateful 
than her words, and that if there were a mountain of fire, he would pass through 
it to prove his innocence. Torn between his love for Sudabeh and his regard for 
his son, Kavus decided to go ahead with the trial. He had a hundred caravans of 
camels and another hundred of red-haired dromedaries bring wood, and servants 
piled it into two huge hills, between which was a narrow pathway such as four 
horsemen might with difficulty pass through. While the populace watched from 
a distance, Kavus had priests pour thick pitch on the pyre; 

Two hundred men dashed out to set the fire 

And such black clouds of smoke rose up you’d say 
Dark night usurped the brilliance of the day. 

But then quick tongues of flame shot out and soon 
The plain glowed brighter than the sky at noon, 
Heat scorched the burning ground, and everywhere 
The noise of lamentation filled the air; 

They wept to see the prince, who came alone 


On a black horse before his father’s throne; 

His helmet was of gold, his clothes were white 
And camphor-strewn, according to the rite 

That’s used in preparation of a shroud. 
Dismounting from his horse, he stood, then bowed. 
Gently his father spoke, and in his face 

The prince saw conscious shame and deep disgrace. 
But Seyavash said, “Do not grieve, my lord, 

The heavens willed all this, and rest assured 

The fire will have no strength to injure me; 

My innocence ensures my victory.” 


When Sudabeh heard the tumult she came out on the roof of her palace and saw 
the fire; muttering to herself in rage, she longed for evil to befall the prince. The 
whole world’s eyes were fixed on Kavus; men cursed him, their hearts filled 
with indignation. Then Seyavash wheeled, urging his horse impetuously into the 
fire; tongues of flame enveloped him and both his horse and helmet disappeared. 
Tears were in all eyes, the whole plain waited, wondering if he would re-emerge, 
and when they glimpsed him a shout went up, “The young prince has escaped 
the fire!” He was unscathed, as if he’d ridden through water and emerged bone 
dry, for when God wills it, he renders fire and water equally harmless. Seeing 
Seyavash, all the plain and city gave a great cry of gratitude, and the army’s 
cavalry galloped forward scattering gold coins in his path; nobles and 
commoners alike rejoiced, passing on the news to one another that God had 
justified the innocent. But Sudabeh wept and tore at her hair and scored her 
cheeks with her nails. 

Seyavash appeared before his father and there was no trace of fire or smoke 
or dust or dirt on him; Kavus dismounted, as did all the army, and the king 
clasped his son in his arms, asking his pardon for the evil that had been done. 
Seyavash gave thanks to God that he had escaped the flames and that his 
enemy’s designs had been destroyed. The king heaped praise on him and the two 
walked in state to the palace, where a royal crown was placed on the prince’s 
head and for three days the court gave itself up to wine and music. 





But on the fourth day Kavus sat enthroned in majesty, his ox-headed mace in 
his hand, and peremptorily summoned Sudabeh. He went over what she had 
claimed, then said, “Your shameless behavior has tormented my heart for long 
enough; you played foul tricks against my son, thrusting him into the fire; you 
used magic against him, and no apology will avail you now. Leave this place and 
prepare yourself for the gallows; you do not deserve to live and hanging is the 
only fit punishment for what you have done.” She answered, “If my head’s to be 
severed from my body, I am ready, give your orders. But I want you to harbor no 
resentment against me in your heart, so let Seyavash tell the truth—it was Zal’s 
magic that saved him.” But the king burst out, “Still at your tricks? It’s a wonder 
you’re not hunchbacked with the weight of your impertinence!” And then he 
turned to the court crying, “What punishment is suitable for the crimes she has 
committed in secret?” All answered, “The just punishment is that she suffer 
death for the evil she has done.” Kavus said to the executioner, “Take her and 
hang her in the public way, and show no mercy.” When all abandoned Sudabeh 





in this fashion, the women of the court broke into loud lamentation, and Kavus 
turned pale, his heart wrung by their cries. 

Seyavash said to the king, “Torment yourself no more about this matter; 
forgive her for my sake. Now, surely, she’ll accept good guidance and reform 
her ways.” And to himself he said, “If Sudabeh’s destroyed, the king will regret 
it eventually, and when that happens he’|] blame me for her death.” Kavus, who 
had been looking for some excuse not to kill Sudabeh, replied, “For your sake I 
forgive her.” Seyavash kissed his father’s throne and then rose and left the court; 
the women of the harem flocked about Sudabeh, bowing before her one by one. 

And after some time had passed the king’s heart once again inclined to 
Sudabeh, and his love was such that he could not tear his eyes from her face. 
Once again her evil nature reasserted itself and she began to weave her secret 
spells, plotting against Seyavash. And, listening to her, Kavus once again began 
to turn against his son; but, for the moment, he concealed his suspicions. 


Kavus Learns of a New Attack on Iran 

News came to the lovesick Kavus that Afrasyab and a hundred thousand Turkish 
cavalry were menacing his borders. Reluctant to give up his life of ease and 
pleasure, he summoned a council and addressed them thus: “God did not make 
this Afrasyab of earth, air, fire, and water, as he did other men. How often has he 
sworn peace with us, but as soon as he can gather an army together, he forgets 
all his oaths and promises. There’s no one but myself who can confront him and 
turn his day to darkest night; if I don’t eclipse his glory he’ ll attack Iran and lay 
waste our territories as swiftly as an arrow flies from the bowstring.” His 
advisors said, “Your army is sufficient without your presence; why waste wealth 
recklessly? Twice already your rashness has delivered the kingdom into your 
enemies’ hands. Choose some warrior worthy of war to carry out this task for 
you.” He answered, “But I see no one here who can confront Afrasyab; no, it’s 
my boat that must be launched for this undertaking. Now leave me, and let me 
prepare my heart for what’s to come.” 

Hearing this, Seyavash grew pensive, and thoughts crowded his mind like a 
dense thicket. To himself he said, “I should fight this war, and I must persuade 
Kavus to give command of our armies to me. In this way God will free me both 
from Sudabeh and my father’s suspicions; and besides, if I can overcome such a 
force, I shall win fame for myself.” He strode forward, his sword belt buckled 
on, and said, “I am capable of fighting with the king of Turan, and I shall 
humble his heroes’ heads in the dust.” 


His father agreed to his request and made much of him, loading him with new 
honors and giving him treasure with which to equip the army. Then Kavus 
summoned Rostam and said to him, “No mammoth has your strength, and you 
showed your unparalleled wisdom and discretion when you raised Seyavash. 
Now he’s come to me, his sword belt buckled on, talking as if he were a young 
lion. He wants to lead the expedition against Afrasyab; you’re to accompany 
him, and see you never take your eyes off him. If you are watchful, I can sleep 
easily, but if you relax your vigilance, then I must bestir myself. The world rests 
safely because of your sword, and the moon in its sphere is yours to command.” 
Rostam said: “I am your slave, obedient to you, 

Whatever you command me I shall do; 

My refuge is prince Seyavash, and where 

His crown is, heaven too, for me, is there.” 
Heartened by Rostam’s words Kavus replied, 
“May wisdom be your spirit’s constant guide!” 


Preceded by the din of fifes and kettledrums, the proud commander Tus 
appeared at court and the king flung open his treasury doors to equip the 
assembled warriors. Helmets, maces, sword belts, armor, lances, and shields 
were distributed, and the king sent the key to the treasury where uncut cloth and 
other wealth was stored to Seyavash, saying that he was to administer it as he 
saw fit. He chose twelve thousand cavalry, men from Pars, Kuch, Baluch, Gilan, 
and the plain of Saruch, and twelve thousand infantry; for leaders he chose men 
like Bahram and Zangeh, Shavran’s son, and he also selected five priests to hold 
aloft the Kaviani banner. 

Seyavash gave orders that they assemble on the plain outside the palace, and 
so crowded did the area become, it seemed there wasn’t room for one more 
horseshoe; before the host the Kaviani banner floated like a glittering moon. 
Kavus came out, quickly inspected the troops, and addressed them: 


“May fortune favor you! May all who fight 
Against you be deprived of sense and sight; 
As you set out, may health and luck be yours, 
May you return as happy conquerors.” 


War drums were strapped on the elephants’ backs; Seyavash gave the order to 
mount and advance. His eyes awash with tears, Kavus accompanied them for the 


first day’s journey. Finally, father and son embraced, each weeping like a cloud 
in springtime, and each felt within his heart that he would not see the other 
again. Kavus turned back to his court, and Seyavash led his warlike army on 
toward Zavolestan, where Zal, Rostam’s father, awaited them. There a month 
passed with wine and music; Seyavash spent his time with Rostam, or with 
Rostam’s brother Zavareh, or seated cheerfully with Zal, or hunting wild game 
through the reed beds. 

But after a month Seyavash and Rostam led the army forward, leaving Zal 
and his hospitality behind. Men flocked to their banner from India and Kabol, 
and as they neared Herat, troops poured in from every side. The heavens still 
smiled on them as they approached Talqun and Marvrud, and so they went 
forward toward Balkh, injuring no one, not so much as by an unkind word. 

On the enemy’s side, swift as the wind, Garsivaz and Barman led their army 
forward; the leaders of the vanguard, Barman and Sepahram, heard that a new 
prince, mighty as a mammoth, was leading an army forth from Iran. Quick as a 
skiff that cleaves the waves, they dispatched a messenger to Afrasyab, telling 
him of Seyavash and his great army and that warriors like Rostam, death’s 
harbinger, accompanied him. They pleaded with him to come at once, with fresh 
troops, for the wind was in the sails of their venture and the ship plunged 
forward. 

But Seyavash confronted them before any answer could arrive, and Garsivaz, 
hemmed in by Iran’s troops, had no choice but to give battle; he decided to make 
a stand before the gates of Balkh. Two great battles were fought on separate 
days, and then Seyavash staged a successful infantry attack against the city’s 
gates. As the Persians poured into the city, Sepahram led the Turanian retreat 
back across the Oxus to Afrasyab. 


Seyavash Writes a Letter to His Father 

As soon as Seyavash and his army had entered Balkh, he ordered that a fitting 
letter, inscribed on silk, with ink compounded of musk, spices, and rose water, 
be written to the king. He began by thanking God from whom all victories 
proceed, who rules the sun and the revolving moon, who exalts kings’ crowns 
and thrones, who raises to glory and strikes down in sorrow whomsoever he 
wishes, and whose ways are beyond all human why or wherefore. Having 
invoked God’s blessings on his father, he continued: “By the grace and farr of 
the world’s king, I came to Balkh in high spirits and favored by fortune. We 
fought for three days and on the fourth, victory was ours; Sepahram has retreated 


to Termez, and Barman fled like an arrow shot from a bow. My troops occupy 
the countryside as far as the Oxus and the world submits to my glory. Now, if 
the king so orders me, I shall lead our army further and continue the war.” 
When this letter reached the Persian king he felt that his crown and throne 

had been elevated to the heavens, and he prayed to God that this young sapling 
of his should grow and bear ripe fruit. In his happiness he had an answer written 
as splendid as spring, as cheerful as paradise: “I pray to God who rules the sun 
and moon and maintains the world that he keep your heart happy and free from 
sorrow and disaster, and that victory, glory, and the crown accompany you 
forever. Impatient for battles of your own, armed with fortune, skill, and 
righteousness, you led off your army, although your lips still smelled of mother’s 
milk. May your body ever keep its skill and your heart always attain to its 
desires. But now that you have the upper hand, you should hold back somewhat. 
Make good use of the time you’ve gained; see that the army doesn’t scatter, 
fortify your camp: “This Turk you’re dealing with is sly and base, 

Malevolent, and of an evil race; 

He’s powerful, imagining that soon 

He’ll lift his head above the shining moon. 

Be in no hurry now for war; hold back, 

Let Afrasyab advance, let him attack; 

When once he’s crossed the Oxus he will see 

Carnage destroy his dreams of victory.” 


He set his seal to the letter and called for a messenger, ordering him to make all 
haste to Seyavash. When Seyavash saw his father’s missive, he kissed the 
ground and banished all thoughts of sorrow from his heart; he laughed and 
touched the letter to his head, took note of its contents, and in his heart felt only 
loyalty to its commands. 

But, for his part, the lion-warrior Garsivaz fled like wind-blown dust to the 
king of Turan, where bitterly and plainly he told him how Seyavash, aided by 
Rostam and an infinite army of famous fighters, had attacked Balkh. He said, 
“To each one of us there were fifty of them, armed with ox-headed maces, and 
their bowmen surged forward like a fire. The eagle does not fly as they flew. For 
three days and nights they fought, until our leaders and horses were exhausted, 
but when one of their side grew tired, he retired from the battle and rested, then 
returned with renewed vigor.” But Afrasyab leapt up like flame and screamed, 
“What’s all this babble about sleep and rest?” He glared at him as if he’d hack 


him in two, then yelled in fury and drove him from his presence. He gave orders 
that a thousand of his henchmen be summoned for festivities and that the plains 
of Soghdia shine with Chinese splendor. 


Afrasyab’s Dream 

Afrasyab passed the day with them in pleasure, but as the sun sank from sight, 
he hurried to his bed and tossed and turned there in the bedclothes. When one 
watch of the night had passed he trembled and cried out in his sleep, like a man 
delirious with fever. His servants ran to him in an uproar, and when Garsivaz 
heard that the light of the throne was dimmed, he hurried to the king’s 
bedchamber and saw him lying there sprawled in the dirt. He took him in his 
arms and said, “Come, tell your brother what has happened.” Afrasyab 
answered, “Don’t ask me, don’t say anything to me now; hold me tightly in your 
arms for a moment and let me gather my wits.” After a while he came back to 
himself and saw his chamber filled with lamenting retainers. Torches were 
brought and, shaking like a wind-blown tree, he was helped to his bed. Again 
Garsivaz questioned him: “Open your lips, tell us this wonder.” 

The great Afrasyab answered him thus: “May no one ever see such a dream 
again; I’ve never heard that any man, young or old, has passed such a night. In 
my dream I saw a plain filled with snakes, the world was choked with dust, and 
eagles thronged the sky. The ground was dry and parched, as though the heavens 
had never blessed it with rain. My pavilion was pitched to one side, and our 
wairiors stood around it. A dust storm sprang up and toppled my banner, and 
then on every side streams of blood began to flow; they swept away my tent, and 
my army that numbered over a thousand was mere lopped heads and sprawled 
bodies. Like a mighty wind, an army attacked from Iran; what lances they 
brandished, what bows! Every horseman had a head spitted on his lance and 
another head at his saddle; clothed in black, their lances couched, a hundred 
thousand of them charged my throne. They flung me from my seat and bound 
my arms behind me; I stared desperately around but saw none of my own people 
there. A haughty warrior dragged me before Kavus, and there on a shining 
throne sat a young man of no more than fourteen. When he saw me bound before 
him, he roared like a thunder cloud and hacked me in two with his sword. I 
screamed with the pain, and my screams awoke me.” 

Garsivaz said, “The king’s dream can only mean what his friends would want 
for him: you will attain to your heart’s desire and those who wish you ill will be 


destroyed. We need a wise, experienced dream interpreter; we should call our 
priests and astrologers to the court.” 

Wondering why they’d been summoned, a group appeared at court. Afrasyab 
had them enter, seated the most distinguished in the front, and chatted a little 
with each man. Then he said, “My wise, pure-hearted councilors, if I hear a word 
about this dream of mine from anyone in the world, I shall not leave a single 
head here on its body.” Then, to allay their fears, he distributed a great deal of 
gold and silver among them and described his dream to them. When the chief 
priest had heard the dream he was afraid and asked pardon of the king, saying, 
“Who among us could interpret this dream, unless the king promises to deal 
justly with us when we give him our opinion?” The king promised they would 
come to no harm, and an eloquent spokesman for the group began: “I will reveal 
the inner meaning of the king’s dream. A young prince accompanied by 
experienced councilors will lead a mighty and vigilant army here from Iran; the 
boy’s father has had his horoscope cast and it predicts that our country will be 
destroyed. If the king fights with Seyavash, the face of the world will turn 
crimson as brocade with the blood that’s shed; the Persians will not leave one 
Turk alive, and the king will regret giving battle. And if the young prince should 
be killed by the king, Turan will be left with no king to lead it, this land will be 
convulsed by a war of vengeance for Seyavash. Then you will recall these truths, 
when our land is ruined and depopulated; and, even if the king became a bird, he 
could not outsoar the turning heavens that look on us at times with fury, at times 
with favor.” 

When he heard this Afrasyab was alarmed and put all thoughts of war from 
his head; he told Garsivaz at length of the destruction that had been prophesied if 
he fought with Seyavash. He concluded, “Instead of looking for world dominion, 
I’ve no choice but to sue for peace. Ill send him gold, silver, crowns, thrones, 
and countless jewels, and I’ll withdraw from the territories they ceded before. 
Then perhaps this disaster can be averted and my tears will damp this fire down. 
If I can seel Fate’s eyes with gold, then the heavens may look favorably on me 
again. But we can only read what Fate has written; justice is whatever the 
heavens will for us.” 

At sunrise the country’s nobles came to court, wearing their diadems of office 
and with loyalty in their hearts. Having gathered together his wisest and most 
experienced men, Afrasyab addressed them: 


“In all my life, Fate’s given me no more 


Than battles, conflict, and unending war. 

How many from this noble company 

Have been destroyed in war because of me; 

How many gardens are now overgrown, 

How many cities sacked and overthrown, 

How many orchards fought through; far and wide 
My troops have scarred and scoured the countryside. 
And when the king’s unjust, goodness must flee, 
Hiding itself in stealth and secrecy; 

The wild ass suffers an untimely birth, 

And rivers fail and dry throughout the earth, 

The hawk’s squabs grow up blind, beasts’ teats turn dry, 
The musk-deer makes no musk to know him by; 
Righteousness flees from crookedness in fear, 

On all sides dearth and misery appear. 

But tired now of the evil ways I trod, 

I long to trace the virtuous paths of God; 

In place of sorrow, pain, and enmity, 

I'll nourish knowledge, justice, amity; 

Through me the world will be at rest; no more 
Will death surprise us, and untimely war. 

Tran and wide Turan are mine by right, 

How many kings pay tribute to my might! 

If you agree hostilities should cease, 

I'll write to Rostam now, proposing peace; 

To Seyavash I’ll send rich tokens of 

My hopes for harmony and mutual love.” 


One by one his councilors agreed to peace and reconciliation, saying that he was 
their king and they his slaves. When they had left, Afrasyab turned to Garsivaz 
and said, “Make ready for the road, don’t waste words; choose two hundred 
watriors and prepare gifts for Seyavash: Arab horses with golden saddles, Indian 
swords with silver scabbards, a gem-encrusted crown, a hundred camel-loads of 
carpets, two hundred slave girls and as many boys. Tell him we’ve no quarrel 
with him, that we make no claim on Iran. Say, ‘We accept that Soghdia, the land 
as far as the Oxus, is ours; thus it has been since the time of Salm and Tur, when 
all the world was turned upside down and the innocent Iraj was slain. I pray that 


God will grant us peace and happiness, that your good fortune will bring peace 
to the world, and that war and evil will disappear. You are a king yourself; speak 
to the king of Iran, see if you can soften his warlike ways.’ Flatter Rostam, take 
him slaves and horses with golden bridles, load him with gifts so that our plan is 
successful, but, as he’s not a king, don’t present him with a golden throne.” 

When Garsivaz had gathered the gifts together, they made a splendid show. 
He hurried to the Oxus and sent a nobleman ahead to Balkh to announce his 
coming. As soon as Seyavash heard of Garsivaz’s approach, he consulted with 
Rostam as to what should be done. 

Garsivaz arrived and Seyavash commanded that he be admitted to the court; 
seeing him, he stood, smiled, and asked his pardon. Garsivaz paused at a 
distance and kissed the ground; shame was apparent in his face, and his heart 
was filled with fear. Seyavash motioned him to a place near the throne and asked 
after Afrasyab. Garsivaz sat and took stock of the prince’s splendor and then 
addressed Rostam, “When Afrasyab heard of your coming, he sent me here with 
a trifling present for Seyavash.” He signaled that the gifts be paraded before 
Seyavash; the road from the city gates to the court was thronged with the slaves 
and valuables he’d brought, and no one could reckon their value. Seyavash was 
well pleased with what he saw and he listened to Afrasyab’s proposals. The wary 
Garsivaz kissed the ground, made his obeisance, and left the court. 

Rostam said, “We should entertain him for a week before we give an answer. 
We must think carefully and consult with others.” A house was fitted up for 
Garsivaz and stewards sent to look after him, while Seyavash and Rostam turned 
the proposal over at length. Rostam was suspicious of the speed with which 
Garsivaz had come and, as was prudent, had scouts posted to keep an eye on the 
approaches. Seyavash questioned him, then said, “We have to get to the bottom 
of why they are seeking peace; what’s the best antidote for a poison like him? 
Who are his closest kin? If he were to send a hundred of his warrior relatives 
here as hostages, that would show us his real objectives. God forbid he’s holding 
back simply out of fear, and that under this show of good intentions he’s actually 
beating his war drums. Once we’ve arranged all this we should send someone to 
my father Kavus to persuade him to give up his dream of vengeance.” Rostam 
agreed, “You’re right; this is the only way to conclude the treaty.” 

At dawn the next day Garsivaz appeared at court, belted and crowned as was 
appropriate; he kissed the ground before Seyavash and greeted the prince. 
Seyavash said, “I have been weighing your words and deeds carefully; the two 
of us agree that we should wash all thoughts of vengeance from our hearts. Take 


this answer to Afrasyab: ‘If you are plotting an attack on us, know that he who 
sees the ends of evil should refrain from evil and that a heart adorned with 
wisdom is a priceless treasure. If there is no poison hiding in this draught you 
offer, if malevolence has no place in your heart, then let Rostam choose a 
hundred of your kin, whose names will be given to you; you will send these men 
to me as guarantors of your good faith. Further, you will evacuate those Iranian 
towns you occupy, withdraw to Turan, and cease to plan for war. There should 
be only righteousness between us; I for my part will not prepare for war, and I 
shall send a letter to King Kavus advising him to recall our armies.’” 

Garsivaz dispatched a horseman, saying, “Gallop to Afrasyab and don’t pause 
for sleep on the way; tell him that I’ve accomplished all he wished for, but that 
Seyavash demands hostages before he’!l renounce this war.” When the message 
was delivered, Afrasyab writhed inwardly, uncertain what he should do. He 
communed with himself: “If I’m to be deprived of a hundred of my own kindred, 
my court’s power will be broken, there’!l be no one left here who has my well- 
being at heart; but if I refuse him these hostages, he’ II think all I’ve said is a lie. I 
shall have to send them if he won’t agree to any other terms.” He counted off a 
hundred of his kinsmen, according to the list drawn up by Rostam, presented 
them with gifts and robes of state, and sent them to the Persian prince. 

Then he gave orders that the drums and trumpets be sounded; the royal 
pavilion was dismantled and his army evacuated Bokhara, Soghd, Samarkand, 
Chaj, and Sepanjab, moving toward Gang without excuses or delay. When 
Rostam learned of their withdrawal he ceased to worry; he hurried to Seyavash, 
told him what he’d heard, and said, “Since things have turned out well, Garsivaz 
should be allowed to return.” Orders were given that a robe of honor be prepared 
and that weapons, a crown, and a belt, together with an Arab horse with a golden 
bridle and an Indian sword in a silver scabbard, be brought. When Garsivaz saw 
the prince’s gifts, he seemed as astonished as a man might be who saw the moon 
descend to the earth. He left full of praises for the prince, and his feet seemed to 
skim the ground in gratitude. 

Seyavash sat on his ivory throne, the crown suspended above him. He 
searched his mind for someone eloquent, who could give words persuasive 
force; he needed some nobleman from the army who would get on well with 
Kavus. Rostam said to him, “Who is going to dare open his mouth about such a 
subject? Kavus is as he always was, his anger is always there, neither less nor 
more. All I can suggest is that I go to him; I’d split the earth open if you ordered 


me to, and I think only good can come of my mission.” Seyavash was overjoyed 
at his words and gave up all thoughts of looking for another messenger. 


Seyavash Writes a Letter to Kavus 

The prince and Rostam sat down together and talked at length. Seyavash 
summoned a scribe, and a letter was written on silk. He began by praising God 
who had given him victory and glory, whose orders none can evade, the Lord of 
wealth and dearth, Creator of the sun and the moon, Bestower of the crown and 
throne, who knows all good and evil. The letter continued: “I reached Balkh 
rejoicing in my fate, and when Afrasyab heard of my coming the clear water in 
his goblet turned to pitch. He knew that difficulties hemmed him in, that his 
world was darkened and his luck at an end. His brother came offering me wealth 
and beautiful slaves, begging the king of the world for peace, and resigning 
authority to him. He promised to keep to his own territories, to leave Iran’s soil, 
and to harbor in his heart no thoughts of war. He sent a hundred of his relatives 
to me as guarantors of his word. Rostam comes to you asking that you pardon 
him, since he is worthy of our kindness.” Rostam set off for the king with a 
contingent of men, his banner fluttering overhead. 

For his part Garsivaz returned to the king of Turan and told him of Seyavash, 
saying, “As a prince he has no equal for handsomeness or nobility of action, for 
intelligence or kindness or dignity or eloquence; he’s brave, speaks well, is a 
good horseman, and he and wisdom are like old companions.” The king laughed 
and said, “Policy beats warfare, then, my brother! I was disturbed by that 
nightmare I had, which is why I looked for some way out of this. Well, I’ve 
accomplished what I wanted with gold and treasure.” 

Meanwhile Rostam reached the king of Iran’s court. As he entered, Kavus 
descended from the throne and embraced him, asking after his son and their 
battles and wanting to known why Rostam had returned. Rostam began by 
praising Seyavash, then handed over the letter. While the secretary was reading 
it to him Kavus’s face grew black as pitch and he turned on Rostam: “He’s 
young, I know, and has seen nothing of the world’s evil, but you, who have no 
equal in the world, whom all great warriors long to match themselves against, 
haven’t you seen Afrasyab’s wickedness, and how he has deprived me of rest 
and sleep? I should have gone, I longed to fight with him, but they told me not 
to, saying I should let the young prince manage things. And where God’s 
punishment was called for, you let yourselves be beguiled by wealth he’s looted 
from the innocent and by a hundred misbegotten Turks, bastards whose fathers 


no one can name. What does he care about such hostages? They’re water under 
the bridge to him. But if you’ve taken leave of your senses, I’m not tired of 
warfare yet: I’ll send someone resourceful to Seyavash, tell him to burn 
Afrasyab’s presents and to send the hostages in shackles here, where I'll hack 
their heads off. And as for you, you must lead your army into enemy territory 
where, like wolves, they’re to plunder all they find until Afrasyab comes out to 
fight you.” 

Rostam replied, “My lord, don’t upset yourself about this, but listen to me for 
a moment. The world is now subservient to you, and you yourself advised the 
prince not to advance across the Oxus, but to wait for Afrasyab to attack. And so 
we waited, but he sued for peace. It’s not right to attack someone who’s looking 
for peace and reconciliation. And the righteous will not look kindly on someone 
who breaks his oath. Seyavash fought like a fearless leopard, and what else was 
he fighting for but the crown and throne, wealth and security, and our homeland 
Iran? He has gained all these, and there is no point in wildly looking for war 
now; don’t darken your bright heart with such muddied notions. If Afrasyab 
reneges on his promises, then we can fight; we’re not tired of battle, and that will 
be the time for swords and warfare. Don’t ask your son to break his oath; lies do 
not become the crown. I tell you plainly, Seyavash will not go back on his word 
and he would be horrified to know what you’re planning.” 

Then Kavus started up, glaring at Rostam in fury, and said, “So everything 
comes out now, does it? So it was you who put these thoughts in his head, you 
who tore the desire for vengeance from his heart? You only looked for your own 
ease and comfort in all this, not for the glory of our crown and throne. You stay 
here; Tus is the one to strap war drums on his elephants and complete this 
business. I’ll send a messenger to Balkh, and the message he takes will be a 
bitter one. If Seyavash can’t agree to my commands, then he’s to resign 
command of the army to Tus and return here with his companions, and I’ 11 deal 
with him as he deserves.” 

Rostam was enraged and replied, “The heavens themselves don’t lord it over 
me; if you think Tus a better warrior than Rostam, you’|! learn soon enough how 
rare men like Rostam are.” And he stormed from the king’s presence with hatred 
in his heart, his face flushed with anger. Kavus immediately summoned Tus and 
ordered him to set out. Tus had drums and trumpets sounded to muster the army 
for the journey. 


Kay Kavus’s Answer to Seyavash 


Kavus summoned a scribe and had him sit beside him. He dictated a letter full of 
belligerent, angry words. Having praised the God of war and peace, Lord of the 
planets Mars and Saturn and of the moon, Creator of good and evil and of kingly 
glory, he went on: “Young man, rejoicing in your strength and fortune, may the 
crown and throne be yours forever. If you have neglected my commands, it’s 
because the sleep of youth has beguiled you. You’ve heard what this enemy did 
to Iran when he beat us in battle. Now is no time for you to fall for his wiles; if 
you don’t want fortune to forsake you, don’t push your young head into his trap. 
Send these hostages you’ve secured here, to my court; it’s no surprise if he’s 
deceived you, he’s done it to me often enough, persuading me by his glozing 
words to call off my attacks. I said nothing about a truce, and you’ve disobeyed 
my orders, enjoying yourself with pretty girls instead of getting on with the war. 
And as for Rostam, he can’t get enough of gifts and riches. But it’s conquest by 
the sword that you should depend on, it’s conquered land that gives a king glory. 
When Tus arrives he’!l sort out your affairs. You’re immediately to load the 
hostages with chains and mount them on donkeys. Fate won’t look kindly on this 
truce of yours; when the news spreads in Iran, it’ cause an uproar. Get on with 
your task of vengeance; attack by night and make a second Oxus of their blood. 
Then Afrasyab won’t stay sleeping long; he’Il advance to give battle. But if you 
feel sorry for that devil incarnate, if you don’t want to break your word to him 
and have no stomach for war, then hand the army over to Tus and get yourself 
back here.” 

When Seyavash received the message and saw its graceless language, he 
called over the courier, who told him how Rostam had been received, and about 
Tus and Kavus’s rage. Seyavash was saddened to hear of the treatment meted 
out to Rostam, and he fell to brooding on his father’s actions, on the day of 
battle, and on the Turkish hostages. He said: 


“A hundred noble knights, all innocent, 

Of royal lineage: and if they’re sent 

To King Kavus he’Il neither ask nor care 
About their lives, but hang them then and there. 


And what excuse can I then bring before God? The world hems me in with 
evil: if I make war on the king of Turan, God and my own men will condemn 
me; and if I hand over the army to Tus and return to Kavus, evil will come to me 
from him, too. I see evil to the left and to the right, and evil ahead of me. 


Sudabeh has brought me nothing but evil, and I don’t know what else God has in 
store for me.” 

He summoned two noblemen from the army, Bahram and Zangeh, cleared his 
tent of everyone else, and sat them down. He told them what had happened to 
Rostam and went on, “Countless evils surround me; the king’s kind heart was 
like a leafy tree bestowing shade and fruit, but everything was tumed to poison 
when Sudabeh deceived him. His harem became my prison, and my life’s 
laughter turned to misery; the fruit of her lust was the fire I passed through. I 
chose war as a means of escape from her clutches. And when we came to Balkh 
and defeated the enemy, they retreated from our land and sent us presents and 
hostages. Our priests advised us to turn aside from war, as we had secured all we 
had fought for and there was no point in shedding more blood. I will not order 
further fighting, since I fear to break my oath. Disobedience to God is 
contemptible, and if I turn from righteousness, I shall forfeit both this world and 
the world to come; I shall be as Ahriman would wish. And, if I fight, who knows 
to which side Fate will give the victory? Would that my mother had never borne 
me, or that in being born I had died; my fate is like a massive tree whose fruit is 
poison and whose leaves are sorrow. I have sworn a binding oath before God 
and if I break it disaster will erupt on every side. The whole world knows I have 
made peace with the king of Turan; everyone will revile me, and I shall deserve 
it. And how can God look kindly on me if I turn again to vengeance, cut myself 
off from the ways of faith, and flout the laws of earth and heaven? I shall leave 
this place and seek out somewhere where my name will be hidden from Kavus; 
but may all be as God wills. Zangeh, I ask you to undertake a heavy 
responsibility; go quickly to Afrasyab’s court and return to him the hostages and 
presents he has given us. Tell him what has happened.” And to Bahram he said, 
“T leave our armies, elephants, and war drums, together with this frontier area, 
under your command. Wait till Tus comes and then hand everything over to him; 
count out to him all the treasure, every crown and throne, item by item.” 

Bahram’s heart was wrung with sympathy for his commander’s pain; 
violently he wept and cursed the country of Hamaveran. The two noblemen sat 
grief-stricken, then Bahram said, “This is not the way forward; without your 
father there is no place for you in all the world. Write the king another letter, ask 
for Rostam back. If he tells you to fight, fight. Best not to bandy words with 
him; there’s no shame in apologizing to your father. We’ll wage war as he 
commands us to; don’t brood on this, flattery will bring him round. The crown 


and throne, the army and court, all will be useless without you. The king’s brain 
is like a brazier filled with coals, and all his plans and wars are mere folly.” 

But Seyavash could not accept their advice, since the heavens secretly willed 
another fate for him. He answered them: “The king’s command transcends the 
sun and moon for me, but neither commoner nor noble, neither lion nor 
mammoth, can oppose God; a man who disobeys God’s commands abandons 
himself to bewilderment. I can neither plunge these two countries into warfare 
again nor go back to the king with his orders neglected and there face his wrath 
and disappointment. If you are alarmed at my orders, ignore them; I shall be my 
own messenger and leave this encampment.” 

Hearing this, the warrior’s hearts failed within them; as if seared by fire they 
wept at the prospect of separation from their commander, fearing what fate held 
in store for him. Zangeh replied, “We are your slaves, sworn to serve you, 
faithful unto death.” Seyavash said, “Go to Turan’s commander and tell him 
what has happened to me; say that this truce has meant sweetness for him, but 
only pain and poison for me. Say that I will not break the oath I swore to him, 
and that if this means I am to be exiled from the throne, then God is my refuge, 
the earth will be my throne and the heavens my crown. Tell him I cannot go 
back to my father. Ask him to allow me free passage through his territories, to 
wherever God wills I should wander. I shall seek out some distant country where 
my name will remain hidden from Kavus, where I shall not have to hear his 
reproaches and can rest awhile from his fury.” 


Zangeh’s Mission to Afrasyab 
Taking a hundred warriors as escort, Zangeh reached the Turkish king’s capital. 
As he approached, Afrasyab rose from the throne, embraced him, and made 
much of him. When the two were seated Zangeh handed over a letter and 
repeated all he had been told. Afrasyab’s heart was wrung by what he read and 
heard, and his head whirled with confused notions. He had Zangeh billeted 
according to his rank and then summoned Piran. Clearing the court, he shared 
with him Kavus’s childish talk, which showed his evil character and his plans for 
war. As Afrasyab spoke his face clouded with anxiety; worry and sympathy for 
Seyavash filled his heart. “What,” he asked, “is the remedy for all this’? What 
would it be best for us to do?” 

Piran replied, “May you live forever, my lord. In all matters you are wiser 
than I am, and more able to carry out what must be done. But this is my opinion: 
whoever has the opportunity to help this prince, either secretly or openly, either 


by giving him wealth or taking pains on his behalf, should do so. I’ve heard that 
in stature, sense, dignity, chivalry, and all that’s fitting for a prince, there’s no 
nobleman in all the world who is his equal. But seeing is better than hearing, and 
we have seen how nobly he acted over the hundred hostages he held, opposing 
his father on their behalf. He’s cast aside hopes of the crown and throne and is 
turning to you for help. It would not be wise or right, my lord, to let him simply 
pass through our territories; our noblemen would blame you for this and you 
would sadden the prince. And then consider, Kavus is old, he cannot reign for 
much longer; Seyavash is young, he possesses the royal farr, and he will soon 
inherit the throne. If my lord acts wisely in this matter he will write to Seyavash 
welcoming him as a father would. Give him a place in this country, offer him 
respect and kindness; marry one of your daughters to him, treat him with honor 
and dignity. If he stays here with you, it will bring peace to your land, and if he 
returns to his father Fate will look kindly on you. Iran’s king will be grateful to 
you and the world’s noblemen will praise you. If Fate brings Seyavash here, our 
two countries will rest from warfare, as the world’s creator would wish.” 

When Turan’s commander had heard Piran out and looked at the facts, he 
brooded for a while, weighing what should be done. Then he said, “Your advice 
pleases me; no one in the world has your experience and wisdom. But there’s a 
proverb that seems apposite here: 


Bring up a little lion cub, and you 

Will be rewarded when his teeth show through; 
Forgetting all the kindness he’s been shown 

He’ll maul his master when his claws have grown.” 


But Piran said, “May the king look at this matter wisely: will a man display 
his father’s bad qualities when he has opposed those very qualities? Don’t you 
see that Kavus’s days are numbered, and that this being so, he must die soon? 
Then with no trouble at all Seyavash will inherit his country and its treasures and 
glory; our country and his, and their crowns and thrones, will then be yours. And 
is this not the height of good fortune?” 


Afrasyab’s Answer to Seyavash 

Hearing this, Afrasyab took a wise decision and called in an experienced scribe. 
He began his letter with praise of the world’s creator and continued: “May this 
God bless the prince, lord of the mace and sword and helmet, who is righteous 


and who fears God, in whose soul there is no injustice or crookedness. I have 
received Zangeh’s message, and my heart is grieved at your king’s treatment of 
you. But what else does a fortunate man seek for in the world than a crown and 
throne? And these you have; all of Turan will do your bidding, and I feel the 
need of your kindness. You’!l be my son and I will be like a father to you, a 
father who seeks to serve his son. Kavus has never shown you the kindness I 
will; I’ll open my treasury to you, assign you a throne, and keep you as my own 
child so that you will be a remembrance of me in the world when I am gone. If I 
let you pass through my kingdom, commoners and nobles alike will condemn 
me, and you will find the going hard beyond my borders, unless you have 
supernatural powers. You’ll see no land there and will have to cross the Sea of 
China. But God has made this unnecessary for you; stay here and live at ease; 
my army, territories, and wealth are at your disposal. And you won’t have to 
search for excuses to leave: when you and your father are reconciled, I’ll load 
you with presents and willingly send you on your way to Iran. You won’t be at 
odds with your father for long; he is old and will soon grow tired of his 
differences with you. Once a man reaches sixty-five the fire of anger begins to 
fail in him. Iran and all its wealth will be yours. I have accepted God’s command 
that I succor you, and no harm will come to you from me.” 

Afrasyab sealed the letter and, having given Zangeh gifts of gold and silver, a 
splendid cloak, and a horse with a gold-worked saddle, he sent him on his way to 
Seyavash. Zangeh reported to his prince what he had seen and heard, and 
Seyavash rejoiced at this, but at the same time his heart was filled with sorrow 
and anxiety that he had to make a friend of his enemy, since when did cooling 
breezes ever blow from a raging fire? He wrote to his father, saying, “Despite 
my youth I have always acted wisely, and the king’s anger against me grieves 
my heart. His harem was the cause of my first sorrow, making me traverse a 
mountain of fire, and in my trial the wild deer wept for me. To escape such 
shame I set out for war, riding confidently against its monstrous claws. Two 
countries rejoiced at the peace I fashioned, but the king’s heart hardened against 
me like steel. Nothing I did pleased him, and since he is sick of the sight of me, I 
shall not stay in his presence. May happiness always inhabit his heart, while 
sorrow drives me to the dragon’s maw. I do not know what will become of this, 
or what secrets of good and ill the heavens hold in store for me.” 

Next he gave orders to Bahram: “Keep your fame bright in the world; I hand 
over to you my crown and royal pavilion, the wealth I’ve levied, and the throne, 
our banners, cavalry, elephants, and war drums. When the commander Tus 


arrives, hand them over to him just as you’ve received them.” He selected three 
hundred horsemen for his own use, together with a quantity of coins, jewels, and 
armor. Then he summoned his officers and addressed them: “Piran, sent by 
Afrasyab, has already crossed to our side of the Oxus. He bears a secret message 
for me, and I shall go out to welcome him. You must remain here; you are to 
regard Bahram as your leader and to obey his orders.” The warriors kissed the 
ground before Seyavash. 


Seyavash Travels from Iran to Turkestan 

As the sun set, and the air grew dark and the world forbidding, Seyavash led his 
men toward the Oxus, his face obscured by tears. At Termez the streets and roofs 
were decorated to welcome him, so that spring with all its tints and scents 
seemed to have come, and each of the towns they passed through seemed like a 
bride arrayed in splendor. At Qajqar he dismounted and rested for a while. When 
news of his approach arrived, Piran chose a thousand knights and rode out to 
welcome him, taking as a gift four richly caparisoned white elephants and a 
hundred horses with gold-worked saddles. As soon as Seyavash saw his banners 
and heard the elephants’ trumpeting he hurried toward him. The two embraced 
and Seyavash said, “Why have you troubled yourself by travelling like this? My 
only hope has been to see you alive and well.” Piran kissed his head and feet and 
his handsome face and gave thanks to God, saying, “O Lord of what is hidden 
and what is plain, if I had seen such a man in a dream it would have restored my 
youth to me.” To Seyavash he said, “I praise God that I see you before me as 
clearly as the daylight. Afrasyab will be like a father to you, and all on our side 
of the Oxus are as your slaves. I have over a thousand henchmen who are yours 
to command, and if you can accept an old man’s service, I stand ready to obey 


3” 


you. 


The two rode forward then, their cheerful chat 
Wandering at random over this and that; 

The towns they passed were filled with music’s sound, 
And scattered musk and gold obscured the ground. 
But seeing this, the prince’s eyes grew dim, 

Old, melancholy memories troubled him; 

His heart recalled great Rostam’s land, Zabol, 

The grandeur and the beauty of Kabol— 

Then all Iran beset him, place by place, 


He blushed for shame and turned away his face; 
But wise Piran saw all his misery 
And bit his lip in pain and sympathy. 


They rested a while and, gazing in wonder at him, Piran said, “You seem like 
one of the ancient kings. You’ve three qualities which together make you 
unique: first, that you’re of the seed of Kay Qobad; another, that you speak so 
honestly and eloquently; and third, that your countenance radiates grace.” 
Seyavash replied, “You are renowned throughout the world for your good faith 
and kindness, for your hatred of evil and Ahriman; swear to me now and I know 
you will not break your word. If my presence here is good, I should not weep; 
but if it is not good, then tell me, show me the way to another country.” Piran 
said, “Don’t dwell on the fact that you’ve left Iran; trust to Afrasyab’s kindness 
and be in no hurry to leave us. His reputation is bad in the world, but this is 
undeserved; he’s a God-fearing man. He’s wise and cautious in his councils and 
is not given to making hasty, harmful decisions. I’m related to him, and I’m both 
his champion and adviser. In this land over a hundred thousand horsemen are 
mine to command; twelve thousand are from my own tribe and, if I wish, will 
wait on me day and night. I’ve weapons, territory, flocks of sheep, and much 
more in reserve; I can live independently of everyone. All that I have I place at 
your disposal if you will agree to live here. I’ve accepted you as a trust from 
God, and I shall let no harm come to you; though no one knows what Fate holds 
in store for him.” Seyavash was comforted by these words; his spirits revived 
and they sat to their wine, Piran as a father, Seyavash as his son. 

Cheerful and laughing, they pressed on to Gang, a beautiful site where the 
Turkish monarch held court. Afrasyab came rushing out on foot to greet them, 
and as soon as he saw the king approaching, Seyavash dismounted and ran 
forward. They embraced, kissing each other’s eyes and head, and Afrasyab said, 
“The world’s evil sleeps. From now on neither revolt nor war will break out; the 
leopard and the lamb will share one watering place. Brave Tur set the world in a 
turmoil, but now our countries are tired of war. They have fought for too long, 
blind to the ways of peace; through you we shall rest from battles and the 
longing for blood-revenge. The land of Turan is your slave, the hearts of all here 
are full of love for you. All I have, my body and my soul, are yours. May you 
live healthily and happily here; all our treasures are yours. I will treat you with a 
father’s love and always smile upon you.” 


Seyavash replied, “May your lineage never forfeit its good fortune.” Then 
Afrasyab took Seyavash’s hand, led him to the throne, and sat down. He gazed at 
Seyavash’s face and said, “I know of nothing like this in all the earth. In the 
world men are not like this, with such a face, such stature, such royal farr.” And 
turning to Piran he said, “Kavus is old and sadly wanting in wisdom if he can 
give up such a noble and accomplished son.” 

Afrasyab had one of his palaces set aside for his guest; it was spread with 
gold-worked carpets, and a golden throne with legs fashioned like the heads of 
buffalo was placed there. The walls were hung with Chinese brocade, and a 
multitude of servants was assigned to it. Seyavash entered, and its arch seemed 
to touch the heavens; he sat on the throne lost in thought until a servant called 
him to dine with the king. The meal passed in pleasantries, and then the courtiers 
sat to their wine while musicians played in the background. Afrasyab pledged 
his heart to Seyavash and swore he’d know no rest without him. They drank till 
darkness fell; by the time everyone was tipsy Seyavash had forgotten about Iran, 
and in this drunken state he returned to his own quarters. Afrasyab said to his 
son Shideh, “Take some of our nobles at dawn to Seyavash, as he’s waking up, 
and have them present him with gifts—slaves, fine horses, gold-worked boots— 
and have the army take him cash and jewels. Do this in a dignified, becoming 
way.” The king himself sent many more gifts, and so a week passed by. 


Seyavash Displays His Skills Before Afrasyab 

One evening the king said to Seyavash, “Let’s get up at dawn tomorrow and 
enjoy ourselves at polo; I’ve heard that when you play, your mallet’s invincible.” 
Seyavash agreed and the next morning they made their way laughing and joking 
to the field, where the king suggested they divide up their companions, with 
Seyavash heading one team and he the other. But Seyavash said, “I can’t be your 
rival, choose some other opponent and let me ride on your side, if you think I’m 
good enough.” Afrasyab was pleased by this and thought everyone else’s 
remarks mere chaff in the wind by comparison. Nevertheless he insisted, “By the 
head and soul of Kavus, you’re to play against me; and see you do well, so that 
no one says I’ve made a bad choice for an opponent.” Seyavash replied, “I and 
all the warriors here, and the game itself, are yours to command.” For himself 
the king selected Golbad, Garsivaz, Jahan, Pulad, Piran, Nastihan, and Human, 
who was known for being able to scoop the ball from water. To Seyavash’s side 
he sent some of his own henchmen, including Ruin and the famous Shideh, 
Andariman, who was a great horseman, and Ukhast, who was like a lion in 


battle. But Seyavash said, “Which of these men is going to try for the ball? They 
all belong to the king, and I’ll be the only one playing on my side. If you’! allow 
me, I’ll choose some of my own men.” The king agreed and Seyavash selected 
seven Iranians who were worthy of the honor. 

At the field’s edge drums thundered out, cymbals clashed, and trumpets 
blared. The ground seemed to shake with the din, and dust rose into the sky as 
the horsemen took the field. The king struck the ball up toward the clouds; 
Seyavash urged his horse forward and before it touched the ground he smote the 
ball so hard that it disappeared from sight. Afrasyab ordered another ball to be 
tapped toward Seyavash; the prince lifted it to his lips and the sound of trumpets 
and drums rang out. Then he mounted a fresh horse, tossed the ball into the air, 
and hit it such a blow with his mallet that it seemed to rise to the moon’s sphere, 
as if the sky had swallowed it. The king laughed out loud, and his nobles were 
startled enough to exclaim, “We’ve never seen a horseman with such skills.” 
Afrasyab said, “This is how a man who has God’s farr is!” 

A royal pavilion had been erected at the field’s edge and there Seyavash sat 
with the king, who gazed happily at his princely guest. Then he called to the 
warriors, “The field, mallets, and balls are yours!” The two sides fell to, and dust 
rose up, obscuring the sun. The Turks strove hard to get possession, but without 
success; Seyavash was alarmed by the Persians’ behavior and called out in 
Pahlavi, “This is a playing field, not a battlefield for you to be raging and 
struggling like this; give way, and let them have the ball for once.” The Persians 
let their reins go slack and stopped encouraging their horses. The Turks struck 
the ball and rushed forward like fire. When Afrasyab heard the Turks’ shout of 
triumph he realized what that sentence in Pahlavi had meant. He said to 
Seyavash, “I’ve been told that you have no equal as a bowman.” Seyavash drew 
his Kayanid bow from its casing and Afrasyab asked to look at it and have one 
of his men test it. He praised it highly and handed it to Garsivaz, ordering him to 
string it. Garsivaz struggled to notch the string, but to his chagrin was unable to. 
Seyavash took the bow from him, knelt, bent back the shaft and strung it. The 
king laughed and said, “Now that’s the kind of bow a man needs; when I was 
young I had one just like that, but times have changed. There’s not another man 
in Iran or Turan who could manage this bow in battle, but Seyavash with his 
great chest and shoulders wouldn’t have any other.” 

A target was set up at the end of the lists; without saying a word to anyone 
Seyavash mounted his horse, yelled his war cry, and galloped forward; one 
arrow struck the center of the target and, as the warriors watched, he notched 


another (made of poplar wood, with four feathers) to the string and in the same 
charge again transfixed the target. Gripping the reins in his right hand he 
wheeled around and once again sent an arrow home. Then he slipped the bow 
over his arm, rode back to the king, and dismounted before him. The king stood 
and called down blessings on him, and the two made their way happily back to 
the palace. 

They sat to food and wine, accompanied by courtiers worthy of the honor, 
and after a few draughts had been downed and the company was growing merry 
they toasted Seyavash. While they were still feasting Afrasyab conferred a 
splendid robe on Seyavash, a horse with all its trappings, a sword and diadem, 
clothes and a quantity of uncut cloth the like of which no one had ever seen, 
silks, purses stuffed with coins, turquoises, male and female slaves, and a goblet 
filled with rubies. He ordered that all this be counted out and then conveyed to 
Seyavash’s palace. He commanded his kinsmen to think of themselves as a flock 
of which Seyavash was the shepherd. Then he turned to the prince and said, “We 
must go hunting together; we’ll enjoy ourselves, and the hunt will put sad 
thoughts out of our minds.” Seyavash said, “Whenever and wherever you wish.” 

And so one day, accompanied by a group of Turkish and Persian warriors, 
they started out with cheetahs and hawks for the hunt. Seyavash spied a wild ass 
on the plain and left the group behind as he set off like the wind in pursuit. His 
reins grew light, his stirrups heavy, as he galloped forward over the rough 
terrain. He caught up with the ass and slashed it in two with his sword; the two 
halves were absolutely equal in weight (as if his hands were a balance and the 
ass weighed silver) and when the king’s companions saw this they exclaimed, 
“Here is a swordsman worthy of the name!” But to one another they murmured, 
“An evil has come to us from Iran. Our leader is put to shame by him; we should 
oppose the king in this.” Seyavash rode on through gullies, over mountains and 
across the plain, bringing down prey with arrows, sword, and lance, piling up 
carcasses everywhere, until the group was sated with hunting and made its way 
cheerfully back to the king’s palace. 

Whether in good spirits or gloomy, the king wished to be with no one but 
Seyavash; he took pleasure in his company alone, no longer admitting Garsivaz 
and Jahan into his confidence. Day and night he spent with Seyavash, and it was 
Seyavash who was always able to bring a smile to his lips. In this way, with all 
its mingled joy and grief, a year went by. 


Piran’s Advice to Seyavash and to Afrasyab 


Seyavash and Piran were sitting one day, chatting of this and that, when Piran 
said, “You’re like a man who’s only passing through this country; what will 
remain of Afrasyab’s kindness to you when you die? 


You’re now the close companion of our king, 
As loved by him as pleasure is in spring, 
And you’re Kavus’s son—your glory here 
Has raised you to the moon’s auspicious sphere, 
And this is where you ought to lead your life. 
But you’ve no brothers here, no kin, no wife, 
You’re like a solitary flower beside 

An empty field; you need to choose a bride. 
Forget Iran, its sorrows and its wars; 

When once Kavus has died, Iran is yours. 
Here in the royal castle’s women’s quarters 
The king has three incomparable daughters, 
And Garsivaz’s household boasts of three 
Descended from a noble ancestry, 

And I myself have four girls, each of whom 
Will be your slave if you will be her groom. 
But best would be if you can marry one 

Of Afrasyab’s girls; you will be his son. 

The finest of them’s Farigis, whose grace 
Knows no competitor in any place; 

She’s tall and slender as a cypress tree, 

Her hair’s a musky crown; you’ll never see 
A woman more accomplished or more wise. 
If you should wish to gain this noble prize 
I'll be your messenger and go-between 

To ask the king if she can be your queen.” 


Seyavash gazed at Piran and said, “What God wills cannot stay unfulfilled; if 
this is heaven’s course, then I cannot oppose it. If I’m not to reach Iran again, or 
see Kavus’s face again, or that of the great Rostam who brought me up, or 
Bahram’s or Zangeh’s, or the faces of any of our warriors, then I must choose a 
home here in Turan. Be as a father to me and arrange this marriage, but keep it 
secret for now.” Having said this, he sighed repeatedly, and his eyelashes 


glistened with tears. Piran replied, “A wise man doesn’t fight with Fate; if you 
once had friends in Iran, you’ve entrusted them to God and left them behind. 
Your home is here now.” 

Piran bustled off to the court and waited for a while near the throne until 
Afrasyab said, “Why are you standing here? What’s on your mind? My army 
and wealth are at your disposal, and if I’ve some prisoner whose release will be 
dangerous for me, II] set him free if you should ask. Now, what do you want 
from me?” 

The wise councilor answered, “May you live for ever; I’ve all the wealth and 
power I need. I bring a secret message from Seyavash. He says to you, ‘I am 
grateful for the fatherly welcome you have given me here; now I need you to 
arrange a marriage for me. You have a daughter called Farigis, and I should be 
honored if I were considered worthy of her.’” Afrasyab grew pensive and 
replied, “I’ve gone through this before and you didn’t agree with me. A man 
who nourishes a lion cub will regret it once the lion’s grown. And astrologers 
have predicted that the union of these two will produce a prince who will 
conquer the world and destroy Turan; the first crown he will seize will be mine: 
Why should I plant a tree whose bitter root 

Will only serve to nourish poisoned fruit? 


A child that comes from Kavus and Afrasyab will mingle fire and flood; how 
can I know whether he will look kindly on Turan? And if he favors Iran, then it 
will be as if I’ve purposefully taken poison. A man doesn’t deliberately pick a 
snake up by the tail. As long as he’s here I’1l treat him like a brother, but that’s 
all.” 

Piran said, “Any child of Seyavash will be wise and good-natured. Pay no 
attention to what astrologers say; arrange matters for Seyavash. A prince of our 
two peoples will be lord of both Iran and Turan, and both countries will be at 
peace after long warfare. There can be no more splendid lineage than that of 
Feraydun and Kay Qobad. And, if heaven has another fate in store for us, 
thinking will not change it. This is a splendid chance, the answer to all you have 
desired.” 

The king replied, “I hope your advice turns out well. I accept your 
suggestion; see that the matter is carried out appropriately.” Piran bowed, left the 
court, and hurried to Seyavash. He went over what the king had said, and that 
night the two washed all sorrows from their hearts with wine. 


Seyavash Becomes Related to Afrasyab 

When the sun raised its golden shield into the sky, Piran said to Seyavash, 
“Bestir yourself, you’re to be the princess’s guest, and I’m ready to do whatever 
you order me to in this affair.” Seyavash was uneasy in his heart and 
shamefacedly said to Piran, “Do whatever you think’s appropriate; you know 
I’ve nothing to hide from you.” Piran bustled off to his house and had his wife 
Golshahr choose a splendid wedding gift: uncut cloth, gold woven Chinese 
brocade, trays of emeralds, beakers of turquoise filled with musk and sweet- 
smelling wood, two princely crowns, two torques, a necklace, two earrings, sixty 
camel-loads of carpets, three sets of clothes with designs worked in red gold and 
jewels, thirty camel-loads of silver and gold, a golden throne and four chairs of 
state, three pairs of slippers worked in emeralds, three hundred slaves with gold 
caps, a hundred more bearing gold beakers. All this, together with ten thousand 
dinars, was taken to Farigis by Golshahr and her sisters. She kissed the ground 
before the princess and said, “The sun is to be joined with the planet Venus; 
tonight you must go to the prince and shine in his palace like the full moon.” 

And so Farigis, resplendent as the full moon, came to the young prince. The 
festivities lasted a week; no one, not even the birds of the air or the fish in the 
sea, Slept during that time; from end to end, the earth was like a garden filled 
with happiness and music-making. Afrasyab loaded his son-in-law with gifts and 
gave him a charter written on silk, making him lord of the lands that stretched to 
the Sea of China, and in confirmation of his sovereignty he sent a golden throne 
and crown to Seyavash’s palace. 

A year went by, and then one day a messenger from Afrasyab arrived at 
Seyavash’s palace. The king said, “It would be right for you to separate yourself 
from me somewhat. I’ve given you the land that stretches toward China; make a 
tour of your territories and choose some city that delights your heart. Make that 
your happy home, and never swerve from righteousness.” 

Seyavash was pleased at this advice; he had fifes and kettledrums sounded, 
the baggage train fitted out, and litters prepared for Farigis and the women of her 
entourage. As he led out his army Piran accompanied him with his own troops, 
and the two made their way toward Piran’s homeland, Khotan. There the prince 
stayed as Piran’s guest for a month, feasting and hunting. When the month was 
over the din of drums rang out at cockcrow and, with the army led by Piran, 
Seyavash entered the appanage he had been granted by Afrasyab. 


When it was known they had arrived, the local chieftains gave them a 
splendid welcome, filling the land with the sound of harps, lutes, and flutes. 


They reached a fertile and well-watered place, 
Possessed of every strength and natural grace: 
The setting’s natural limit was the sea, 

A highway marked the inland boundary, 

To one side mountains reared above the plain, 

A place of hunting grounds, and wild terrain; 

The streams, the groves of trees, made weary men 
Feel that their ancient hearts were young again. 


Seyavash said to Piran, “I shall build here, in this happy place: I’ Il raise a 
splendid city filled with palaces and porticoes. My capital will be worthy of the 
crown and throne and will soar as high as the moon’s sphere.” Piran replied, 
“My lord, do as you see fit. I will contribute everything necessary; knowing you, 
I have no more need for wealth or land.” Seyavash said, “All my treasure and 
goods are from you; I see you striving everywhere on my behalf. I’ll build a city 
here such that everyone who sees it will be amazed.” But the astrologers 
reported that the site was inauspicious, and when Seyavash heard this the reins 
slackened in his hands and tears fell from his eyes. Piran asked, “My prince, why 
should this grieve you so much?” 


And Seyavash said, “As the heavens roll 

They cast my spirit down and sear my soul. 
The wealth with which my treasury is filled, 
The goods I’ve sought, the palaces I build, 
Will pass into my enemy’s fell hand. 

Before long, death will take me from this land. 
And why should I rejoice when I foresee 

That others will sit here in place of me? 

I’m not long for this world, and soon, God knows, 
I'll need no palaces or porticoes; 

My throne will then be Afrasyab’s, and he 
Though innocent connives to murder me. 

And so the ever-turning skies bestow 

Now joy, now sorrow, on the world below.” 


Piran said, “O my lord, why do you bewilder your soul in this way? Afrasyab 
has cleansed all evil from his heart and renounced all thoughts of vengeance; and 
while the soul stays in my body I will stay faithful to you. I won’t let even the 
wind so much as disturb your hair.” Seyavash said, “Your reputation is 
unsullied, and I see only goodness come from you. You know all my secrets; I 
bring you tidings from God himself, for I am privy to the secrets of the turning 
heavens. I will tell you what must be, so that later when you see how the world 
turns you will not wonder at my fate. Listen then: not many days will pass before 
I shall be slain, although I am innocent of sin; another will inherit my throne and 
palace. You are true to your word, but the heavens will otherwise. Slander and 
an evil fortune will bring evil on my innocent body. Iran and Turan will rise 
against one another and life will be overwhelmed by vengeance. From end to 
end our lands will suffer, swords will usurp the time; innumerable red, yellow, 
black, and purple banners will throng the skies of Iran and Turan; endless the 
pillage and slaughter, the theft of accumulated treasure; countless the countries 
whose streams will turn brackish, their soil trampled beneath war horses’ 
hooves. Then the lord of Turan will regret what he has said and done; but when 
smoke rises from his pillaged cities, regret will be useless. My spilt blood will 
set Iran and Turan to wailing, and all the world will be in turmoil. Thus He who 
holds the world has written, and it is by his command that what has been sown is 
reaped. Come, let us rejoice and feast while we may; the world passes; why tie 
your heart to it, since neither our efforts nor the wealth we delight in will 
remain?” 

Hearing him, Piran’s heart was stricken with grief, and to himself he said, “If 
what he says is true, I am the cause of this evil. It was I who expended so much 
effort to bring him to Turan, I then who sowed the seeds of this war of 
vengeance. I took the king’s words as so much wind when he said as much to 
me.” But he consoled himself, “Who knows the secrets of the heavens? He 
remembers Iran, Kavus, and the days of his greatness, and it is this that’s 
disturbed him.” As they rode forward all their talk was of the mysteries of fate, 
but when they dismounted they put the subject aside and called for wine and 
musicians. For a week they feasted, telling tales of the ancient kings; on the 
eighth day a letter came from Afrasyab ordering Piran to lead his troops on a 
tour of inspection, collecting tribute as he went. First he was to travel to the Sea 
of China, then to the border with India and the Indian Ocean, and from there to 
Khazar in Turkestan. 


The shout to assemble went up from the doorway of Piran’s tent; to the din of 
drums troops amassed to receive their orders, and then the columns set out on 
the itinerary the king had commanded. 


Afrasyab’s Letter to Seyavash 

One night, at about the time men sleep, a messenger from Afrasyab came 
hurrying to Seyavash. The letter he bore was filled with kindness: “Since you 
left Iam never happy. I have identified a place here in Turan where you could 
live; however cheerfully and splendidly you pass the time where you are, return 
to my kingdom and confound those who are envious of your good fortune.” 

Seyavash gathered his troops and set off to the appointed place, as the king 
had commanded him. With him came a hundred camel-loads of dirhems, forty of 
dinars, and a thousand red-haired Bactrian camels made up the baggage train. 
Ten thousand swordsmen guarded the litters carrying the women of his court, 
and the thirty camel-loads of precious goods—rubies, turquoise, torques, crowns 
and earrings, sweet smelling woods, musk and ambergris, brocade and silk, as 
well as goods from Egypt, China, and Persia. He came to the chosen place, 
named Khorram-e Bahar (The Joy of Spring), and there constructed a city of 
palaces, porticoes, public squares, orchards and gardens; the place was like a 
paradise, and in the desert wastes he made roses, hyacinths, and tulips grow. On 
his palace walls he had frescoes painted showing royal battles and banquets. One 
was of King Kavus with his crown, torque, and royal mace; Rostam stood next 
to his throne, and with him were Zal, Gudarz, and the rest of Kavus’s entourage. 
On the opposite wall Afrasyab was painted, together with his warriors and the 
chieftains Piran and Garsivaz. At each corner of the city was a dome that 
reached to the clouds; and there, their heads among the stars, musicians would 
sit and sing. The city was called Seyavashgerd, and the world rejoiced in its 
existence. 

On his return journey from India and China, Piran came to visit Seyavash. He 
was Curious to see what the prince had done with the site and hurried forward, 
together with a crowd of well-wishers worthy of the honor. The prince and his 
troops came out to greet him; seeing him in the distance Piran dismounted, as 
did Seyavash, and the two embraced. They walked together through the city, 
where so recently there had been only a wilderness of thorns, and Piran praised 
Seyavash and the magnificent buildings and orchards he saw laid out on every 
side. He said, “If you were not endowed with knowledge and the royal farr, how 
could you ever have founded such a place? May it last as your memorial until 


the end of the world, and may you and your descendants live here as victorious 
kings until then.” 

When he had seen a portion of the city he reached Seyavash’s palace and 
turned toward Farigis’s quarters. The princess scattered coins before him in 
welcome, asked about the hardships of his journey, and seated him on a throne, 
while her servants stood in waiting for his orders. He praised all he saw, and 
then they turned to feasting, wine, and music. They spent a week in this way, at 
times lighthearted and cheerful, and at times quite drunk. On the eighth day 
Piran handed over gifts he had brought from his travels: rubies and other 
princely gems, coins and jewel-studded crowns, silks, horses with saddles of 
leopard skin and gold-worked bridles; to Farigis he gave a diadem and earrings, 
a necklace, and a gem-encrusted torque. 

After leaving Seyavashgerd Piran returned to his own land of Khotan. 
Entering his women’s quarters he said to his wife, Golshahr, “Whoever has not 
set eyes on paradise should travel where I have been, to see the angel Sorush 
enthroned in splendor. Go for a while, and refresh your soul with the sight of 
Seyavash’s city.” Then, quick as a skiff that cleaves the waves, he traveled on to 
Afrasyab. He listed the countries he had visited and the tribute he had levied, 
then mentioned Seyavash, saying all he had seen and answering the king’s 
questions: “Heaven’s glories do not equal that city, nor is the sun more splendid 
than Seyavash. I saw a city unparalleled in all of Persia and China: wisdom and 
that prince’s soul have combined to make a paradise of gardens, public places, 
and flowing streams. From a distance Farigis’s palace glitters like a vast jewel. 
Men revile the world, but you have no cause for complaint now. If Sorush 
himself were to descend from the blue heavens he would not be possessed of 
such magnificence, glory, and wisdom as is your son-in-law. And our two 
countries rest from war, returning to life like a man who has lain unconscious 
and revives again.” 

The king was happy to hear these words, believing that the tree of his good 
fortune had borne fruit. He told Garsivaz what he had heard, and said, “Visit 
Seyavashgerd and see what kind of a place it is. Seyavash has given his heart to 
Turan and forgotten Iran; he’s renounced its crown and throne and said farewell 
to King Kavus, Gudarz, and Bahram. In the thorn-brakes here he has created a 
city; he has built Farigis tall palaces and treats her with honor and respect. When 
you see him, speak kindly to him and act with suitable deference, whether out 
hunting, seated at court with his Persian entourage, or drinking and feasting. 
Take him abundant presents—whatever you can lay your hands on in your 


treasury—and give Farigis presents, too, and congratulate her on her good 
fortune. If your host welcomes you with smiles, stay in his pleasant city for two 
weeks.” 


Garsivaz Visits Seyavash 

Garsivaz chose a thousand Turanian knights and set off in high spirits for 
Seyavashgerd. Hearing of his approach Seyavash and a detachment of troops 
hurried out to meet him; the two embraced and Seyavash enquired after the 
king’s health. He welcomed Garsivaz to the palace and had his escort billeted 
appropriately. On the next day Garsivaz brought Seyavash the king’s letter 
together with a robe of state; when Seyavash saw the robe the king had bestowed 
on him, his spirits opened like a flower in springtime. He and his nobles took 
Garsivaz about the city, and when they had surveyed it, building by building, 
they returned to the palace. There they saw Farigis wearing a diadem studded 
with turquoise, seated on her ivory throne, and surrounded by maidservants. She 
descended and welcomed Garsivaz, asking after the king and her hometown. 
Garsivaz seethed with resentment, but his outward behavior was punctilious and 
respectful. In his heart he said, “Let another year pass and Seyavash will have no 
time for anyone: he has sovereignty here, a crown and power, wealth, land, and 
an army.” But though inwardly he writhed in anguish and his face turned pale, 
he hid what was in his heart, saying to Seyavash, “Your efforts have been 
rewarded; may you live for many years enjoying your good fortune.” Two 
golden thrones were placed in the palace, and there Garsivaz and Seyavash sat, 
while musicians played heart-bewitching music on harps and lutes. 

At sunrise on the next day Seyavash and Garsivaz went out to an open space 
to play polo. Garsivaz threw down the ball and Seyavash struck it so hard that it 
disappeared as though the heavens had swallowed it, while his opponent’s mallet 
struck only dust that spurted up from the plain. Thrones were set at the edge of 
the field for the two heroes, who watched as their men displayed their prowess 
with javelins. Garsivaz suggested that Seyavash himself show his martial valor 
before the Turks, and he assented. 


Seyavash Displays His Skill to Garsivaz 

The prince exchanged his throne for his saddle. Five suits of mail, each heavy 
enough to tire a man, were bound together and set up at the field’s end, while all 
the army watched. Seyavash owned a spear that had belonged to his father, who 
had used it in the war against Mazanderan; this he grasped and then like a 
maddened elephant he charged, plunging the spear into the suits of mail, 
shattering their fastenings and scattering them at will. Garsivaz’s men collected 
the broken remnants from the field. Then the prince had four Gilani shields— 


two made of wood and two of iron—bound together as a target. He called for his 
bow, and thrust six poplar wood arrows in his belt; three more he kept in his fist, 
and one he notched to the bowstring. Then he galloped toward the target and 
loosed the first arrow: it pierced all four shields, as did all ten of his arrows one 
after another, while young and old roared their approval. 

Garsivaz said, “My prince, in all Iran and Turan you have no equal. But let’s 
you and I engage in a wrestling match, grasping each other’s belts and straining 
to throw one another, here, in front of our troops. I’m the foremost warrior of the 
Turks, and you won’t see many horses to rival mine; there’s no one else here 
who’s fit to oppose you. If I can throw you from your saddle to the ground, 
you’ll have to accept that I am the better warrior and have the better mount, and 
if you succeed in throwing me, I’ll never show my face on a battlefield again.” 
Seyavash replied, “Don’t say such things: you are a great lord and a great 
watrior, your horse is superior to mine, and I reverence your helmet. Choose 
some other Turk to face me.” Garsivaz said, “It will only be a friendly contest, 
for a moment, with no malice or hard feelings involved.” But Seyavash replied, 
“Tt would not be right; where I fight is no place for you. When two men oppose 
one another, they may smile but their hearts are filled with fury. You’re the 
king’s brother and your horse’s hooves tread down the moon. I’!I do whatever 
you order me to, but I can’t consent to this. Choose some lion warrior from 
among your companions, set him on a fine, fleet horse, and if you’re still intent 
on having me fight, you’ll see his head in the dust.” Garsivaz laughed, and 
turning to his Turks called out, “Which of you wants to humble the greatest of 
watriors, and so be renowned throughout the world?” No one responded, till 
Gorui spoke up, “If no one else will oppose him, I’m his match.” Seyavash 
frowned at this, but Garsivaz said, “My lord, he has no equal in our army.” 
Seyavash said, “If I’m not going to fight with you, combat with anyone else is 
contemptible. But choose two, and I’1l fight against both together.” A Turk 
called Damur joined Gorui, and Seyavash faced them, while they circled him. 
Then he lunged forward and grabbed Gorui by the belt, dragging him from his 
saddle to the ground, all without having to use his lariat. Next he wheeled toward 
Damur and seized him by the neck, lifting him lightly from his horse, so that all 
the onlookers were astonished. As if he were carrying a mere ant rather than a 
wairior, he rode over to Garsivaz, dismounted, released Damur, and sat down 
laughing on his throne. Garsivaz was secretly enraged by what he had seen and 
his face flushed. The two returned to the palace and spent a week feasting 


according to Persian custom, drinking wine and listening to singers, flutes, and 
lutes. 

On the eighth day Garsivaz and his entourage made preparations to leave. 
Seyavash wrote a friendly letter to Afrasyab and loaded Garsivaz with presents. 


At first the journey home was filled with praise 
Of Seyavash and all his princely ways, 

But Garsivaz said, “When this Persian came, 
The only gift he brought for us was shame. 
Our king has welcomed him—to our disgrace, 
Humiliation stares us in the face. 

Great Gorui and brave Damur, two men 
Whose like Turan won’t quickly see again, 
Were forced by this high-handed Persian knight 
To look like fools who don’t know how to fight. 
And this won’t be the end of it; I fear 

The consequences of his presence here.” 


And so he talked until they reached Afrasyab’s court, muddying the streams 
of goodwill toward Seyavash. When they arrived, Afrasyab questioned him 
eagerly, and after he had read Seyavash’s letter he laughed aloud, in the best of 
spirits. Malignant Garsivaz saw the king’s gladdened face, and as evening came 
he left the court, his heart a mass of pain and hatred. 

All night he writhed in anguish, and when night’s black cloak was torn aside 
he made his way to Afrasyab again. The court was cleared of strangers and the 
two sat together. Garsivaz began, “Your majesty, Seyavash is not the man he 
was; he receives messengers from King Kavus and also from Rum and China; he 
drinks Kavus’s health and a mighty army has gathered around him. Soon he will 
be a threat to you. If evil had not darkened Tur’s heart, he would not have slain 
Iraj, but since that time our two countries have been like fire and water, each 
heartsick at the other; and you are crazy enough to want them to unite? You 
might as well attempt to trap the wind. If I had hidden this evil from you, the 
world would have condemned me.” 

The king’s heart was hurt by this report, and he began to brood on Fate and 
its sorrows. He said, “Affection sprung from our common blood guides you to 
speak like this. Let me weigh the matter for three days; if wisdom agrees with 
your assessment, I’1l say what remedy to adopt.” 


On the fourth day Garsivaz appeared at court, his sword belt tight about his 
waist, his diadem of office on his head; Afrasyab summoned him and went over 
the matter of Seyavash. He said, “How you remind me of our father, Pashang! 
And who else have I in the world besides you? It’s you I must tell my secrets to, 
and you must plumb them thoroughly and give me your advice. That dream I 
had, which upset me for a while and confused me, prevented me from fighting 
against Seyavash. But no harm’s come to me from him; since he’s bid farewell 
to the throne of Iran and wisely woven his fate with mine, he has never once 
disobeyed my orders. And I’ve treated him well; I gave him a country to rule 
over, and wealth, and I’ve made no mention of our grievances against him. I’ve 
made a blood alliance with him; I gave him my daughter, the light of my eyes, 
and I’ve renounced all thoughts of vengeance against Iran. If, after all this, I 
were to suspect him, the world would rebuke me; I haven’t the least excuse to 
move against him. If I were to harm him our nobles would condemn me, I’d be a 
byword for bad faith everywhere. And if I harmed an innocent man could God 
who rules the sun and moon approve of this? I can see no other solution than to 
summon him to my court and then send him back to his father: if it’s sovereignty 
he wants, he can take his quarrel elsewhere.” 

Garsivaz said, “My lord, you can’t treat this matter so lightly. If he goes back 
to Iran now, our whole country will be destroyed. Whenever you welcome a 
stranger into your family he becomes privy to all its secrets; if you try and 
distance yourself from him now, who knows what insanity may come from this? 
He’ll be your enemy, and you’!l be rubbing salt into open wounds. As has been 
well said, the man who brings a leopard up sees only trouble as his reward.” 

His words seemed true to Afrasyab, who regretted what he had done and 
foresaw only disaster. He replied, “I see no good in this affair, neither in its 
beginning nor in its end. We must look for what the heavens reveal; in every 
situation delay is better than haste. Wait until the sun has shone on this for a 
while, until we get some sense of God’s will, and who it is that heaven’s light 
looks favorably upon. If I summon him to court, I’ll be able to sound his secrets, 
and if I bring disloyalty to light, then I shall have to harden my heart against 
him; no one can blame me then, since evil deserves punishment and there’s an 
end to the matter.” 

But Garsivaz, intent on vengeance, said, “You are wise and honest, my lord, 
but consider: if Seyavash, with all his power and royal farr, with his God-given 
might, with that mace and sword of his, should come here, to your court, then 
the sun and moon will be darkened for you. Seyavash is not the man you saw; 


his crown outsoars the heavens. And you would not recognize Farigis, who 
seems beyond all earthly needs. Your army would go over to him, and you’d be 
left like a shepherd with no flock. If the army sees a prince as handsome, 
generous, and wise as he is, it’s not going to be content with you as its 
sovereign. And you can’t simply keep him in his own city, grateful to you for 
what you’ve done for him and still willing to serve you. No one has ever seen a 
lion and an elephant mate, or fire above while water flows below. 


If someone wraps a lion cub in silk, 

A little whelp, who’s not yet tasted milk, 

It keeps its nature still, and, once it’s grown, 
Fights off an elephant’s attack alone.” 


Then Afrasyab became despondent and beset by care; old memories of 
ancient wrongs and thoughts of vengeance filled his heart. 

From then on Garsivaz visited him continually, filling the king’s heart with 
calumny, until one day Afrasyab cleared the court and said to him, “Go and visit 
him; don’t stay long, but give him this message from me: ‘Don’t you have any 
desire to quit your round of pleasures and see someone else? Come here with 
Farigis for a while; I need to set eyes on your face again and enjoy your wise 
company. There is good hunting in our mountains, and wine and milk in our 
emerald goblets. We can spend time pleasantly together, and when you wish to 
return to your own city, you’ll be seen off with music and festivities. Why is it 
forbidden for you to drink with me?’” 


Garsivaz Visits Seyavash for the Second Time 

His heart filled with malevolence, his head with deceit, Garsivaz hurried off on 
his mission. When he was close to Seyavashgerd he selected a smooth-talking 
soldier and said to him, “Go to Seyavash and say to him from me, ‘My noble and 
ambitious lord, I beg you by the soul of Turan’s king, and by the soul and crown 
of King Kavus, not to trouble yourself to come out of your city to greet me. Your 
fame, farr, lineage, crown, and throne raise you above such concerns, and the 
winds themselves stand ready to serve you.’” 

The envoy arrived and kissed the ground before Seyavash, who was saddened 
by Garsivaz’s message; he withdrew and pondered for a while over what it 
might mean, saying to himself, “There is some secret hidden here.” When 
Garsivaz reached the court Seyavash went out on foot to meet him, questioning 


him about his journey, the king, and affairs of state. Garsivaz handed over 
Afrasyab’s letter, which delighted Seyavash, who exclaimed, “I’d outface 
swords and adamantine walls for his sake; I’m ready to travel to his court; you 
and I shall link our reins and ride together. But first we must feast and drink in 
these golden gardens, for the fleeting world is a place of sorrow and grief, and 
woe to him who does not seize pleasure where he can.” 

Garsivaz said in his heart, “If I return to the king with him, his chivalry and 
wisdom will trample my plans underfoot; my words will count for nothing, and 
my council will be seen as a lie. I must make some scheme to lead him astray.” 
For a while he stood in silence, staring at Seyavash’s face. Then tears flowed 
from his eyes, and seeing this, Seyavash asked in sympathy, “My brother, what 
is it? Is it a sorrow you can’t talk about? If your tears are because you’re upset 
with Turan’s king, Ill ride with you now and fight against him until I know why 
he’s humiliating you; and if some formidable enemy has appeared in your life, 
I’m ready to help you in any way I can. Or if Afrasyab is at odds with you 
because someone has been slandering you and so replaced you in his favor, tell 
me about it so that I can help look for a remedy.” 

Garsivaz replied, “No, there’s nothing like this between me and the king, and 
I’ve no enemies my wealth and martial skill can’t deal with. Thoughts of our 
lineage welled up in my heart, and I remembered true tales from the past. How 
evil first came from Tur, who lost God’s farr; you’ve heard of how he schemed 
against the humble Iraj and so began the endless vendetta of our peoples, and 
how from then until the time of Afrasyab, Iran has been like fire and Turan like 
water, never mingling in one place, always rejecting wisdom and good council. 
And Turan’s king is worse than Tur; his ox had not been skinned yet, who 
knows what he’|I do? You don’t know how evil his nature is, but if you watch 
and wait, you’ ll see. Think first of how with his own hand he stabbed Aghriras. 
The two were brothers, of the same mother and father, and yet he killed 
Aghriras, who had committed no crime. And there have been many other 
innocent nobles whom he has destroyed. My concern is that you remain vigilant 
and safe; since you came here, no one’s been harmed by you, you’ve always 
striven for justice and decency, and the world has been made more splendid by 
your knowledge. But Ahriman has filled the king’s heart with resentment against 
you. I don’t know what God wills in all of this. But you know that I’m your 
friend whatever good or evil should appear; I don’t want you to think later on 
that I knew of this and didn’t warn you.” 


Seyavash replied, “Don’t trouble yourself about this. God is with me, and the 
king has given no sign that he wishes to destroy me. If he were angry with me, 
he wouldn’t have distinguished me by giving me a country to rule over, together 
with his own daughter, wealth, and troops. I’ll return with you to his court and 
make his darkened moon splendid again. Wherever truth shines out, lies lose 
their luster. I shall show Afrasyab my heart, brighter than the sun in the heavens. 
Be cheerful, and give up these dark suspicions.” 

Garsivaz said, “My kind lord, don’t imagine he is as you once saw him. For 
all your knowledge and stature, you can’t distinguish pretence from goodness, 
and I fear bad luck will come of this. He has tricked you, blinded you with glory. 
You were foolish to rejoice when he made you his son-in-law; he lured you 
away from your own people and gave a great feast and made you his familiar, so 
that the world began to gossip about it. You’re not a wiser man than Aghriras, 
and you’re no closer to him than he was; before their horrified troops Afrasyab 
cleaved his brother’s waist in two with a dagger. Take this as a lesson, and put 
no trust in the fact that you’re related to him. There, I have told you what’s in 
my heart. You abandoned your father in Iran and made a place for yourself here 
in Turan; you trusted our king’s talk and became his friend in sorrow. But this 
tree you planted has bitter roots and its fruit is poison.” His heart was filled with 
treachery, but he sighed as he spoke and his eyelashes were wet with tears. 

Seyavash stared at him in bewilderment, and tears streamed from his eyes; he 
remembered the prophecies of his evil destiny, that the heavens would deprive 
him of love, that he would not live long but die while still a young man. His 
heart was wrung and his face turned pale, his soul was saddened and sighs 
escaped his lips. He said, “However I look at this, I cannot see that I deserve 
punishment. No one has heard that I have done or said anything wrong. If I have 
made free with his wealth, I’ve also striven on his behalf, and whatever evil 
comes to me I shall not swerve aside from his commands. I’ll accompany you, 
without my troops, and we’|l see what has turned the king against me.” 

Garsivaz replied, “Ambitious lord, it would be better for you not to come. A 
man should not step heedlessly into fire or trust himself to ocean waves. You’d 
be rushing into danger and lulling your good luck to sleep. I will act for you in 
this and throw cold water on the fire. Write an answer setting out the good and 
evil of the situation; if I see that he has no thoughts of vengeance and that the 
days of your glory are renewed, I’ll send a messenger here on horseback, 
lightening the darkness of your days. I trust in God, who knows what is open and 
what is hidden, that the king will return to righteous ways, leaving aside 


crookedness and evil. And if I see that his mind is still dark, P’ll send a 
messenger immediately, and you should wait no longer but leave at once: it’s not 
far from here to the borders, a hundred and twenty parasangs to China, and three 
hundred and forty to Iran. In the former everyone looks favorably on you; in the 
latter your father longs to see you and the whole country is yours to command. 
Don’t delay, but write to both countries and be prepared to fly to either.” 


No longer vigilant, no longer wise, 

Prince Seyavash believed his specious lies. 

He said to him, “I put my trust in you, 

I acquiesce in all you say and do; 

Go, plead my cause before the king, and seek 
For righteousness and justice when you speak.” 


Seyavash Writes to Afrasyab 

He summoned a scribe and dictated his letter. After invoking God and praising 
wisdom, he addressed Afrasyab: “O wise beneficent king, may you live forever. 
You summon me and I am grateful; but you have summoned Farigis, too, and 
she has been ill for some time. She hardly touches her food and has not the 
strength to walk. She keeps to her bed, and I sit beside her pillow. My heart is 
filled with anxiety, seeing her hovering between this world and the next. When 
her illness eases she will be ready to serve you: but my worry for her well-being 
is the reason I cannot visit you now.” He had the letter sealed and handed it to 
Garsivaz, who asked for three of his fastest horses and rode day and night back 
to Afrasyab’s palace. 

On the fourth day he reached the court, and when the king saw him exhausted 
from the journey he asked him why he had hurried back so quickly. Garsivaz 
replied, “When evil threatens there’s no time for delay. Seyavash treated 
everyone with contempt; he didn’t come out to meet me, he wouldn’t listen to 
what I said, he didn’t read your letter, he kept me standing before his throne. 
Letters were constantly coming to him from Iran, but the gates of his city were 
closed against me, and troops flocked to him from Rum and China. If you don’t 
deal with him soon, your fist will close on wind and nothing more; he’1] make 
war on us and seize both Iran and Turan. And once he leads his men to Iran who 
will dare attack him? I’ve told you what I’ve seen, now suffer in the crisis you 
created.” 

When Afrasyab heard him, ancient wrongs revived in his mind. In his anger 
he said nothing to Garsivaz, but fire roared in his heart and his head seemed 
filled with wind. He ordered fifes, cymbals, trumpets, and Indian chimes to be 
sounded and led his army out from Gang: once more he planted the tree of 
vengeance. 

While the deceitful Garsivaz was straining in the stirrups on his journey 
home, Seyavash made his way to the inner apartments of his palace. His face 
was pale and his body trembled. When Farigis saw him she said, “My lion lord, 
what’s made you lose your color like this?” He answered, “My love, I have no 
honor left here in Turan; if Garsivaz speaks truly, my life has come full circle.” 


Queen Farigis clutched wildly at her hair 
And clawed her rosy cheeks in her despair, 
Blood clogged her musky curls, tears stained her face, 


Distractedly she cried, “Leave, leave this place, 
But where in all the world will welcome you? 
Now, quickly, tell me what you plan to do; 

Your father’s rage excludes Iran, you say, 
China would shame you, Rum’s too far away— 
Your only refuge in the world is He 

Who rules the sun and moon eternally. 

May years of pain destroy the scoundrel who 
Corrupted the king’s heart and slandered you.” 


And Seyavash said, “Garsivaz will be arriving at Afrasyab’s court about now.” 


Seyavash’s Dream 

On the fourth night Seyavash slept in Farigis’s arms; he began to tremble and 
started up from sleep, roaring like a maddened elephant. Beside him his wife 
said, “My prince, what is it?” Then she called for tapers, and for sandalwood and 
ambergris to be burned before him. Again she asked, “My king, what did you 
see in your dream?” 

Seyavash said, “Tell no one what I’ve dreamed. My love, my silver cypress 
tree, I saw an endless river, and on the further shore a mountain of fire, and men 
with lances crowded the bank. The fire began to overwhelm my city, 
Seyavashgerd. On one side there was water, on the other fire, and between them 
was Afrasyab mounted on an elephant. He saw me and frowned, and blew on the 
fire to make it flare up.” Farigis said, “This can only have a good meaning; sleep 
now for the rest of the night.” 

But Seyavash rose and called his troops to the palace courtyard. His dagger in 
his hand, he began to prepare for battle and sent out scouts to watch the road 
from Gang. When two watches of the night had passed, one of the scouts 
galloped back from the plain, saying, “Afrasyab and a great horde of soldiers 
have appeared in the distance; they are hurrying this way.” And then a courier 
brought a message from Garsivaz: “Save yourself; nothing I said had any effect 
and the fire sends out clouds of threatening smoke. Decide what you must do 
and where you should lead your army.” Still Seyavash did not suspect his 
behavior, believing all that he told him. Farigis said, “My wise king, don’t think 
of me, put no trust in Turan but saddle a swift horse and flee. You must stay 
alive; save your own head and give no thought to anyone else.” 


Seyavash replied, “My dream was true, and the glory of my life darkens; my 
time on earth draws to its close and only bitterness remains. But this is the 
heavens’ way, bestowing now pleasure and now sorrow; if my palace reached to 
the stars, still the world’s poison would have to be tasted; and if I lived for one 
thousand two hundred years, still my resting place would be the dark earth. You 
are five months pregnant, and if the fruit maturing in your womb should grow to 
ripeness, you’ll be delivered of a splendid prince. Name him Kay Khosrow, and 
may he be a consolation for your sorrows. Soon, by Afrasyab’s command, my 
luck will sink to sleep; though I am innocent they will cut my head off, and my 
crown will be soaked in my vitals’ blood. I’ll have no coffin, shroud, or grave, 
no mourners to lament my death; I shall lie like a stranger in the dirt, my head 
severed from my body by a sword blow. The king’s bodyguards will drag you 
naked through the streets, and Piran will come to beg you from your father. He’ Il 
take you in your wretchedness to his castle; a warrior will come from Iran and 
lead you and your son secretly across the Oxus. Your son will be placed on the 
throne, and from the fish in the sea to the birds of the air all creation will serve 
him. A huge army will come from Iran intent on vengeance; the world will be 
filled with tumult. Armies will clash in the war of my revenge, the earth will 
groan from end to end in torment, and Kay Khosrow will throw the world into 
confusion.” This was his farewell to Farigis: “Dearest wife, I must leave; harden 
your heart, and bid farewell to ease and luxury.” She scored her cheeks and tore 
out her hair, her heart filled with grief for her husband, her eyes with tears. The 
two clung to one another in their grief, then, weeping and heartsick, Seyavash 
left her apartments. 

He went to the stables where his Arab horses were kept and found black 
Behzad, who on the battlefield outran the wind. Lifting off his halter Seyavash 
wept, took Behzad’s head in his arms, and whispered in his ear, “Let no one near 
you until Kay Khosrow returns; he will replace your bridle. Then you must bid 
farewell to this stable and bear him out to war and vengeance.” He hamstrung all 
the other horses, wild as a fire that burns through reeds; then he and his warriors 
set out for Iran, their faces blinded by tears. 


Afrasyab and Seyavash Meet 

But after they had traveled half a parasang they were confronted by the army of 
Turan. Seeing them in their armor, with their swords at the ready, Seyavash 
buckled on his breastplate and said to himself, “Garsivaz spoke the undeniable 
truth.” Each side eyed the other’s ranks; before this neither had felt any enmity 
for the other. Turan’s cavalry held back out of fear of Seyavash. The Iranians 
drew up in battle order and prepared for bloodshed: all of them were ready to 
fight alongside Seyavash; neither delay nor reproaches would be of any use now. 
They said, “If we’re killed we won’t go down to the dust alone; they’ ll see what 
battle with Persians means and not consider us contemptible.” Seyavash said, 
“There is no sense to this; this battle has neither head nor tail to it. We’ll shame 
ourselves, and my gift to my father-in-law is to make war on him. But if the 
heavens decree that I shall be destroyed by evil, I have no strength or desire to 
oppose God’s will. As the wise have said, there is no point in striving against an 
evil fate.” Then he called out to Afrasyab, “Great and glorious king, why have 
you come with your army ready for war; why do you wish to kill me, though I 
am innocent? You will stir up the armies of our two countries, and fill the land 
with curses.” 

Garsivaz replied, “You senseless fool, when has such talk ever been worth 
anything? If you’re so innocent, why have you come before the king armed? A 
show of bows and shields is no way to welcome a monarch.” 

The sun rose as Garsivaz spoke, and Afrasyab ordered his men to draw their 
swords and roar their war cry as if Judgment Day had come. He said, “Grasp 
your weapons, and make this plain a sea of blood to float a ship on.” 

There were a thousand Persian warriors there, all good fighting men, but they 
were surrounded on all sides and slaughtered. Seyavash was wounded by arrows 
and lances and fell from his black horse; as he lay in the dust Gorui wrenched his 
hands behind his back and bound them tight as a stone. They set a yoke on his 
shoulders and dragged him on foot, hemmed in by soldiers, his face bleeding, 
toward Seyavashgerd; the prince had never seen such a day as this. 

Afrasyab said, “Take him off the road, to a stony place where no plants grow, 
and cut off his head. Let his blood sink in the hot soil there; fear nothing, and be 
quick about it.” But the army cried out as with one voice, “Great king, what is 
his sin? Why would you kill someone for whom the very crown and throne will 
weep? In the days of prosperity do not plant a tree whose fruit will be poison.” 


Piran’s clear-sighted younger brother, Pilsom, was there. He said to Afrasyab, 
“The fruit of this tree will be pain and sorrow; the wise say that one who acts 
circumspectly has little to regret, that reason soothes anger, that haste is the work 
of Ahriman, bringing guilt to the soul and pain to the body. There’s no sense in 
cutting off a subject’s head precipitately. Keep him in chains until time teaches 
you the best course; act when wisdom’s wind has touched your heart. A wise 
king does not sever a head that’s worn a crown. And, if you kill this innocent, 
his father Kavus and Rostam, who brought him up, will seek revenge. Men like 
Gudarz, Gorgin, Farhad, and Tus will bind war drums on their elephants; the 
mammoth-bodied Giv, who despises all enemies, and Kavus’s son Fariborz, a 
lion who never tires of battle, will ready themselves for a war of vengeance. The 
plains will be thronged with warriors; neither I nor any like me in this company 
will be a match for them. But Piran will be here at dawn; wait and hear his 
advice.” 

Garsivaz said, 


“Pay no attention to a young man’s prattle: 
Vultures feed on their warriors killed in battle; 

If you’re afraid of vengeance, this will be 

Sufficient cause for Persia’s enmity. 

You’ve done enough harm—must you once again 
Listen to raw advice from foolish men? 

If this prince calls, from Rum’s and China’s borders 
Swordsmen and troops will flock to hear his orders. 
You’ve wounded the snake’s head—now you’re afraid, 
And want to wrap its body in brocade? 

Well, spare him if you wish, but I won’t be 

A part of it, you’ve seen the last of me; 

In some dark cave I'll hide myself away 

And live in fear until my dying day.” 


Then Damur and Gorui came forward, plausibly twisting their words: “Don’t 
worry about spilling Seyavash’s blood, delay is wrong when there’s work to do. 
Take Garsivaz’s good advice and destroy your enemy. You set the trap and 
caught him, don’t hesitate now. You have the leader of the Persians in your grip, 
now break the hearts of those who oppose you. You’ve destroyed his army 
already, how do you think the Persian king is going to look on you? If you had 


done nothing against him from the beginning, this could have been overlooked; 
but now it’s better if he disappear from the world entirely.” 

The king replied, “I’ve seen no sin in him, but the astrologers say that 
hardship will come because of him. But if I spill his blood, a whirlwind of 
vengeance will arise from Iran. I have brought evil on Turan, and sorrow and 
pain on myself. To free him is worse than killing him, and killing him is grief 
and agony to me. But neither wise nor evil men know what the heavens will 
bring.” 

Farigis heard this talk and came before the king, her cheeks bloodied, her hair 
smeared with dust, wailing and trembling with pain and fear. She said, “Great 
king, why will you make a widow of me? Why have you given your heart to 
lies? In your glory you cannot see the misery before you. Don’t cut off an 
innocent prince’s head; the ruler of the sun and moon will not approve of this. 
Seyavash abandoned Iran and, with all the world to choose from, made his 
obeisances to you; he renounced his crown and throne and father’s goodwill for 
your sake. And he became your ally and support; what more do you want from 
him? Who has deceived you? And I am innocent, do not mistreat me, for the 
world is fleeting, casting one into a pit of misery and raising another to glory; 
but both descend to the dark earth finally. Do not listen to malignant Garsivaz’s 
lies and so make yourself an emblem of evil throughout the world. You’ve heard 
what the Arab tyrant Zahhak suffered at Feraydun’s hands, and what the great 
king Manuchehr did to the malevolent Salm and Tur. In Kavus’s court live men 
like Rostam, who is contemptuous of Turan and at whose name the world 
trembles, Gudarz of whom lions are terrified, Bahram, and Zangeh, the son of 
Shavran. You are planting a tree whose leaves will bring blood and whose fruit 
is vengeance. The world’s glory will darken and curse Afrasyab; you are ruining 
yourself, and you will have long years in which to remember my words. You’re 
not out hunting now, bringing down some wild ass or deer; you’re destroying a 
prince, and the throne and crown will curse you. Do not cast the land of Turan to 
the winds, or make this an evil day that you’|l regret.” 

Having said this she gazed at Seyavash’s face, wailing and clawing her 
cheeks. The king pitied her but seeled up the eyes of wisdom and said, “Leave, 
get back to the palace; what do you know of what I mean to do?” They took 
Farigis and locked her in a dark room deep in the palace. 


Seyavash Is Killed 

Garsivaz looked at Gorui, who turned his face aside, and stepped before 
Seyavash, abandoning all chivalry and shame. He grasped the prince by the hair 
and began to drag him away; Seyavash cried out, “Great God, who rules our 
earthly state and destiny, bring forth a bough from me that will be like a shining 
sun to my people, who will seek revenge for my death and renew my ways in my 
own land.” Pilsom followed him, his eyes awash with tears, his heart filled with 
sorrow. Seyavash said to him, “Farewell; may Fortune weave her threads with 
yours forever; convey my greetings to Piran. Tell him the world has changed, 
that I had other hopes of Piran when I was like a willow tree bending before the 
wind of his advice. He told me that when my luck turned he would be at my side 
with a hundred thousand infantry and cavalry, that he would be like a pasture for 
my foraging. But now that I’m haled before Garsivaz, on foot, despised and 
wretched, I see no one here to befriend me or to weep for me.” 

Garsivaz and Gorui dragged him away from the army and the city to a waste 
place on the plain. Gorui took the dagger from Garsivaz, and when they had 
reached the appointed place they threw the prince’s mammoth body to the 
ground. Knowing neither fear nor shame, they held a gold dish at his throat to 
catch the blood and severed the head of that silver cypress tree. The prince’s 
head sank into endless sleep, never to awake. Gorui took the dish to the place 
that Afrasyab had ordered, and emptied it. A wind rose up, and darkness 
obscured the sun and moon; people could not see one another’s faces, and all 
cursed Gorui. 


I turn to right and left, in all the earth 

I see no signs of justice, sense, or worth: 
A man does evil deeds, and all his days 
Are filled with luck and universal praise; 
Another’s good in all he does—he dies 

A wretched, broken man whom all despise. 


Seyavash’s palace resounded with lamentation; his slaves cut off their hair, 
and Farigis too cut her musky tresses and bound them about her waist and 
clawed at her cheeks’ roses. Loudly she cursed Afrasyab, and when he heard her 
cries he ordered Garsivaz to drag her into the streets, and there to strip her and 
have her beaten, so that she would miscarry the seed of Iran, saying, “I want 


nothing to grow from Seyavash’s root, neither a tree nor a bough nor a leaf; I 
want no scion from him worthy of a crown or throne.” 

One by one the nobles of his entourage condemned him, saying that no one 
had ever heard of a king or minister who had given such an order. Pilsom came 
weeping and heartsick to Lahak and Farshidvard and said, “Hell is better than 
Afrasyab’s realm, and this land will know no rest or peace now; we should go to 
Piran and seek help for these tormented women.” 

They saddled three fine horses and hurried to Piran’s castle, where they 
arrived covered in sweat and dust. They told him that Seyavash had been 
dragged on foot, bound, and with a yoke placed about his neck; that he had been 
forced to the ground by Gorui with his face twisted up like a sheep’s while a 
basin was held to catch his blood; that his head had been severed and that his 
body lay like a silver cypress felled in a meadow. They said that a heathen 
shepherd of the deserts would not slit a man’s throat in such a way, that all the 
land mourned for Seyavash, and that tears stood in all eyes like dew. 

Piran fell from his throne in a faint, and when he came to he tore at his hair 
and clothes and heaped dust on his head. Pilsom said to him, “Hurry, pain is 
heaped upon pain: Farigis will be killed, guards have dragged her by her hair to 
the court; don’t turn your back on her distress.” 

Piran had ten good horses brought from his stables and in two days and nights 
the group arrived at Afrasyab’s court. They saw the gates thronged with warders 
and executioners, and Farigis dragged forward, as if insensible, by guards with 
drawn swords in their hands. The court was in a tumult, weeping and lamenting 
and condemning Afrasyab, saying that he would have Farigis hacked in two, that 
this horrific crime would utterly destroy his sovereignty and that no one would 
ever call him king again. Piran rode forward like the wind, and everyone with 
any sense rejoiced. Farigis saw him through her bloody tears and said, “See what 
evil you have brought upon me, you have thrown me living into the fire.” Piran 
dismounted and tore at his clothes in grief; he told the guards crowded about the 
gates to delay carrying out their orders. 

Then, weeping and heartsore, he rushed before Afrasyab and said, “Great 
king, live prosperously and wisely: what evil has darkened your benevolence, 
what demon has gained power over you, destroying all shame before God in 
your soul? By killing the sinless Seyavash, you’ve thrown your own honor and 
glory in the dust. When this news reaches Iran the court will go into mourning, 
and their nobles will lead a great army here intent on vengeance. The world was 
at peace and God’s ways prevailed, and now some demon has burst from hell 


and deceived the king’s heart: curses on the devil who perverted your heart! For 
long years you’ll regret this, living in pain and sorrow. And now that you’ve 
dealt with Seyavash, you turn against your own child? But Farigis has no desire 
for glory or sovereignty; don’t make yourself a byword for cruelty by killing 
your pregnant daughter; you will be cursed throughout the world for as long as 
you live, and when you die hell will be your home. If the king would brighten 
my soul he will send her to my castle; and if you fear her child, wait until it is 
born; [’ll bring it to you, and then do to it whatever evil you wish.” 

Afrasyab replied, “Do as you say; you have made me unwilling to shed her 
blood.” Heartened by this, Piran went to the gates, paid off the guards, and took 
Farigis away from the court and its lamentations. He brought her to Khotan and, 
when they arrived, entrusted her to Golshahr, his wife, saying, “Hide this lovely 
woman away; look after her well.” Days passed, and Farigis, whose glory lit the 
world, grew heavier. 


The Birth of Kay Khosrow 

On a dark, moonless night, when birds and beasts were sleeping, the lord Piran 
saw in a dream a candle lit from the sun. Seyavash stood by the candle, a sword 
in his hand, crying out in a loud voice, “This is no time for rest; rise from sleep, 
learn how the world moves onward; a new day dawns and new customs come; 
tonight is the birthnight of Kay Khosrow.” 

Piran trembled in his sleep and woke; he roused Golshahr and said, “Go to 
Farigis; I dreamed of Seyavash, more splendid than the sun, who said to me, 
‘How long will you sleep? Rise, and run to the feast of Kay Khosrow, who will 
rule the world.’” 

When Golshahr reached Farigis she saw that the princess had already borne 
her son. She ran back lightheartedly, shouting the news to all the world, and said 
to Piran, “He’s like the sun and moon together; come and see the little marvel, 
see what God has created in his goodness; you’|l say he’s ready for a crown, or 
for a helmet and battle.” As soon as Piran saw the prince he laughed and 
scattered coins for him; his great stature seemed more fitting for a one-year-old 
child than a newborn baby. Gazing at the child, Piran wept for Seyavash and 
cursed Afrasyab. To his nobles he said, “If I am killed for this, I’ll say it: I shall 
not let Afrasyab get his clutches on this child, even if he throws me to wild 
beasts.” 

At the time the sun unsheathes its sword, as Afrasyab was waking up, Piran 
came hurrying in; after the room was cleared, he approached and said, “Sun 
king, world conqueror, wise and versed in magic arts, another subject was added 
to your rule last night. He seems a capable, intelligent child and is as fair to look 
on as the moon. If Tur could live again he’d long to see him, for he resembles 
Feraydun in majesty and glory. No picture in a palace is as magnificent as this 
prince; in him the royal splendor is renewed. Now distance evil thoughts from 
your mind, mercy will become both your crown and your heart.” 


God cleansed all hatred from the monarch’s mind; 
He knew that Seyavash had been maligned; 

He sighed for him, tortured with pain and guilt, 
Mourning his malice and the blood he’d spilt. 


He said, “I’ve heard enough about this newcomer; everyone talks about him. 
The land is full of disturbances because of him, and I remember what I was told; 


that from the mingled line of Tur and Kay Qobad a great king would be born, the 
world will turn to him, and all the cities of Turan will pay him homage. But let 
what must come, come; there’s nothing to be gained by worry and grief. Don’t 
keep him among your courtiers; send him off to the shepherds, and see that he 
doesn’t know who he is or why he is there.” He said whatever came into his 
head, thinking that this ancient world was young and malleable. 

Piran left the court in high spirits, giving thanks to God and praising the king. 
He traveled home deep in thought. Once there he summoned shepherds from the 
mountains and said, “Keep this boy as dearly as your own souls, keep him safe 
from wind and dust, see that he wants for nothing and never suffers.” He gave 
the shepherds many gifts, and sent a wet nurse with them. 

By the time the boy was seven years old his lineage began to show. He 
fashioned a bow from a branch and strung it with gut; then he made a featherless 
arrow and went off to the plains to hunt. When he was ten he was a fierce fighter 
and confronted bears, wild boar, and wolves. Soon, still using the same rough 
bow he’d made, he progressed to leopards and lions. By now he would take no 
orders from the shepherd who looked after him, and so his guardian descended 
from the mountains and went whining to Piran. He said, “I’ve come to complain 
to your lordship about our young hero; at first he hunted deer and didn’t look for 
lions or leopards. But now it makes no difference to him whether he’s after a 
lion or a deer. God forbid any harm should come to him; I’m yours to command 
my lord.” Piran laughed, and said, “Lineage and skill won’t stay hidden long!” 

He rode to where the young lion was living and ordered him to step forward. 
Seeing the boy’s noble stature, he dismounted and kissed his hand. Then he 
gazed at him, taking in the signs of kingly glory in his face; his eyes brimmed 
with tears and love filled his heart. He folded the boy in his arms and held him 
there for a long time, brooding in his heart on the boy’s fate. He said, “O 
Khosrow, follower of the pure faith, may the face of the earth be bright for you.” 
Khosrow replied, “My lord, everyone speaks well of your kindness, and I see 
you’re not ashamed to embrace a shepherd’s son.” Piran’s heart was wrung at 
these words; he blushed and said, “My boy, you call to mind our ancient heroes; 
the world is yours by right and you’re deprived of it. No shepherd is kin to you, 
and I could tell you much more about this.” He called for a horse and royal 
clothes for the young man, and, as the two rode together back to Piran’s castle, 
Piran grieved in his heart for Seyavash. He kept the boy by him and brought him 
up; but though he delighted in his company, he feared for him because of 
Afrasyab, and his anxiety gave him no rest. And so the heavens turned for a few 


years more, and Afrasyab’s heart grew milder. One night a messenger arrived 
summoning Piran to the king’s presence. When he arrived Afrasyab said to him, 
“Every night my heart is filled with thoughts of evil and sorrow. I think of that 
child of Seyavash and it’s as if he has darkened all my days. How can it be right 
for a shepherd to bring up a descendant of Feraydun? If it’s fated that evil will 
come to me from him, my precautions won’t change God’s will. If he can forget 
about the past, let him live happily, and I will, too; and if he shows any signs of 
evil, then he’ lose his head, as his father did.” 

Piran replied, “My lord, you need no councilor to advise you. What does a 
little child who’s ignorant of the world know about the past? Don’t trouble 
yourself about this matter any more. What’s that saying, ‘The teacher’s stronger 
than the father, and a mother’s love counts most of all’? Now, for my sake, 
swear me an oath, as solemn as those sworn by the ancient kings, that you won’t 
harm the boy.” Afrasyab’s granite heart softened at Piran’s words, and he swore 
a solemn royal oath: “By day’s bright splendor, by the dark blue night, 

By God who mace the earth and heaven’s light, 
Who made earth’s beasts and human souls, I say 
I shall not harm this child in any way.” 


Piran kissed the ground and said, “Just king, without peer or equal on the 
earth and in the heavens, may wisdom always guide you, may time and space be 
as the dust beneath your feet.” 


Piran Takes Kay Khosrow to Afrasyab 

Piran hurried back to Kay Khosrow, and his cheeks glowed with happiness. He 
said to Khosrow, “Drive wisdom from your heart; if he talks about battles 
answer with banquets, appear before him like a fool, talk as an idiot talks. If you 
can keep clear of sense, you’ ll get through today safely.” Then he placed the 
Kayanid crown on his head and buckled the Kayanid belt about his waist. He 
had him mounted on a high stepping horse, and the two came to Afrasyab’s 
court while crowds gathered to gaze with tears in their eyes, and heralds called 
before them, “Clear the way, a new prince approaches.” 

When they reached the court the grandfather’s face was wet with tears of 
shame; then he stared at his grandson, saying words of friendship but revolving 
evil in his mind. He gazed for a while at the youth’s stature and splendor, and as 
he looked his face turned pale. Watching him, Piran began to tremble and 


despaired of Khosrow’s life. The king’s face seem closed and forbidding, but 
then kindness entered his heart. 

He said, “Young man, you are new to the court; tell me what you know about 
the shepherd’s life. What do you do with your sheep, how do you lead them to 
their pasture?” 

Khosrow answered, “There’s no hunting; I’ve no bow or bowstring or 
arrows.” 

Then Afrasyab asked him about his teachers, and the good and evil fortune he 
had seen. 

Khosrow answered, “Where there’s a leopard, the hearts of sharp-clawed men 
burst with fear.” 

Thirdly he asked him about his mother and father, about Iran, and about his 
food and where he slept. 

Khosrow answered, “A fierce dog can’t bring down a ravening lion.” 

The king laughed at his replies and turned to Piran saying, “His mind’s awry; 
I ask him about the head and his answer’s all about feet. No good or evil is going 
to come from him; men intent on revenge don’t behave like this. Go, hand him 
over to his mother, and set someone trustworthy to look after them. Let them go 
to Seyavashgerd. Keep bad councilors away from him, but give him whatever he 
needs in the way of money, horses, slaves, and so forth.” 

Hurrying a little, Piran hustled Kay Khosrow from Afrasyab’s presence; they 
reached home safely with Piran well pleased by what had happened and 
convinced that the evil eye was seeled. He said, “God’s justice has bestowed a 
new tree on the world, and now it gives its fruit.” He opened wide the doors of 
his ancient treasury and equipped the prince with all he needed—-silks, swords, 
jewels, horses, armor, crowns, belts, thrones, purses of coins, carpets, and cloth 
and everything else he might require. 

Then he sent Farigis and Kay Khosrow to Seyavashgerd, which had become a 
wilderness of thorns; even the beasts of the field came to pay homage to them, 
and men gathered from every quarter and bowed before them, saying, “From the 
noble tree’s uprooted stock a new shoot has sprung. May the evil eye be far from 
our universal lord, may Seyavash’s soul be filled with light.” The ground of the 
ruined city revived and the weeds tured to tall cypresses. From the place where 
Seyavash’s blood had been spilt a green tree sprang up; on its leaves the prince’s 
face could be seen, and its scent was like the scent of musk. It flourished in the 
winter’s cold as freshly as in spring, and it became the place where those who 
mourned for Seyavash gathered together. 


This crone will see her infant suck and play, 

And while he sucks she’ll snatch her breast away; 
Such is the world to which our hearts are bound 
Before we’re hurried pell-mell underground. 

If Fortune raises one above the skies 

Fortune will cast him down before he dies; 

Turn from this world’s inconstant vanity 

And put your trust in God’s eternity. 


Wren Rostam learned of Seyavash’s death he dragged Sudabeh from Kavus’s 
harem and killed her for her part in the young prince’s downfall. He then 
attacked Turan and laid much of it waste in a war of vengeance. Afrasyab 
however escaped and lived to fight another day. 


GIV BRINGS KAY KHOSROW AND FARIGIS 
TO IRAN 


Gudarz Sees the Angel Sorush in a Dream 

One night Gudarz dreamed that he saw a rain cloud pass over Iran, and on it sat 
the angel Sorush, who said to him: “If you would find a way to free yourself 
from the troubles caused by this evil monster Afrasyab, know that there is a new 
prince in Turan. His name is Kay Khosrow, and he is the son of valiant 
Seyavash, of noble lineage, who was descended from Kay Qobad; on his 
mother’s side his lineage is from Turan. When he comes to Iran good fortune 
will be his and the heavens will watch over him; he will bind on his belt to 
avenge his father and despoil the land of Turan. The Red Sea itself shall be 
thrown into tumult, and not for a moment will he pause in pursuit of vengeance 
against Afrasyab; night and day he shall stay in the saddle, dressed in his armor, 
fighting for years on end. Only Giv, whom God the dispenser of justice 
cherishes, of all Iran’s warriors can find where this prince is now; such is the 
command of the turning heavens.” 

When Gudarz woke he prayed, his white beard pressed against the ground, 
and his heart was filled with hope for a king who would rule the world. As the 
sun appeared from behind the hills, ascending like a golden lamp, the chieftain 
sat on his ivory throne and had a chair made of teak brought into the audience 
hall. His heart was thronged with thoughts as he summoned Giv and spoke to 
him for a while about his dream. He said, “Good fortune fills your days, and 
your star illuminates the world; since your mother bore you the world has been 
filled with your praise. Last night, at God’s command, the glorious angel Sorush 
showed his face to me in a dream; he sat on a cloud of wind and rain, and from 
end to end washed the world clean of sorrow. He saw me and said, ‘What is all 
this sorrow for? Why is the world parched of life’s moisture and filled with 
vengeance? It is because the king lacks farr and authority, and does not follow 
kingly ways. When Kay Khosrow comes to the land of Iran, he will bring down 
misfortune and warfare upon its enemies, but from all this land’s brave warriors 


only Giv, the famed son of Gudarz, will be able to find him.’ This is the decree 
of high heaven, that it will be you who will free us from sorrow, pain, and 
servitude. You have sought to make a name for yourself by fighting between two 
armies’ ranks, and now an eternal name is within your grasp, so that while there 
are men in the world, and speech, your fame will never grow old. It’s through 
you that high heaven will free us from our toils; treasure comes to us through 
trouble, as does fame, and your fame will be better than any treasure. Although 
you will not live forever your fame will be a better thing than this fleeting world; 
you will bring a prince to the world and make fruit grow on loyalty’s tree.” 

Giv said to him, “O father, I am your slave and will strive to follow your 
advice as long as I live. I swear by the splendor of your name that if this can be 
done I shall attempt it, without a guide.” Then he went home in wonder at his 
father’s dream and prepared for his journey. 

When the shining sun arose and the land glowed like meadow saffron, brave 
Giv came dressed for the trials ahead and riding a swift-paced horse. He said to 
Gudarz, “World conqueror, brave, valiant, and pure-hearted, my bow and horse 
are sufficient companions for me; there’s no need for me to take anyone else to 
that frontier. If I take men with me I’I] be questioned, and that might lead to 
confrontation; a lariat at my saddle’s side, a fleet horse, a glittering sword, and 
Indian clothes are all I need. I’m to travel through plains and mountains for a 
while, finding guides as I go, and by your good fortune I shall return happy and 
successful. I bid you farewell; remember me, but don’t let your soul be troubled 
on my account. I do not know if we shall see one another after this; no one 
knows such things, except the World Creator. When your cheeks are bathed in 
tears during prayer, pray for me to the World Creator, that He may be my 
companion and guide till I reach the great lord I seek.” 


As Giv rode off, pain filled his father’s heart, 
Tears stained his cheeks to see his son depart. 
Gudarz was old, his son was eager for 
Adventure like a lion seeking war; 

The old man dreaded that from that day on 
He’d never see again his valiant son. 


Giv’s Journey to Turkestan 
Following his father’s orders Giv set out like a raging lion and reached the 
borders of Turan. He spoke in Turki to everyone he met who was alone, asking 


for some sign of Kay Khosrow. If the man answered, “I know nothing about 
him,” Giv quickly killed him, dragged him aside with his lariat, and summarily 
buried him in the earth. He did this so that no one would know of his secret 
mission or hear his name or news about him. He took one of the men he met 
with him as a guide, going watchfully ahead with him and not telling him of his 
intentions for a while. One day he said to him, “I want to ask you something in 
confidence; if I find you’re honest and that you’ve cleansed your heart of 
falsehood, I’ll give you anything you want from me, even my body itself.” The 
man answered, “There’s plenty of knowledge to be had, but it’s parceled out 
among different people; if I know about whatever it is you’re asking, you won’t 
find my tongue empty of an answer.” Giv said, “Where is Kay Khosrow now? 
You have to tell me the truth.” The man replied, “I’ve never heard such a name.” 
When Giv heard this answer from his guide he drew his sword and cut off the 
man’s head. 

Like a madman then Giv roamed about Turan, hoping to find some sign of 
the prince. This continued for seven years; his waist was made sore by his 
leather sword belt, his drink was brackish water, his food was herbs or the flesh 
of onagers, and his clothes were their skins. In this way he wandered over the 
mountains and deserts, suffering pain and hardship, and bereft of companions. 


Giv the Son of Gudarz Finds Kay Khosrow 
One day, beset with anxieties and apprehension, he came to the edge of a famous 
wooded area. Sadly, he entered its outskirts; the world was beautiful, but his 
heart was filled with sorrow. He saw the green ground and a stream flowing with 
water; everything there suggested rest and sleep. He dismounted, let his horse 
wander freely, and with his heart full of disquiet lay down. He said, “It’s as 
though some foul demon inflicted that dream on my valiant father. I can find no 
trace of Kay Khosrow here; what am I doing wearing myself out like this? My 
friends are fighting in battles or drinking at banquets; one is seeking fame and 
another pleasure, but my fate is like throwing walnuts to get them to stick on a 
dome. It’s crazy the way I push at my soul, so that it’s bent like a bow. It’s as 
though Khosrow’s mother never gave birth to him, or if she did Fate threw him 
to the winds. All that my searching has brought me is pain and hardship; 
compared to me a man who dies of poison is fortunate!” 

Sorrow filled his mind as he wandered through the landscape, looking for the 
prince. He saw a bright stream flickering from far away and beside it a 
handsome young man, cypress-tall, a goblet filled with wine in his hand, and 


with a chaplet of sweet-smelling colorful flowers on his head. God-given farr 
was apparent in his stature, and wisdom in his mien. You would have said that 
he was seated with a torque about his neck on an ivory throne and that there was 
a jeweled crown on his head. His face gave off the scent of benevolence, and his 
hair had the splendor of a crown. To himself Giv said, “This can be no one but 
the king; such a face is worthy only of the throne.” He dismounted and ran 
quickly toward the figure; as this hero who had sought the king for so long 
approached him the knots of his sorrow were loosened, the treasure he had 
sought was before him. As Kay Khosrow looked up from beside the stream and 
saw him he smiled, and his heart beat faster with joy. To himself he said, “This 
must be Giv; this land has no hero who looks as this man does. He has come in 
search of me to take me to Iran, so that I shall reign there.” Giv said to him, 
“Proud warrior, wisdom would know your name. I think you are the son of 
Seyavash and a discerning descendant of the Kayanids.” The prince replied to 
him, “And you are the famous Giv, the son of Gudarz.” Giv said to him, “Lord 
of the righteous, may you always know joy and glory! Who told you tales about 
Gudarz? Who gave you information about Keshvad and Giv?” Kay Khosrow 
said to him, “Lion-warrior, my noble mother told me this from my father; when 
by God’s grace he gave her his last advice and told her that evil would then 
come to him, he said: ‘At last Kay Khosrow will appear and bring the key that 
will open all shackles. When he is grown into a hero who can rule the world, 
proud Giv will come from Iran and take him to Iran’s throne, and to its nobles 
and lion-wartriors. His manly chivalry will set the world on a new footing, and he 
will take revenge for my death.’” 

Giv said to him, “You are first among the valiant, but what sign do you have 
of your farr and greatness? Seyavash had a distinguishing birthmark, like a spot 
of pitch on a rose petal. Open your clothing and show me your arm, so that all 
may see the sign.” The king uncovered his flesh, and Giv looked at the black 
sign, which was an inheritance from Kay Qobad and a true mark of a Kayanid 
lineage. When Giv saw the sign he made his obeisance before him, and wept, 
and spoke silently to himself. The prince of the earth took him in his arms, 
praising and thanking him in his joy. He asked about Iran, the royal throne, 
Gudarz, and Rostam who is ever eager for vengeance. Giv said to him: “Great 
sovereign of the world, noble, astute, and favored by Fate, if God who knows 
both good and evil bestowed all paradise on me, made me king of the world’s 
seven climes, and gave dominion and the royal crown into my hands, my heart 
would not know such happiness as it knows now in seeing your face, here in 


Turan. Who in Iran knows whether I’m still alive, or whether I’ve been through 
water or fire, or have seen Seyavash alive and questioned him about his sorrows 
and suffering. Thanks be to God who has brought such cruel hardships to a 
happy and prosperous end!” 

As they both set off from the wooded area Khosrow asked after King Kavus, 
and about the seven years of pain and distress that Giv had spent, of where he 
had taken shelter, how he had slept, and what he had eaten. Giv told the king of 
the fate God had allotted him; he described Gudarz’s dream and his own long 
tribulations, his food, clothes, and miseries, as well as where he had rested and 
taken comfort. He told him how the years had lessened Kavus’s farr, and how 
the loss of his son had made him weak and incapable; how glory had departed 
from Iran, and how the whole country faced ruin. Khosrow’s heart was wrung 
for him, and his cheeks burned like fire. He said to him, “Now Fortune will give 
you peace and comfort in exchange for your long sufferings. Be as a father to 
me; tell no one of this, and we shall see what Fate will reveal to us.” 

The king of kings sat on Giv’s horse, with the hero Giv going before him 
with a drawn Indian sword in his hand. Watchful as they went forward, Giv 
unhesitatingly slashed through the neck of anyone they met and buried his body 
in the mud. They went to Seyavashgerd, and there, when their hearts and minds 
were refreshed, they made Farigis their confidant. Secretly the three of them 
agreed to set off clandestinely, keeping away from warriors who might be eager 
for a skirmish. Farigis said, “If we delay we shall only make our situation more 
perilous. If Afrasyab hears of this he won’t eat or sleep; he’!l come after us as if 
he were the White Demon, and then our hearts can despair of life’s sweetness; 
no one will ever see any of us alive again, either openly or in hiding. The world 
is filled with our adversaries and enemies, and all this realm is the abode of 
Ahriman; if that shameless man learns of us he’|I set fire to the whole country. 
There is a high meadowland not far from here, unfrequented by Turan’s 
horsemen. You and Giv must go there at dawn with this saddle and black bridle; 
climb up, and you’!l see a mountain pasture as beautiful as the joys of spring. 
There’s a streambed there flowing with water, and simply to see it revives a 
person’s soul. As the sun rises to its height in the heavens, and a warrior thinks 
of rest, all the herds in that pasture will come to the stream to drink, and among 
them will be Behzad, your father’s horse. Then you must show the saddle and 
bridle to Behzad, and when he is calm you must go close to him and show him 
your face, speak to him, and gently stroke him with your hand. When Seyavash 


despaired of this world, and the bright face of day grew dark for him, he said to 
his Behzad, who is the color of night, ‘From now on, bow to no authority 

But like the wind itself be wild and free— 

Live in the upland fields, let no man tame you, 

Until my son, Khosrow, arrives to claim you; 

Then be his mount, traverse the world, and beat 

His enemies to dust beneath your feet.’” 


The prince mounted Giv’s horse, and Giv walked ahead of him. They began 
to climb, looking always upward like men who seek for a solution to their 
troubles. The herd of horses came down to the narrow stream, and when they 
had drunk their fill turned to leave. Behzad glanced up then to see who was 
there, and a cold sigh came from his vitals. He saw the leopard skin on which 
Seyavash had sat, the long stirrups, and the poplar wood pommel of the saddle. 
He stood there motionless, his hooves in the stream, and when Kay Khosrow 
saw that Behzad was calm he hurried forward with the saddle. He stroked 
Behzad’s eyes and nose, patted his back and mane, and rubbed his hide; he 
slipped the bridle on and placed the saddle on his back, thinking with sorrow of 
his father as he did so. When he sat in the saddle and gripped Behzad’s flanks 
with his thighs the mighty animal leaped forward. He sped away like the wind 
and disappeared from Giv’s sight; Giv was alarmed and astonished, and 
murmured the name of God in his bewilderment. He said to himself, “This must 
be Ahriman who’s tricked our eyes 

And like a horse appeared here in disguise; 
Now Khosrow’s surely dead, and all my trials 
And treasure are defeated by his wiles.” 


When Khosrow had traversed half the mountainside he tugged on the black 
reins and stood waiting until Giv had caught up with him; then this perspicacious 
king said to him, “Would it be right for me to bring into the open what my 
warrior companion was thinking?” Giv replied, “Great king, it is right for you to 
know what is secret; you have God’s farr with you, and you are descended from 
the Kayanid kings; you can penetrate into the center of a hair.” Khosrow said, 
“In your heart, you had doubts about this nobly born horse; you thought, 
‘Ahriman has tricked this young man; now he’s gone, and all my trials have 
been wasted; my heart is sad and the demon rejoices.’” Giv dismounted before 
his warrior king and said, “May blessings light upon you night and day, and may 


the hearts of those who hate you be torn from their bodies, since you possess 
greatness, splendor, good judgment, and farr, and God has given you both ability 
and a noble lineage.” 

They set off down the mountainside toward the palace, their minds filled with 
anxieties, their souls seeking the way forward. When they reached Farigis they 
discussed the long journey ahead, considering how their plan could be kept 
secret so that no one should learn of their actions. When Farigis saw Behzad she 
wept so copiously that her tears hid her face; she laid her two cheeks against his 
mane and chest, remembering Seyavash’s sufferings as she did so. When she had 
shed her tears, her thoughts quickly turned to the wealth she possessed. There 
was a treasury in her palace of which only she was aware, a store of gold coins, 
together with many rubies and other jewels; there were maces and barding for 
horses there too, as well as daggers and heavy swords. With a heavy heart, her 
face bathed in blood-stained tears, she opened the treasury door in front of her 
son and said to Giv, “You have suffered a great deal, now see which precious 
stones in this treasury you desire, which of these gold coins and royal jewels, 
rubies, and gem-encrusted crowns. This treasure is yours, I am only its 
chatelaine, because it is you who have risked your life and been through such 
trials.” The hero kissed the ground before her and said, “Noblest of queens, you 
make the earth like springtime in paradise, and the sky distributes good and ill as 
you would wish; may the world be your son’s slave, may the heads of those who 
wish you ill be cut off.” 

Giv looked at the wealth and selected Seyavash’s armor, as well as the finer 
jewels, helmets, strong barding, and weaponry suitable for a chieftain. Then he 
sealed the treasury door and prepared for their journey through the wastelands. 
When all was ready they set saddles on their swift horses, and Farigis covered 
her head in a helmet. The three of them set off like the wind, traveling as quickly 
and as secretly as they could toward Iran. 


Piran Viseh Learns of Kay Khosrow’s Flight 

But the town was filled with talk of Khosrow’s journey toward Iran. The gossip 
didn’t remain hidden for long; someone came to Piran and said, “The great 
warrior Giv came from Iran to the wise hero, Prince Khosrow, and the two of 
them together with Farigis have set off for Iran.” When Piran heard this he was 
saddened, and trembled like the leaves on a tree. From his chieftains he chose 
Golbad, the hero Nastihan, and Pulad, and ordered that three hundred horsemen 
be made ready for battle. At their head he placed Nastihan and Barman, who 


could say to a charging elephant “Halt,” and it would do so. He said, “Spit Giv’s 
head on a spear, bury Farigis in the earth, and bind that wretch Kay Khosrow in 
chains. His presence has brought misfortune to this land, and if that malevolent 
man should cross the water who knows what disasters he will bring down on this 
country and its noblemen?” The troop of young warriors, with their two wary 
commanders, set out in pursuit. 

Worn out by their journey and the trials of the road, Farigis and her sorely 
tried son had lain down to sleep, and Giv was their sentinel. The two slept while 
Giv, his heart filled with anger and pain, kept his eyes on the road and watched 
for approaching horsemen. He was helmeted and wore his body armor; his heart 
was Valiant and his body was ready for death. 

When, in the distance, he saw the horsemen’s dust, he gripped and drew his 
sword, and yelled a war cry as loud as clouds’ thunder, one that would have 
darkened with terror the soul of a savage lion. As quickly as windblown dust he 
bore down on the horsemen, sending up dust that obscured the earth; now with 
his sword, now with his mace, he brought down fire on his enemies, until his 
mighty blows had blunted their eagerness for battle. So filled with rage was his 
heart that a great river would have seemed a mere stream to him, but now his 
enemies surrounded him, a press of warriors around a raging lion. The thronging 
lances made the battlefield seem like a reed bed, hiding from sight the sun and 
moon, but the lion’s heart was enraged in the midst of this reed bed, and with the 
blood he shed he made it seem like a winepress. Giv slew so many that the 
remaining horsemen were overcome with dread, and the warrior Golbad said to 
Nastihan, “He’s like a mountain of granite that’s grown shoulders and a neck.” 
Then wounded and worn out they made their way back to proud Piran. The 
caves and plain were strewn with bodies, and the blood made the ground as red 
as a Judas-tree’s blossom; the horsemen’s cries and the wailing of their brass 
bugles echoed in the mountains, as though the crags’ hearts were wrenched from 
their places. 

Brave Giv returned to Kay Khosrow, his breast covered in blood, his hands 
like a lion’s claws, and said to him: “My king, may you rejoice! May wisdom be 

Your guide, and may you live eternally! 

A mighty army followed us, led by 

Golbad and Nastihan, and now they fly— 

Those who are still alive—back whence they came, 
And men would weep to see their wounds and shame. 
Rostam aside, I think no Persian can 


Ride out to fight against me, man to man!” 


Khosrow of the pure faith rejoiced at his success, praising him and calling 
down God’s blessings upon him. Then they ate what food they could find and 
hurried on across the trackless wastelands. 

When the wounded, wailing, weeping Turks reached Piran he was astonished 
and said to Golbad, “This is a wonder that shouldn’t be kept secret. What did 
you do to Khosrow, and where is Giv? How did the encounter go? Tell me the 
truth.” Golbad said to him, “My lord, if I tell you what brave Giv did to our 
watriors, your heart will have had enough of the battlefield. You’ve seen me 
often enough with an army of men, and you’ve approved of my fighting. That 
famous warrior must have withstood a thousand blows from my mace; you’d 
have said his head must have become an anvil, that his forearms were an 
elephant’s tusks. I’ve seen Rostam fight many times, and I’ve heard much about 
great warriors, but I’ve never seen anyone withstand such blows in the give and 
take of battle. If our maces had been made of wax and our horsemen’s lances 
fashioned from leopard skin it would not have been surprising if his chest and 
shoulders were smashed into pieces. But he remained constantly fierce and 
nimble, bellowing his war cry again and again like a trumpeting elephant.” 

Piran leaped up and said to him, “Enough! Aren’t you ashamed to talk in this 
way? Words like these don’t become a horseman; don’t ever think of fighting 
with warriors again! You and Nastihan went off with an army strutting like male 
lions, and now you’re making Giv out to be a maddened elephant; your name 
has become contemptible among warriors. When Afrasyab hears about this he’ Il 
fling his crown away to know that two brave, mounted chieftains together with a 
whole army worthy of war turned tail and fled from a single horseman who slew 
so many of Turan’s brave soldiers. It’s ridicule and scorn you deserve, not a 
standard-bearer and war elephants and kettledrums.” 


Piran Viseh Pursues Giv, Kay Khosrow, and Farigis 

Piran chose a thousand renowned horsemen, all eager for war. He said to them, 
“Quickly, saddle your swift horses and night and day ride like lions giving 
chase; never pause to loosen your waists’ straps and rest, because if Giv and 
Khosrow reach Iran the very women there will become like lions. Then neither 
earth nor water will remain in this land, and Afrasyab’s heart will seethe with 
rage.” At his words they roused themselves and night and day rode in hot 
pursuit, never pausing for rest, and Afrasyab was informed of their quest. So 


they went forward until they reached a deep river, where the group became 
scattered like cloth that has unraveled; the channel was deep and narrow, and 
there was no way to follow Giv across. 

On the opposite shore Giv and the prince were asleep while Farigis sat 
keeping watch. As she peered forward she saw the Turnian chieftain’s banner 
and ran to Giv to tell him, cutting short the sleepers’ slumber. She said to him, 
“You have suffered long and hard, but you must get up, a day of danger has 
come to you; if they find you they’! kill you, and our hearts will be wrung with 
sorrow. My son and I will weep for you, and they’ |! take us in chains before 
Afrasyab, and then I don’t know what harm will come to us; no one knows the 
secrets of the high heavens.” Giv said to her, “O noblest of queens, why have 
you distressed your soul in this way? Go with your son up that high mountain, 
and don’t give another thought to Piran and his army; the Lord of Victory is my 
support, and Good Fortune’s star is with me.” Kay Khosrow said to him: “Great 
warrior, this business of mine has weighed on you for long enough. I have 
escaped from catastrophe’s snare, and you should not rush now into the dragon’s 
maw so recklessly. I must go out on the plain, and my sword shall make their 
blood gush as high as the sun.” Giv said to him, “Great king, the world has need 
of your crown. My father is a champion warrior, as am I, and our lineage and 
souls have never turned toward sovereignty. I have seventy-eight brothers, but 
the world will be at an end if your name perishes. There are many champions but 
few kings. What do I mean, ‘few’? I can see none. If I am killed there are others 
to take my place, and the king’s crown will remain unharmed; but if you are 
destroyed in some distant land, I see no one left who is worthy of the crown and 
throne; my seven years’ suffering will be thrown to the winds, and I shall bring 
shame on my family. Go up into the heights and watch the army; the World 
Creator will be my support.” 

He put on his armor, mounted his high-stepping horse, and came forward like 
a lion. On one side there was the chieftain, and on the other the army; between 
them ran the river blocking the way. Giv gave a shout like springtime thunder, 
asking for the army’s leader. Piran came forward in fury, cursing, and said, “You 
are evil and of an evil race; you’ve come to this battlefield alone, foolhardily 
pitting yourself against an army, but your food will be the spearheads that pierce 
you, and hawks’ talons will be your shroud. A single horseman can be an iron 
mountain, but a thousand men will swarm about him like ants, shredding his 
armor into pieces and dragging his carcass through the dust. The savage lion 
says, ‘Fate counts a deer’s breaths till the fatal day 


It meets with me, and must become my prey.’ 


Now Fate has brought you here to me, in the sight of this great host of men.” 
Giv said to him, “Brave lion-lord, you should come down into the water, and 
then you’ll see what fate this single horseman will bring down on your head. 
You’re a thousand, and I’m but one renowned brave warrior, but even so I’ll lay 
your army’s chieftain low. When I lift my massive mace I’ll trample all your 
army’s heads beneath my feet.” Piran’s heart was enraged at what he heard, and 
his eyes filled with tears. He lifted his mace to his shoulder and urged his horse 
forward, gripping him with his thighs. Like a boat he slipped from dry land into 
the water, entrusting himself to God as he did so. Giv made no sudden 
movement until the warrior chieftain emerged from the river, and then he tugged 
at his reins, declining to give battle, and fled until he had drawn Piran away from 
his army; then Giv readied his mace on his saddle. His adversary came closer, 
and the world darkened as if night had fallen. Still drawing away from Piran, Giv 
loosed his lariat from his saddle-straps then suddenly turned and flung it so that 
it fell over his opponent’s neck, and he was able to pull him from his horse. He 
drove him on foot further away from the river, then threw him to the ground, 
bound his arms, and despoiled him of his armor. Next, he took Piran’s banner in 
his fist and returned to the banks of the river, which was called Golzaryun. When 
the Turks saw their commander’s banner they involuntarily crowded forward. A 
great cry went up, a mingled sound of voices, bugles, fifes, and Indian cymbals; 
seeing this Giv came down to the water, like a boat being launched, and lifted 
his mace to his shoulder, while the opposing army gazed at him in wonder. His 
reins became light, his stirrups heavy, while the watching warriors quailed in 
fear and Giv laid about him with mace and sword, bringing disaster down on 
their heads. The plain became so piled with bodies that it was like a mountain, 
and one man was able to strike terror into the hearts of an army of brave 
watriors. They fled, showing him their backs, as a flock of sheep flees before a 
lion. Then he recrossed the river with so little concern that you’d have said he 
had not even dreamed of an enemy army. 

He galloped back to Piran and was ready to cut off his head. But he dragged 
him on foot, forcing him to run like a man who is half-conscious, and when they 
reached Kay Khosrow he said, “This evil-hearted, faithless wretch is in the lion’s 
maw now; it was at his word that Seyavash was killed, and as he was thrown to 
the winds so must this man be too.” Piran made his obeisance before the king, 
wailing and kissing the ground. He said, “O king, you seek for knowledge, and 


you are as asun among the people. You know how I have suffered, and how I 
argued with my king on your behalf. It would be right if I found refuge with 
your farr and fortune, and were saved from this dragon’s clutches.” Giv looked 
at Kay Khosrow, to see what orders his king would give, and then he caught 
sight of Farigis, whose eyes were filled with tears, her tongue with curses against 
Afrasyab. She said to Giv, “Great warrior, you have undergone many trials and 
come on a long journey, but you should realize that this aged chieftain, who is 
wise, righteous, and possessed of a noble soul, was, after the just God Himself, 
the cause of my being saved from a bloody death; his kindness was like a curtain 
that kept my soul safe, and he asks for quarter now because of this.” Giv said to 
her, “O noblest of queens, and may our young king’s soul flourish, I have sworn 
a great oath by the moon, the crown, and the exalted king’s throne, that if this 
man falls into my hands on the day of battle, I shall make the ground as red with 
his blood as the blossoms of the Judas-tree.” Kay Khosrow said to him, “My 
lion-warrior, you must fulfill 

The oath you swore, you cannot flout God’s will. 

Ready your heart to satisfy this vow 

And with a dagger pierce his earlobe now, 

And as his blood drips on the ground you’ll see 

Vengeance and love united equally.” 


Giv took his dagger and pierced Piran’s ear with it, and said no more angry 
words about his oath. Piran said to the king, “How can I go back to my army 
without a horse? Order him to give me back my horse, then you will have 
returned to me both my life and my wealth.” Giv said to him, “You were the 
bravest in your army, how is it you’ve become so weak on the battlefield? I’1l 
give you your horse on condition that I bind your arms and only Golshahr shall 
undo them, no one else; she is the first of your wives, and she it is who binds 
you, skin and bone!” Piran swore to this, and with his oath that only Golshahr 
should free his arms he purchased both his horse and his life. Giv gave him his 
horse, bound his arms, and sent him on his way. 


Afrasyab Learns That Kay Khosrow and Farigis Have Fled When 
Afrasyab learned of the army’s rout, the sun’s brightness was 
darkened for him. He had bugles blown and drums beaten and an 
army mustered, and set off like a raging fire from his palace. He 


sped like an arrow from a bow, covering two stages of the journey in 
the time it takes for one. He brought his men to the battlefield where 
Golbad had fought, and saw that his forces were scattered and the 
land littered with bodies. He said, “This chieftain came here with his 
army, and no one was aware that he’d left Iran with such a huge 
force of men? Who has been giving that devil information about us? 
May no one ever put up with Piran’s advice again! Dust should 
have been that boy’s tutor, in the grave, and then my two eyes 
wouldn’t have been confronted with such a day as this.” Sepahram 
said to him, “If your heart is worried about an enemy army it 
needn’t be; Giv the son of Gudarz came, and that was all; we didn’t 
see a single other horseman with him. Our army was defeated by 
one man, and now Giv, Farigis, and the prince have fled.” 

As Afrasyab was listening to Sepahram, a group of men appeared led by 
Piran, whose head, beard, and shoulders were covered with blood. Afrasyab 
thought that he had found Giv and was hurrying back after defeating him, but as 
Piran drew closer it was clear that he was sorely wounded. Afrasyab saw that he 
was strapped to his saddle as firmly as a rock, and that his arms were tied with a 
cord behind his back. He questioned Piran, and was astonished and distressed by 
what he saw and heard. Piran said, “My king, no raging lion, or ravening wolf, 
or savage tiger could be as Giv is when he fights alone. The way he fights on the 
day of battle a sea monster would quail in fear from him. He began by laying 
about him with his mace, which he wielded as though it were a blacksmith’s 
hammer; he rode and fought with such skill that our horsemen were 
dumbfounded. More mace and sword blows than drops in a rainstorm rained 
down on his head, but he bore himself as if his saddle were a bed of roses where 
he lay asleep. In the end all our men turned tail, and there was no one left to face 
him but me. He fled from me, but as he did so he turned and flung his lariat and 
noosed me with it; I lost consciousness and fell headlong in the dust. He 
dismounted and bound my arms, and tied me to my saddle. He made me swear 
by my life, by the king’s head, by the sun and moon, by God and the throne and 
crown that I’d ask no one to loosen my arms until I reached my home. I swore 
this because I saw that good fortune had deserted me; I don’t know what secret 
reason there is that the heavens wish to withdraw their love from me so 
completely.” 


When Afrasyab heard this anger filled his eyes with tears; he roared with rage 
and pushed aside Piran, who writhed in shame and said nothing. Wind filled 
Afrasyab’s brain; he let loose a stream of oaths and curses, and said, “Even if 
Giv and that devil’s spawn become clouds thundering in a mighty wind I’ll bring 
them down from their cloudy heights”—and here he grasped his mace in his fist 
—“and slash their waists in two with my sword and feed them in pieces to the 
fishes. Kay Khosrow wants to get to Iran, but tell me what Farigis is doing with 
him?” He set off in fury for the Oxus, trailing his skirts in blood. He said to 
Human: “Make haste now, hurry! Don’t draw rein before 

We reach the confines of the river’s shore— 
If Khosrow crosses, all our toil and pain 

Will be as wind that scours an empty plain. 

In ancient times a wise and righteous sage 
Once said that when the royal lineage 

Of Kay Qobad and that of Tur unite, 

A king will come from these two clans to smite 
Turan’s wide land, and all our cities then 

Will be but thorn brakes and bereft of men.” 


Kay Khosrow, His Mother, and Giv Reach the Shore of the Oxus 
Giv and Kay Khosrow had reached the river and were impatient to get across, 
but a squabble broke out with the tollkeeper. They asked for a pilot who had a 
boat “worthy to bear Kay Khosrow.” The tollkeeper answered, “A king or 
servant’s all the same to me, 

To get across you have to pay a fee.” 


Giv said to him, “Ask whatever you wish; get us across, there’s an army after 
us.” The man said, 


“In that case getting you across won’t be 

A simple matter for a paltry fee; 

If I’m to get you to the other shore 

I fancy one of these, one out of four— 

I want his armor, that black horse he’s on, 

The woman, or his crown. You choose which one.” 


Giv said, “You’re out of your mind, talk sense you fool! When this man 
becomes king you’ll get your fare share of the world’s goods. You say you want 
the king’s mother as your fee, or the king’s crown, or his horse black Behzad 
who outruns the wind, or his armor that’s proof against water and fire, that 
neither lance nor Indian sword nor arrow can pierce, armor that you don’t even 
know how to strap on yourself—you want this as your fee for crossing a river! 
We’ll manage the river by ourselves and you can keep your boat; sovereignty 
will be ours and hardship will be yours!” 

Then he turned to Kay Khosrow and said, “If you are indeed Kay Khosrow 
you’ ll experience nothing but kindness from the river. Once Feraydun had 
crossed the River Arvand, he was within hailing distance of the throne. Through 
his glory and farr the world from end to end became his slave. What have you to 
fear if you’re the king of Iran, the lord of its brave horsemen and lion-warriors? 
With your farr, your greatness, and your beauty how can this water hold you 
back? If I am drowned, or your mother is, you should not take the loss too hard. 
Did not your mother bear you because the imperial throne needed a ruler? My 
mother too bore me for the sake of you, so do not take these things to heart. I am 
certain that Afrasyab is hurrying to this riverbank, where he will string me up 
alive on a gibbet, and feed you, my prince, and Farigis to the fishes here, or have 
you trampled beneath his horses’ hooves.” Kay Khosrow replied, “All this is 
true. Enough! My refuge is with God who answers our prayers.” He came down 
from his tireless horse, and laid his face against the ground, and prayed, “You 
are my support and my refuge, my way in the water and on dry land.” Khosrow 
urged his black horse into the water, and like a boat crossed the river and 
reached the toll-post opposite; Farigis and brave Giv came after him, emerging 
triumphant from the Oxus’s current. When all three had reached the opposite 
bank safely, Khosrow, whose determination never faltered, bathed his head and 
body and prayed in the reed beds there, giving praise and thanks to God. Seeing 
the three arrive at the other side, the boatman was amazed and said to his friends, 
“This is incredible, astonishing, 

The Oxus is in spate now since it’s spring 
And yet these three with heavy armor ride 
Into the waves and reach the other side; 

A wise man would have said no man alive 
Could brave this mighty current and survive! ” 


Then he regretted his thoughtless words and saw that he had ruined his 
chances in the world by saying them. He filled his boat with what goods he had, 
hoisted the sail, and crossed the river. Once on the opposite shore he went to the 
prince to apologize; he laid all his gifts before him—a bow, a lariat, and a 
helmet. Giv said to him, “You’re a stupid ox; you said the water would swallow 
anyone who entered it. This great prince asked you for a boat and you wouldn’t 
give it to him. Damn your gifts! You’ll remember today on the day of 
vengeance!” The boatman returned humiliated and in his heart he bade his life 
farewell. As he reached the tollhouse the Turanian army arrived at the same 
moment. When Afrasyab came down to the riverside he could see no one there 
and no boats. He yelled at the toll collector, “How did that devil get across the 
river?” He answered, “Great king, my father was toll collector here as I am, but I 
never saw or heard of anyone who could treat the Oxus like dry land. It’s 
springtime, the river’s full of cresting waves, and if you enter it there’s no 
escape; but those three got across on their horses; you’d say the air was carrying 
them across.” Afrasyab told him to hurry up and launch a boat, but Human said 
to him, “My lord, consider, don’t let a fire flare up in you. If you cross over to 
Iran with these horsemen, you’ll be entering the lion’s maw, you’! be caught in 
its claws. You’ll be facing men like Gudarz, and mammoth-bodied Rostam, Tus 
and Gorgin, and all their entourage, exactly those men who’ve exasperated you, 
whose lion claws you’ve encountered here. On this side of the river you rule 
everything as far as China and Machin; here the sun and moon, Saturn, and the 
Pleiades are yours. Protect Turan and its royal throne, and there need be no fear 
of harm coming to us from Iran.” With his heart seething with blood Afrasyab 
and his men turned back from the river. 


Giv and Kay Khosrow Reach Iran 

When Kay Khosrow arrived in Zam with Giv, some there were happy and some 
despondent. Giv sent out messengers in every direction with letters saying, “The 
army’s leader, chieftain of the race of Kay Qobad, has come in triumph from 
Turan.” From among Zam’s noblemen he chose a messenger who was a good 
horseman, wise, loyal, and blessed by fortune; he told him all that had happened 
and said, “Go as quickly as you can from here to Isfahan and tell Gudarz, ‘World 
warrior, when you slept your soul was awake.’ Tell him that Kay Khosrow has 
arrived in Zam, and that even the winds sought to do him no harm.” The 
messenger took a letter from him for King Kavus and set out; his swift mount 
leaped forward like fire, and drops of sweat flew from him as he galloped. Giv’s 


messenger went first to Gudarz and when he handed over the letter he brought 
Gudarz touched it to his head, cursed Afrasyab, and wept for Seyavash. As the 
messenger continued on his way to King Kavus, sweat poured from his horse’s 
neck, and when he reached the king’s court a shout of joy went up from those 
present. The army’s commander in chief called the messenger forward and 
sprinkled jewels on Giv’s letter to him. News was given to the world that the 
king’s grandson, the world-seeker Kay Khosrow, had arrived in Iran. The world 
was decorated in celebration, and everywhere musicians were summoned; from 
every side nobles poured into Isfahan. Gudarz decorated his great castle with 
royal brocade hung everywhere; he placed there a throne finished with gold and 
embossed with various kinds of jewels, and laid out broad bracelets, a crown and 
earrings, together with a torque studded with royal gems. He embellished his 
court with pearls and jewels worthy of a king, and had the whole city decorated, 
including the main square. Then he mounted his horse and together with the 
assembled nobles rode out eighty parasangs to greet the young prince, according 
to their custom. When Giv and the prince came into sight the horsemen 
dismounted; seeing the prince and Giv in the distance, the chieftain’s eyes 
flowed with tears, and he heaved a deep sigh as he remembered the sufferings of 
Seyavash. He hailed the king, calling down God’s blessings upon him, and said, 
“May your heart be wise and Fortune bring you victory; I would not exchange 
the sight of you for a country or a throne. May the eyes of those who wish you ill 
be far from you, and may Seyavash’s soul be filled with light. God who rules the 
world is my witness that the sight of you is now my guide, and if I had seen 
Seyavash alive it would not have delighted my heart like this.” One by one the 
nobles of Iran prostrated themselves before him and returned rejoicing in their 
good fortune. Gudarz kissed Giv’s eyes and head, and said to him, “You have 
drawn a heaven out of hiding; you gave up all thought of rest and fought, and 
when it was necessary you watched and waited.” 

Cheerful and at ease they came to the chieftain’s home where they stayed for 
a week with wine cups in their hands, and then on the eighth day, with happiness 
in their hearts, they set out for Kavus’s city. 


Kay Khosrow Approaches Kay Kavus’s Throne 

As Kay Khosrow arrived at the king’s court the world was filled with scents and 
colors and splendor. Every place was decorated according to royal custom, with 
doors and roofs and walls adorned with valuables; on all sides there were 
musicians sitting, and the scents of rose water, wine, musk, and saffron filled the 


air; the horses’ flanks were soaked in musk and wine, and they trod upon sugar 
and gold coins that had been scattered before them. When Kay Kavus saw Kay 
Khosrow’s face, tears dropped from his eyelashes to his cheeks; he descended 
from his throne, and laid his eyes and face against the prince’s eyes. The young 
man paid homage to him, and then the two of them returned to the throne. The 
king questioned Kay Khosrow at length about the Turks and the Turkish throne. 
He replied, “That foolish man delivers the face of the earth over to evil; he 
caressed me and cajoled me in various ways, but I kept my good sense and 
abilities hidden. I feared what he was capable of, and my dread made me 
prevaricate. He might be a cloud raining down pearls, but how can a man be 
friends with his father’s murderer? No priest would say I had acted righteously if 
I were loyal to such a man, when my father lay beneath the earth. And now Giv 
has been through many hardships, searching for me throughout Turan and 
suffering as he did so, and all this was to bring me out of that land. Two 
chieftains with their armies came after us like fire, and then I saw Giv perform 
feats that no idol worshipper in India could see a maddened elephant do; I 
thought no crocodile could rise up from a river to fight as he did. And when 
Piran came forward like a lion, riding like the wind and ready for combat, 
entering the river like some water monster, as if the earth were burning with the 
heat of battle, Giv flung his lariat over Piran’s helmet and shoulders and noosed 
him. Great king, I interceded for him, because my father’s sufferings had made 
him heartsick, and he had never spoken ill of me, and if I hadn’t Giv would have 
slashed his head from his shoulders. Giv never tired of wielding his ox-headed 
mace until we reached the shore of the Oxus, and then in his fury he crossed it 
giving no thought to either a boat or the current. A man who has acted as 
heroically as he has done should live eternally in happiness and with his soul at 
peace.” 

Keshvad had a splendid palace and garden at Estakhr, where Gudarz and Kay 
Khosrow went after the conversation before Kavus’s throne. When Kay 
Khosrow arrived at this rose garden arrayed in gold he was shown to a golden 
throne, and all the nobles present called down God’s blessings upon him. All of 
Iran’s chieftains swore loyalty to him, except for Tus the son of Nozar, dressed 
in his golden boots, with war drums under his command, who had charge of the 
Kaviani banner and who turned his head aside. Gudarz was angered by this and 
sent lionhearted Giv to give him a straightforward message; he said to Giv: “Tell 
Tus the son of Nozar it’s a crime 

To stir up strife at such a joyful time. 


Say, ‘Iran’s lion-chiefs have sworn to be 

His subjects and to serve him loyally— 

What demon has corrupted you with pride 
And made you turn your angry head aside? 
Can you not see God’s farr is with him now? 
If you’re disloyal to this prince I vow 

Between us there’ll be bitter enmity; 

Giv speaks; the words he says belong to me.’” 


Giv left his father and harsh words filled his heart. He came to the army’s 
general Tus and said, “What demon’s fathered this opinion on you?” When he 
heard him Tus replied, “It’s not right to speak to me with such contempt. In Iran, 
after mammoth-bodied Rostam, I am the foremost warrior, the grandson of the 
brave king Manuchehr, who subdued the world with his sword. I hunt savage 
lions, split open the elephant’s heart and the leopard’s claws. You’ve confronted 
me with this ceremony that gives the world into a new ruler’s hands, but I shall 
not agree to it. Don’t tell me tales about Khosrow; if we appoint as king 
someone descended from Afrasyab our good fortune will be at an end. I don’t 
want a king from Pashang’s race; a flock isn’t happy to be led by a leopard, and 
this will be the fruit of your labors because Khosrow is young and headstrong. A 
man who is to be king must have skill and lineage, God’s farr, and faith. 
Fariborz is King Kavus’s son, he is a man who is worthy of the throne; he has no 
enemy blood in him, and he possesses farr, strength, a good reputation, and he is 
just.” 

Tus’s understanding and faith seemed foolish to Giv; he turned in anger and 
went back to Gudarz and said, “Farr and wisdom are no friends of Tus. You’d 
say his two eyes are blind; his choice falls on Fariborz, even though no one 
becomes the palace as Kay Khosrow does when he is seated on the throne, 
crowned and wearing the royal earrings.” Gudarz was infuriated and said, “Of all 
our nobles, the world would be well rid of Tus.” Accompanied by the din of 
drums, Gudarz led his forty-eight sons and grandsons out from the palace to the 
public square. Twelve thousand warlike horsemen, with their horses covered in 
barding, were under his command. And from the other side came the chieftain 
Tus to bind war drums on his elephants; he led a multitude of warriors, and from 
their midst rose the Kaviani banner. When he saw Gudarz with such a huge host 
darkening the face of the sun and moon, and valiant Kay Khosrow, the crown 
upon his head, seated on a turquoise throne glittering like the Nile and strapped 


to a massive elephant’s back, with two hundred elephants surrounding him, his 
throne radiant as moonlight and light flashing from the rubies in his crown, 
Tus’s heart grew melancholy, and he thought to himself, “If I provoke a fight 
today many men from both sides will be killed. The quarrel should not be here; 
this would only please Afrasyab and reawaken the Turks’ good fortune; the 
imperial throne would fall into their hands, and our days of glory would be at an 
end.” He sent a wise and cautious messenger to Kay Kavus saying, “If any one 
of us on this battlefield should notch a poplar wood arrow to his bow, such a 
battle will ensue that Afrasyab will dream of it every night.” 

King Kavus sent a messenger to the army’s commander saying, “You are an 
old experienced man; don’t put poison in this goblet of milk. Sheathe your 
sword, undo your sword belt, loss must not come from the profit we have 
gained.” Tus and Gudarz went to the king and spoke before him. Tus spoke thus: 
“Tf the king is weary of his crown and sovereignty, then the world and its glory, 
its crown and throne, should pass to his son. Fariborz possesses farr, he has the 
Kayanid bearing, and like a savage lion he is ready for battle. If a son is alive 
why should a grandson wear the crown and take his place on the throne?” 
Gudarz said to him, “How lacking in wisdom you are! No one with any sense 
would consider you to be a man at all! In the whole world there never was a man 
who was as just, as honest, and as humble as Seyavash. And now this valiant 
warrior is his son, possessed of farr and fortitude, a man who is inwardly and 
outwardly strong. Even if through his mother he is descended from Tur, a man of 
his royal lineage will not turn aside from justice. Who is there like him in Turan 
or Iran, so what’s the purpose of your simple-minded chatter? Can’t your eyes 
see his face, his tall stature, his kindness? He crossed the Oxus without a boat, 
by grace of the Kayanid farr and his noble mind, just as King Feraydun crossed 
the River Arvand without a boat, relying on his courage and God’s farr to 
protect him from the hand and eye of evil. You’re Nozar’s son, you’re not a 
stranger here; your father was quick-tempered and you are mad. If I’d a spear 
with me now your chest and shoulders would be drenched in blood.” Then he 
said to Kavus, “King of the world, don’t turn aside from custom and our ancient 
ways. Summon the two noble princes to come before you; both are worthy to 
rule, both are young. Look, and decide which of them is the more deserving in 
his stature and God-given farr; then give the crown to him and be happy in your 
heart that you will see your descendant as king.” 

Kavus said, “This is not the right way to go about the matter, since both my 
son and grandson are equally dear to me, and if I choose one of them the other 


will hate me in his heart. But now I’|l propose a solution that will mean there’|1 
be no dissension among our people: the two of them must each take a troop of 
horsemen to the gates of Ardebil. Bahman’s castle guards the marches, and 
every year the land there is filled with warfare stirred up by Ahriman, who 
harries the fire-worshippers so harshly that no temple priest dares live in the 
area. I won’t hesitate to hand over the royal throne to whoever captures this 
castle with his sword.” When Gudarz and Tus heard their wise commander’s 
decision, both agreed to it and there was no further discussion; their hearts 
accepted the king’s words, and they left his presence. 

When the sun rose in Leo and the bright heavens defeated dark night, 
Fariborz and Tus the son of Nozar came quickly before the king. Tus said to 
him, “I and my army’s commander will set out with trumpets and drums; I shall 
carry the Kaviani banner, and with it I shall turn the ruby faces of the enemy 
blue with terror. Now I leave the royal court to load up our pack animals and 
muster our men; Fariborz and our drums and banners will turn the air dark with 
the dust sent up by our horses’ hooves. There’s never been a royal grandson 
prepared for war to equal Fariborz, a prince of such stature and possessed of 
such farr.” The king said to him, “When you ride out from here it won’t be the 
greater or smaller number of your men that counts, but whether the Lord of the 
sun and moon enables you to achieve victory. If Fariborz agrees to this 
expedition, draw up your army and be quick about it. There’s no need for any 
more talk about the matter; Fate will not change what it has in store.” 

Then Tus set out in splendor with drums and banners, wearing the golden 
boots of his rank; he led the way with his elephants, and Fariborz was in the 
army’s midst. As they approached Bahman’s castle, Tus readied the army for 
battle; quickly and eager for the fray they approached the fortifications. But as 
the troops came closer the earth began to burn like fire; their spears glowed in 
the heat, and the men’s bodies were scorched beneath their armor. You would 
have said that the whole earth was ablaze and that the air itself was a snare set by 
rebellious Ahriman. The ramparts towered above them in the burning air, and 
they saw no way to fight against fire. Tus said to Fariborz, “When a lion-warrior 
goes out to war, he struggles to win something with his mace and bow and sword 
and lariat, but there is no way up to this castle, and the fire means our men’s 
hearts are not with you in this venture; they’re burning beneath their armor, and 
our horses too are scorched by the heat.” For seven days they circled the 
fortifications but saw no way into them. They gave up hope and returned from 


their attack; the pains they had taken and the long road they had traveled were 
fruitless. 


Kay Khosrow Goes to Bahman’s Castle 

When news reached Gudarz that Tus and Fariborz had returned, he said to Kay 
Khosrow, “Tus and Fariborz have come back, and now you must go to fight.” 
He prepared the war elephants, and a great clamor went up; his troops and the 
young prince came forward. A golden throne studded with emeralds was set for 
him on an elephant, and around it were horsemen with purple banners. The 
prince wore golden boots, a jewel-encrusted crown, and a torque of gold set with 
gems. Gudarz said, “Today a new day dawns; the world king Kay Khosrow 
takes his place upon a golden throne, a crown upon his head, his mace in his 
hand.” 

When they were not far from the castle Kay Khosrow put on his armor and 
prepared for battle; he summoned a scribe to join him behind his saddle and 
dictated a letter to him in Pahlavi, written on Chinese paper and with ink mixed 
with ambergris, as was fitting for a royal missive. It said, “This letter is from the 
slave of God, renowned Khosrow who seeks possession of the world, who has 
escaped the toils of evil Ahriman, who devotes to God the labor of his hands, for 
it is He who is the eternal Lord, who holds the world, who gives us our 
sustenance and is our guide, the Lord of Saturn, of Mars, and of the sun, the 
Lord of farr and of might, who has bestowed glory and the Kayanid’s farr, a 
mammoth’s body and a lion’s reach on me, so that the world from end to end is 
mine to rule, from Aries unto Pisces. If this castle belongs entirely to Ahriman, 
the enemy of the World Creator, by farr and the command of God I shall smite 
his head with my mace and bring it down into the dust. If all this realm is ruled 
by wizards, I need no army to oppose their magic; Ill loop their heads within my 
lariat’s noose. And if the glorious Sorush is here commanding the army of God, 
I’m not in league with Ahriman, my soul and body are imbued with godly farr, 
and I shall level this castle at God’s command. This is my imperial command.” 

Then Khosrow took a long spear and affixed the letter to its head; he lifted it 
up like a banner, desiring nothing in the world but God’s farr. He ordered Giv to 
take the lance and carry it to the castle’s high walls. He said to him, “Take this 
letter of rebuke to the ramparts; lift up the lance and as you do so cry out God’s 
name, then tug at your reins and quickly return.” God-fearing Giv took the lance, 
calling down God’s blessings on his prince, and set it with world-seeking 
Khosrow’s message against the wall; then, calling on God the giver of all that’s 


good, he sped back on his horse like the wind. The royal letter disappeared, a 
roar was heard, and dust swirled about the castle; at the same moment, by God’s 
command, the ramparts split apart. In the darkness a great crash resounded in the 
mountains and you would say it was the thunder of spring rains. What with the 
dust sent up by the army and the dust from the crumbling ramparts, the world 
became as dark as an African’s face; you’d have said a black cloud had arisen, 
and that the air was like a lion’s maw. 

Kay Khosrow urged his black horse forward and called to his army’s 
champion, “Rain down arrows on the castle, make the air like a cloud in 
springtime.” Like a cloud of sleet bringing death in its wake the arrows rained 
down; many demons were killed by the shafts, many whose vitals were split 
open fell in the dust. Then a great light shone and dispersed the darkness; by the 
name of God and the king’s farr, the world became like a shining moon, a 
breeze bestowing blessings sprang up, and the heavens and earth smiled again. 
The king of free men, along with the old warrior Gudarz of the clan of Keshvad, 
entered the fortifications, and saw within the walls a city filled with gardens and 
mansions, public squares and palaces. At the spot where the light shone out 
obscuring the top of the ramparts Khosrow gave orders that a dome be built that 
rose into the dark clouds; its length and breadth were to be ten lariats long, and 
there were to be high arches all around, and its circumference was to be half the 
distance that an Arab horse could gallop. This was the fire temple he built, and 
he settled there priests, astrologers, and sages. He stayed in the area a while, 
until the fire temple became renowned and revered, and when a year had passed 
he left the sacred fire, prepared his baggage train, and led off the army. 

When King Kavus received news of what the divine farr had wrought for 
Kay Khosrow, he and the world were astonished by the prince’s glory and 
greatness. All the nobility, one by one, went joyfully out to greet him with their 
gifts. Fariborz, accompanied by an army made up of Persian warriors and as 
massive as a mountain, came before him. When Kay Khosrow saw him he 
dismounted from his golden throne and kissed his uncle’s face, then seated him 
beside him on the throne, calling down God’s blessings upon him as he did so. 
Tus came forward, bringing with him his golden boots and the warriors’ drums, 
and carrying the Kaviani banner; he kissed the ground before Kay Khosrow then 
handed him the banner. He said to him, “See now which great chieftain from this 
army is worthy of these drums, these golden boots, this auspicious Kaviani 
banner.” Then he asked pardon for his former words, inwardly writhing at the 
foolish advice he had given. The victorious prince welcomed him, smiled, and 


sat him on a throne. He said to him, “I see no one in this host more worthy of the 
Kaviani banner, the golden boots, the rank of preeminent Persian warrior than 
yourself. And there is no need for your apologies; it wasn’t some outsider whom 
you wanted as king.” 

The young, discerning prince, who sought the crown, proceeded on to Pars. 
When King Kavus heard that his grandson whom Good Fortune favored was 
approaching he went out to greet him; his face was the color of the blossoms of 
the Judas-tree, and his ancient heart had grown young again for joy. When 
Khosrow saw his grandfather in the distance, he smiled and his happy heart beat 
faster; he dismounted and made his obeisance before him. His grandfather was 
eager to see him and he too smiled and embraced the prince and praised him as 
he deserved. He said, “The lion has returned with victory, 

Dark is the heart now of his enemy.” 


Then the kings made their way to the palace and the throne of the king who 
makes and unmakes kings, and when they dismounted their souls and tongues 
were filled with courteous greetings. Kavus sat on the royal throne and took Kay 
Khosrow’s hand; he brought him forward and sat him in his own place, and then 
asked the treasurer to bring the Kayanid crown. He kissed the crown and placed 
it on the prince’s head, leaving him the ivory throne while he himself sat on a 
lower seat. Emeralds were brought from the treasury as a gift, together with 
many other jewels, and Kavus blessed the memory of Seyavash, saying that 
Khosrow resembled no one but him. The nobles of the court came forward, the 
army commanders and leaders of men; they hailed him as their king, and all of 
them poured gold coins and jewels upon his head. 

This is the world’s way, bestowing with one hand and taking away with 
another. We suffer from its crooked turns, at times riding high and at times cast 
down, but if you are able to, live with a happy heart; you will not stay here long, 
so while you are here give no place to sorrow. Look to be happy, and give away 
whatever remains once this is achieved; don’t let one day’s grief into your heart. 
God has provided for you, and in the same way He will provide for your son, the 
sapling who has sprung from your root. Can you not see that His treasury is full, 
and that He has arrayed the world in beauty? God is not sparing with his gifts, 
and you will find no greater generosity than His; do not despair! 


FORUD, THE SON OF SEYAVASH 


When a great warrior embarks on war he should not trust his army to an enemy; 
only tears which no doctor can cure will come of this. Someone who is from a 
noble family but who cannot achieve any kind of greatness is made savage by 
his failure. It is unwise for a king to trust any man who remains subject to others 
and unfulfilled in this way. If the heavens deny him his desires, his loyalty to the 
king is always suspect; there is no goodness in him, and ambition always gnaws 
at his heart. When you hear this tale through, you will know the nature of such a 
man. 


Tus Leads His Army to Turan 

The sun had reached its zenith, bringing Aries beneath its sway, and the world 
was filled with a golden light like white wine. From Tus’s encampment the din 
of drums and the squeal of trumpets rang out; the land resounded with war cries 
and the neighing of horses, and the air was dark with the dust of armies 
gathering. The sun and moon were obscured, and everywhere the clatter of 
armor and the trumpeting of elephants could be heard. 

Red, yellow, blue, and purple banners thronged the sky, and in the center was 
the banner of Kaveh, surrounded by horsemen from the clan of Gudarz. A tucket 
sounded, and Kay Khosrow appeared at the entrance to his tent, crowned and 
carrying his mace. Wearing golden boots as a sign of office, Tus went forward 
with the banner of Kaveh. He was followed by chieftains descended from Nozar, 
each wearing a torque and a diadem; one by one they paraded before Khosrow. 

The king addressed them: “Tus leads this army; he bears the Kaviani banner, 
and you must be ready to obey his orders. Following royal custom, he should 
harm no one on the march; let no chill wind touch farmers, craftsmen, or any 
other civilian. Fight only with opposing warriors; harm no one who offers you 
no harm, for the world is fleeting and we are not here long. Under no 
circumstances should you pass through Kalat; if you do so your enterprise will 
fail. May the soul of Seyavash be as the sun; may his place in the other world be 


one of hope. He had a son, by a daughter of Piran; the boy closely resembled his 
father. He and I were born at the same time, and he was like me when we were 
young, open and cheerful in his manner. He lives now in Kalat with his mother, 
ruling the area in royal splendor. He knows none of our Persian chieftains by 
name; you must not ride that way. He has a fine army, besides which the road 
through his territory lies over a difficult mountain pass. He himself is a brave 
warrior and horseman, of noble lineage and with a champion’s strength. Take the 
way through the desert; there is no point in passing through a lion’s territory.” 

Tus replied, “May Fortune always favor your desires; I shall travel as you 
have commanded, since your commands bring only success.” 

Quickly Tus led off his troops and Kay Khosrow retired to take council with 
Rostam and his nobles and priests. They spoke of Afrasyab, of Kay Khosrow’s 
anxieties, and of his father’s suffering. 

The army progressed, stage by stage, until they came to a place where the 
road divided. In one direction lay a waterless desert, and in the other Kalat and 
the road to Jaram. The elephants with their war drums in the van of the march 
paused until Tus arrived; the men waited to see whether he would obey orders or 
take the road the army itself would have preferred. When he reached them Tus 
talked with his officers about the hot, waterless way; he said to Gudarz, “Even if 
the dust of this desert were of amber and its sands of musk we would still have a 
weary journey ahead of us, and we will need water and rest. Therefore it’s better 
that we make for Kalat and Jaram, and we can rest at Mayam for a while. On 
both sides of the road the area is cultivated and there’s flowing water; why 
should we put ourselves to the trouble of slogging through the desert? I’ve been 
through Jaram once before, when the army was led by Gazhdaham, and it’s not a 
difficult journey, except there’s a bit of going up and down hillsides. It’s best we 
go this way then, and not count off the desert parasangs.” 


Forud Learns of the Approach of the Persian Army 

Forud was told that the face of the sun was dimmed by an approaching army’s 
dust, and that the earth seethed like a rushing river with horses and elephants. 
“Your brother,” they said, “is bringing an army up from Iran, seeking revenge 
for the murder of his father.” Forud was an inexperienced youth; when he heard 
this his heart was filled with anxiety, and his soul darkened. He went out to 
inspect the surrounding mountainside and had the gates to his castle fastened 
behind him. He gave orders that no herds or flocks of sheep were to be left on 
the plains or mountain pastures, that all of them were to be brought within the 


perimeter wall. When he had supervised the flocks being brought up the 
mountainside he returned to the castle and secured the gates. From Jaram the din 
of distant drums resounded, and toward Mayam dust obscured the sky. 

Forud’s mother was Jarireh, who still grieved in her heart for Seyavash. 
Forud came to her and said, 


“Dear mother, from Iran an army comes 

Led by great Tus, with elephants and drums; 
What’s your advice? What tactics should we try? 
If they attack us how should we reply?” 


His mother said, “My son, you’re always so eager to fight, but God forbid such a 
day should dawn for you. Your brother Kay Khosrow is now the new king of 
Iran; he knows very well who you are, and that you and he had the same father. 
Piran gave me to your father from the first, and if he hadn’t done so Seyavash 
would never have taken a Turkish wife. You are of noble, royal descent on both 
sides. If your brother is seeking revenge in order to vindicate the spirit of 
Seyavash, you should join him and prepare yourself for war. Put on your Rumi 
armor and ride out to battle, your heart filled with rage, your head ringing with 
war cries. Go in the van of your brother’s army; as he is the new king, so you 
will be the new champion seeking revenge. It is fitting for even leopards and sea 
monsters to grieve at Seyavash’s death, and for the birds of the air and the fish of 
the sea to curse Afrasyab; no heroic prince like Seyavash will ever appear again 
in the world, neither as regards glory or civility or dignity or justice. You are this 
great man’s son, you’re every inch a king and you should ready yourself to exact 
revenge, to show whose blood runs in your veins. Observe this approaching 
army and find out who is leading it. Call your warriors about you and prepare 
gifts—wine, fine robes, noble horses, tables of food, swords, helmets, barding, 
armor, Indian daggers. In all the world, your brother is a sufficient treasure to 
you; may you lead his army on this war of revenge, you as the new champion, he 
as the new king.” 

Forud said to his mother: “Which Persian should I speak to? On the day of 
battle, which of them can I depend on? I know none of them by name, and none 
of them have sent any messages to me.” 

Jarireh replied, “My prince, when you see their army’s dust in the distance, 
search the ranks for Bahram and Zangeh, the son of Shavran. Have them show 
you proof of who they are, for you and I need have no secrets from them. Don’t 


be separated from these two; they were your father’s lieutenants when he was a 
prince. May you and your good name live forever; may Seyavash’s soul abide in 
glory. Now, keep what I tell you in mind; go out with Tochvar and with no other 
soldiers. When you ask who is who in their army, Tochvar will be able to tell 
you.” 

Forud said, “Mother, you’re like a lion, and it’s your councils that give our 
tribe its splendor.” 


A lookout ran in from the walls and cried, 

“The Persian army fills our mountainside, 

The plain and passes are all thronged with men, 
You’d say we’ll never see the sun again; 

The way up to our castle’s like a sea 

Of banners, elephants, and cavalry.” 


Tochvar and Forud galloped out of the castle gates, but the young man’s luck 
was dimmed by dust, and when the heavens turn aside, neither rage nor kindness 
suffice. 

Forud said to Tochvar, “Don’t keep from me anything I ask you; when we 
see the Persian chieftains with their banners and maces of office, and golden 
boots, tell me the names of everyone you know.” They made their way to a high 
point from which they could look down on the groups of Persians below. There 
were so many golden helmets and golden shields, golden maces and golden 
belts, that a man would say there was no gold left in any mine on earth and that a 
cloud had passed overhead and rained down jewels. There were cavalry and 
infantry, swordsmen and lance bearers, and their drums thundered with such a 
noise that the vultures of the air cowered away in fear; thirty thousand warriors, 
armed and ready for combat, crowded the mountainside. Forud and Tochvar 
stared in astonishment at the mass of men and their gear. 

Forud said, “Now, tell me the chieftains’ banners, and don’t hide anything 
from me.” Tochvar replied, “The banner with the device of an elephant belongs 
to Tus, and those horsemen with glittering swords who crowd around it are his 
bodyguard. The banner behind him, with the device of a shining sun, belongs to 
your father’s brother, Fariborz. Behind him, the huge banner that’s surrounded 
by such a mass of warriors, the one with a shining moon, belongs to young 
Gostaham, Gazhdaham’s son, whose valor makes elephants tremble in terror. 
The one beyond that, with the device of a wild ass, stands before the brave 


watrior Zangeh, the son of Shavran. The banner studded with stars, with a red 
ground and a black silk fringe, belongs to Bizhan who in battle stains the sky 
with blood. The banner with the dark, lion-terrifying tiger belongs to Shidush, a 
huge mountain of a man. The one behind that, with a buffalo, with all the lance 
bearers crowded around it, belongs to Farhad, who seems blessed by heaven in 
all he does. The banner with the wild boar on it belongs to Gorazeh, and the one 
bearing the device of a wolf belongs to the chieftain Giv.” 


Tus Sees Forud and Tochvar on the Mountainside 
When the Iranians caught sight of Forud and Tochvar high on the mountain, Tus 
was furious and ordered the elephants with their war drums to halt. He said, 
“This will alarm our soldiers; a nimble horseman must ride up to the summit and 
see who those two warriors are, and what they’re doing up there. If they’re our 
men they’|l be whipped with two hundred lashes, and if they’re Turks they’re to 
be caught and brought here. If they’re killed in the encounter then their bodies 
are to be dragged in the dust; we should do this without fear of any 
consequences. If they’re spies sent in secret to count our number, let them be 
hacked in two where they are, and their bodies tossed from the mountainside.” 
Bahram, of the tribe of Gudarz, volunteered, saying, “I'll ride up to the 
summit and do as you command.” He urged his horse out of the army’s ranks; 
determinedly, he made his way up the mountain. Forud turned to Tochvar and 
said, “Who’s this approaching us with such contempt? He’s in such a hurry he 
seems quite unconcerned by us; he’s riding a fine dun horse and has a lariat 
looped at his saddle.” His councilor answered, “He’s not someone to be handled 
roughly; I don’t know who he is, but I think he’s one of Gudarz’s men. When 
Khosrow returned to Iran from Turan, one of the king of Turan’s helmets went 
missing; I think he’s wearing it, and his armor seems royal, too. He’s surely one 
of Gudarz’s clan, but let’s ask him.” 


Bahram approached the top, and roared aloud 
As if he were a threatening thundercloud, 
“Who are you on the mountain’s summit there ? 
Our trumpets blare, our drums’ din fills the air, 
And can’t you see our army’s countless horde 
Led by great Tus, our leader and our lord?” 


Forud replied, “You’ve been offered no scorn, don’t speak scornfully to us. Talk 
civilly, as a knight should, and keep your cold, contemptuous words unsaid. 
You’re not a lion and I’m not a wild ass; this is no way to behave with me. 
You’re no greater than I am, neither as a warrior, nor as a man, nor in brute 
strength. You’ve a head, feet, a heart, a brain, sense, a loud voice, and eyes and 
ears; look, I have all those, too, so don’t threaten me. I’m going to question you, 
and if you answer me as befits a knight, I shall be pleased.” 

Bahram replied, “Say on, then, you in the sky up there while I’m down here 
on the ground!” 

Forud said, “Who is leading this army off to war?” 

Bahram answered, “Tus leads us, with the Kaviani banner and his war drums; 
he’s accompanied by chieftains like Gudarz, Giv, Shidush, Farhad, Gorgin, 
Gostaham, Zangeh, and Gorazeh.” 

Forud said, “Why haven’t you mentioned Bahram? The list is incomplete 
without him. Of all the clan of Gudarz, he’s the one that I want to hear about, but 
you say nothing about him.” 

Bahram replied, “Well, my lion-warrior, and what have you to do with 
Bahram?” 

Forud said, “This is what I heard from my mother. She said, ‘When the army 
approaches you, welcome them and ask for Bahram, and also for another warrior 
called Zangeh, the son of Shavran; these two were brought up with your father, 
they shared the same wet nurse, and you should try not to miss them.’” 

Bahram replied, “May fortune favor you; are you the fruit of that royal tree? 
Young prince, are you Forud? If so, long may your shining soul flourish!” 

He said, “Yes, I’m Forud, a sapling from that toppled cypress.” 

Bahram said, “Show me your body, uncover the mark of Seyavash.” Forud 
showed him his upper arm, on which there was a dark mole, like a dash of amber 
on a rose petal, such that no painter could reproduce it, even with a pair of 
Chinese compasses. Bahram knew then that the person before him was 
descended from Qobad and of the seed of Seyavash. He dismounted and made 
his obeisance to Forud and then ran up the mountain toward him. Forud too 
dismounted and sat on a rock and said to Bahram, “Great leader, lion in battle, 
seeing you alive and well, I could not be happier if my eyes beheld my father 
here; I came to this summit to find out which chieftains were with the Persian 
army and who was leading it. I shall hold as splendid a feast as my means allow, 
in order to delight your commander. I shall distribute horses, swords, maces, and 
all manner of other goods, and then I shall set out with you to Turan, intent on 


vengeance. I am the right man to prosecute this war; in the saddle I am like a 
mounted fire, burning all before me. Tell your commander to come up the 
mountain so that he and I can spend a week together laying plans, and on the 
eighth day, when the war drums ring out and Tus is seated in the saddle, I shall 
in bitterness of heart, and with a fury that no man has ever equaled, prepare 
myself to avenge my father’s death.” 

Bahram replied, “My young, noble, chivalrous prince, I shall tell Tus all that 
you have told me, and I shall kiss his hand asking him to respect your wishes; 
but our leader is not a wise man and he has little time for advice. He has skill 
and wealth and is of the blood royal, but he has scant respect for the king. He’s 
always quarreling with Giv, Gudarz, and the king about Fariborz and the 
succession, and he constantly says, ‘I am of the seed of Nozar, I am worthy to be 
king of the world.’ He’s likely to ignore my words, or to be infuriated by them 
and attack me. He’s a willful, unpredictable man. Apart from myself, don’t let 
anyone else who comes in search of you catch sight of your helmet; if someone 
else comes, don’t greet him. And then Tus dislikes me in his heart, because he 
wishes that he and Fariborz were rulers. He said to me, ‘See who’s on that 
mountain, don’t ask him why he’s there but let your mace and dagger speak for 
you. Why should anyone be on that mountain today?’ If he takes your message 
calmly, I will bring you the good news and lead you to the army; if anyone else 
comes, do not trust him. Not more than one warrior should ride up to you at a 
time, this is our leader’s way; if anyone approaches consider him well, and if 
need be, retreat to your castle and bar the doors.” 

From his belt Forud drew a mace; its handle was of gold and encrusted with 
turquoise. He said to Bahram: “Take this as a remembrance from me and keep it 
whatever happens; if Tus welcomes me, all will be well and there will be many 
other presents—horses, saddles, crowns and royal jewels.” 

When Bahram returned to Tus he said, “May wisdom fill your faultless soul: 
the man we saw was Forud, the son of King Seyavash, who was slain despite his 
innocence. He showed me the birth sign of those descended from Kavus and Kay 
Qobad.” 


But evil Tus replied, “These men you see, 
These drums and trumpets, all belong to me; 
My orders when I sent you there were clear: 
‘Don’t say a word to him, but bring him here.’ 
So he’s a prince, is he? And who am I, 


According to this castle in the sky? 

What have I seen from your Gudarz’s clan? 
Nothing but brazen traitors, to a man. 

A lion doesn’t guard that mountainside; 

One useless horseman made you run and hide.” 


Rivniz Fights with Forud 

Tus turned to his troops: “Great fighters, destroyers of our enemies, I want an 
ambitious warrior who’ll face this Turk in combat, who’|l sever his head with a 
dagger and bring it here to me.” Rivniz, Tus’s son-in-law, responded to the call; 
this battle would be his last. 

Bahram said to him, “Champion, fear the Lord of the sun and moon and don’t 
rush into something that will dishonor you. If a knight rides out against that 
prince, he won’t escape with his life.” Tus was angered by Bahram’s words and 
he ordered a few warriors to ride up toward the summit of the mountain. But as 
they were leaving Bahram called out to them, “Don’t think this will be an easy 
task. It?s Kay Khosrow himself who’s on that mountain, and a hair of his is 
worth more than any hero. If anyone here never saw Seyavash’s face, then let 
him ride up the mountainside to see it now.” When they heard this the warriors 
returned to camp. 

But Tus’s son-in-law, whom the heavens watched with scorn, took the way 
from Jaram toward Mount Seped, his heart filled with a furious longing for 
combat. 

When Forud caught sight of him, he readied his bow, and said to Tochvar, 
“Tus has treated my overtures of peace with contempt. The knight riding up 
toward us is not Bahram, and anxiety fills my heart. Watch him, and tell me 
whether you recognize him; and why is he clothed from head to foot in iron 
armor?” Tochvar replied, “This is Rivniz, the one brother among forty sisters, all 
as lovely as the spring. He’s deceitful, untrustworthy, a flatterer; but he’s also 
young and brave and Tus’s son-in-law.” 

Forud said, “This is no time to be praising him, when he’s about to fight me. 
As soon as he gets closer I’Il send him back to his sisters’ skirts. If he feels the 
wind of my arrows and lives, no longer count me as a man. Now, should I shoot 
at his horse or at him; you’re experienced at this, what do you advise?” Tochvar 
said, “Shoot at the rider, and let Tus grieve for him. Tus knows that in the 
goodness of your heart you offered him peace, but he’s foolishly decided to 
make war on you, and in so doing he shames your brother.” 

When Rivniz was a bowshot away, Forud drew back his Indian bow and 
loosed an arrow of poplar wood, which pierced the knight’s helmet, pinning it to 
his skull. He fell, and his horse turned, dragging Rivniz’s head in the dust. Tus 
was watching from the heights in Mayam, and when he saw this the 


mountainside blurred and darkened before his eyes. But as the wise say, an evil 
nature is repaid in kind, not once but many times. 


Tus’s Son, Zarasp, Fights with Forud 

Then Tus said to Zarasp, “Make your heart bright as fire, put on knight’s armor, 
exert yourself and avenge our fallen champion; if you do not, I see no one who 
will.” Zarasp prepared for combat and placed his helmet on his head; his heart 
was filled with a longing for revenge, and his head whirled with impatience. 

The lion warrior said to Tochvar, “Another rider is coming. Look and see if 
you recognize him; is he a prince, or one of the common soldiers?” Tochvar 
replied, “The time has come to fight in earnest; this is Tus’s son, Zarasp, who 
won’t turn his horse aside from a raging elephant. He is married to one of 
Rivniz’s sisters and has come to avenge his brother-in-law. As soon as he can 
make out your helmet, loose an arrow against him, so that this crazy commander 
Tus will realize we’re not to be despised.” 

Forud urged his horse forward and as he did so loosed an arrow toward 
Zarasp: it pierced the armor at his waist and entered his body. Blood flowed 
from the wound, and his soul departed; he fell, and his horse turned and galloped 
back to camp. A great cry went up from the Persian army, and Tus wept with 
rage and grief; in haste he pulled on his armor, lamenting for the two dead 
watriors and shaking like a leaf. Like a mountain he sat in the saddle, as if he 
were astride some great elephant, then grasped the reins and set off toward 
Forud, his heart filled with a longing for revenge, his head whirling with grief 
and pain. 


Tus Fights with Forud 

Tochvar cried out to Forud, “A moving mountain approaches our mountain: it’s 
Tus, their commander, who’s come to fight against you in combat. You should 
not pit yourself against an experienced monster like this; get into the castle and 
bar the gates, and then we’ll see what Fate decrees. Now you’ve killed his son 
and son-in-law you can’t expect a friendly welcome from him.” 

Forud was young and flared up against Tochvar saying, “When battles are to 
be fought—whether it’s against Tus or a raging elephant or a ravening lion or a 
sea monster or a tiger—a man gives himself to combat heart and soul; he doesn’t 
start smothering the fire with mud.” 

Tochvar, in his experience, said, “Princes do not despise good advice. Even if 
you were made of iron and could rip a granite mountain up by its roots, you’re 
still one solitary knight. If thirty thousand Persian warriors come up this 
mountain to fight against you, not only your castle but the very stones of this 
mountain will be razed and not a jot will survive. And the expedition to avenge 
your father’s death will suffer a setback that will never be reversed.” But he did 
not say what should have been said long before and, following the advice of this 
worthless councilor, Forud gained only war and death. 

The prince tugged at the reins, turning his horse toward the castle, and 
notched another arrow to his bow. Within Forud’s castle walls were eighty 
female attendants; they were watching from the battlements, and when they saw 
the young hero turn back, their spirits sank. 

Tochvar addressed Forud: “If you’re determined to oppose Tus it’s better you 
don’t destroy him; kill his horse beneath him, because a Persian prince won’t 
fight on foot even if hard-pressed. And then one arrow might not finish him; his 
henchmen are certain to follow him up the mountain. You have never faced his 
fury, and you can’t deal with both him and them.” Forud heard him and drew 
back his bow; the arrow struck Tus’s horse, which lowered its head and fell 
lifeless to the ground. Enraged, Tus made his way on foot back down the 
mountain, his shield slung around his neck, his body caked in grime. Forud 
yelled taunts after him, “What happened to the great champion then, who runs 
away on foot from a single horseman? What kind of a show does that make in 
front of his army?” The women on the battlements laughed, and Jaram re-echoed 
with their scornful cry, 


“The old man ran from the young hero’s bow, 


Straight down the mountain, quick as he could go.” 


When Tus reached the base of the hillside, warriors clustered about him saying, 
“You’ve come back safe and sound and this is no time for tears.” But Giv turned 
aside, ashamed to see his leader return on foot. He said, “This young man has 
gone too far; if he’s a prince, and wears the earrings of his office, how can he 
treat our great army so contemptuously? We’re not here to agree to whatever he 
wants to propose. Even if Tus was hasty and overbearing, this Forud is making a 
mockery of our mission. We came here to sacrifice our lives in a war of 
vengeance for Seyavash; we should not forget this. Forud has destroyed Zarasp, 
a great knight descended from Nozar, and he left Rivniz’s body weltering in its 
own blood. What further humiliations are we waiting for? Even if he were 
Jamshid’s son and had Qobad’s brain, he’s still embarked on the course of an 
ignorant fool.” 


Giv Fights with Forud 

As he spoke he fastened on his armor; he mounted his horse, which was like a 
mighty dragon, and set off toward Jaram. When Forud saw him, a cold sigh 
escaped his lips and he said, “This army has no sense of its luck, good or bad; 
one after another they come, each braver than the last, shining like the sun in 
Gemini. But this is not a wise course, and a head without wisdom is like a body 
without a soul. If they aren’t victorious, I fear for their war of vengeance, unless 
Khosrow comes to Turan, and then he and I shall stand shoulder to shoulder in 
this war for our father and crush our enemies like dirt in a fist. Now, tell me, 
who is this haughty warrior, over whose weapons they’!] have to weep?” 

Tochvar looked down the mountainside and, unaware of the effect of his 
words, was like one who sows thorns in a meadow. He said, “This man is a 
terrible dragon whose breath can bring birds down from the sky. He has 
destroyed three armies from Turan, orphaned innumerable children, crossed 
mountains, rivers, and deserts, deprived countless fathers of their sons, and 
placed his foot on the neck of slain lions. It was he who took your brother to 
Iran, getting him across the Oxus when no boat could be found. His name is Giv, 
and he’s a mammoth of a man, a raging flood in battle. No arrow will pass 
through his breastplate: he wears Seyavash’s armor when he fights and fears 
neither lances nor poplar wood arrows. Shoot your arrow at his horse and see if 
you can wound that. Then he’|I have to dismount and go on foot back to camp as 
Tus did, his shield slung about his neck.” 

Forud drew back his bow and the arrow flew, piercing the horse’s chest. Giv 
toppled from his collapsing mount and began to make his way back down the 
mountain. A laugh of derision went up from the battlements, and Giv seethed 
with chagrin beneath their taunts. The Persian warriors went to him saying, 
“Thanks be to God it was your horse that was wounded, and not you.” 

But his son Bizhan, who was a headstrong youth, railed against him: “My 
father’s a conqueror of lions, he’s outfaced raging elephants, so why did a single 
horseman make you turn tail like this? You always used to be in the thick of the 
fighting, and now because your horse is wounded you run off like a drunkard!” 
Giv said, “When my horse was wounded I’d no choice but to quit the field,” and 
then angrily reproached Bizhan for his presumptuous remarks. Bizhan turned his 
back on him; Giv exploded in rage and struck at him with his horsewhip, 
shouting as he did so, “Haven’t you been told you should think before picking a 


quarrel? You’ve neither sense nor brains nor wisdom, my curses on whoever 
brought you up!” 





Bizhan’s heart was filled with bitter fury, and he swore a solemn oath before 
God that he would not take saddle from horse until either he had avenged Zarasp 
or died in the attempt. He went to Gostaham, his heart filled with grief, his mind 
with rage, and said, “Lend me a horse that can ride up that mountain; I’m going 
to put my armor on and show just who is a man and who isn’t. A Turk has 
installed himself on that summit in full view of the army. If we leave here there 
will be a lot of hard riding to do, and I’ve only two horses that can carry a man 
in full armor; if one of them’s killed here, I’ll never find his equal either for 
speed, strength, or endurance.” 

Gostaham replied, “This is not sensible; you should not go rushing into 
disaster. Think of Zarasp, Rivniz, our matchless leader Tus, your father who 
brings down lions—all of them seen off by this Turk; no one can defeat that 





granite mountain and enter the castle unless he has a vulture’s or a Homa’s 
wings.” 

Bizhan said, “Don’t break my heart; I’1] tear myself limb from limb if I don’t 
do this. I’ve sworn by the moon, by God who holds the world, and by our 
sovereign’s crown that I’ll not come down from that mountain until I have 
avenged Zarasp or am slain like him.” 

Gostaham replied, “This is not the road you should be taking; wisdom knows 
nothing of such fury.” 

Bizhan burst out, “Then I shall go on foot to avenge Zarasp, keep your 
horses!” 

And Gostaham said, “I would not have one hair of your beard harmed. I’ve a 
hundred thousand horses, their tails braided with royal jewels; choose one and 
have him saddled, and if he’s killed, so be it.” 

He owned a splendid horse, swift as a wolf, lean-bellied, tall and eager for 
combat. Bizhan, filled with youth’s ambition, had him armored with barding. 
But when he thought of Forud’s prowess, Giv’s heart was thrown into anxiety. 
He called Gostaham to him, and they talked about youth’s impetuous fire; he 
sent back with him Seyavash’s armor and royal helmet. Gostaham gave them to 
Bizhan who put them on as quickly as he could and set off in high spirits, 
accoutered as a mighty warrior, up Mount Seped. 


Bizhan Fights with Forud 

The young prince turned to Tochvar: “Another of their men is coming. Look 
there, and tell me the name of this young chieftain for whom they’ || soon have to 
weep and wail.” 

Tochvar replied, “Iran has no warrior like him; he’s Giv’s only son, and his 
father loves him more than his wealth and his own soul. He’s a brave champion, 
victorious as a lion. Again, shoot at the horse; you must not break the Persian 
king’s heart by killing this lad. And anyway, he too is wearing the armor that 
Giv wore, and it’s proof against arrows and lances. He’s likely to fight on foot 
and you won’t be his equal then; look at that sword he bears, glittering like 
diamonds.” 

Forud loosed an arrow at Bizhan’s horse, which fell as if lifeless; Bizhan 
disentangled himself from his falling mount and began to climb up to the 
summit, his drawn sword in his hand. 


He shouted to Forud, “Courageous knight, 

Wait where you are and see how lions fight; 
Know that this unhorsed warrior won’t turn back 
But sword in hand I’Il climb your mountain track; 
Wait for me, face me man to man, and then 

See if you ever want to fight again!” 


When he saw that Bizhan was not withdrawing, Forud shot an arrow at him, but 
Bizhan lifted his shield and harmlessly deflected it. He reached the summit and 
readied his sword; Forud retreated, and the battlements behind him rang with 
shouts. Bizhan ran after him, and with his sword hacked at the barding of 
Forud’s horse; he pierced it, and the horse fell in the dust. Forud scuttled into the 
gatehouse of his castle and the sentinels immediately barred the gates behind 
him. Those on the battlements hurled rocks down at Bizhan, knowing that no 
time should be lost. Bizhan yelled back, “You were mounted and ran away from 
aman on foot. Aren’t you ashamed of yourself? Where are your courage and 
fame now, Forud?” 

When Bizhan got back to Tus he boasted, “My lord, that knight could 
humiliate a whole plain full of soldiers; you shouldn’t be surprised if the hail of 
his arrows turned a granite mountain to water, there’s no greater fighter 
anywhere.” Tus’s response was to swear an oath of vengeance, saying, “I’ll raze 


his castle and see the dust of its ruins obscure the sun; I’1l fight a battle of 
revenge for Zarasp and destroy that malignant Turk; I’ll make the stones of his 
castle glisten like coral with his blood.” 


Jarireh’s Dream 

When the shining sun disappeared and dark night spread its army across the sky, 
a thousand horsemen entered the castle of Kalat as reinforcements. The gates 
were fastened behind them, and the night was filled with the sound of armaments 
and the bells of their horses’ gear. 

Jarireh, Forud’s mother, slept at her son’s feet, and the darkness was filled 
with pain and sorrow for her. She dreamed of a great fire that raged in their 
castle, and then spread until the whole mountain was a mass of flame which 
consumed the castle and all the women in it. She started up from sleep, her soul 
in anguish, and went on the battlements to gaze out on the world. She saw all the 
mountain filled with the glitter of spears and armor, and ran weeping to Forud, 
saying “Wake up, my son, the stars have turned against us; all the mountainside 
is thronged with our enemies, and their spears and armor threaten our gates!” 

The young prince said, “Dear mother, do not cry. 
If Fate has willed that I am soon to die 

You weeping will not make my death delay; 

Each man must leave on his allotted day. 

My father too was young when he was killed, 
Now I must bow to what the heavens have willed. 
As he was put to death by Gorui 

So this Bizhan intends to murder me. 

But I will fight; if I’m to die, Ill slaughter 

All who attack, and I'll not beg for quarter.” 


He distributed helmets and armor to his men; then he placed a helmet on his own 
head, tightened the belt about his Rumi armor, and grasped his royal bow. 


Forud Fights with the Persians and Is Killed 

When the shining sun rose into the sky’s vault, the war cries of chieftains rang 
out on all sides, mingling with the clatter of heavy maces and the din of drums, 
bugles, fifes, and Indian chimes. Forud led the Turkish troops out from the 
castle, and the top of the mountain was so clogged with dust, arrows, and maces 


that it seemed like a sea of pitch. The ground had disappeared, there was hardly 
room to fight, and the rocks and precipitous mountain slopes alarmed the horses. 

Battle was joined and, as the sun journeyed across the sky, Forud’s army 
steadily lost ground. On the heights and in the gullies the Turks were killed; 
Fortune was against the young man, although he himself still fought like a lion 
and the Persians watched him in wonder. But when he saw that all his 
companions had been killed, and that he could not fight on alone, he tugged at 
the reins, turned, and fled up the mountain to his castle. Roham and Bizhan lay 
in ambush for him, and as he approached Bizhan appeared on horseback in front 
of him and bore down on him. As soon as he saw Bizhan’s helmet Forud readied 
his mace, but as he did so Roham rode out of the ambush behind him, yelling his 
war cry, an Indian sword in his grasp. He struck a mighty blow that caught 
Forud on the shoulder, severing his arm, and rendering him unfit for battle. 
Forud groaned with the pain and urged his horse forward; he reached the castle 
gates, which were slammed to and bolted behind him. 

Jarireh ran to him and took him in her arms, and she and their attendants bore 
him to an ivory couch. At the hour of his death he was still too young to have 
worn the crown. His mother and the women cut off their musky tresses, and 
Forud struggled for life while wailing surrounded his couch and anguish filled 
the castle. Barely opening his lips, Forud said, “It’s right for you to mourn; the 
Persians will come now intent on plunder, they will enslave you and raze my 
castle and its ramparts to the ground. Those of you who pity me, whose faces 
burn for my sorrow, go to the battlements now and cast yourselves down from 
them, so that not one of you remains for Bizhan to boast of. He it is who has 
taken my life from me, who has destroyed me in the days of my youth.” After he 
had said this, his cheeks turned sallow, and in pain and grief his soul departed. 

The womenfolk fled to the battlements and all of them threw themselves 
down on the rocks beneath. Jarireh set fire to the castle and fed it with their 
treasures. Then she went to the stable and with a sword slashed the remaining 
horses’ bellies and lacerated their legs, and the horses’ blood spattered her face. 
Lastly she made her way back to where Forud lay. She drew a dagger from the 
folds of his clothes and ripped open her belly with it; she placed her face against 
her son’s and died. 

The Persians had torn up the gateposts and poured into the castle, intent on 
plunder. But when Bahram came on Forud and Jarireh his heart broke with grief. 
Weeping, he turned to the Persian troops and said, “This man has died even 
more wretchedly and terribly than his father did. Seyavash was not killed by a 


mere squire, and his mother did not die beside him; neither was his castle burned 
like a reedbed nor his chattels and treasures destroyed. Fear God, my friends, 
and the turning of the heavens, whose arm is long in apprehending evil-doers 
and who is merciless to sinners. Have you no shame before Kay Khosrow, who 
spoke so gently and at such length to Tus, who sent you here to avenge the death 
of Seyavash and who gave you such wise council? When he learns of his 
brother’s spilled blood, you will lose all favor with him. And what good can be 
expected from men like Roham and that hothead Bizhan?” 

Meanwhile Tus and his entourage of Persian chieftains, including Gudarz and 
Giv, made their way up the mountainside to Kalat, their war drums sounding as 
they came. Entering the room where Forud and his mother lay dead, they saw 
Bahram seated beside the bodies, weeping and lamenting, and Zangeh to one 
side, a group of warriors clustered about him. Forud lay on the ivory couch like a 
toppled teak tree, his face fair as the full moon, and it was as though Seyavash 
himself lay there, asleep in his armor. Gudarz and Giv and the other warriors 
wept to see him, and Tus too wept bloody tears, both for his son and for Forud. 
Gudarz, Giv, and the others there turned on him and said, “A commander should 
not act hastily, and rage ruins all he does. Through rage and haste you have 
thrown this young prince, with all his splendor and nobility, to the winds; and 
the same passions destroyed both Rivniz and Zarasp, who counted Nozar among 
their ancestors. Without wisdom, ability and rage together are like a sword eaten 
away by rust.” 

Tus ordered that a royal tomb be built on the mountain top. Within it, on a 
golden couch, they placed the prince’s body dressed in cloth of gold and with a 
golden belt. His head was embalmed with camphor and his body with rosewater 
and musk. The tomb was sealed, and the army moved on; so passed this 
lionhearted prince. 


A fter Forud’s death, Tus led the Persian army deep into Turan, and 
Afrasyab’s counselor, Piran, was put in charge of Turan’s defenses. 
Success had made the Persians careless, and Piran was able to inflict a severe 
defeat on them by ambushing them at night. 
Kay Khosrow eventually heard of Tus’s insubordination in attacking Forud, 
and of his army’s defeat at the hands of Piran. He angrily recalled Tus and 
appointed Fariborz as commander in his place. But the Persians suffered defeat 


again, and the remnants of their broken army fled back toward Iran. Turan 
allied itself with other Asian peoples and nations, including China, in the hope 
of finally defeating Iran. Rostam began to intervene in the conflict and the tide of 
battle turned in Iran’s favor: Afrasyab and his allies were routed, although 
Afrasyab managed to escape again, and the border areas between Iran and 
Turan were once more under Persian control. At this point Rostam, who could 
now move about Turan more or less at will, encountered a notorious demon, the 
Akvan Div. 


THE AKVAN DIV 


Listen to this tale, told by an old Persian. Here is what he said: 

One day Kay Khosrow rose at dawn and went to a flower garden to hold 
court. He had spent the first hour of the day there, surrounded by his chieftains— 
Gudarz, Rostam, Gostaham, Barzin, Garshasp (who was descended from 
Jamshid), Giv, Roham, Gorgin, and Kharrad—when a herder of horses came in 
from the plains with a request for help. 

“A wild ass has appeared in my herd,” he said. “He’s like a demon—a div— 
who has slipped his bonds, or you could say he’s like a savage male lion. He’s 
constantly breaking the necks of my horses. He’s colored just like the sun, as if 
he’d been dipped in liquid gold, except for a musk-black stripe that runs from his 
mane to his tale. He’s as tall as a fine bay stallion, with big round haunches and 
sturdy legs.” 

Khosrow knew very well that this was no wild ass, since a wild ass is never 
stronger than a horse. He turned to Rostam and said, “I want you to deal with 
this problem; go and fight with this animal, but be careful, for it may be 
Ahriman who is always looking for ways to harm us.” Rostam replied: 


“Your Fortune favors any warrior who 
Fearlessly serves your royal throne and you: 
No dragon, div, or lion can evade 

My fury and my sword’s avenging blade.” 


He mounted his great horse Rakhsh and, lariat in hand, left the king and his 
courtiers to their pastoral pleasures. When he arrived at the plain where the 
herdsman kept his horses, the wild ass was nowhere to be seen. For three days he 
searched among the horses, and then on the fourth he caught sight of him 
galloping across the plain like the north wind. He was an animal that shone like 
gold, but beneath his hide all was ugliness and sin. Rostam urged his horse 
forward, but as he closed on the wild ass he changed his mind. He said to 
himself, “I shouldn’t kill this beast with my dagger; I ought to noose it with my 


lariat and take it still alive to the king.” Rostam whirled his lariat, intending to 
snare it by the neck, but as soon as the ass saw the lariat, he suddenly 
disappeared from before the hero’s eyes. Rostam realized that he was not dealing 
with a wild ass, and that it would be cunning he would have to call on, not 
strength. He said, “This can only be the Akvan Div, and somehow he must be 
made to feel the wind of my sword’s descent. I’ve heard from a knowledgeable 
man that this is the area he haunts, but it’s strange that he should take on the 
shape of a wild ass. I must find some trick by which my sword can stain that 
golden hide with blood.” 


wofitthiee 
ARE es 


* 


ur. oD Nha _ oath. 


a 
ae oe we ‘ce 
verrere ig 


ijn > ad tity 
a : afer : a 
7 “UN Tian 


S 


Ao “Allide ag 
VORKIOP iii 
Kado yee set TT HR H ae AUR 

agiiyes SER rotten. 
PYM aN Rn 


Ses 
ie ative: 
mullite: Hi 
Z 


‘ Zo. wert weber 


la WW “WD & 


a WAH, ORR EH 


4 3 AY . “OTE Arann = 


gr 


= gk 
Beer Ps ine Ee Seteee- 


ravi 


ae 


LS 


ie 
TR im anf 


«mete 


enya 
fo, 


mete iyyere ) 
sai Aaa 

:S eg meen 
gf MUR ay 

ay ? a 


sie gen i 
F - wf 
vaginas tiie 


OMY 


oafieer. 
“ott ta pig 
SM. aoattuyen oath 


eter 





Then once again the beast appeared on the plain, and Rostam urged his horse 
forward. He notched an arrow to his bow, and as he rode like the wind, the arrow 
flew ahead like fire. But at the moment he drew back his royal bow, the ass once 
again disappeared. For three days and nights Rostam rode about the plain, until 
he began to feel the need for water and bread, and he was so exhausted that his 
head sank down and knocked against the pommel of his saddle. Looking around, 
he caught sight of a stream as inviting as rosewater; he dismounted and watered 
Rakhsh, and as he did so he felt his eyes closing in sleep. He loosened the girth 
and removed the poplar wood saddle from Rakhsh’s back and set it down as a 
pillow beside the stream. He spread out his saddle cloth and lay down to sleep on 
it, while Rakhsh cropped the grass nearby. 

When the Akvan Div saw Rostam asleep in the distance, he transformed 
himself into a wind rushing over the plain. As soon as he reached the sleeping 
hero he dug out the soil all round him, and then lifted him up toward the heavens 
on a great crag of excavated earth. Rostam woke and was alarmed; his wise head 
whirled in confusion, and as he wriggled this way and that the Akvan Div called 
out to him: 


“Hey, Rostam, mammoth hero, make a wish! 
Am I to throw you to the ocean fish, 

Or hurl you on some arid mountainside ? 
Well, which is it to be, then? You decide.” 


Rostam realized that in this div’s hands all wishes would be turned upside down. 
He thought, “If he throws me down on a mountain, my body and bones will be 
smashed. It’ll be much better if he throws me in the sea, intending the fishes’ 
bellies to be my winding sheet.” 


Rostam replied, “The Chinese sages teach, 
‘Whoever dies in water will not reach 

The heavens, or see Sorush; his fate will be 
To haunt this lower earth eternally.’ 

Throw me upon some mountain top, and there 
Ill terrify a lion in its lair.” 


When the Akvan Div heard Rostam’s request, he roared and bore him toward the 
sea. 


“I’m going to hurl you somewhere,” he replied, 
“Beyond both worlds, where you can’t run or hide.” 


Then he flung him deep into the ocean’s depths; but as he descended through the 
air toward the water, Rostam drew his sword and with this he kept off the sharks 
and sea monsters that made for him. With his left arm and leg he swam, and with 
the right he warded off attacks. He struck out immediately, as befits a man used 
to fighting and hardships, and after a short time, by going steadily in one 
direction, he caught sight of dry land. 

Once he had reached the shore and given thanks to God who had delivered 
him from evil, he rested and took off his wet tiger skin, spreading it beside a 
stream until it was dry. He threw away his soaked bow and armor and set off, 
leaving the sea behind him. He found the stream by which he had slept and 
where he had been confronted by the evil-natured div. 

But his splendid horse Rakhsh was nowhere to be seen in the pastures there, 
and Rostam railed against fate. Angrily he picked up the saddle and bridle and 
set off through the night in search of him. As dawn broke he came on a wide 
meadow filled with clumps of trees and flowing streams. There were partridges 
everywhere, and he could hear the cooing of turtle-doves; then he found 
Afrasyab’s herdsman, asleep among the trees. Rakhsh was there, charging and 
neighing among the herd’s mares, and Rostam whirled his lariat and snared him 
by the head. 

He rubbed Rakhsh down, saddled him, slipped the bridle over his head, and 
mounted. Then calling down God’s blessing on his sword he set about rounding 
up the horses. Their thundering hooves woke the bewildered herdsman, who 
called to his companions for help; grasping lariats and bows, they came 
galloping to see who the thief was who had dared come to their meadow and 
challenge so many of them. When Rostam saw them he drew his sword, roared 
like a lion, “I am Rostam, the son of Zal,” and fell upon them. When he had 
slaughtered two-thirds of them, the herdsman turned and fled; Rostam followed 
in hot pursuit, an arrow notched to his bow. 

It happened that at this time Afrasyab was coming to this very meadow, in a 
hurry to inspect his horses. He arrived with his entourage and with wine and 


entertainers, intending to relax for a while in the place where the herdsman 
watered the herd every year. 

But as he drew near the spot there was no sign of either the herdsman or his 
horses. Then he heard a confused noise coming from the plain, and in the 
distance he saw the horses galloping and jostling one another, and Rakhsh was 
visible through the dust sent up by their hooves. Soon the herdsman appeared 
and told him the whole astonishing story of how he had seen Rostam not only 
drive off the whole herd single-handed, but also kill many of the herdsman’s 
companions besides. 

It became a matter of urgent discussion among the Turks that Rostam had 
appeared there alone. They said, “This has gone beyond a joke; we must arm 
ourselves and respond. Or have we become so weak and contemptible that one 
man can come and kill whoever he wishes? We can’t allow a solitary horseman 
to turn up and drive off our whole herd of horses.” 


Afrasyab Goes in Pursuit of Rostam 
Afrasyab set off with four elephants and a detachment of soldiers in pursuit of 
Rostam. When they were close enough, Rostam unslung his bow from his 
shoulder and came riding toward them; he rained arrows down on them as 
thickly as the clouds rain down dew and then set about them with his steel 
sword. Having killed sixty of them, he exchanged the sword for his mace, and 
dispatched forty more. Afrasyab turned tail and fled. Rostam captured the four 
white elephants, and the Turanian soldiers despaired of life as he pursued them 
for two parasangs, raining down blows of his mace against their helmets and 
armor like a spring hail storm. Then he turned back and added the elephants to 
his plunder. 

He returned to the stream in triumph, and once again met with the Akvan 
Div, who said, 


“Don’t you get tired of fighting constantly? 

You fought the savage monsters of the sea, 

Got back to land and, once you’d reached our plain, 
It seems you couldn’t wait to fight again!” 


When Rostam heard him he roared like a warrior lion; he unhitched his lariat 
from his saddle and flung it toward the div, who was caught about the waist. 
Rostam twisted in the saddle and raised his mace, then brought it down with a 


blow like a blacksmith at his forge. The blow landed on the div’s head and his 
skull and brains were smashed by its force. Rostam dismounted and with his 
glittering dagger severed the div’s head. Then he gave thanks to God who had 
given him victory on the day of vengeance. 

You should realize that the div represents evil people, those who are 
ungrateful to God. When a man leaves the ways of humanity consider him as a 
div, not as a person. If you don’t appreciate this tale, it may be that you have not 
seen its real meaning. 

Once Rostam had cut off the div’s head, he remounted Rakhsh and, driving 
the herd of horses before him, together with whatever else he had looted from 
the Turks, he set off toward Khosrow’s court. News reached the king that 
Rostam was returning in glory; he had set off to noose a wild ass, and now he 
had defeated a div and captured elephants besides. The king and his court went 
out to meet him, the courtiers wearing their crowns of office; the procession 
included elephants, trumpets, and the imperial banner. When Rostam saw the 
banner and realized that the king was coming to greet him, he dismounted and 
kissed the ground; the army shouted its approval and the drums and trumpets 
sounded. The nobles dismounted and only Khosrow remained in the saddle; he 
ordered Rostam to remount Rakhsh and the procession made its way cheerfully 
back to Khosrow’s camp. 

Rostam distributed the horses to the Iranian army, keeping none back for 
himself, as he considered only Rakhsh suitable to be his own mount. The 
elephants he gave to Kay Khosrow, as worthy of a lionlike king. The court spent 
a week rejoicing with wine and music and entertainers, and when Rostam was in 
his cups he told the king about the Akvan Div, saying, “I never saw such a 
majestic wild ass, of such a splendid color; but when my sword cut its hide, it 
was an enemy I saw, not a friend. It had a head like an elephant’s, long hair, and 
a mouth full of boar’s tusks; its two eyes were white and its lips black; its body 
didn’t bear looking at. No animal is like him, and he’d turned that whole plain 
into a sea of blood; when I cut his head off with my dagger, blood spurted into 
the air like rain.” 

Kay Khosrow was astonished; he set down his wine cup and thanked God for 
creating such a hero, the equal of whom the world had never seen. 

Two weeks passed with feasting, pleasure, and telling stories, and when the 
third began Rostam decided to return home in triumph. He said, “I long to see 
Zal, my father, and I can’t hide this wish any longer. I shall make a quick 


journey home and return to court, and then we can plan our campaign. Capturing 
a few horses is too trivial to count as vengeance for the blood of Seyavash.” 

Kay Khosrow opened the doors of his treasury. He had a goblet filled with 
pearls brought, and five royal robes worked with gold, as well as Rumi slaves 
with golden belts, girls with gold torques about their necks, carpets and an ivory 
throne, brocade and coins and a crown studded with turquoise. All these he sent 
to Rostam saying, “Take them as a present for your journey. But stay today; 
tomorrow we can think about your leaving.” Rostam stayed that day, drinking 
with the king, but when night came he was determined to leave. The king 
accompanied him two parasangs of the way, and then the two embraced and 
bade farewell to one another. Kay Khosrow took the way back to his court, and 
the world was filled with his justice and goodness, while Rostam continued on 
the journey to Zabol. 


BIZHAN AND MANIZHEH 


A night as black as coal bedaubed with pitch, 
A night of ebony, a night on which 

Mars, Mercury, and Saturn would not rise. 
Even the moon seemed fearful of the skies: 

Her face was three-fourths dimmed, and all the night 
Looked gray and dusty in her pallid light. 

On plain and mountainside dark henchmen laid 
Night’s raven carpet, shade on blacker shade; 
The heavens seemed rusted iron, as if each star 
Were blotted out by tenebrous, thick tar; 

Dark Ahriman appeared on every side 

Like a huge snake whose jaws gape open wide. 
The garden and the stream by which I lay 
Became a sea of pitch; it seemed that day 
Would never come, the skies no longer turned, 
The weakened sun no longer moved or burned. 
Fear gripped the world and utter silence fell, 
Stilling the clamor of the watchman’s bell, 
Silencing all the myriad cries and calls 

Of everything that flies or walks or crawls. 

I started up, bewildered, terrified; 

My fear awoke the woman at my side. 

I called for her to bring me torches, light; 

She fetched bright candles to dispel the night 
And laid a little feast on which to dine, 

Red pomegranates, citrons, quinces, wine, 
Together with a polished goblet fit 

For kings or emperors to drink from it. 

“But why do you need candles now?” she said. 
“Has sleep refused to visit your soft bed? 


Drink up your wine and—as you do so—I 

Will tell a story from the days gone by, 

A story full of love and trickery, 

Whose hero lived for war and chivalry.” 

“Sweet moon,” I said, “my cypress, my delight, 

Tell me this tale to wile away the night.” 

“First listen well,” she said, “and when you’ve heard 
The story through, record it word for word.” 


The Story Begins 

When Kay Khosrow decided on revenge for his father’s death, he put the 
world’s affairs on a new footing; the crown of Turan began to lose its luster, and 
the Persian throne gained in glory. The heavens smiled on Iran and its people; 
the world was renewed again, as in its early days, and Khosrow washed his face 
in the waters of loyalty and good faith, although no wise man will put his trust in 
this world where all things flow away like water. 

One day Khosrow was sitting with his warrior chieftains at an entertainment. 
His throne was draped with brocade and he wore a jeweled crown; in his hand 
was a cup encrusted with rubies and filled with wine, and the heart-ravishing 
sound of harps echoed in his ears. Their wine cups filled with wine like rubies 
from the Yemen and white roses set out before each one, his loyal nobles 
surrounded him: Kavus’s son Fariborz, Gostaham, Gudarz, Farhad, Giv, Gorgin, 
Shapur, Nozar’s son Tus, Roham, and Bizhan. Serving girls stood before 
Khosrow, their hair like musk, their skin like jasmine; all the court was alive 
with color, perfumes, and beauty, and the king’s chancellor presided over the 
feast. 

A doorman entered and went over to the chancellor; he said that a delegation 
from the Ermani tribe, who inhabit the border region between Iran and Turan, 
were outside asking to see the king. They had traveled a long way and were 
demanding justice. The chancellor relayed their request to the king who granted 
them audience; they were brought in according to court protocol, their arms 
crossed over their chests, and when they had kissed the ground they presented 
their petition to the throne. In deep distress they said, “Great king, may you live 
victorious and forever. We have traveled a weary way from our country, Erman, 
which lies between Iran and Turan, and we bring you a sorrowful message. You 
are the scourge of evil in seven countries, the prop of the helpless, and long may 
you flourish! Our country borders Turan, from which great disasters have come 
to us. Within our marches, toward Iran, is a forest, parts of which we have 
cultivated. It’s full of fruit trees and we also pasture our flocks there; in short, we 
depend on this area and we appeal to the king to help us. Innumerable wild boar 
have overrun this forest; their tusks are like an elephant’s, they’re of 
mountainous size, and they are destroying the land of Erman, killing our 
animals, trampling our crops, smashing with their tusks trees that have been 
there for longer than anyone can remember. Granite is not as tough as their 
tusks, and we fear that our good fortune is at an end.” 


When the king had heard them out he pitied their plight and he tumed to his 
chieftains: 


“Who is ambitious for success and fame? 

Which warrior here is worthy of the name? 

Who’ll chop these wild pigs’ heads off with his sword? 
I won’t be miserly with my reward!” 


Then he ordered his treasurer to bring in a golden tray heaped high with jewels 
jumbled pell-mell together; near this was set a quantity of brocade, and ten 
horses branded with Kavus’s mark and caparisoned with golden bridles were led 
in. Once again he turned to his nobles and said, 


“Who here will do the bidding of the throne, 
And with his efforts make my wealth his own?” 


No one answered, except Bizhan, son of the great warrior Giv: he stood and said, 
“Long may your realm and clan flourish, and the world submit to your authority. 
I will undertake this mission, my body and soul are yours to command.” 

Giv glanced up and it was clear that he was worried by his son’s remark. He 
made his obeisance to the king, then turned to Bizhan: “This is mere young 
man’s talk. What makes you so sure of your strength? A youth might be 
knowledgeable and of good family but he won’t manage anything without 
experience. He has to see the world first, both good and bad, and he has to taste 
life’s bitterness. Don’t go wandering off where you’ve never been before, and 
don’t make such a fool of yourself in front of the king!” 

Bizhan was a quick-witted young man whose star was rising; he was 
infuriated by his father’s talk and he turned directly to the king: “Don’t think I’m 
not capable of this; believe me, I have the strength of a young man and the 
wisdom of a graybeard: I’ Il cut these wild pigs’ heads off or I am not Bizhan, the 
son of Giv, destroyer of armies.” Khosrow responded, “You are full of talents, 
and may you always be our shield against evil; any king who has a subject like 
you would be a fool to fear his enemies.” Then he turned to Gorgin, Milad’s son, 
and said, “Bizhan is young and ignorant of the way: be his guide and companion 
to where the river marks the boundary of our domain.” 

Bizhan tightened his belt, placed his helmet on his head, and prepared to 
leave. He took Gorgin as a companion to turn to if anything should go wrong, 


and the two set off with hawks and cheetahs intending to hunt as they proceeded 
on their long journey. 

Like an elephant foaming at the mouth, Bizhan gave chase to wild asses and 
gazelles, slicing off their heads; his cheetahs brought down mouflon, ripping 
their bellies open, the rest of the flock scattering in terror. With his bow Bizhan 
was like another Tahmures, the binder of demons, and his hawks’ talons made 
such havoc among the pheasants that their blood spotted the jasmine plants by 
the wayside. Indeed, Bizhan and Gorgin went forward as if the plain were their 
private hunting park. 

They reached the forest of wild boar; the animals were milling about with no 
knowledge that Bizhan had saddled his horse to deal with them, and the young 
warrior was enraged by their number and effrontery. He said to Gorgin, “Let’s 
go in together, or, if you’d rather, you wait over by the lakeside there, while I 
attack them with my arrows. When you hear them squealing among the trees, 
have your mace ready for any that escape me.” 

But Gorgin said, “This is not what we agreed to before the king: you took all 
the jewels and gold and silver, and you agreed to do the fighting; all you could 
expect from me was that I show you the way here.” Bizhan frowned in 
astonishment at this response; nevertheless, he entered the forest like a lion and 
set about shooting arrows at the herd of boar. His war cry was like a spring 
cloud’s thunder, and the trees’ leaves came pattering down like rain. He went 
after the herd like an enraged elephant, a glittering dagger in his hand; they 
turned to charge him, tearing up the ground with their tusks, sparking fire where 
their tusks struck rock, as if they would burn the world. One sprang at Bizhan 
like a devil, ripping open his armor, then withdrew and rubbed its tusks against a 
tree, as if it were an armorer honing a sword on stone. But when it renewed its 
attack, the young warrior plunged his dagger into its belly, splitting its mammoth 
body in two. Then the remaining boar scattered like foxes, their bodies wounded, 
their hearts sick of combat. Bizhan lopped off the heads of those he’d killed with 
his dagger and fixed them to his saddlestraps. He intended to take the tusks back 
to the king and to display the severed heads to the court as a demonstration of his 
prowess; their combined weight would have exhausted a buffalo. 

Resentful and scheming, Gorgin emerged from where he had been lurking; he 
was So filled with chagrin that the forest appeared like pitch to him. He 
congratulated Bizhan and made a show of rejoicing at his success, afraid of the 
shame that might come to him from this business. Ahriman twisted his heart; 


forgetful of God, for the sake of his own reputation, he began to plot against 
Bizhan and spread a snare before him. 

He said, “My congratulations; you’ve a watrior’s heart and a wise man’s 
soul; God and your good fortune have given you victory here. There’s something 
I wanted to tell you: I’ve been in these parts a few times before, with Rostam, 
Giv, and Gostaham. Tus was here, too, and Gazhdaham. What splendid deeds 
we did on this wide plain then; how famous we became, and how dearly 
Khosrow loved us! But the heavens have moved on since then. About two days’ 
journey from here, toward Turan, there’s a place where people gather to hold 
festivals; you’ll see a wide pasture, all green and gold, a sight to rejoice any free 
man’s heart. The landscape is filled with copses of trees, flowers, flowing 
streams; it’s a place worthy of a hero. The ground’s as soft as silk, the air’s 
scented like musk, the streams seem to flow with rosewater; jasmine tendrils 
bow down to the ground with the weight of their flowers, and the roses there are 
incomparably beautiful; pheasants strut among the rosebushes, and nightingales 
sing from the cypress branches. 

“In a few days from now the whole area will be like a paradise, the meadows 
and mountain slopes dotted with groups of angelic young women, all led by 
Manizheh, the daughter of Afrasyab. She and her attendants will be staying 
there; the Turkish girls are cypress-slender, smelling of musk, with faces like 
rose petals, languorous eyes, lips that taste of wine and rosewater. If we hurried 
we could be there in a day, and we could seize a few of these delectable girls and 
take them back in triumph to Khosrow.” 

When Bizhan heard this his young blood was roused; he agreed to the 
venture, partly from a thirst for fame, but partly too for the pleasure it promised. 
The two set off on the long journey, one urged on by desire, the other by malice. 
They traveled for a day between two forested areas, and then spent two cheerful 
days hunting in the Ermani grasslands. Gorgin knew that Manizheh was not far 
off, and that the whole plain was as bright as a pheasant’s eye with her 
entourage, and so he repeated to Bizhan what he had said about the festival held 
there. 

Bizhan said, “I’ll go on ahead; I’ll spy out the festival from a distance, to see 
how the Turanians manage these things. Then I’ Il ride back here and we can 
decide what to do. I’Il be able to think better once I’ve seen them.” Then he 
turned to his steward and said, “Bring me my golden diadem that looks so 
splendid at banquets, and the torque and earrings Kay Khosrow gave me, and the 
armbands covered in jewels that I have from my father.” He also asked for a 


jeweled belt, then wrapped himself in a splendid Rumi cloak and fixed an 
eagle’s feather to his diadem. His horse Shabrang was saddled and he set off for 
the festival, his ambitious heart filled with curiosity. 

When he came in sight of the festivities, he stretched out beneath a cypress 
tree, to stay out of the sun. He was close to the princess’s tent, and he felt his 
heart fill with longing. The whole plain echoed with the sound of music and 
singing, as if welcoming his soul. The princess peered from her tent and saw the 
stretched-out warrior, his cheeks as bright as Canopus in the skies above Yemen, 
or like jasmine petals encircled by dark violets, an imperial diadem on his head, 
a brocade cloak covering his body. Within her tent the princess felt the force of 
love, and she made no attempt to veil herself from the stranger. She said to her 
nurse, “Go quickly over there; find out for me 

Who’s lying underneath that cypress tree: 

I think it’s Seyavash, or else he seems 

More like the angels that we see in dreams. 
Ask him, ‘What brings you here? Won’t you at least 
Join in our festival and share our feast? 

Are you Prince Seyavash, then? Or are you 
An angel’s child? Because whichever’s true, 
You’ve lit in me a fire that makes me fear 

The world will end and Judgment Day is near. 
I’ve come here every year to celebrate 

The spring’s arrival on this happy date, 

But never saw a stranger here before: 

Now I’ve seen you, and I shall see no more.’” 


When the nurse reached Bizhan, she bowed to him and spoke as Manizheh 
had instructed her. Bizhan blushed like a rose, then said confidently enough, 
“Messenger of your beautiful mistress, I am not Seyavash, nor am I born of an 
angel; I’m from Iran, from the land of the free. I am Bizhan, Giv’s son, and I 
traveled here from Iran to fight against wild boar. I cut their heads off and left 
them lying in the dirt; I’m going to take their tusks back to my king. When I 
heard about this festival, I put off returning to my father: I thought my good 
fortune might show me the face of Afrasyab’s daughter in my dreams. And now 
I see this plain decked out like a Chinese temple with splendor and wealth. If 
you treat me well I’ll give you a golden diadem, earrings, and a belt; take me to 
your beautiful mistress, and incline her heart favorably toward me.” 


The nurse returned to Manizheh and whispered in her ear, describing his face, 
his stature, and how God had made him. Straightaway Manizheh sent her back, 
with the message, “If you come over to me and brighten my dismal soul, you 
will find you have gained what you dreamed of.” When Bizhan heard this, the 
time for talk was over; full of hope and curiosity, he walked from the tree’s 
shade to the princess’s tent. 

He entered the tent, tall as a cypress; Manizheh embraced him and removed 
his gold-worked belt. She asked him about his journey, and which warriors had 
accompanied him on his expedition. “And why,” she said, “should such a 
handsome and noble person be tiring himself out with a mace?” She washed his 
feet in rosewater and musk and had an elaborate meal set before the two of them; 
wine was brought and the tent was cleared of everyone except Manizheh’s 
musicians, who stood before them with lutes and harps. The ground was spread 
with brocade sewn with gold coins and embroidered like a peacock, and the tent 
was filled with the scents of ambergris and musk. Old wine in crystal goblets 
overcame the warrior’s defenses; for three days and nights the two were happy 
in each other’s company, till finally drink and sleep defeated Bizhan. 

The time for departure came, and Manizheh felt she could not bear to be 
separated from Bizhan; seeing his sad face she called her serving girls and had 
them prepare a soporific drug which they mingled with his drink. They fitted up 
a traveling litter, so that one side was for pleasure, the other for sleep; the 
sandalwood of the sleeping area was drenched in camphor and rosewater, and 
there they set the unconscious warrior. As they approached the town Manizheh 
covered him with a cloth; stealthily, at night, Bizhan was conveyed into the 
castle, and she mentioned her secret to no one. 

After his long sleep Bizhan awoke to find his beloved in his arms; he was in 
Afrasyab’s palace, and Manizheh’s face was beside him on the pillow. He 
started up in alarm and cried out to God for protection against Ahriman: “How 
can I ever escape from this place? Listen to my sufferings, take revenge for me 
on Gorgin; he it was who led me into this, who deceived me with a thousand 
tricks.” 

But Manizheh said, “Live happily, my love, and reckon as wind what has not 
yet happened. All kinds of fate come to men, sometimes feasting, sometimes 
fighting.” They prepared to eat, not knowing whether a gallows awaited them or 
a marriage ceremony. Manizheh called for musicians; each of the young women 
was dressed in Chinese brocade and, to the sound of their lutes, Bizhan and 
Manizheh passed the day in pleasure. 


Afrasyab Learns of Bizhan’s Presence 

A few days passed in this way, and then gossip caused disaster’s tree to tremble. 
A rumor reached the court chamberlain, and he secretly investigated the matter, 
tracing the reports back to their source. He inquired as to where the interloper 
was from and why he had come to Turan; when he found out, he feared for his 
own life and made all haste to save himself. He saw no choice but to tell the king 
and ran to him with the news: “Your daughter has taken a lover from Iran.” 
Outraged by Manizheh’s behavior, the king shook like a willow tree in a storm, 
called on God to aid him, and sent for his councilor Qara Khan. “Give me,” he 
said, “good advice as to what to do with this shameless woman.” 

Qara Khan replied, “First enquire more closely into the accusation. If the 
matter turns out to be as you say, then I have nothing to add. But hearing about 
something is not the same as seeing it.” Afrasyab turned to Garsivaz and said, 
“How much we’ve endured at the hands of Iran and will endure in the future! 
And now Fate has added a faithless daughter to my troubles from that country. 
Go with loyal horsemen and watch the gates and roofs; tie up any stranger you 
find within the palace and bring him here.” 

His men surrounded the inner palace, occupied the roofs, and kept a watch on 
the exits while Garsivaz approached the main door. He found it secured from the 
inside, and sounds of feasting and revelry could be clearly heard. Garsivaz tore 
the door from its hinges and leaped into the chamber beyond; immediately, he 
made his way to the room where Bizhan was. When he saw Bizhan, his blood 
boiled with rage; three hundred serving girls and musicians were there, singing 
to lutes and serving wine. Bizhan sprang up in fear, his one thought being how 
he could fight without his armor or his horse Shabrang. He was alone and his 
father Giv could not help him now; God was his only recourse. 

He had always kept a glittering dagger inside one boot, and this he now drew 
as he leaped toward the door, saying: 


“T am Bizhan, Giv’s warlike son; I claim 

An ancient Persian family’s noble name. 

No one skins me, unless he’s sick of life 

And wants his head slashed open with this knife; 
And if the earth resounds with Judgment Day, 
No man will ever see me run away. 

If you insist on war, prepare for war— 

I'll soak my fists in your Turanian gore 


And hack your heads off. But if you agree 
To intercede before your king for me, 

Ill tell him why I’m here. You are a knight, 
Be chivalrous and we won’t need to fight.” 


Garsivaz saw what Bizhan was about, but he also saw the sharp dagger in his 
hand and knew that he meant it when he said he would soak his fists in their 
blood. He swore a solemn oath that he would do as Bizhan suggested, and with 
his promises he managed to cajole the dagger from Bizhan’s hand. He then 
talked him into allowing himself to be bound in fetters; they trussed him up like 
a caught cheetah. 


When Fortune turns her face away from you, 
What can your manly skills or virtues do? 


And so Bizhan was haled before Afrasyab, bareheaded, and with his hands 
bound. He greeted the king and said, “If you want the truth from me, here it is: I 
had no desire to come to this court and no one is to blame for my being here. I 
came from Iran to destroy a herd of wild boar and found myself near your 
borders. I sent my people to search for a lost hawk, while I sheltered from the 
sun under a cypress tree and fell asleep there. A denizen of fairyland came and 
spread her wings over me and gathered me up, while I was still sleeping, to her 
bosom. She separated me from my horse and took me along the path where your 
daughter and her escort of soldiers were. The plain was filled with horsemen, 
and various litters and palanquins passed me by. In the distance an Indian 
parasol appeared, surrounded by Turanian cavalry, and as it came closer I saw 
that the parasol covered a splendid litter in which lay a beautiful young woman; 
a crown was on the pillow beside her. The being that held me repeated the name 
‘Ahriman’ a few times and then like a mighty wind swooped down among the 
horsemen; suddenly she set me in the litter and whispered a spell over the 
woman there so that she remained asleep until we entered the castle. I wept to 
see her, but I’ve committed no sin, and Manizheh has suffered no stain or taint 
of guilt in all this. I think the being who did this to me must have been a fairy of 
ill omen.” 

But Afrasyab said, “Bad luck’s caught up with you, and none too soon. You 
came from Iran with your bow, looking for a fight and hoping to make a name 
for yourself; now you stand in front of me defenseless as a woman and with your 


hands tied, prattling about dreams as if you were drunk. You think you can 
deceive me with your lies?” 

Bizhan replied, “You majesty, listen to what I have to say for a moment, and 
realize its truth: a boar can fight anywhere with its tusks, as a lion can with its 
claws; warriors need a sword, a mace, a bow in order to fight against their 
enemies. You can’t have on the one side a man naked and with his hands tied, 
and on the other a man armored in mail; no matter how brave it might be, how 
can a lion fight without its claws? If the king wishes me to show my prowess 
before his men, let him have a horse and a heavy mace brought here. Then he 
can set a thousand of his horsemen against me, and if I leave one of them alive, 
never call me a man again.” 

When he heard this, Afrasyab glared at Bizhan in fury and turned to Garsivaz. 
“You see how he’s still plotting against me; the evil he’s done already’s not 
enough for him, he asks to be allowed to kill my men in combat! Take him 
bound as he is and get rid of him; have a gallows erected before my castle gates 
so that everyone who passes by will see him. String him up and never mention 
him to me again, so that the Persians will know not to come snooping around 
here any more.” 

As they dragged Bizhan to the door he wept in bitterness of heart, and said, 
“If God has written on my forehead that I am to die in an evil time, I fear neither 
death nor the gallows. I fear the warriors of Iran; I fear that my enemies among 
them will call me a coward because I was strung up unwounded; I fear that my 
noble ancestors will reproach me, and that my soul will linger here, having 
shamed my father.” 


The Arrival of Piran 

God pitied his youth and confounded his enemies’ plans. While the pit for the 
gallows was being dug, Piran appeared in the distance; as he approached he saw 
a gallows being erected with a noose swinging from it and called out, “Who is to 
be hanged here? And is the king’s gateway a fitting place to raise a gibbet?” 

Garsivaz answered, “This is for Bizhan, the king’s enemy, who comes from 
Iran.” 

Piran urged his horse forward and came up to Bizhan; he saw he was in great 
distress, naked, dry-mouthed, and pale, with his hands tied tightly behind his 
back. He said, “How did you come to be here? Did you come to Turan looking 
for bloodshed?” Bizhan told him his tale of bad luck, and Piran wept to hear it. 
He ordered the soldiers to pause before hanging him, to wait until he had talked 
with the king and pointed out to him where his best interests lay. 

He entered the court humbly, his arms folded across his chest, bowed before 
Afrasyab, and waited. The king realized he had some petition to make and 
laughed, saying: 


“Out with it then! Tell me, what’s your request? 
Noblest of all my chieftains, and the best, 

If you want gold or jewels or wealth from me, 

If you want troops, or arms, or sovereignty, 

You know my goods are yours, as payment for 
Your peerless services in peace and war.” 


Loyal Piran kissed the ground, stood, and said, “May your auspicious reign 
never end; the world’s kings praise you and your splendor is like the sun’s. 
Whatever I have—be it people, wealth, or authority—is from you; my request is 
not for myself, since no subject of yours wants for anything. I have given the 
king advice on many matters many times before this, but my advice was not 
followed. I told you not to kill Kavus’s son, Seyavash, who was of royal lineage 
and who was tireless on your behalf, as this would make Rostam and Tus your 
enemies, bringing them from Iran on their war elephants, tearing apart the bonds 
that unite us. And have you not seen the damage the Persians have done to our 
country, trampling two-thirds of it underfoot, making our lives bitter as brackish 
water? And Zal’s sword is still not sheathed; his son Rostam is still lopping off 
heads with it and staining the sun with blood. Now that there’s the chance of 


peace, you’re looking to stir up new troubles, foolishly sniffing at the poisoned 
blossoms of hatred. If you spill Bizhan’s blood, once again the dust of 
vengeance will rise up from Turan. The king is wise and I am his subject, but 
open your heart’s eyes to the truth. Think how the king of Iran has profited from 
our enmity, and yet you’re trying to provoke it further, to make disaster’s tree 
bear fruit again. We cannot survive a second war against them; no one knows 
Giv, and that monster Rostam, or iron-fisted Gudarz better than you do.” 

Piran threw cold water on the raging fire, but Afrasyab replied, “And you 
don’t know what Bizhan has done to me, embarrassing me before all Turan and 
Iran. Can’t you see the humiliation that shameless daughter of mine has brought 
to my white hairs, destroying my women’s reputation in the world? My whole 
country and army will make fun of my disgrace for ever. If he escapes from me 
with his life, everyone will reproach me; I’ll spend the rest of my days weeping, 
disgraced, and despised.” 

Piran repeatedly called down heaven’s blessing on the king and said, “My 
noble lord, favored by fortune, all is as you say, and it’s your reputation that’s at 
stake. But consider my suggestion carefully: chain him in heavy chains, such 
that he’d rather die on the gallows than suffer the pain they bring. This will teach 
the Persians a lesson, and they won’t be in such a hurry to plot against us in the 
future. Any man who languishes in your dungeons is not going to be reckoned a 
useful warrior.” 

The king followed his advice and said to Garsivaz, “Prepare a dark pit and 
heavy chains: bind his arms tightly, shackle him hand and foot, and hang him 
head down within the pit so that he sees neither sun nor moon. Take elephants, 
and have them drag here the huge rock that the Akvan Div wrenched from the 
ocean depths; cover the pit’s entrance with it, and let Bizhan suffer there till he 
loses his mind. Then go with your cavalry to that shameless hussy Manizheh’s 
palace and destroy it; strip her of her crown and status and say to her, ‘Wretched 
woman, you deserve neither crown nor throne; you have shamed the king before 
his ancestors and dragged their noble name in the dust.’ Then hale her to the pit 
and say to her, ‘See in this pit now, naked and alone, 

The man you set beside you on your throne; 
You were the springtime of his life; now be 
His friend and jailer in adversity.’” 


Garsivaz strode from the king’s presence to carry out his evil orders. Bizhan was 
dragged from beneath the gallows to a deep pit, loaded from head to foot with 


heavy chains, and lowered head down into its darkness. A stone was placed over 
the opening, and from there Garsivaz led his men to Manizheh’s quarters; her 
wealth was plundered, and the crown torn from her head. Barefoot, clad only in 
her shift, her hair loose, her face smeared with blood and tears, Manizheh was 
dragged stumbling to the pit’s edge. There Garsivaz said to her, “Here is your 
lord and household; you’re to be this prisoner’s jailer forever.” 

For a day and a night Manizheh wandered moaning about the wilderness. As 
dawn approached she came back to the pit’s edge and scrabbled away the dirt 
beneath the stone till she could force her hand into the darkness. When the sun 
rose above the mountain tops she began to go from door to door, begging for 
bread. At the end of the day she brought the scraps she had collected and pushed 
them through the opening she’d made, offering them to Bizhan. And so, in grief 
and wretchedness, she passed her days. 


Gorgin Returns to Iran Without Bizhan 

After a week, Gorgin saw that Bizhan had not returned and he began to search 
for him everywhere, his face bathed in tears of shame. He regretted what he had 
done and wondered how he could have betrayed his companion like this. He 
hurried in the direction Bizhan had taken and went through the groves of trees 
looking for him, but he saw no one and heard not even so much as a bird’s song. 
He scoured the meadows calling for his friend, and finally caught sight of 
Bizhan’s horse in the distance. The reins were loose, the saddle had slipped 
down, and the horse’s lower lip hung pendulous, as if the animal were consumed 
with rage. Gorgin gave Bizhan up for lost, certain that he would never return to 
Iran: either he had been strung up on a gallows or was languishing chained in a 
pit, but it was clear that Afrasyab had harmed him in some way. Gorgin flung 
down his lariat and turned aside his face in shame; he was sorry for what he had 
done and longed to see his friend. He led Bizhan’s horse back to their camp and 
rested there for a day; then he set out for Iran, travelling day and night without 
stopping to sleep. 

When the king learned that Gorgin was returning without Bizhan, he told Giv 
to ask Gorgin what had become of his son. Giv ran weeping into the street, his 
heart filled with anxiety, crying out, “Bizhan has not come back, and why should 
he stay with the Ermani?” He ordered that a horse he had used in crises before be 
saddled; inwardly raging like a leopard, he rode out to meet Gorgin, intending to 
ask him where Bizhan was, and what had happened. To himself he said, “This 


Gorgin has secretly and suddenly tricked him; if I find it’s true that he’s coming 
back without Bizhan, I’ll cut his head off there and then.” 

Gorgin saw Giv approaching. He dismounted and ran forward, then groveled 
in the dust before him, his head bared and his cheeks scored by his nails. He 
said, “My lord, you are the king’s elect, the leader of his armies, why have you 
come out to meet me, your eyes flowing with tears? I return sick at heart, and 
seeing you, my wretchedness increases; I look at you and my face is bathed in 
shame’s hot tears. But don’t fear for him; no harm has come to him, and I can 
give you proof of this.” 

When Giv heard the warrior’s words and saw his son’s dusty, desolate horse 
led by Gorgin, he fell from his own mount as if unconscious. His head sank into 
the dust; moaning, he tore at his clothes and hair and beard, and cried out, “God 
of the heavens, who has placed intelligence and love in my heart, now that I 
have lost my son it is right that the bonds of life dissolve in me; take me to 
where the blessed spirits live, you who know better than I do the extent of my 
heart’s sorrow. In all the world he was all I had, as a companion and as a help in 
times of trouble; now that ill fortune has taken him from me, I am left here to 
grieve alone.” 

Again he tumed to Gorgin. “Tell me what happened, from the beginning. Did 
Fate suddenly snatch him away, or did he leave you of his own accord? What 
disaster overtook him? Tell me what snare the heavens laid for him, what devil 
confronted him and destroyed him in the uplands there. Where did you find his 
abandoned horse? Where did you lose sight of Bizhan?” 

Gorgin replied, “Calm yourself, and listen to my words carefully. Know, 
then, my lord—and may your presence always lend splendor to our court—what 
happened, and how it happened, while we were fighting the wild boar. We 
traveled from here to confront the herd and when we reached the borders of 
Erman we saw a once-wooded region that had been leveled as flat as the palm of 
a hand; all the trees had been torn down, and the whole area was full of boars’ 
lairs. We seized our spears and went to work, yelling to drive the boar into the 
open and fighting like lions; the day ended and we still weren’t tired of our task. 
Like charging elephants we drove them before us, and we hacked out their tusks 
with chisels. Then we set off on the return journey to Iran, rejoicing and hunting 
as we came. Suddenly a wild ass appeared, more beautiful than any ever seen 
before; its coat was like that of Gudarz’s horse, it had Farhad’s horse’s muzzle, 
feet like the Simorgh’s, but with steel hooves, and its head, ears, and tail were 
like those of Bizhan’s horse, Shabrang. Its mane was like a lion’s, and it was as 


swift as the wind; you’d think it had been sired by Rakhsh. It made for Bizhan 
like a towering elephant, and he noosed it with his lariat, but it charged off into 
the distance, dragging Bizhan out of sight. Their struggle sent a cloud of dust 
into the air and both the wild ass and his captor disappeared from view. I 
searched everywhere, until my mount was exhausted, but I found no trace of 
Bizhan: all I could discover was his horse, trailing its saddle in the dust. I stayed 
there for a long time calling Bizhan’s name, but finally I gave up and decided 
that the wild ass must have been the White Demon. My heart burned with 
anxiety, wondering how his struggle with the Demon had tured out.” 

When Giv heard this speech he knew that something terrible had happened; 
he saw that Gorgin was talking at random, his eyes downcast, his fearful face the 
color of straw, his trembling voice indicative of his guilty heart. Giv thought that 
his son was lost to him, and he saw that Gorgin was lying; Ahriman plucked at 
his heart, and he longed to take revenge for his son’s disappearance, no matter 
how shameful such a course might seem. But then he reflected that this would 
clarify nothing. “What good will it do me to kill him now?” he thought. “It will 
only make Ahriman glad and profit Bizhan nothing at all. I must look for another 
way forward. I’ll tell Gorgin’s tale to the king and see if that will clear matters 
up; I can easily take my revenge later, as he has no defense against my spear if I 
choose to use it.” 

Giv roared at Gorgin, “You devil’s spawn, you’ve taken the sun and moon 
from my life, you’ve stolen away the king’s chosen champion, you’re forcing me 
to travel the world in search of relief for my sorrow—how can you sleep or rest 
enmeshed in such lies and deceit? But I shall go before the king, and after that I 
shall be revenged on you with my dagger.” 

And so he went to the king, and after greeting him respectfully and wishing 
him long life and good fortune, he said, 


“In all the world I had but one delight— 
My son, for whom I fretted day and night, 
For whose pure soul I wept paternal tears; 
To lose him was the worst of all my fears. 
And now Gorgin returns alone and tries 
To hide his guilty soul with specious lies; 
He brings bad news of my beloved son 
And has no sign of him to show but one— 
A riderless, led horse. Your majesty, 


Look closely at this matter and you’ll see 
That my demand for vengeance here is just; 
Gorgin has brought my head down to the dust.” 


The king was moved by Giv’s grief; he turned pale and grew sick at heart 
thinking of Bizhan. He asked Giv, “What did Gorgin say about where Bizhan 
is?” Giv told him Gorgin’s tale, and Khosrow answered, “Think no more of this, 
mourn no longer; Bizhan is alive and you should live in hopes of seeing your 
lost son again. I have agreed with my priests that I and my troops shall soon set 
out for Turan to fight in the war of vengeance for Seyavash: I and my elephants 
will overcome that country, and Bizhan will be there by my side, fighting like a 
devil on our behalf. Grieve no more; I am as eager as you are to see him again.” 
Giv left his presence, his heart filled with pain and grief, his cheeks sallow, his 
eyes wet with tears. 

When Gorgin arrived at Khosrow’s court he found it empty; the courtiers had 
left with Giv to comfort him. Gorgin went forward, shamefaced and 
apprehensive, kissed the ground before Khosrow, and greeted him. He placed the 
boars’ tusks, glittering like diamonds, before the king, and said, “May the king 
be victorious in all things, may all his days be springtime, and may the heads of 
all his enemies be cut off as I cut off these boars’ heads!” 

Khosrow looked at the tusks and questioned Gorgin about the expedition, 
asking how he had been separated from Bizhan and what disaster had befallen 
him. At first Gorgin was speechless, but then he began to tell his lying tale, 
trembling from fear of the king. But before he could finish, Khosrow, realizing 
that his confusion indicated his guilt, started up and pushed him away from the 
throne, reviling him: “Haven’t you heard the old saying that even a lion who 
arouses the vengeance of Gudarz’s clan will perish miserably? If you weren’t 
such a wretch, and so certain to come to a bad end, I’d have your head twisted 
off like a chicken’s!” 

Khosrow gave orders that blacksmiths fashion heavy shackles for him, and 
that his feet be fettered, so that he could reflect on the evil he’d done. To Giv, 
Khosrow said, “Calm yourself, we must begin the search for Bizhan. I shall send 
out a thousand horsemen to see if they can find news of him, and if we hear 
nothing at first, do not despair. Wait until spring brings in the new year, and the 
sun renews the world; then when the flowers reappear and the earth turns green 
again, and the breezes are laden with scent, I shall pray to Hormoz. I shall have 
the world-revealing cup that shows the seven climes brought to me, and I shall 


invoke God’s blessings on our noble ancestors. Then I will tell you where 
Bizhan is, since the cup will answer my prayers.” 

Giv’s heart was reassured, and he thanked the king and wished him long life 
and prosperity. 

As soon as Giv had left the king’s presence, he sent out horsemen in every 
direction to see if they could find some trace of his son. They covered all Iran 
and Turan but found nothing, so that when the spring came and the world was 
renewed the king turned to the world-revealing cup. 

Hopeful for news of his son, Giv entered the court, and when Khosrow saw 
him bent over and withered away with worry, he put on the Rumi cloak he wore 
to pray. He cried out to God, calling down blessings on the sun as it inaugurated 
the new year, and asked for strength and help to defeat the power of Ahriman. 
Then he returned in solemn procession to his palace, replaced the crown on his 
head, and took the cup in his hands. He stared into it and saw the world’s seven 
climes, the turnings of the heavens, all that happened there, and how and why 
things came to pass. He saw from the sign of Pisces to that of Aries, he saw 
Saturn, Mars, the sun, Leo, Venus, Mercury above, and the moon below. The 
royal magician saw all that was to be seen. Searching for some sign of Bizhan, 
his gaze traversed the seven climes until he reached the land of the Gorgsaran, 
and there he saw him, bound with chains in a pit, longing for death; beside him 
princess Manizheh stood, ready to serve him. The king turned toward Giv and 
his smile lit up the council chamber. “Rejoice, Bizhan is alive, rid yourself of 
your anxiety. He is imprisoned, but this is small cause for grief, because he is 
alive and a noble woman is attending him. He suffers terrible pains, and it hurts 
me to see him like this, weeping, despairing of help from his family, trembling 
like a willow tree. But who can go to his rescue, who is loyal enough to 
undertake this expedition, to save him from his sorrows? Only Rostam, who can 
pluck monsters from the sea’s depths, is fit for this task. Go to Zavolestan and 
travel day and night without rest; take my letter but breathe not a word of it to 
anyone as you go.” 


Khosrow’s Letter to Rostam 
A scribe was called in and the king dictated a friendly letter to Rostam: 


“Great Rostam, noblest of our warriors, 
Whose deeds remind us of our ancestors, 
Leopards submit to you, seamonsters roar 


In terror when you walk upon the shore, 
Persia’s stout heart, prop of our sovereignty, 
Prompt with your help in all adversity: 

The demons of Mazanderan were slain 

By you, your mace destroyed their evil reign. 
How many kings, how many enemies 

You’ve conquered, and how many provinces! 
To pluck from darkness any mortal who 

In peril or affliction turns to you, 

The Lord has given you a mammoth’s might 
And lionhearted courage when you fight. 
Gudarz and Giv in their despair now ask 
For your assistance in a worthy task; 

You know how close this clan remains to me, 
Never have they endured such agony. 

Giv has a single son, and all his joy, 

His hopes of life, are centered on this boy; 
To me he’s been a loyal courtier who 

Will do whatever I command him to. 

Now, when you read this letter, don’t delay, 
Return with Giv, hear what he has to say; 

In council we’ll decide what must be done 
To save this noble warrior’s captive son. 

I'll provide men and treasure, you’re to free 
Bizhan from his Turanian misery.” 


Khosrow sealed the letter; Giv took it, made his obeisance to the king, and went 
home to prepare for the journey. He rode with his clansmen, quick as a hunted 
animal, covering two days’ travel in each day, crossing the desert and heading 
for the River Hirmand. When he reached Gurabad a lookout saw him and 
shouted that a warrior and his entourage were approaching the riverbank; the 
leader carried a Kaboli sword in his fist, and they were followed by a banner 
flapping in the wind. Rostam’s father, Zal, heard the lookout’s cry and rode out 
to meet them, so that they would have no reason to act hostilely toward him. As 
he saw Giv coming, his face downcast and preoccupied, he said to himself, 
“Something has happened to the king, there’s no other reason for Giv to come 
here.” When he met up with them he asked after the king, and how the war with 


Turan was faring. Giv greeted him respectfully from Khosrow, and then 
unburdened his heart, telling him the tale of his lost son. He asked for Rostam, 
and Zal answered, “He’s out hunting wild asses: when the sun goes down he’|l 
be back.” Giv said, “I'll go and find him, I have a letter from Khosrow I have to 
give him.” But Zal answered, “Stay here, he’ll be here soon; come to my house 
and spend the day feasting with me.” 

But as Giv entered the outer court Rostam was seen returning from the hunt. 
Giv went out to greet him and dismounted before him. Hope flared up in his 
heart and the color came back to his face, although his eyes were still filled with 
tears. When Rostam saw the anxiety in his expression and the marks of tears on 
his face, he said to himself, “Some disaster has happened to Iran and to the 
king.” He dismounted and embraced Giv, asking after Khosrow, and then for 
news of Gudarz, Tus, Gazhdaham, and various other warriors at the Persian 
court such as Shapur, Farhad, Bizhan, Roham, and Gorgin. When Giv heard the 
name “Bizhan,” a cry escaped from his lips and he said to Rostam, “My lord, all 
kings honor you, and I am happy to see you and to hear you speak so kindly; 
those you ask after are well, and they send their greetings to you. But you don’t 
know the terrible calamity that has stricken me in my old age; the evil eye has 
lighted on Gudarz’s clan and destroyed all our good fortune. I had one son in all 
the world; he was both my boy and my confidant, my councilor. He has 
disappeared from the face of the earth; no one in my clan has suffered such a 
calamity. I’ve ridden day and night searching the world for Bizhan. But now, at 
the turning of the year, our king has prayed to God and seen in the world- 
revealing cup that he is in Turan, loaded down with chains; seeing this, Khosrow 
sent me here to you. I stand before you, my heart filled with hope, my cheeks 
sallow with grief, my eyes blinded by tears: I look to you as my one recourse in 
all the world, as you are ready to help everyone in their time of need.” 

He wept and sighed, and as he handed over Khosrow’s letter he told Rostam 
of the business with Gorgin. Rostam too wept as he read the letter, and loathing 
for Afrasyab welled up in him. He cried out for Bizhan and said, “Think no more 
of this; Rostam will not remove the saddle from Rakhsh’s back until he has 
taken Bizhan’s hand in his and destroyed the chains and prison that hold him. By 
God’s power and the king’s good fortune, I shall bring your prince back from 
Turan.” 

They went to Rostam’s castle, where Rostam went through Khosrow’s letter 
and said to Giv, “I understand what’s to be done, and I shall carry out the king’s 
commands. I know what services you’ve rendered, to me and to the court, and 


though I rejoice to see you here, my heart grieves for Bizhan. But you should not 
despair; I shall act as the king orders me and do my best to rescue your son, even 
if God should separate my soul from my body in the attempt. I’m ready to 
sacrifice my soul, my men, and my wealth on Bizhan’s behalf. With God’s help 
and our victorious king’s good fortune, I’1l free him from his chains and the dark 
pit where he languishes and return him to the Persian court. But now, you must 
be my guest for three days, and we shall drink together and take our ease; there 
is no thine or mine between you and me. We’II feast here and tell tales of the 
heroes and kings of old, and on the fourth day we’|l set out for Khosrow’s 
court.” 

Impulsively Giv stepped forward and kissed the hero’s hand, chest, and feet. 
He praised Rostam and wished him eternal strength and wisdom. When Rostam 
saw that Giv was reassured he said to his steward, “Set out a feast, call our 
councilors and chieftains.” After the banquet, Zavareh, Faramarz, Zal, and Giv 
sat in a bejeweled hall where musicians and wine servers entertained them; their 
hands were stained with ruby wine, the goblets glittered, and the harps 
resounded. And so three days and nights passed in pleasure and happiness; on 
the fourth they prepared to set out. Rostam ordered the baggage train to be made 
ready, laid his ancestors’ mace in the saddle, and mounted Rakhsh. Rakhsh 
pricked up his ears, Rostam’s head seemed to overtop the sun, and he and Giv, 
together with a hundred selected Zavoli horsemen, set out impatiently on their 
journey to Iran. 

As Rostam approached the Persian heartland, the pinnacles of Khosrow’s 
castle could be seen in the distance and a welcoming wind came down to him 
from the heavens. Giv said, “I shall ride on ahead and announce your coming.” 

Giv reached the court and made his obeisance to Khosrow, who asked him 
about his journey and where Rostam was. Giv replied, “Great king, your good 
fortune makes all things turn out well; Rostam did not refuse your orders. When 
I gave him your letter he reverently placed it against his eyes, and he has come 
here as befits a loyal subject, his reins twisted with mine. I rode on ahead to 
announce his coming to you.” 

Khosrow’s answer was, “And where is this prop of our nobility, this paragon 
of loyalty now?” He ordered Gudarz, Tus, and Farhad, together with two 
companies from the army, to go out and greet the approaching hero. The din of 
drums rang out and the welcoming party was drawn up; the world was darkened 
by their dust, and in the gloom their lances glittered and their banners fluttered. 
When they reached Rostam they dismounted and bowed before him, and he too 


descended from his horse and asked each one for news of the king. Then 
everyone remounted and the group made its way to the royal palace. 


Rostam Addresses Kay Khosrow 

When Rostam entered the audience hall he ran forward, invoking the blessings 
of Hormoz upon the king. He then called on the angel Bahman to protect his 
crown, the angel Ordibehesht to protect his person, the angel Shahrivar to give 
him victory, the angel Sepandarmez to watch over him, the angel Khordad to 
bring prosperity to his lands, and the angel Mordad to watch over his flocks. 

Khosrow stood, motioned Rostam to sit beside him, and said, “You are the 
champion of the world’s kings; what men conceal you know, and what you do 
not conceal is still unknown to them. The Kayanids have chosen you before all 
others; you are the support of their army, the guardian of Iran, the refuge of their 
troops. I rejoice to see you here, valiant and vigilant as ever. Now, are Zavareh, 
Faramarz, and Zal well? What news can you give me of them?” Rostam knelt 
and kissed the throne and replied, “Victorious king, all three are well and 
prosperous, thanks to your good fortune. Blessed are those whom the king 
remembers!” 

Khosrow ordered his chamberlain to summon Gudarz, Tus, and other 
courtiers of the first rank. The steward had the royal gardens prepared; a golden 
crown and throne were placed beneath a tree whose blossoms were beginning to 
fall, royal brocades were spread on the grass, and the flower gardens glowed like 
lamps at night. Near where the king sat a tree was placed so that its shade 
covered him; its trunk was of silver, its branches of gold encrusted with rubies 
and other precious stones; its leaves and buds were made of emeralds and agates 
that hung like precious earrings. Golden oranges and quinces grew from the 
branches; they were hollow inside and filled with musk macerated in wine, and 
their surfaces were pierced like a flute’s, so that the scent diffused through the 
air, delighting the king. The wine servers who stood before the guests had 
bejeweled crowns, and their cloaks were of brocade shot with gold; they wore 
torques and earrings, and the bodices of their clothes were worked with gems. 
The faces of the servants who burned sandalwood before the king and played on 
harps glowed like rich brocade. All hearts rejoiced to be there; the wine went 
round and even before it took effect the guests’ faces shone like pomegranate 
blossoms. 

Khosrow sat Rostam in the place of honor beneath the tree and said to him, 
“My noble friend, you are Iran’s shield against all evil, protecting us as the 
Simorgh spreads out her wings. You have always been ready to serve Iran and 
her kings, and with your mace and the might of your royal farr you destroyed the 


demons of Mazanderan. You know how Gudarz’s clan has served in good 
fortune and bad, always ready to do my bidding and to guide me toward the 
truth, and Giv especially has been my bulwark against all evils. Such a sorrow 
has never come to this clan before, for what sorrow is greater than the loss of a 
child? If you do not agree to help us now no other lion-warrior will; think what 
must be done to save Bizhan, who languishes a captive in Turan. Whatever 
horses or arms or men or treasure you need, take them, and give the matter no 
more thought!” 

Rostam kissed the ground, rose quickly, and said, 


“Your majesty, you’re like the radiant sun 
Bestowing light and life on everyone: 

May greed and anger never touch your reign 
And may your enemies live wracked with pain. 
Monarch with whom no monarch can compete, 
All other kings are dust beneath your feet, 
Neither the sun nor moon has ever known 

A king like you to occupy the throne. 

My mother bore me so that you could live 

Sure of the service that you knew I’d give; 

I’ve heard the king’s command and I agree 

To go wherever he might order me. 

The heavens can rain down fire but I won’t leave 
This mission that I undertake for Giv 

Until success is mine—and I won’t ask 

For chiefs or troops to help me in this task.” 


Gudarz, Giv, Fariborz, Farhad, and Shapur, together with the other assembled 
chieftains, called down the world Creator’s blessings on Rostam, and the 
company Sat to their wine, as happy and radiant as the springtime. 


Gorgin Sends a Letter to Rostam 

When Gorgin heard of Rostam’s presence at the court, he realized that here was 
the key to his deliverance. He sent him a message: “O sword of fortune, 
scabbard of loyalty, banner of greatness, treasury of faith, gateway of generosity, 
imprisoner of disaster, if it does not pain you to hear from me, let me tell you of 
my sorrows. The hunchbacked heavens have doused the torch of my heart and 


left me in darkness; what was fated to happen to me has happened. If the king 
will forgive me my sins and restore me my good name, I’m ready to throw 
myself into fire before him, I’ll do anything to rid myself of this disaster that has 
come to me in my old age. If you will ask for me from the king, I will follow 
you with all the energy of a wild mountain sheep. I shall go to Bizhan and grovel 
before him, in hopes of getting back my good reputation.” 

When Gorgin’s message reached Rostam, he sighed, troubled by Gorgin’s 
sorrow and by his foolish request. He sent the messenger back and told him to 
say to Gorgin, “You fearless fool, haven’t you heard of what the leopard said to 
the sea monster: ‘When passion overcomes wisdom, no one can escape its 
clutches; but the wise man who overcomes passion will be renowned as a lion’? 
You talk like a cunning old fox, but you didn’t see the trap set for you. How can 
I possibly mention your name before Khosrow for the sake of such a foolish 
request? But you’re so wretched that I’ll ask Khosrow to forgive your sin and 
brighten your life’s darkened moon. If God wills that Bizhan be freed from his 
chains, you’ ll be set free, too, and no one will take any further revenge on you. 
But if the heavens will otherwise, you must despair of life. I shall go on this 
mission, armed with God’s strength and the king’s command, but if I don’t 
return successfully, prepare yourself for Gudarz and Giv to wreak vengeance on 
you for their child’s death.” 

Two days and nights passed and Rostam made no mention of the matter; on 
the third day, when Khosrow was seated on his ivory throne, the hero came to 
him. He began to talk about Gorgin’s miseries, but the king cut him off: “You’re 
my general, and you’re asking me to break the oath I swore by my throne and 
crown, by the lord of the sun and moon, that Gorgin would see nothing from me 
but suffering until Bizhan was freed from his chains. Ask me for anything else, 
for thrones, seal-rings, swords or crowns!” 

Rostam replied, “My noble lord, if he did wrong, he repents of it and is ready 
to sacrifice his life in a good cause; but if the king will not forgive him, his name 
and reputation are lost forever. Anyone who strays from wisdom’s path sooner 
or later regrets the evil that he does. It would be right for you to remember his 
former deeds, how he was always there in every crisis, and how he fought 
steadfastly for your ancestors. If the king can grant me this man, it may be that 
fortune will smile on him again.” Khosrow allowed his request, and Gorgin was 
released from the dark pit where he had been chained. 

Then the king asked Rostam how he intended to go about his task, what he 
would need in the way of troops and treasure, and who he wanted to accompany 


him. He added, “I fear Afrasyab will kill Bizhan in a fit of impatience. He has a 
demon’s nature and he’s impulsive; he might well suddenly destroy our 
watrior.” Rostam replied, “I shall prepare for this task in secret; the key to these 
chains is deceit, and we must not act too hastily. We must tug back on the reins, 
and this is no time for maces, swords, or spears. I’]l need a quantity of jewels, 
gold, and silver; we’ll go with high hopes, and when we’re there, fear will make 
us cautious. We’|l go as merchants, and this will give us a good excuse to linger 
in Turan for a while. I’ll need carpets and clothes, and things to give as 
presents.” 

Khosrow gave orders that his ancient treasuries be opened; the king’s 
treasurer brought brocades and jewels, and Rostam came and selected whatever 
he needed. He had a hundred camel-loads of gold coins made up, together with a 
hundred mule-loads of silver, and he had the court chamberlain choose a 
thousand lion hearted warriors. Seven noblemen—Gorgin, Zangeh, Gostaham, 
Gorazeh, Farhad, Roham, and Ashkash—were to go with him as his companions 
and as guardians of the wealth. When these men were summoned, Zangeh asked, 
“Where is Khosrow, and what’s happened that he has called for us like this?” 


Rostam and the Seven Persian Heroes Enter Turkestan 

At dawn the chamberlain appeared at the castle gates, and the seven heroes stood 
before the chosen troops, fully armed and ready to sacrifice their souls if need 
be. At cock crow, as the sky whitened, war drums were fastened on the elephants 
and Rostam, tall as a cypress tree, appeared in the gateway, mace in hand, his 
lariat hitched to his saddle. He called down God’s blessings on his country, and 
the group set off. 

They neared the border with Turan, and he called the army’s leaders to him. 
He said, “You are to stay here, alert and on guard; you are not to leave this place 
unless God divides my body from my soul; be prepared for war, however, have 
your claws ready for blood.” 

The army stayed on the Persian side of the border while Rostam and his 
nobles pressed on to Turan. But first they disguised themselves as merchants, 
removing their silver sword belts and dressing in woolen garments. They entered 
Turan as a richly laden caravan, accompanied by seven horses, one of which was 
Rakhsh; there were a hundred camel-loads of jewels, and a hundred mule-loads 
of soldier’s tunics and armor. The bells on the animals and the clatter of their 
progress made a noise like the trumpets of Tahmures; the whole plain was filled 
with their din until they reached the town where Piran lived. Piran was away 


hunting; when Rostam saw him returning, he had a goblet filled with jewels and 
covered with a fine brocade cloth and two horses with jeweled bridles and 
draped with brocade led forward. Servants took the gifts to Piran’s palace, and 
Rostam accompanied them. He greeted Piran respectfully, as one whose virtues 
were known both in Iran and Turan. By God’s grace Piran did not recognize 
Rostam; he said to him, “Where are you from, who are you, and why have you 
come here in such a hurry?” Rostam replied, “I am your servant, sir; God’s led 
me to your town to refresh myself and rest. I’ve come the long and weary way 
from Iran to Turan as a merchant; I buy and sell all sorts of things. I’ve traveled 
here assured of your kindness, and hope has now conquered my heart’s fears. If 
you will take me under your wing’s protection, I shall stay here to sell jewels 
and buy horses. Your justice will ensure that no one harms me, and your 
benevolence will rain down blessings upon me.” Then he set before Piran the 
goblet filled with jewels and had the splendid Arab horses, that had no trace of 
windblown dust on their immaculate coats, led forward. Invoking God’s 
benediction, he handed the presents over, and the bargain was made. 

When Piran saw the jewels glittering in the goblet he welcomed Rostam 
warmly and sat him on a turquoise throne, saying, “Be happy here, be sure you’ ll 
be safe in my city; P’ll give you quarters near to my palace and you need have no 
fears for your goods, no one will give you any trouble. Bring everything you 
have of value here and then look for customers. Make my son’s house your 
personal headquarters, and think of yourself as one of my family.” Rostam 
replied, “My lord, I brought this caravan from Iran for you, and all that I have in 
it is yours. Wherever I stay will be suitable for me, but with my victorious lord’s 
permission, I’ll stay with the caravan; there are all kinds of people traveling with 
me, and I don’t want any of my jewels to disappear.” Piran said, “Go and choose 
any place you desire; I’1l send guides to help you.” 

Rostam chose a house for his party to stay in, and a warehouse for his goods. 
News spread that a caravan had come to Piran’s castle from Iran and customers 
began to arrive from all quarters, particularly when it became known that there 
were jewels for sale. Buyers for brocade, carpets, and gems converged on the 
castle, and Rostam and his companions decked out their warehouse so that it 
shone like the sun itself. 


Manizheh Comes to Rostam 

Manizheh heard about the caravan from Iran and hurried to Piran’s city. 
Unveiled and weeping, Afrasyab’s daughter came before Rostam; wiping her 
tears from her face with her sleeve, she said, 


“T wish you life and long prosperity, 

May God protect you from adversity! 

May heaven prosper all you say and do, 

May evil glances never injure you. 

Whatever purposes you hope to gain 

May all your efforts never bring you pain, 

May wisdom be your guide, may fortune bless 
Tran with prosperous days and happiness. 

What news have you? What tidings can you bring 
Of Persia’s champions, or of their king? 

Haven’t they heard Bizhan is here, don’t they 
Desire to help their friend in any way? 

Will he be left by Giv, by all his kin, 

To perish in the pit he suffers in? 

Fetters weigh down his legs, his arms and hands 
Are fixed to stakes by heavy iron bands; 

He hangs in chains, blood stains his clothes, I weep 
To hear his groans, and never rest or sleep.” 


Rostam was afraid when he heard her, and he burst out as if in rage, pushing her 
toward the street: “Get away from me, I don’t know any kings, I know nothing 
about Giv or that family, your words mean nothing to me!” 

Manizheh stared at Rostam and sobbed pitifully. She said, “You’re a great 
and wise man and your cold words don’t suit you. Say nothing if you wish, but 
don’t drive me from you, for my sufferings have worn away my life. Is this the 
way Persians treat people? Do they deny news to the poor and wretched?” 

Rostam said, “What’s the matter with you, woman? Has Ahriman told you 
the world’s coming to an end? You disrupted my trade, and that’s why I was 
angry with you. Don’t let what I said upset you; I was worried about selling my 
goods. As for the king, I don’t live in the city where he does, and I know nothing 
about Giv or his clan; I’ve never been to the area where they live.” 


Quickly, he had whatever food was available set in front of the poor woman, 
and then he questioned her as to what had made her unhappy, why she was so 
interested in the Persian king and nobility, and why she kept her eye on the road 
from Iran the whole time. 

Manizheh said, “And why should you want to know about my sorrows and 
misfortunes? I left the pit with my heart filled with anguish and ran to you 
thinking you were a free and noble man, and you yelled at me like a warrior 
attacking an enemy. Have you no fear of God in you? I am Manizheh, 
Afrasyab’s daughter; once the sun never saw me unveiled, but now my face is 
sallow with grief, my eyes are filled with bloody tears, and I wander from house 
to house seeking charity. I beg for bread; this is the fate God has visited upon 
me. Has any life ever been more wretched than mine? May God have mercy on 
me. And poor Bizhan in that pit never sees the sun or moon, but hangs in chains 
and fetters, begging God for death. His pain adds to my pain, and I have wept so 
much that my eyes can weep no more. But if you go to Iran again and hear news 
of Gudarz, or if you see Giv at Kay Khosrow’s court or the hero Rostam, tell 
them that Bizhan lies here in deep distress and that if they delay it will be too 
late. If they wish to see him alive, they should hurry, for he is crushed between 
the stone above him and the iron that binds him.” 

Rostam wept tears of sympathy and said to her, “Dear lovely child, why don’t 
you have the nobles of your country intercede for you with your father? Surely 
he would forgive you and feel remorse for what’s happened?” Then he ordered 
his cooks to bring Manizheh all kinds of food, and especially he told them to 
prepare a roasted chicken folded round with soft bread; when they brought this, 
Rostam dexterously slipped a ring into it and gave it to Manizheh, saying, “Take 
this to the pit, and look after the poor prisoner who languishes there.” 

Manizheh hurried back to the pit, with the food wrapped in a cloth and 
clutched against her breast. She passed it down to Bizhan just as she’d received 
it. Bizhan peered at it in astonishment and called out to her, “Dearest Manizheh, 
you’ve suffered so much on my behalf. Where did you get this food you’re in 
such a hurry to give me?” She said, “From a Persian merchant who’s come with 
a caravan of goods to Turan; he seems like someone who’s passed through many 
trials, a noble and splendid man. He has a great many jewels with him and has 
set up shop in a big warehouse in front of Piran’s castle. He gave me the food 
wrapped in a cloth and told me to bring it to you, and said that I could return for 
more later.” 


Hopeful and apprehensive, Bizhan began to open the bread, and as he did so 
he came on the hidden ring. He peered at the stone set in it and made out a name, 
then he laughed in triumph and astonishment. It was a turquoise seal, with the 
word “Rostam” engraved on it with a steel point, as fine as a hair. Bizhan saw 
that the tree of loyalty had born fruit; he knew that the key that would release 
him from his suffering was at hand. He laughed long and loud and when 
Manizheh heard him laughing, chained in the darkness as he was, she was 
alarmed and feared that he had gone mad. She called down to him, “How can 
you laugh when you can’t tell night from day? What do you know that I don’t? 
Tell me. Has good fortune suddenly shown you her face?” 

Bizhan replied, “I’m hopeful that fate will finally free me from this pit. If you 
can swear to keep faith with me, I’ll tell you the whole tale from beginning to 
end, but only if you’ll swear yourself to secrecy, because a man can sew up a 
woman’s mouth to prevent idle talk and she’II still find some way to free her 
tongue.” 

Manizheh wept and wailed, “How wretched my fate is! Alas for the days of 
my youth, for my broken heart and my weeping eyes. I’ve given Bizhan my 
body, my soul, and my wealth, and now he cannot trust me. My treasury and my 
jeweled crown were plundered, my father cast me out, unveiled and humiliated, 
before his court, and now that Bizhan sees hope he leaves me in despair. The 
world is dark to me, my eyes see nothing, Bizhan hides his thoughts from me, 
and only God knows all things.” 

Bizhan replied, “What you say is true. You lost everything for my sake. I 
should not have said what I said. My kindest friend, my dearest wife, you have 
to guide me now, the agony I’ve suffered has turned my brains. Know then that 
the man selling jewels, whose cook gave you the food you brought, has come to 
Turan looking for me; that’s the only reason he’s here selling jewels. God has 
taken pity on me and I shall see the broad earth once again. This jeweler will 
save me from my long agony, and you from your grief and beggary on my 
behalf. Go to him once again and say to him in secret, “Great hero of the worlds’ 
kings, tender-hearted and resourceful, tell me if you are Rakhsh’s lord.” 

Manizheh hurried to Rostam like the wind and spoke as Bizhan had 
instructed her. When Rostam saw her come running like this and heard what she 
said, he knew that Bizhan had entrusted her with their secret. His heart melted 
and he said, “May God never withdraw his kindness from you, my lovely child. 
Tell him, ‘Yes, Iam Rakhsh’s lord, sent by God to save you. I have traveled the 
long road from Zavol to Iran and from Iran to Turan for your sake.’ Tell him, but 


let no one else know of this; in the darkest night listen for the least sound. Spend 
the next day gathering firewood in the forest, and when night comes, light a huge 
bonfire.” 

Overjoyed at his words and freed from all sorrow, Manizheh hurried back to 
the pit where Bizhan lay bound. She said, “I gave the great lord your message, 
and he confirmed that he was the man you said he was. He told me to wipe away 
my tears and to say to you that he had come here like a leopard to find you, and 
now that he had done so you would soon enough see his sword’s work. He will 
tear up the ground and throw the stone that covers you to the stars. He told me 
that when the sun releases its grip on the world and night comes I’m to build a 
huge fire so that the stone and the pit’s whereabouts shine like the daytime, and 
he will be able to use the glow as a guide to us.” 

Bizhan said, “Light the fire that will deliver us both from darkness,” and he 
prayed to God, saying, “Pure, splendid, and just, release me from all sorrows and 
strike down my enemies with your arrows; give me justice, for you know the 
pains and grief I have suffered; allow me to see my native country again and to 
smash against this stone my evil star.” Then he addressed Manizheh: “And you, 
who’ve suffered long and patiently, 

Who’ve given heart and soul and wealth for me, 
Who thought that, undergone for me, distress 
Was but another name for happiness, 

Who cast aside your kin, your noble name, 

Your parents, crown and land, to share my shame: 
If in my youth I find I’m free again, 

Delivered from this dragon and this pain, 

I'll bow before you like a man whose days 

Are passed before his God in prayer and praise; 
Prompt as a slave who waits before his lord, 
Ill find for you a glorious reward.” 


Manizheh set about gathering firewood, going from branch to branch like a bird, 
her eyes fixed on the sun to mark when it would drop behind the mountains. And 
when she saw the sun disappear and night draw its skirts over the mountain 
slopes, at that moment when the world finds peace and all that is visible fades 
from sight because night’s army has veiled sunlight in darkness, Manizheh 
quickly lit the flames. Night’s pitch-black eyes were seeled; Manizheh’s heart 
pounded like a brass drum as she listened for the iron hooves of Rakhsh. 


For his part, Rostam put on his armor and prayed to the God of the sun and 
moon, saying “May the eyes of the evil be blinded, give me strength to complete 
this business of Bizhan.” He ordered his warriors to prepare for battle; poplar 
wood saddles were placed on their mounts, and they made ready to fight. 

They set out toward the distant glow, and traveled expeditiously. When they 
reached the great stone of the Akvan Div and the pit of sorrow and grief, Rostam 
said to his seven companions, “You’ll have to dismount and find some way to 
remove that stone from the mouth of the pit.” But no matter how hard the 
watriors struggled, they could not shift the stone; when Rostam saw how they 
sweated to no avail, he too dismounted and hitched up his skirts about his waist. 
Praying to God for strength, he set his hands to the stone and lifted it; with a 
lion’s power he flung it into the forest, and the ground shuddered as the stone 
landed. 

He peered into the pit and, sighing in sympathy, addressed Bizhan: “How did 
such a misfortune happen to you? Your portion from the world was to have been 
one of delight, how is it that the goblet you took from her hands was filled with 
poison?” Bizhan answered from the darkness, “Your journey must have been 
long and hard; when I heard your war cry, all the world’s poison turned to 
sweetness for me. You see how I have lived, with iron as my earth and a stone as 
my sky; I’ve suffered so much pain and grief that I gave up all hope of the 
world.” 

Rostam replied, “The shining Keeper of the World has had mercy on your 
soul, and now I have one request to ask of you: that you grant me Gorgin’s life, 
and that you drive from your heart all thoughts of hatred for him.” Bizhan said, 
“What do you know of my experiences with this companion of mine; my 
lionhearted friend, what do you know of how Gorgin treated me? If I ever set 
eyes on him again my vengeance will be like God’s last judgment.” 

Rostam said, “If you persist in this hatred and refuse to listen to what I have 
to say, I shall leave you chained here in this pit; I shall mount Rakhsh and return 
whence I came.” When he heard Rostam’s words, a cry of grief rose up from the 
pit, and Bizhan said, “I am the most wretched of our clan’s heroes. The evil that 
came to me was from Gorgin, and now I must suffer this, too: but I accept, and 
drive all thoughts of hatred for him from my heart.” 

Rostam lowered his lariat into the pit and brought Bizhan out of its depths, 
wasted away with pain and suffering, his legs still shackled, his head uncovered, 
his hair and nails grown long, all his body caked with blood where the chains 
had eaten into the flesh. Rostam gave a great cry when he saw him weighed 


down with iron and set about breaking the fetters and shackles. They made their 
way home, with Bizhan on one side of Rostam and the woman who had 
succored him on the other; the two young people recounted their sufferings to 
the hero, who had Bizhan’s head washed and fresh clothes brought for him. 
Then Gorgin came forward and sank to the ground, striking his face against the 
dust; he asked pardon for his evil acts and for the foolish things he had said. 
Bizhan’s heart forgave him, and he forgot all thoughts of punishment. 

The camels were loaded with their goods, Rostam put on his armor once 
more, and the Persian warriors mounted, with drawn swords and maces at the 
ready. Ashkash, who was a wary fighter, always on the lookout for whatever 
might harm the army, led off the baggage train. Rostam said to Bizhan, “You 
and Manizheh should go with Ashkash. Afrasyab will be so enraged we can’t 
rest tonight; I’m going to play a trick on him within his own walls, and his whole 
country will laugh at him tomorrow.” But Bizhan’s answer was, “If I’m the one 
who’s being avenged, I should be at the head of this expedition.” 


Rostam and Bizhan Attack 

Rostam and the seven warriors left the baggage train in Ashkash’s capable hands 
and set out. Letting their reins hang slack on their saddles and drawing their 
swords, they arrived at Afrasyab’s palace at the time when men turn to 
drunkenness, rest, and sleep. They attacked and confusion reigned: swords 
glittered, arrows poured down, heads fell severed from bodies, mouths were 
clogged with dust. Rostam stood in the portico of Afrasyab’s palace and yelled, 
“So you sleep well, do you, you and your valiant warriors? You slept in state 
while Bizhan was in the pit, but did you dream of an iron wall confronting you? 
I am Rostam, the son of Zal; now is no time for sleep in soft beds. I have 
smashed your chains and removed the stone you set as Bizhan’s keeper; he is 
free of his fetters, and rightly so, since this was no way to treat a son-in-law! 
Were Seyavash’s sufferings, and the war that came from them, not enough for 
you? You had no right to seek Bizhan’s life, but I see your heart’s stupefied and 
your mind’s asleep.” And Bizhan cried out, “Misbegotten, evil-minded Turk, 
think how you dealt with me when you were on your throne and I stood chained 
before you; then, when I was bound motionless as a stone, you were savage as a 
leopard, but now I walk freely on the face of the earth, and the ferocious lion 
slinks off.” 





Afrasyab struggled with his clothes and called out, “Are all my warriors 
asleep? Any man who wants jewels and a crown, block these enemies’ 
advance!” Cries and a confused noise of combat resounded on all sides, and 
blood streamed beneath Afrasyab’s door; every Turanian warrior who ventured 
forward was killed, and finally Afrasyab fled from his palace. Rostam entered 
the building and distributed among his men its cloth and carpets, the noble 
horses with their poplar wood saddles covered with leopard skins and jewels, 
and the king’s womenfolk, who took the Persian heroes by the hand. 

They left the palace and packed up their plunder, having no intention of 
staying any longer in Turan. Because of the baggage they carried and to avoid a 
bitter outcome to their expedition, they urged the horses forward as fast as they 
could. Rostam became so exhausted by their haste that even the weight of his 
helmet was a trouble to him, and his companions and their horses were so weak 
they had hardly a pulse left in their arteries. Rostam sent a messenger to the 
forces he had left when he crossed into Turan, saying “Draw your swords from 
their scabbards; I am certain that the earth will soon be black with an army’s 
hooves. Afrasyab will muster an army of vengeance, and follow us here; their 
lances will darken the sunlight.” 

At last the returning group reached the waiting army; they made themselves 
ready for battle, their lances sharpened, their reins at the ready. A lookout saw 
horsemen approaching from Turan and Rostam went to Manizheh in her tent and 
said, “If the wine has been spilt, its scent still lingers: if our pleasures are past, 
the memory of them is still ours. But this is the way of the world, giving us now 
sweetness and pleasure, now bitterness and pain.” 


Rostam’s Battle with Afrasyab 
As soon as the sun rose above the mountain tops Turan’s warriors had begun to 
prepare for their onslaught. The town was filled with a deafening clamor: 
horsemen mustered in their ranks before Afrasyab’s palace, Turan’s nobles 
bowed their heads to the ground before him, and all were eager to exact 
vengeance from Iran. They felt that the time had passed for words; a remedy had 
to be found, since what Bizhan had done had disgraced their king forever. “The 
Iranians do not call us men,” they said. “They say we are women dressed as 
warriors.” 

Like a leopard, Afrasyab strode forward and gave the signal for war: he 
ordered Piran to have the war drums strapped on their elephants, saying, “These 


Persians will make fun of us no more.” Brass trumpets, bugles, and Indian 
chimes rang out before the palace. Turan was in an uproar as the army set out for 
the Persian border, and the whole earth seemed like a moving ocean. 

A lookout saw the earth heaving like the sea and ran to Rostam: “Prepare to 
fight, the world has turned black from the dust flung up by their horsemen.” But 
Rostam replied, “There’s no cause for fear; dust is what they’1l come to if they 
fight with us.” Leaving the baggage with Manizheh, he donned his armor and 
came out to inspect his troops, roaring like a lion, “What use is a fox when it’s 
caught in a lion’s claws?” Then he addressed his men: “The day of battle’s 
come: my noble lords, 

Where are your iron-piercing spears, your swords? 
Now is the time to show your bravery 
And turn our vengeance into victory. ” 


The trumpets blared and Rostam mounted Rakhsh. He led his men down from 
the mountainside as the enemy were passing through a defile to the plains. The 
two sides ranged themselves behind walls of iron-clad warriors. On the Persian 
side, Ashkash and Gostaham and their horsemen made up the right flank, the left 
was commanded by Farhad and Zangeh, while Rostam himself and Bizhan were 
in the center. Behind them towered Mount Bisitun, and before them was a wall 
of swords. When Afrasyab saw that the enemy forces were led by Rostam, he 
put on his armor uneasily and ordered his men to hold back. He had them form 
defensive ranks; the air darkened and the ground disappeared. He entrusted his 
left flank to Piran, and the right to Human; the center was held by Garsivaz and 
Shideh, while he himself kept an eye on all parts of the line. 

Like a massive mountain, Rostam rode up and down between the armies and 
called out 


“You miserable, wretched Turk—you shame 

Your throne, your warriors, and your noble name. 
Your heart’s not in this fight: how many men 
You’ve mustered in your army’s ranks, but when 
The battle’s joined at last and I attack, 

I'll see no more than your retreating back. 

And did my father never say to you 

The ancient proverbs that are always true? 

‘A herd of milling asses cannot fight 


Against a single lion’s savage might; 

All heaven’s stars will never equal one 

In glory and in radiance—the sun; 

Words won’t give courage to a fox, no laws 
Can make an ass develop lion’s claws.’ 
Don’t be a fool, and if you want to save 

Your sovereignty, don’t act as if you’re brave; 
If you attack this time, in all this plain 

You won’t escape alive from me again!” 


When the Turkish king heard these words he trembled, heaved a bitter sigh, 
and cried out in fury, “Warriors of Turan! Is this a battlefield, or a banqueting 
hall?” 

When they heard their commander’s voice a great shout went up from the 
Turanian ranks; dust rose into the sky obscuring the sun, war drums were 
fastened on elephants, horns and trumpets sounded, and the line of armored 
walriors made a solid iron wall. The plain and mountain slopes re-echoed with 
cries from men on both sides, in the dusty air the glitter of swords flashed as if 
the world’s end had come, and blows from steel maces rained down on armor 
and helmets like hail. Rostam’s banner, with its dragon device, seemed to eclipse 
the sun; wherever he rode, severed heads fell to the ground. With his ox-headed 
mace he was like a maddened dromedary that has slipped its tether, and from the 
center of the army he scattered his enemies like a wolf. 

On the right flank Ashkash pressed on like the wind, eager for combat with 
Garsivaz; on the left Gorgin, Farhad, and Roham pushed back the Turkish 
warriors; and in the center Bizhan went triumphantly forward as if the battle 
were a celebratory feast. Warriors’ heads fell like leaves from a tree, and the 
battlefield became a river of blood in which the Turkish banners lay overturned 
and abandoned. 

When Afrasyab saw the day was lost and that his brave warriors had been 
slain, he threw away his Indian sword and mounted a fresh horse: he separated 
himself from the Turkish army and rode toward Turan, having achieved nothing 
by his attempt to ambush the Persians. Rostam sped after him, raining arrows 
and blows on the intervening Turks; like a fire-breathing dragon he followed him 
for two parasangs, but finally returned to camp, where a thousand Turkish 
prisoners were waiting. There he distributed to the army the wealth his men had 


captured, loaded up the elephant train with baggage, and set out in triumph to 
Kay Khosrow. 


Rostam Returns with Bizhan from Turan to Iran 

When news reached the king that the lion was returning victorious, that Bizhan 
had been released from the prison where he’d been held, that the army of Turan 
had been smashed and all their hopes had come to naught, he prayed to God for 
joy, striking his face and forehead against the dust. 

Gudarz and Giv hurried to Khosrow. The noise of the approaching army’s 
war drums and trumpets could be heard; then the ground in front of the king’s 
palace was darkened by horses’ hooves, the clamor of trumpets and horns 
resounded throughout the city, the banners of Gudarz and Giv were raised, 
chained leopards and lions were led out on one side and on the other were 
mounted warriors. In this fashion, as the king had commanded, the army went 
out to greet the returning victors. 

When Rostam emerged from the approaching group, Gudarz and Giv 
dismounted, and all the Persian nobility followed suit. Rostam too dismounted 
and greeted those who had come to welcome him. Gudarz and Giv addressed 
him, “Great commander, may God hold you forever in his keeping, may the sun 
and moon turn as you would wish, may the heavens never tire of you; you have 
made us your slaves, for through you we have found our lost son; it is you who 
has delivered us from pain and sorrow, and all Persians long to serve you.” 

The nobles remounted and processed toward the king. When they were close 
to the city, Khosrow came out and welcomed Rostam as the guardian of all his 
heroes. Rostam saw that the king himself was coming to greet him and he 
dismounted once more, saying he was humbled that the king had put himself to 
this trouble. Khosrow embraced him and said, “You are a root stock of 
manliness and a mine of virtues; your deeds shine like the sun, for their 
goodness is seen everywhere.” Quickly Rostam took Bizhan by the hand and 
handed him over to his father and his king. Then he brought the thousand 
Turanian prisoners bound before the king, and Khosrow called down heaven’s 
blessings on him, praising Zal, who had such a son, and Zavol, that had nurtured 
such a hero. 

Next the king addressed Giv: “The hidden purposes of God have looked 
kindly on you: through Rostam He has restored your son to you.” Giv replied, 
“May you live happily and forever, and may Rostam’s luck remain ever fresh 
and green, and may Zal rejoice in his son.” 


Khosrow gave a great feast for his nobles, after which the company went to a 
splendid hall where they were plied with wine and entertained by richly dressed 
musicians whose cheeks blushed like rich brocade, and who accompanied their 
songs with the bewitching sound of harps. There were golden trays heaped with 
musk, and to the front of the hall was an artificial pool filled with rosewater; in 
his glory, the king seemed like a cypress topped by the full moon, and when the 
nobles left his palace every one of them was drunk. 

At dawn Rostam returned to the court, prompt to serve his prince and with 
not a care in his heart; he asked for permission to return home, and Khosrow 
discussed this with him for a while. He ordered his chamberlain to bring in a suit 
of clothes sewn with jewels, a cloak and crown, a goblet filled with royal gems, 
a hundred saddled horses, a hundred laden mules, a hundred servant girls, a 
hundred serving youths—all these he gave to Rostam, who kissed the ground in 
thanks. The hero then placed the crown on his head, girt himself in the cloak and 
belt, made his farewells to the king, and took the road to Sistan. And his noble 
companions, who had seen so much sorrow and joy and suffering at his side, 
were also given presents, and they too left the king’s palace in good spirits. 

When the king had said farewell to his champions, he settled contentedly on 
his throne and summoned Bizhan. He asked him about the pains and sorrows he 
had endured, the narrow pit where he’d languished, and the woman who had 
ministered to him. Bizhan talked at length, and as the king listened he was 
moved to pity, both for him and for the torments Afrasyab’s poor daughter had 
endured. He had a hundred sets of clothes of cloth of gold worked with jewels 
brought in, as well as a crown, ten purses of gold coins, slaves, carpets, and all 
manner of goods and said to Bizhan, “Take these to your grieving Turkish 
friend: speak gently to her, see you don’t make her sufferings worse, think what 
she has gone through for your sake! 

“Live your life in happiness with her now, and consider the turnings of Fate, 
who lifts one to the high heavens so that he knows nothing of grief or pain, and 
then throws him weeping beneath the dust. It is fearful, terrible, to think on this. 
And while one is brought up with luxury and caresses, and is thrown bewildered 
and despairing into a dark pit, another is lifted from the pit and raised to a throne 
where a jeweled crown is placed on his head. The world has no shame in doing 
this; it is prompt to hand out both pleasure and pain and has no need of us and 
our doings. Such is the way of the world that guides us to both good and evil. 
Now you should never need for wealth, and I wish you a heart free from all 
Sorrow.” 


T he war between Iran and Turan continued with great slaughter on both sides, 
but Turan’s forces were driven inexorably back. At one point eleven renowned 
warriors on each side fought in single combat with one another; in each 
encounter the Iranian warrior was victorious. Finally, the leaders of the two 
armies, each of them his king’s deputy in the war, faced off against one another. 


THE DEATH OF PIRAN 


And so it was that Piran, as the leader of Turan’s forces, and Gudarz, as the 
leader of the Persians, faced one another in mortal combat. Each of them rode 
forward, their hearts filled with pain, their heads with the desire for vengeance, 
and the sun seemed to pause above their combat, bewildered by the dust they 
sent up. They fought with swords and daggers, maces and lariats, striving in 
every way they knew to gain the advantage; but it was God who decreed the 
outcome and brought Piran to an evil end. He could not fight against the will of 
God, and neither his struggles nor his strength nor his steed were able to save 
him. Piran saw what was afoot, and he knew that it was the will of God that had 
decreed this, but his valor was such that he fought nevertheless, striving against 
the turning of Fate. 

Then the two commanders, two old men now filled with wisdom and 
experience, turned to their bows and arrows to fight. They let loose a hail of 
arrows against one another, like an autumn wind when it blows among the trees. 
Gudarz chose an arrow of poplar wood that could pierce both iron and stone, and 
loosed it against the barding of Piran’s horse, which stumbled, and neighed, and 
collapsed with Piran struggling beneath him. Piran’s right arm was broken, but 
he managed to free himself and stand on his feet. He knew now that his time was 
at an end and that he would not survive this dark day. He fled from Gudarz, 
scrambling up the mountainside, and despite the pain that assailed him he 
reached the mountain’s peak, hoping that Gudarz would let him be and go back. 
Gudarz watched him and wept, struck with fear at what Fate had wrought, 
knowing that it is faithful to no man and that it is always ready for carnage. He 
shouted: “Great champion, what are you doing, running from me like a hunted 
animal? You’re a commander, where is your army? No one from your army will 
come to your aid. I see not a man of them coming to save you! Where are all 
your strength and valor, your weapons, your courage, your wealth, and your 
wisdom? You were the pillar of heroes, the support of Afrasyab, but your king’s 
sun has been eclipsed. Your time is at an end, this is no moment to fight, and 


don’t try to escape; your situation is desperate, so ask me for quarter, and I shall 
take you alive to the king.” 


Piran replied to him, “This shall not be, 

That I should live to see such misery, 

That after such a life I would implore 

Your mercy just to live a little more. 

I came into the world for death, and I 

In combat with you am prepared to die. 

I’ve heard great men declare ‘No matter how 
Much worldly happiness beguiles you now 

The end is death, from which no man can flee’— 
I’ve no complaint that death should come to me.” 


Gudarz rode round the mountainside but could find no way forward for his 
horse. He dismounted, grasped his shield, and like a hunter began to scramble 
upward, holding a javelin in one hand while the other kept his shield before him, 
as he craned his head to make out the summit. Piran saw him from a long way 
off and leapt from rock to rock; he flung his dagger as though it were an arrow, 
and it pierced the old commander’s arm. When Gudarz saw he had been 
wounded by Piran, he was enraged and hurled his javelin at him; it struck home, 
ripping through the chain mail that covered the warrior’s chest and trunk, and 
lodging in his liver. Piran gave a great cry, his mind turned dark as blood welled 
up from his liver into his mouth, and his soul departed; like a raging lion he fell 
on the mountainside, jerking spasmodically for a moment, until his mind rested 
from all thoughts of vengeance and battle. 

When Gudarz arrived at the mountain’s summit, he saw this mountain of a 
man brought low, his heart as broken as his arm, his head clogged with dust, his 
armor rent, and his belt loosened. Gudarz said: 


“O lion hero, first of those who fight, 
Unmatched in martial bravery and might, 
The world’s seen many men like you and me 
And harries all of us relentlessly.” 


Then he dipped his hand in Piran’s wound, so that it was filled with blood, 
and—oh horror!—he drank the blood and smeared his face with it. He wept 


bitterly for Seyavash’s shed blood and prayed to God, moaning in grief to Him 
for his seventy slain clansmen. He was ready to cut off his own head and would 
not have thought this an evil thing to do to himself. He planted a banner in the 
ground next to Piran, so that its shadow shaded the fallen warrior’s head from 
the sun; then he turned back toward his own army, with blood dripping from his 
arm like a stream. 


One morning, when Afrasyab was getting ready to bring reinforcements to Piran 
on the battlefield, a horseman appeared riding like wind-blown dust and bringing 
news of Piran’s fate. After him came the wounded, weeping, with dust on their 
heads, each of them recounting what he had seen and telling of the evil that had 
come to them from Iran. They spoke of Piran, Lahhak, and Farshidvard, of their 
champions on the day of battle, and of the woes that had beset them, both when 
their army faced the enemy and when they fled from him. They described how 
Kay Khosrow had appeared on that day, filling the plain from mountainside to 
mountainside with his forces, and how they had thrown themselves on his 
mercy, scattered as they were like a flock that has no shepherd. 

When the king heard this news he was astonished, and his face turned as dark 
as his black heart. Wailing aloud, he descended from his ivory throne and flung 
his crown to the ground before his nobles. A cry of sorrow went up from the 
army, and the chieftains’ faces turned sallow with grief. The king’s rooms were 
cleared of strangers, and his family took counsel together. The king wept in his 
sorrow, shedding tears and tearing out his hair. He cried out, “O Ruin my proud 
horseman, and Lahhak who sought to seize the world, and Farshidvard, and my 
knights who were like lions on the day of battle! No sons or brothers are left to 
me from this war, no chieftains or champions remain.” So he lamented and 
coldly sighing swore an oath: “By God, I’m weary of the throne,” he said, 

“T’ll never wear my crown upon my head; 
Armor will be the only cloak for me, 

My throne shall be a horse, the shady tree 
Beneath which I reposed will be a spear. 
I want no luxury or comfort here— 

I leave the glory of my crown to take 


Revenge for my brave, fallen warriors’ sake 
On lowborn Khosrow—may his father’s race 
Be torn up from the earth and leave no trace!” 


And as the assembly was weeping at his words, news came that Kay 
Khosrow had led his forces to the shores of the Oxus, where the multitude of his 
men covered the land. In an agony of grief Afrasyab summoned his army, and 
spoke to them at length about Piran, and the blood of his brother Farshidvard, 
and Ruin, the army’s champion. “Now,” he said, “is the time for vengeance, for 
shedding blood, for fighting like lions. I feel both the grief of love for those I 
have lost and the desire for vengeance against Persia and the Persian king.” With 
tears on their eyelashes the Turkish chieftains said to Afrasyab, “We are all your 
slaves, and we will not swerve aside from this war of vengeance for as long as 
we live. No mother ever bore such sons as Piran, Ruin, or Farshidvard who was 
descended from Feraydun. Now we stand before you, nobles and commoners 
alike, and even if the valleys and mountains should become a sea of blood, and 
our tall warriors lie felled on the ground, if the Lord of the moon is with us, not 
one of us shall turn away from this war.” 

The Turkish king’s heart was rejuvenated by this; he laughed, and his mind 
turned to other matters. He opened the door to his treasury and distributed 
provisions, his heart full of vengeance, his head full of wind, and put his herds of 
horses in the plains and mountains at the army’s disposal. He chose a hundred 
thousand horsemen worthy of war, instructed and cautioned them, and sent them 
toward Balkh, which was guarded by Gostaham, the son of Nozar. Then he 
selected thirty thousand sword-wielding horsemen and sent them to the Oxus 
with orders that they launch boats on the face of the water and cross stealthily at 
night to prevent their being attacked by anyone. The king sent out armies in 
every direction and created a multitude of stratagems of every kind, but the will 
of God was that this unjust monarch should perish. 

That night, he sat with his advisors and priests, men of great experience who 
spoke with him about every kind of matter, expatiating on the ways of the world, 
and all agreed that the king should lead his army across the Oxus. Searching for 
some way to ward off the evil of his enemies, he divided his army into two parts. 
He ordered Qarakhan, his eldest son, to appear before him—you would say the 
boy was his father himself in his manliness, his stature, his glance, his character, 
and his counsel—and to him he gave half of his forces, made up of renowned 
and well-tried troops. He ordered him to follow his father to the gates of Balkh, 


to be like a granite mountain in his rear, sending arms and troops forward little 
by little, and not to turn aside from the road in order to feed the baggage train. 

He led his army out from Bikand toward the Oxus, where they covered the 
riverbank. A thousand boats and skiffs were brought, and in a week the mass of 
troops had crossed and spread out across the plain and mountainsides on the 
opposite shore. The area was filled with the roaring of elephants and lions, the 
river disappeared beneath the mass of boats, and the wasteland of Amui was 
covered with troops. Afrasyab crossed in the rear of his troops, his mind filled 
with thoughts of battle; he sent off in every direction mounted scouts, men of 
intelligence and good sense, and said to them, “Look to the right and left for 
somewhere the army can camp, in the plains or mountains.” When they returned 
one of them said to his proud king, “Such a huge army, on such a battlefield, 
needs foraging, equipment, and a place to rest and take counsel. In one direction, 
there is a pathway to the sea of Gilan, where there is grazing for the horses and a 
place to camp. On this side of the river we need provisions, and a wise leader, so 
that in the midst of these sands, on this wide plain, we can pitch our pavilions 
and tents, which will serve us in lieu of a palace.” 

Afrasyab’s heart rejoiced at this, and he drew himself up, as tall as a noble 
cypress tree. He had great experience of fate’s vicissitudes and took advice from 
no one. He organized the center and wings of his army, dispatched scouts to 
watch out for the enemy, arranged the army’s rear where the baggage would be 
kept, and disposed the right and left flanks. The camp was royally laid out, with 
a hundred thousand swordsmen at its center, where his own place was, as the 
commander and leader. He chose Shideh* to command the left flank, a man of 
great strength with a grasp like a sea monster’s; his equal could not be found in 
the whole army, and there was no horseman to compare with him. He could urge 
his horse forward, seize a leopard by its tail, and then tear it apart with his bare 
hands. His lance was of iron, and in battle he could pierce a mountain with it. 
With him was his younger brother, named Jahn, who was his equal in valor, a 
man who scattered the world’s dust before him; he was a wise advisor to his 
father, and his intelligence exceeded that of any other courtier. To him Afrasyab 
gave a hundred thousand warlike Chinese horsemen. He ordered Shideh to send 
cavalry back from the right flank to the baggage area, and gave the left flank to 
Jahn, saying, “May good fortune accompany you everywhere!” When his fourth 
son, called Afrasyab, came before his father he gave him a hundred thousand 
Turks from Chegel, all armed with chain mail and carrying ox-headed maces, 
and told him to guard Shideh’s rear and not to waver there even if the clouds 


rained down rocks. He gave a detachment of troops to the warrior Kahila, and 
another to Borzila, Afrasyab’s grandson, who could slice flesh from the flanks of 
lions to roast as kebabs, both of them lion-hearted horsemen of Turan. On the 
right wing he drew up an army of thirty thousand warriors whose dust obscured 
the sun, made up of Tartars, and men from Ghoz and Khalakh, all horsemen 
worthy of war; these he placed under the command of his fifth son, a pugnacious 
hero called Gordgir, whose sword blade and arrows split mountains. Damur and 
Kharanjas accompanied him, hurrying to support Jahn. Another group of thirty 
thousand warriors with daggers drawn were led by the experienced Nastuh, who 
was under the command of brave Shideh. Thirty thousand malevolent warriors, 
armed with maces and bows and arrows, were led by the general Aghriras, who 
made blood flow like water in an irrigation channel. The king chose from all 
these troops forty thousand sword-wielding warriors and put them under the 
command of mammoth-bodied Garsivaz. To this leader of armies and supporter 
of the throne, Afrasyab gave command of the elephants. Then he chose ten 
thousand warriors who never tired of battle, ordering them to ride between the 
two armies, their lips flecked with foam, and to charge their horses against the 
Persians and break both their ranks and their hearts. The army’s rear was toward 
the east; night fell, elephants blocked the roads, and the king whose splendor lit 
the world laid plans for his army to march on Sistan. 


Kay Khosrow Learns That Afrasyab Has Crossed the Oxus 

When the prince of the world heard from his watchful scouts that Afrasyab had 
transported his troops across the Oxus, that he had pitched camp on the Persian 
side of the river, and that the mass of his men obscured the sands and gravel of 
the shore, he called his warriors to him and told them all he had learned. He 
chose an army of Iranian chieftains, men who had tasted the acrid bitterness of 
the world in fighting with Gostaham, the son of Nozar, before Balkh, and 
ordered Ashkash to lead them toward Zam, taking with him elephants and a 
treasury of silver coins; their mission was to see that Khosrow’s army was not 
attacked from the rear, which would have destroyed the strategy of the Persian 
lions. Then he had his warriors mount their horses, and to the din of brass 
kettledrums he led out his army. They progressed at an easy pace, deliberately 
and carefully, because haste in war will bring only regret. When they reached the 
desert the commander drew up his armies for battle: to his right lay Chorasmia, 
whose soft sands would make an easy battlefield; to his left was Dehestan and 
Sabnar, a quantity of water, and the sandy waste where Afrasyab was camped. 


He, Rostam, Tus, Gudarz, Giv, and a number of other chieftains from the army 
made a tour of the area, examining the wasteland and every way into and out of 
it. When the king saw how huge his grandfather’s army was, his heart decided 
on a defensive ploy, since he was faced with an uncountable multitude of 
warriors and elephants. He had a great ditch dug around his army and sent out 
scouts in every direction. When night came he diverted a flow of water into the 
ditch, on the side where Afrasyab was. 

When the sun rose in Aries, illuminating the whole surface of the earth, the 
commander of the Turkish forces surveyed his troops, brass bugles were blown, 
and columns were drawn up. The world became full of the noise of trumpets and 
armor, and all the troops put on their iron helmets. You would have said that the 
surface of the earth was made of iron, and the air seemed to be wearing an armor 
of lances. For two days and two nights the two armies faced one another, and not 
a lip so much as quivered; on this side and on that, in the saddle or on foot, so 
they stood. The world seemed to be an iron mountain, and the vault of heaven 
chain mail. Astrologers sat before the two kings, deep in thought, their star 
charts beside them, searching with their astrolabes for the secret of whom the 
heavens would favor. But in this war heaven was simply an observer, and the 
astrologers were hard put to say what would happen. 

On the fourth day, when things seemed at an impasse, the brave warrior 
Shideh presented himself before his father. He said to him, “Lord of the world, 
most splendid of our nobles, there is no other king beneath the sky who has your 
farr, and the sun and moon are not malevolent toward you. An iron mountain 
will melt into a lake of water if it hears the name of Afrasyab; the earth cannot 
turn away your armies or the sun your crown. No king dares set himself against 
you, except for this wicked and fatherless descendant of yours. You took 
Seyavash in as your son, giving him all the care and love of a father; you 
brought him up so delicately that the winds of heaven were not allowed to touch 
him. You grew tired of him, and you were right to do so, because he sought to 
possess your throne and crown and army; world-conquering king, if you had not 
killed him you would have had to resign your royal seal and crown to him. Now, 
look at this man who has come to make war on you (but he is not long for this 
world). Anyone who forgets the kindnesses done to him thinks as Seyavash 
thought. You brought this impudent low wretch up as a father would, not letting 
the earth touch his feet. You nourished him until his wings were fledged, until 
thanks to your love he was worthy of the throne and sovereignty, and he flew 
like a falcon to Iran, as if he had never set eyes on his grandfather. Remember 


what Piran, out of the kindness of his heart, did for this faithless, worthless man. 
He forgot all of Piran’s kindnesses, filling his heart with malevolence, his head 
with fury, and when that good-hearted hero fell into his hands, he said nothing 
and killed him. And now he leads an army from Iran to fight against his 
grandfather. He doesn’t want money, or a crown, or horses, or swords, or 
treasure, or an army—the only thing he wants is to spill the blood of his own 
relatives; this is all he talks of doing. You are my king and father, that I am your 
son bears witness to the truth of what I say. Enough talk about these Persians, 
don’t break your army’s heart like this! What’s the point of deploying 
astrologers against them? Brave men seek results with a sword! All the 
horsemen who are with me on the right wing of our army are body and soul 
ready for battle, and if the king gives the order I shall not leave one of these 
Persians alive. I’ll stitch their helmets to their heads with arrows, and I care 
nothing for the watery ditches they’ve dug!” 

When Afrasyab had heard him out, he said, “Not so fast, don’t be so 
impetuous! All that you have said is true, and only truth should be praised. But 
you know that our hero Piran always followed the path of righteousness; there 
was no crookedness or falsehood in his heart, he sought only justice and truth. 
He was a mammoth in strength on the day of battle, his heart was as wide as the 
sea, and his face like the shining sun. And his brother, Human, who was a 
leopard in battle, warlike Lahhak and Farshidvard, and a hundred thousand 
Turkish horsemen, ambitious for fame and worthy of war—all these went to 
fight, while I hid myself away, groaning and bowed down by sorrow, and so 
many were killed on the battlefield that the ground beneath them turned to mud 
with their gore. All of Turan is desolate, terror has broken our people’s hearts; in 
their dreams they see nothing but Piran’s death, and no one calls on the name of 
Afrasyab. Wait until my chieftains and my noble horsemen see the Persians face 
to face; pain and fury drive sorrow from men’s hearts. And let the Persians see 
the size of our army, let them see our throne and wealth and crown. It would not 
be right for such massive forces to fight, they will be destroyed, and our fists 
will close on the wind. Let us put forward our champions in single combat; in 
this way we shall soak the desert sands with their blood.” 

Shideh answered, “My king, if this is the kind of encounter you’re looking 
for, I am the army’s first champion; my mammoth body is as though made of 
brass, and I can throw horses to the ground. I know of no one who dare confront 
me on the day of battle. My wish is to fight with Kay Khosrow, this newest king 
in the world, and if he wants to fight with me, which he surely will, he won’t 


escape from my clutches. And if someone else comes forward to oppose me I| 
shall lay his head in the dust in no time, his heart and spine will be snapped in 
two, and in the sight of everyone his life’s business will be concluded.” 

Afrasyab answered, “How inexperienced you are! How could a king of kings 
come to fight with you? If he wants to fight with anyone it will be with me, and I 
shall trample his body and his glory beneath my feet. If he fights with me 
hostilities will be over, and both armies will be able to rest from war.” Shideh 
said to him, “O my veteran lord, who has seen so much of the world’s warmth 
and cold, your five sons stand before you; do you think we will let you fight in 
this way? The army wouldn’t accept that you should fight hand to hand with 
him, nor would any God-fearing man.” 


Afrasyab Sends a Message to Kay Khosrow 

The king said to him: “My dear son, may ill fortune keep far away from you! Go 
from here to our soldiers and choose a wise man from among them. Have him 
take a message from me to Kay Khosrow: ‘This is not the way of the world! A 
grandson who makes war on his grandfather must have a mind filled with evil 
and deceit. Is it the World Creator’s wish that the world be filled with strife and 
warfare? Seyavash was not innocent when he was killed, he had turned away 
from his teachers. And if I have sinned, what had Piran done, or Ruin, or 
Lahhak, or Farshidvard, that they had to strap saddles on their mounts and fight 
drenched in blood like maddened elephants? And if now you say that I’m of an 
evil race, malicious, sprung from the seed of Ahriman, remember that you are 
my descendant and that you are insulting your own lineage. Save your thirst for 
revenge for Kavus and Gudarz, who have been so quick to bring armies against 
me. I don’t say this because I’m afraid of you, or because I’ve grown old and 
changed; my troops are as numerous as the sands of the sea, and all of them are 
as brave as male lions. If I command them to, boy, in an instant they will level 
Mount Kang as flat as a lake. But I fear God’s justice if blood is spilt on an evil 
day and so many innocent noblemen are beheaded on the field of battle. Fear the 
disgrace that will come to you if you persist in your intention of fighting against 
me. But if you will make a treaty with me and strive not to break it, I shall be a 
guide to you, and your treasure and army will remain intact. If you will forget 
this business of Seyavash and treat me, your grandfather, as Seyavash, then Jahn, 
and Shideh, a warrior who can raze a mountain in battle, will be your brothers. 
I’ll give orders that the lands that you claim belong to Iran will be emptied of 
Turks. All the wealth I’ve inherited from my ancestors, coins and crowns and 


thrones, horses and weapons, everything, whatever has come down to me from 
my grandfather Zadsham, I’1l send all of it to you. Our two armies will rest from 
the rigors of war, and all our fighting shall be turned to feasting. But if Ahriman 
rules your soul and you’re eager for your shroud, if the only thing you want to 
do is fight and there’s no place in your brain for my advice, then advance from 
your army to see if this business will turn out to your satisfaction. The two of us 
will face one another in combat, while the many men in our armies rest from 
warfare. If I am killed the world is yours; my army will be your slaves, my sons 
will be in your safekeeping; if you are killed at my hands, I shall do no harm to 
anyone here. Your army will be given safe conduct, and its chieftains will be my 
companions. And if you don’t want to fight me, if you’re not equal to pitting 
yourself against such an experienced leviathan as myself, Shideh will come out 
ready to fight you, and you shouldn’t hesitate to accept his challenge. His father 
is old, but this young man, who is wise and clear-headed, will take his place; 
when he fights you on the battlefield he’!l fight bravely, like a savage beast, and 
we Shall see on which of you the heavens chooses to bestow its crown. And if 
you don’t wish to fight him either, and are looking for some other kind of battle, 
let the army rest tonight, and when the sun lifts its golden crown above the 
mountains we can choose proud warriors from our forces; we’ ll turn the earth 
the color of brocade with blood and topple our enemies to the ground. On the 
second day, at cockcrow, we’!I tie war drums on our huge elephants, lead out 
champions to reinforce our fighters, and make the streambeds run with blood. 
On the third day all our forces will be pitted against one another like great 
mountains, and we shall see whom heaven humbles and whom she favors.’ If 
this malevolent creature refuses to listen to the message and won’t take my offer, 
then challenge him to single combat yourself, the two of you, out of sight of the 
army.” 

The son made his obeisance and left; the father had tears in his eyes and 
thoughts of blood in his heart. Shideh chose four wise men who had experienced 
the world’s heat and cold, and then a thousand shrewd troops who were ready 
for war. The advance guard of the Persian army saw the Turanian banners and 
cavalry in the distance; those who were at the head of the Turkish troops were 
young and inexperienced, and they suddenly charged at the Persian guards and 
set about them, without Shideh’s orders. A number of the Persians were 
wounded and the skirmish was spreading when Shideh arrived on the scene and 
caught sight of the Persian commander. Shideh’s heart was distressed at what 
he’d seen, and he ordered his troops to fall back; to the Persians he said, “Send a 


horseman to your king, with all the customary formalities, to tell him that 
Shideh, whose heart is pure, has brought various messages for him from the 
Asian king Afrasyab, the father of the Iranian king’s mother.” 

A horseman set off from the advance guard’s camp and hurried quickly to the 
Persian king where he reported that the king of Turan’s messenger—a dignified 
warrior accompanied by a black banner—had arrived saying, “My name is 
Shideh, and I need someone to help me deliver a message.” The king’s face was 
suffused with shame at this, and hot tears fell from his eyes. He said, “This 
Shideh is my uncle, my equal in stature and courage.” He scanned his noble 
companions and saw that the only suitable person there was the Kaviani warrior 
Qaren. He said to him, “Go to Shideh with happiness in your heart; greet him 
from me, and listen to his message.” When Qaren left the assembled troops he 
saw the glittering black banner and came forward to Shideh, greeting him on 
behalf of the king and the Persians. The youth, who was an astute and virtuous 
young man, replied quickly and sweetly, repeating what he had heard from 
Afrasyab concerning peace and war, fighting and feasting. When Qaren had 
heard the polite words of this noble and righteous young man he returned to the 
Persian king, saying, “The messages were wise and just.” 

When Khosrow heard what Qaren had to say, he remembered things that had 
been said of old, and he laughed at his grandfather’s behavior and the way he 
was trying to save himself by a ruse. Then he said, “So Afrasyab regrets having 
crossed the waters of the Oxus; his eyes are filled with tears, his lips with 
speeches, while my heart is filled with ancient agonies. He’s trying to entrap me, 
to terrify me with the size of his army; he doesn’t know that the turning heavens 
will not delay the day of his misfortune. I have no choice now but to go out with 
my heart filled with fury and face him in combat; when the time for action 
comes I’m not one to hold back.” 

The wise councilors who were present, and the leaders of the army, said with 
one voice, “This is not the path that should be followed. Afrasyab is experienced 
and wise in the ways of the world, and even in his dreams he sees only trickery; 
he knows nothing but magic and sorcery, deceit and malice and malevolence. He 
chose to send Shideh because he thought this would be the key to unlock his evil 
plans. He wants to fight against you in order to fill all our days with sorrow; 
don’t be so impatient as to attack this old man, don’t act as though you’re tired 
of Iran and its crown. And if Shideh challenges you to fight with him, don’t be 
so foolhardy as to meet him on the battlefield. If Shideh is laid low by you, it’ll 
mean one less hero in their army, but if, far from here, you are killed, all of Iran 


will be plunged into mourning; not one of us will remain alive, and no town or 
village in Iran will still be habitable, because we have no one from the Kayanid 
royal line who will ready himself to take vengeance for your death. Your 
grandfather is an old experienced man, beloved in Turan and China; he’s 
apologizing to you for what he’s done, and he’s challenging you to single 
combat because he’s at a loss as to what else to do. He says he’II transfer from 
his treasury to yours the horses and wealth, the golden thrones and crowns, the 
golden belts and heavy maces that Tur accumulated for Zadsham; he hopes that 
in this way he’|l buy himself out of trouble, besides which he says he’ II quit the 
towns and territories you claim for Iran, and empty them of Turks. So let us 
return to Iran, victorious and glad, and forget what is past!” Thus they spoke, 
young and old, all but Rostam, the great hero, who had no desire to make peace, 
whose heart ached with longing to avenge Seyavash. 

The king gnawed at his lip and surveyed his companions. Then he said, “It is 
not right that we should return from this camp to Iran. Where are our solemn 
oaths, the purses and prisoners we promised ourselves, if Afrasyab remains alive 
as a ruler, seated on his throne, with Iran in ruins? What excuse can we bring 
before Kavus? And let us consider what we have suffered. You have heard what 
happened to noble Iraj because of Tur’s ambition for the crown and throne, and 
how the lust for treasure and sovereignty made the king of Turan kill Seyavash, 
although he was innocent of any crime. And now some deceitful Turk comes 
strutting here to me; if he wants to challenge me to fight with him, why should 
your faces turn sallow? I’m astonished at you, since my desire for vengeance has 
grown greater than ever. I never thought that Persians would lay aside their 
weapons forever and forget our cause. I haven’t seen a single man from the 
Persian army who has fallen in battle here or who is eager to fight with this fraud 
Afrasyab now he has challenged us.” 

When the Iranians heard the king’s words, they writhed inwardly, conscious 
of their failings. They asked pardon, saying, “We are your slaves and spoke only 
out of love for you. The king of kings desires only a good name and a good 
outcome to his endeavors. But the world’s ruler, exalted in his wisdom, will not 
want us to be derided or for men to say that there was not one Persian horseman 
who dared challenge Shideh to combat, and that—with all the army crying in 
lamentation on the battlefield—no one but the king of kings was brave enough to 
do this. Can the king of all councilors desire that we should be shamed forever in 
this way?” 


The king answered them, “O my councilors, my guides, you should realize 
that this Shideh has a father who is not an ordinary man; his father has used 
magic, dark sorcery and malevolence, to fashion his armor; your weapons will 
have no effect against his chain mail and steel helmet; his horse is born of the 
wind, whose swiftness it possesses, along with a lion’s gait. A man to whom 
God has not given the royal farr will be helpless against Shideh in combat; he 
wouldn’t deign to fight with any of you, his farr and his lineage would be 
shamed by such an encounter. I shall torment his father’s evil heart with fire, as 
he tormented the heart of Kavus when he killed his son.” All the horsemen and 
lion-warriors of Iran called down their blessings on the king. 


Kay Khosrow’s Answer to Afrasyab’s Messages 

He commanded good-hearted Qaren to return and give this answer from the 
king: “‘This business of ours is an ancient and grim affair, and more than enough 
has been said about it. A skilled, serious warrior doesn’t look for delay when he 
is fighting a war, and now we shall see to whom the Lord of the sun and moon 
will give the victory. It is not Persian land or treasure that I want from you, for 
this fleeting world stays for no man. I swear by the might of the World Creator, 
by the diadem of Kavus the provider, that I shall not leave you the time it takes 
for a strong wind to snap a rose. I have no need for this wealth of yours, which 
came to you by cruelty and injustice. If God is my support, if Fortune smiles on 
me, your land and treasure and army will be mine, your golden throne and crown 
will be mine. Shideh came to me accompanied by a mighty escort, and at dawn 
he will be my guest and see how I lop off heads with my sword. Shideh and I 
will meet with drawn swords, and our encounter will end when I shall bring the 
Day of Judgment down upon him. If I am victorious in this battle, I shall not 
delay as you are advising me to; we’|l attack on two fronts, crying our war cry; 
the plain will be awash with blood, and then we shall lead our warriors forward, 
massed like a moving mountain.’ When you have said this, say to Shideh, ‘O 
wise nobleman, eager for fame, you have not come here alone because you are 
seeking combat, nor for the sake of your reputation, nor to deliver Afrasyab’s 
message, but because your evil acts have made you impatient. It is God who has 
forced you out of that army, and your tomb and shroud await you here. 
Destruction will come to you from the innocent head that was severed from its 
body like a lamb’s, and your father will weep bitterly for you, as Kavus wept for 
his son.’” 


Qaren hurried from the king’s side to the black banner and repeated all that 
he had heard, leaving hidden neither its good nor its evil. Shideh went to 
Afrasyab, his heart like meat when it is roasted on a spit. The Turkish king was 
distressed by this answer; he became despondent and heaved a bitter sigh. He 
remembered the dream he had had long ago and which he had kept secret from 
everyone. His head whirled, his heart was filled with fear, he knew that his end 
was at hand, and he said, “Tomorrow the battlefield will be so full of fallen 
Turkish warriors that a man will not be able to walk there.” Then he addressed 
Shideh, “From dawn tomorrow, my son, for two days, do not mention this battle 
to me. You would say this war is breaking my heart, which is as if it’s being torn 
from my body.” His son said, “O king of Turan and China, do not despair on the 
day of vengeance. When the shining sun lifts its banner and makes the purple 
vault of heaven shine with its brilliance, I and Khosrow shall meet on the plain 
to do battle, and I shall raise the black dust of death around this king.” 


Shideh Comes to Fight with Kay Khosrow 

When the blue tent of heaven grew bright, and the world became like a lake of 
glittering topaz, Shideh bestrode his horse, and the wind of youth filled his head 
with thoughts of battle; he wore his body armor, and his royal helmet was made 
of iron. Accompanied by a Turkish warrior carrying his banner, he made his way 
to the Persian army. A nobleman came before the king and announced, “A 
watrior is coming from between the two armies, armed and proud in his bearing, 
his sword unsheathed in his hand. He says that the king is to be told that Shideh 
has arrived.” The king smiled at this and called for his armor and lifted his royal 
banner aloft. He placed a golden helmet on his head and handed his banner to 
Roham, the son of Gudarz. All of his army began to lament and weep, as though 
they were being burned by fire. They cried out, “Do not torment your body with 
this iron armor. Kings should be enthroned; may whoever has forced you to 
prepare yourself for battle like this find his home in the black earth, may none of 
his desires come to fruition!” Their commander, armed in chain mail, helmeted, 
grasping his mace, sent them his greetings: “No one must stir from this camp, 
neither from the right nor the left nor the center nor the wings of the army; no 
one must ride out to battle; listen to Roham, the son of Gudarz. When the sun is 
high in the heavens you will see who has been defeated. Whoever it is, do not 
regret the outcome, since this is the beginning and end of war; sometimes we 
triumph, sometimes we are laid low; sometimes we are joyful and safe, 
sometimes struck down in anguish.” 


Armed with his lance and helmet and chain mail, he urged forward Behzad, 
his horse the color of night who could outrun the wind, and the dust he sent up 
ascended to the clouds. Shideh saw him emerge between the two armies and 
heaved a cold sigh drawn up from his vitals. He said to him: “You are a wise, 
respected man, the son of noble Seyavash and the grandson of the commander of 
the armies of Turan, whose helmet reaches to the moon’s sphere, and if you had 
any sense you would not be proposing to fight against your own uncle. But if it’s 
battle before our armies that you want, choose some remoter spot for the 
encounter, so that no one from Iran’s or Turan’s forces sees us; we don’t want 
helpers and allies to join us.” 

This was the king’s answer: “O lion-warrior, I am the heartsick son of 
blameless Seyavash, who was killed by the king. I have come from Iran to this 
plain to seek vengeance, not for a throne or a royal seal. You stood before your 
father and said that from all our army you wanted to fight me, and since it was 
me that you wanted to face I could not send someone worthless against you. 
Now, single out a place where we can fight, far from the eyes of our troops.” 

They agreed that no one would come to their aid, from either side, and that no 
harm would come to either of their standard-bearers. They went apart from their 
armies, like men riding joyfully to a feast. They found an area suitable for their 
encounter, a wasteland close to the border with Chorasmia, a spot so hard and 
waterless that neither lions nor leopards would venture there, nor eagles traverse 
its skies, a pitiless place that produced mirages. There they began their great 
battle, two horses and two warriors like wolves, like lions stretching their necks 
forward in the fury of the hunt. They attacked with their lances, and by the time 
the hot sun began its descent in the sky, their lances were blunted and the 
barding and reins of their mounts were saturated with sweat. Then, of necessity, 
they attacked one another with Rumi maces, with swords and arrows, and though 
the earth beneath them tured black with their blood these two horsemen did not 
weary of battle. When Shideh saw the courage and might of Khosrow tears fell 
from his eyelashes to his cheeks, since he realized that this power derived from 
God’s farr and that faced with such an opponent he should weep for his body’s 
plight. Shideh’s horse was weakened by thirst, and he himself felt his strength 
failing. He thought in his heart, “If I say to the king, ‘Let us fight on foot, hand 
to hand, so that our bodies become soaked in sweat,’ he won’t dismount, he’ll be 
ashamed to do such a thing, he’II think it beneath his dignity as a king; but if I 
can’t find some way to escape from him I’m truly in the dragon’s maw.” He 
said, “O king, everyone fights with arrows and lances, and tugs at his horse’s 


reins, but it would be better for us to fight on foot, like lions who stretch out 
their claws for their prey.” Khosrow, the lord of the world, knew immediately 
what this malevolent wretch was thinking. He said to himself, “This lion with his 
strong claws, this descendant of Feraydun, when he’s had a moment’s respite 
he’ll lop off warriors’ heads and terrify lion-hearted fighters; but if I don’t 
dismount and face him on foot things will go badly for the Persians.” Roham 
said to him, “You wear the crown, do not disgrace your lineage with such an act. 
If Khosrow is to fight on foot, what are all these horsemen doing on this plain? If 
someone has to fight on foot I’m here, a descendant of Keshvad, and I, not the 
great king who rules the world, will fight against him.” The king said to Roham, 
“O my kind champion, Shideh is a prince, and you should realize that he won’t 
fight against you. Besides, you wouldn’t be able to oppose him, there is no finer 
warrior in all the Turkish forces, no one as brave as this descendent of Feraydun 
has ever been born. It won’t be shameful for me to fight in this way; on foot 
we’ ll face one another like leopards.” 

On the other side, an interpreter went to Shideh and said to him: “Distance 
yourself from the evils of this malevolent opponent; you have no choice but to 
go back, since you cannot withstand Khosrow’s onslaught. To flee from an 
enemy in time is better than death and facing God’s Judgment.” Shideh said to 
this renowned interpreter, “A man’s voice should not stay hidden. Know this 
then, since I have been a warrior I have lifted my head as high as the sun, and I 
have never seen a combatant on the battlefield with such strength and skill, or 
possessed of such farr. But, once I have begun to fight, better a tomb be raised 
for me than that I flee. I shall not turn aside from what the heavens have in store 
for me, and either I shall place my foot in triumph on the dragon’s eyes or my 
life is in his hands and neither enemy nor friend can save me. I know where his 
strength and valor come from but, for all his God-given farr, if I can face him on 
foot in combat I will make his blood flow fast enough!” 

The king of the world addressed Shideh, “Renowned warrior, sprung from a 
noble race, it’s certain that no Kayanid prince has ever fought on foot, but if this 
is your wish I shan’t tug at my reins and turn away.” The king dismounted from 
his night-hued horse and removed his royal helmet from his head; he handed his 
splendid mount to Roham and strode forward like lightning. When Shideh saw 
him on foot he too dismounted from his mighty warhorse. They attacked one 
another on that plain like mammoths, and the dust was mixed with their blood. 
When Shideh saw the king’s might and strength, his God-given farr and skill, he 
sought for some way to escape from him, since when its head is gone a body is 


worthless. But Khosrow saw what he was about, and heard his vile whimpering, 
and suddenly seized his opponent’s neck with his left hand, his thigh with his 
right, and lifted him up and flung him against the ground. All his vertebrae were 
shattered by the violence with which he struck the ground and his leg was 
broken. Khosrow drew a sharp dagger from his belt, slashed his opponent’s 
armor to pieces, and ripped open his gut. Then in his sorrow he poured dust on 
his helmet and said to Roham: “This horseman was my uncle; he was brave, 

And peerless, and deserves a noble grave. 

Now that I’ve killed him treat him well, and see 

A royal tomb preserves his memory; 

With camphor cleanse his body of its grime, 

His head with musk, and rose water, and lime; 

May amber stud his crown, and may this bold 

And gallant warrior wear a torque of gold.” 


Shideh’s interpreter saw men lift the blood-smeared body of his prince from 
the dust and carry it to the king’s army. Weeping, he came before the king and 
said, “Great and just king, I was merely his slave, I am not a horseman or 
warrior. May the king have mercy on me, and may the heavens favor him.” 
Khosrow replied, “Go, and tell your companions what you have seen from me.” 

The eyes of Turan’s nobles were fixed on the road, waiting for the return of 
Shideh. A horseman appeared, riding across the soft sand, bareheaded, his eyes 
filled with tears; in front of the king of the Turks he set forth everything they did 
not know. The lord of the world despaired of the world, and he tore out his hair 
that was as white as camphor; the mighty champion heaped dust upon his head 
and turned aside from his troops. The hearts of all who saw his face were 
broken; they tore at their clothes and such a cry of grief went up from the ranks 
that the sun and the moon pitied them. Afrasyab cried out in his sorrow: “From 
this day on, I shall not rest or sleep; 

Befriend me in my grief—mourn now and weep! 
My sword shall never see its sheath, and I 

Shall see no happy days until I die; 

Let us prepare for war, and let our might 

Lay waste Iran forever when we fight. 

May any man who is not moved by all 

We’ve suffered here be called an animal, 

I do not need his tears of sympathy 


If he’s not stirred to stand and fight for me, 

For that great warrior-horseman whose fair face 
Was like the full moon in its shining grace, 
Whose stature was a cypress tree’s that grows 
Beside a stream where gentle water flows.” 


And he wept bloody tears from his eyes, stricken by the agony whose cure is 
in no physician’s care. All his nobles answered the king, “May the just God 
favor you and strike terror into the hearts of those who wish you ill; and we shall 
rest neither by day nor by night in seeking vengeance for the death of Shideh. 
We shall stir up the hearts of our troops and lead them to the battlefield, where 
they shall strike off the heads of our enemies. Khosrow will be as nothing before 
us; he has brought down vengeance upon vengeance.” The troops’ hearts were 
filled with sorrow for their king, and the camp rang with lamentation and 
mourning. 


Kay Khosrow’s Second Battle with Afrasyab 
When the sun rose in Taurus, and the lark’s voice was heard over the plain, the 
din of drums and the blare of bugles and brass trumpets rang out in each camp, 
and Afrasyab’s son, Jahn, led out ten thousand swordsmen ready for battle. 
Khosrow saw this and ordered the Kaviani hero Qaren and his troops to emerge 
like a mountain from the army’s center to oppose Jahn and terrify him, while 
Gostaham quickly advanced with his banner on the left flank. The dust sent up 
by horsemen turned the world dark; the earth was crowded with warriors, the air 
with their banners. Neither Khosrow nor Afrasyab quitted the center of their 
forces, and no warriors had ever seen a battle like the one that was fought there. 
So many men from Turan were killed that the battlefield became a sea of blood, 
and the battle went on until the sky was so dark that the combatants’ eyes could 
not make out their opponents. Warlike Qaren was victorious, brave Jahn’s forces 
were broken, and when the moon replaced the sun on the sky’s throne the armies 
drew back from the battlefield. The Persian king rejoiced that his forces had 
been victorious; all night his forces prepared for battle and neither ate nor slept. 
When the sun rose in Cancer the world was filled with warfare, bugle calls, 
and tumult. Both sides drew up their forces, foaming at the mouth in their 
eagerness for combat. Accompanied by a trustworthy commoner, the leader of 
the Persian troops withdrew to the rear of his army, and when they had gone a 
short distance he dismounted. 


He prayed, scraping his face against the dust, 
And said, “Great Judge of all that’s pure and just, 
You know how long I’ve suffered, all the days 
That I’ve endured this evil sovereign’s ways: 
Punish this evildoer now with blood, and be 

A guide to safeguard and deliver me.” 


Then, his heart filled with sorrow, his head with rage against the seed of 
Zadsham, he returned, crying his war cry, to the center of his army and put on 
his royal helmet. A shout went up, and the piercing sound of oboes, trumpets, 
and brass cymbals announced the army’s advance. And on the other side, mass 
upon mass, the enemy’s army came forward like a mountain, or a mighty ocean, 
with Afrasyab and Jahn at its center. When the armies met it was as if the plain 
itself were on the move; the sun turned black with the armies’ dust, and was 
obscured by the steel points of lances and eagle feathers affixed to arrows. There 
was such a din of trumpets and clashing of arms, such a swirling of dust on the 
battlefield, that it was as though iron weapons, the mountains and stones, were 
flowing water, that crocodiles fought in a great river, and leopards on a plain. 
Such tumult filled the earth, such clamor filled the air, that they would have split 
the ears of a savage lion; you would have said that all the earth was Ahriman, or 
that the heavens were at war with the world. Heaps of dead warriors from Turan 
and Iran lay on all sides; heads and limbs were scattered across those woeful 
sands, the very ground seemed to give up its heart. The countryside was like a 
cloth steeped in blood and trampled beneath the horses’ hooves. 

Like a ship on the water, Afrasyab’s warriors plunged ahead against the 
howdahs filled with archers; these were liked castles strapped to the backs of 
elephants that had been deployed in front of the Persian army to block the way. 
Arrows rained down from the elephants’ howdahs as the din of the armies’ 
encounter filled the air. Then the elephants, and horsemen with spears, surged 
forward from the heart of the Persian army. From two miles away, Afrasyab was 
watching the clash between his troops and the elephants with their armed 
howdahs; he ordered his own fierce elephants forward; the world turned dark, 
the day’s brightness vanished as he cried out, “My warriors renowned in war, 
why are you fighting on such a narrow front? You’re all crowded in front of 
their howdahs filled with archers, but the front extends for miles—leave the 
howdahs, attack on the right and left flanks.” He ordered Jahn, who was 
experienced in war, to lead off ten thousand brave warriors and Kabord, a lion in 


battle, to make haste and deploy his troops on the army’s left flank. When 
Khosrow saw this attack by the Turks, which sent up so much dust that it 
obscured the sun, he turned to Aveh-ye Vasmgan, whose warriors were fierce as 
savage lions, and ordered him to lead his men to the left of the conflict and shine 
there like the sun in Aries; ten thousand of them, all renowned and eager for war, 
set off to do his bidding. Then the king ordered Shamakh, the lord of Sur, to 
choose ten thousand warriors wearing chain mail and armed with ox-headed 
maces, and have them ride out between the armies, their swords drawn to 
humble their enemies. 

So violently did the two armies attack that you would say they had become 
confounded with one another. The din of the clash of weapons sounded on both 
sides, and streams of blood covered the ground. With dust rising to his right and 
left, the lord of the world called for his body armor. On one flank elephants were 
goaded forward, their howdahs filled with archers, and the world seemed in 
motion like the Nile River. The king rode out from the army’s center with 
Rostam, Manushan, and Khuzan, the savior of armies; to the din of drums and 
trumpets Tus rode at the king’s side, bearing the Kaviani banner behind which 
came Persia’s champions shod in their golden boots; with rage in their hearts 
they took up their positions to the king’s left. Gudarz, the great veteran of the 
Keshvad clan, was there, together with Iran’s nobles, while Zarasp and wise 
Manushan accompanied Rostam on foot. A tumultuous clash of arms resounded 
on the battlefield; no man has ever seen such a battle as this. So many dead lay 
there that men could not see the ground before their feet; the sands were covered 
with dying and slaughtered soldiers, with the bodies of those whose lives were at 
an end. The plain was like an Oxus of blood, a mass of severed heads and 
toppled warriors. The cries of the horsemen and the neighing of their horses 
could be heard above the din of war drums; you would have said that the heart of 
the mountainside had split open, that horsemen had torn the earth apart. Headless 
bodies and bodiless heads, the crash of huge maces, the glitter of daggers and 
sharp-bladed swords—all these put the sun to flight; it was as if a black cloud 
had arisen and rained down blood upon the battlefield. On the left flank 
Kharanjas was killed by Fariborz, the son of King Kavus, and on the right 
Kahila, whose might was like that of a hundred lions in one body, was killed by 
Manuchehr. 

Toward midday a wind from Iran sprang up; a cloud obscured the face of the 
bright sun and made the earth so dark that men’s eyes could barely see, and they 
were bewildered. As the sun began to decline the king of the Turks’ heart grew 


fearful at the sight of so many horsemen from every country, from every land 
and territory, every noble family, so many kinds of armor, so many kinds of 
banners covering the world in red and yellow and purple. 

Garsivaz observed the battle and brought up troops to reinforce his king; he 
dispatched an army of men to the right of the conflict, fine soldiers who fought 
together as if with one heart and one body, and similarly he sent an army to fan 
out on the left, forty thousand riders chosen from among the Turks for their 
skills as swordsmen. Then he hurried to his brother the king, and when brother 
saw the face of brother Afrasyab’s strength returned, and he led his troops 
forward. Now the din of blows given and taken rose above the battlefield, and 
the face of the air was veiled with the feathers of arrows. 

As the sun became a narrow band on the horizon and the day was darkened 
by the approach of night, Garsivaz, that deceitful champion, came complaining 
to his brother: “Which of our heroes is still eager to fight, with the ground 
soaked in blood, the air filled with dust? Order the retreat; night has come, don’t 
press forward or you’!] hear your Turks cry out in protest; you’ll still be fighting 
while your army is fleeing; don’t hazard your life like this!” But the king’s heart 
was filled with rage and fury, and in his anger he paid no heed to what he heard. 
He urged his horse out from the mass of his army, galloping forward with his 
black banner, and killed a number of Persian noblemen. Khosrow saw this and 
charged to his warriors’ aid; now two kings from two countries, intent on 
vengeance, surrounded by their mounted retainers, faced one another. But 
Garsivaz and Jahn had no desire for Afrasyab to fight face to face with Khosrow, 
and they grabbed at his reins, turning his horse’s head, and hurried him away to 
the sands of Amui. 

With his king gone, Ostoqila came forward as quickly as wind-blown dust to 
fight with Khosrow, and with him were King Ilak, who was as fierce as a 
leopard, and Borzila; all three of them were renowned horsemen, implacable in 
war. When Khosrow saw them he rode out like a moving mountain from among 
those who were with him and thrust with his lance at Ostogila, lifting him from 
the saddle and hurling him to the ground. King Ilak quickly rode forward and 
flung his lance at Khosrow’s waist, but Khosrow’s armor deflected it, and his 
bright heart was unclouded by fear. When Khosrow saw his opponent’s strength 
and courage he quickly drew his sharp sword and struck at his waist, slicing him 
in two. This terrified Borzila, who—when he saw Khosrow’s courage and 
strength and skill and the blow he had struck—quickly made off into the 
darkness; you would have said his body’s skin had split open in terror. 


When the army of Turan saw such exploits, not a hero remained on the 
battlefield, and it was like a pronouncement of death to Afrasyab that he had to 
show his back to Khosrow as he fled. The Turks were humiliated as they left the 
battlefield, and Afrasyab had them cry out: “Your lion-warrior’s prowess is due 
to the darkness of night, and we retreated because night had come. If today the 
wind has been with you and given you triumph, see what will happen when the 
land and the river turn bright with the dawn, and our glorious banner is unfurled. 
We shall make all the face of this plain like a sea of blood, and the shining sun 
will be as the Pleiades compared with our glory.” So the two kings of two 
countries, intent on war, returned to their camps. 


Kay Khosrow’s Defeat of Afrasyab 
But when half of the dark night had passed and the heavens had moved out of 
the sign of Taurus, the commander of the forces of Turan ordered that their 
baggage be loaded up; he distributed helmets and armor to his troops, and sent 
ten thousand riders ahead on horses protected by barding. Afrasyab addressed 
his army: “When I have crossed the river follow me closely; make all speed, 
using boats to cross the Oxus.” And in the darkness of the night Afrasyab and his 
army left Amui and crossed the river. All the face of the plain was covered with 
a confused mass of tents and pavilions, but the army was gone. When dawn 
broke in the east the Persian lookout could see no sign of the enemy, and he 
brought the good news to his sovereign: “The king has quit the field of battle. 
All the plain is covered in tents and pavilions, but I cannot see a single enemy 
horseman.” When Khosrow heard this, he made haste to bow down to the earth 
and praise God, saying: “O glorious Creator, it is you 

Who guides the world, sustaining all we do, 

Who gave this farr, and crown, and strength to me, 

And blinded my malicious enemy; 

Keep this foul brute from all that’s good and wise— 

May terror torture him until he dies!” 


When the sun lifted its golden shield and the night’s locks were adorned with 
turquoise, the lord of the world sat on his ivory throne and placed on his head the 
crown that delights the hearts of all who see it. The army paraded before him, 
praising him and wishing eternal life to one so worthy of sovereignty. The army 
wanted for nothing since the forces belonging to the lord of Turan and China had 
abandoned their wealth. Men said that it was ridiculous that in the darkness of 


the night such a great prince had left with his army, his drums and trumpets, 
abandoning the field to the Persians. The cautious king said to them, “When the 
king’s enemy is killed, this is good; and when he flees from him, this too is 
good. Since it is the Lord of Victory who has given me farr, greatness, my 
crown, and sovereignty, send up praises to Him from this world, praise Him 
throughout the night, since when He wishes to He can make a man’s fate bitter 
and can place a worthless fool on the throne. There is no questioning or 
inquiring into what He does, and no slave can resist His justice. I shall remain in 
this camp for five days, and on the sixth, which is the day of Hormozd whose 
splendor lights the world, I shall lead my army from this place, since Afrasyab 
augments my longing for vengeance, and I am eager for war.” 

For five days they searched the battlefield for the Persian troops who had 
been killed in the conflict; they washed the grime from them and erected a tomb 
worthy of those who had perished. 


King Kay Khosrow Sends a Letter to Kay Kavus 

Kay Khosrow summoned a scribe, telling him to bring paper, musk, and 
ambergris. He wrote a letter to King Kavus, describing the battle in fitting 
language. He began the missive with praise of the World’s Creator and 
continued: “Lord of the world, whose soul trembles for me as a father, may his 
greatness be as a mountain’s, may the hearts of those who wish him ill suffer 
defeat! I traveled from Iran to the sands of Farab and there fought three fierce 
battles in three nights. A wise man could never even dream of the number of 
horsemen under Afrasyab’s command. With this, I send to you the severed heads 
of three hundred noblemen—brothers and relatives, noblemen and sons of his 
family; and I send two hundred more of renowned warriors, each of whom was 
the equal of a hundred lions in battle. May the turning skies give all our battles 
on the plains of Chorasmia an outcome such as this! Afrasyab has fled, and we 
are hurrying after him, to see what Fate has in store.” The letter was sealed with 
musk, and Kay Khosrow set out across the sands. “May this battlefield be 
blessed,” he said, “may it flourish throughout the years under an auspicious 
star.” 

When for his part Afrasyab had quickly crossed the waters of the Oxus and 
his men had joined forces with the army at Qarakhan, each person told what he 
had seen of the battle. How sorely then the Turks’ commander wept for those of 
his kinsmen who were no longer alive, for his dear son, his nobles, and his 


relatives; such a cry went up, you would have said the clouds were a lion 
weeping blood. 

He called a halt at Bokhara, hoping to reanimate his lion warriors for battle. 
He summoned to council those magnanimous nobles who remained alive, and 
when the wisest men in the army had gathered together they spoke to the king, 
telling him of the wretchedness in their hearts. They said, “The great men of our 
army have perished, and our hearts are lacerated for them. Of every hundred 
men only twenty remain, and we must weep for those who are gone. We tore our 
hearts away from our wealth and children and families in order to fight a war 
beyond the Oxus; we did what our king ordered us to do. You are the king, and 
we are your dependents, and you know what came to us because of this folly. If 
the king considers wisely he will lead the army to Chach; Kay Khosrow will be 
here intent on vengeance, and you should equip an army to oppose him. If the 
king follows this advice he will retreat beyond Golzaryun to the earthly paradise 
of Gang where both treasure and the means to wage war await him.” This was 
their unanimous opinion, and no one suggested any other course of action. The 
whole army, with tears in their eyes and blood-smeared faces, made their way 
toward Golzaryun. There the king of Turan rested for three days, and went 
hunting with hawks and cheetahs. Then, without pausing again, they traveled to 
Gang Dezh, a heavenly city whose soil was like musk, whose bricks were of 
gold. The king rested there, untroubled and lighthearted, and you would say that 
he and Safety were inseparable companions. From all sides he called together his 
haughty warriors and chieftains; they drank deeply in Afrasyab’s gardens, 
surrounded by roses and hyacinths, beguiled by the sounds of harps and lutes; 
and so they passed their time, waiting to see what secrets the turning world 
would reveal. 

When Kay Khosrow had crossed the Oxus, he gave no thought to food or rest 
or sleep but sent out messengers in each direction, to convey his greetings to the 
populace and say: “No one should fear my coming here; pray to God that He 
may guide me.” He distributed great wealth to the poor, giving even more to 
those who welcomed him with joy. From there he marched to the border with 
Soghdia, where he saw a new world that was the haunt of owls. Here too he 
distributed wealth, wishing to help the area flourish by his gifts. At every stage 
of his journey horsemen came forward to guard him and guide him. But then he 
received news that a cunning warrior had joined forces with Afrasyab, bringing 
an army like lions turned loose on their prey. This man was a descendant of Tur; 
he was a warrior filled with hatred and malevolence who was always spoiling for 


a fight. Kay Khosrow also learned that Afrasyab had sent a detachment of 
wairiors eager to seize the Persian crown and throne toward Chach, as well as an 
army under the command of Turog into the great desert, where the local 
chieftains had agreed to join in the war against the Persian king. But Kay 
Khosrow thought nothing of these maneuvers and reinforcements; his mind was 
fixed on Afrasyab himself. He gave orders that the army that had come up from 
Barda and Ardebil, along with their leaders and advisors, appear before him, 
company by company; they were placed under the command of Gostaham, a 
man who could stand his ground against lions. Similarly he ordered the army 
from Sistan, under the command of Rostam, the scourge of his enemies, to 
mount their intrepid horses and ready themselves for combat. 

The king stayed in Soghdia for a month, and the whole country wished him 
well. He distributed coins to his soldiers and saw that they were rested in 
preparation for the coming battle. He made an ally of whoever was skilled in the 
arts of siege warfare and struck terror into the hearts of his enemies. And then he 
set off from Soghdia and Keshan, leading an army whose confidence, arms, and 
readiness for battle astonished the world. News reached the Turks that the army 
of Kay Khosrow, a king both ambitious and benevolent, was approaching, and 
the world was filled with the clamor of their scramble to seek refuge behind 
castle walls. Kay Khosrow addressed his troops: “Today we shall fight in a 
different way; do not shed the blood of any Turks who yield to us, whose hearts 
regret that they once fought against us; guide no one toward evil! But if someone 
seeks war with us, and his vengeful heart cannot be won over, it is licit for you 
to shed his blood, and to pillage and plunder his possessions.” The order was 
proclaimed before the army: “Do not fight against, and do not withhold food 
from, those who have no hatred for our king in their hearts, since in their terror 
of Afrasyab the Turks’ thirsty lips would not even sip water without his 
permission, and the headless bodies of those who lagged behind his army littered 
the roads,” 

Bravely the Persian warriors approached the enemy fortifications, and 
wherever they found a defender eager for fame they razed the walls in a moment 
and rendered the buildings unfit for habitation; they drove off the slaves, 
servants, and animals, and left not a scrap behind, neither for good nor for evil. 
In this way Kay Khosrow went forward for a hundred parasangs and left neither 
castles nor villages standing. When he had brought his army to Golzaryun, a 
guide showed him the land, and everywhere he looked he saw a world like a 
garden in springtime. All the land, the plains and mountain slopes, was filled 


with beauty; the mountains teemed with game, the plains were thronged with 
trees, and it was a landscape fit for those whom Fortune favors. He sent out 
scouts and posted guards to forestall any evil that might still be in hiding there. 
And then they pitched the young king’s pavilion beside a flowing stream; the 
world’s lord sat on his golden throne surrounded by his loyal chieftains, and they 
feasted throughout the night until dawn in such a way that it seemed the dead 
would rise up out of the dark earth. 


Afrasyab Learns of the Approach of Kay Khosrow 
Meanwhile, in Gang, Afrasyab continually said to his councilors and wise 
advisors, throughout the bright day and the dark night, “Now that the enemy has 
reached my bedside, how can there be any peace for us in Gang?” All of them 
answered, “Now that this malevolent enemy approaches we can see no way 
forward but war; it would not be good to show weakness, we have a mighty 
army at our disposal.” Having said this they left him and spent the night 
mustering their forces. At cockcrow, as dawn broke the next day, the din of 
drums rang out in the king’s court, and an army marched from Gang, crowding 
the plain with so many men that ants and flies could not have found space there. 
As the army approached Golzaryun the earth seemed like the mountain of 
Bisitun; they marched for three days and nights, and the world resounded with 
the clatter of arms and the tramp of warriors. The columns of men stretched for 
seven parasangs, and their numbers were greater than swarms of locusts or ants. 
On the fourth day, as a mist ascended to the sun from the river, they drew up 
their ranks for battle. The army’s right flank was commanded by Afrasyab’s son 
Jahn, who lifted his lance above the sun, and the left by the lion-warrior Kabord, 
leading a body of battle-tried cavalry. Afrasyab was in the army’s center, 
surrounded by wise and warlike horsemen. The rear was commanded by 
vengeful Garsivaz, the army’s defense against its enemies. Opposed to them was 
Kay Khosrow, at the center of his army like a safe mountain of support; with 
him were warriors like Gudarz and Tus, the son of Nozar; Manushan and valiant 
Khuzan; Gorgin, the son of Milad; and lion-like Gostaham, Hojir, and 
courageous Shidush. Fariborz, Kavus’s son, commanded the troops to the right, 
who were all of one mind and united as one body, while Manuchehr, who could 
withstand any warrior’s onslaught, commanded the left; the rear was led by the 
lord of the marches, Gudarz’s son Giv. The nails of so many horseshoes made 
the ground like an iron mountain, and the plain became a sea of ruby-red blood. 
A haze of black dust enveloped men’s heads, sharp lances split open the granite 


ground, and the world became like a tent as black as ebony. The stars shuddered 
at the roar of war drums, the ground trembled as though it were a black cloud, 
and you would say that the armies could not survive there. The earth was so 
covered with spilled brains, heads, arms, and legs, that not a patch of soil was 
visible. The horses’ hooves trampled on dead warriors’ heads, and all the plain 
was a mass of headless bodies and scattered limbs. Souls said farewell to their 
bodies as so many axes split open so many helmets, and those warriors who had 
any sense withdrew from the fray. The two armies knew that if the battle 
continued in this manner not a horseman would remain alive and the very skies 
would fall from their foundations. 

When Kay Khosrow saw how hard fought the battle was, he felt his heart to 
be oppressed by the world. He went aside, behind his army’s lines, and prayed to 
God, who holds the world in His grasp: 


“O God ineffable, far higher than 

The comprehension of the noblest man, 

O King who rules the kings of every land, 

Holding the world itself within Your hand, 

If I’ve not been oppressed and beaten like 

Forged iron when the blacksmith’s hammers strike, 
I don’t deserve or seek for victory 

And You won’t hear another prayer from me.” 


He spoke and rubbed his face against the dust, and the world was filled with 
the sound of his cries. At that moment, as a fierce wind sprang up, strong enough 
to snap the branches of a flourishing tree, and the dust of the battlefield was 
blown in the face of the Turkish king and his army, Afrasyab saw one of his men 
fleeing from the fight and he slashed off the man’s head with a dagger; sand and 
dust were that corpse’s only shroud. As the earth and sky grew dark with dust 
many of the Turks were taken prisoner; then night spread its musk-colored tent 
over the world, and no one fought any longer. The darkness of night descended 
from the sky to the earth, and the two kings recalled their men from the 
battlefield. 

All the lower slopes of the mountain, as far as the river, were covered with 
tents, armor, cuirasses, and helmets. Fires were lit on every side, and sentries 
kept watch at the edges of the camp. All night Afrasyab meditated plans for the 
battle he would fight when the sun rose and lit the mountainside, turning the 


ground the color of a ruby from Badakhshan. But the World Creator intended 
another fate for him, and there is no withstanding His intentions. 

The night was still as dark as an African’s face when someone came to Kay 
Khosrow from Gostaham, the son of Nozar. He said, “May the world’s king live 
forever; we have returned exulting in our victory! Stealthily we reached 
Afrasyab’s nobles while they were sleeping; no horsemen were guarding them, 
no one gave any thought to their safety. As they woke we drew our swords and 
heavy maces, and as dawn approached only Qarakhan and a few men of no 
importance remained alive. All the plain was littered with their heads and torsos; 
the ground was their pillow, and the dust their shroud.” 

And then as dawn was breaking good news arrived from Rostam. His 
messenger said, “We heard that there were movements in the desert, and we 
hurried to the spot as quickly as we could, with Rostam and his horse Rakhsh 
riding ahead. We came on the enemy as the sun was rising, and as we 
approached them Rostam put on his helmet and drew back his bow; as soon as 
he released his first arrow the desert was emptied of Turkish lances. He has 
pursued them into Turan, and news will soon come to the king of his exploits 
there!” 

The shout of joy that went up from the Persian warriors was so great that it 
reached the ears of the Turkish king. He ordered his followers to mount, and at 
that moment a horseman galloped up to Afrasyab, crying aloud in his anguish, 
“Of all our army only Qarakhan and sixty men have survived and reached us. 
The Persian army is making for Turan, and the waters of the Oxus will disappear 
beneath the mass of their warriors.” Afrasyab said to his advisors, “We’re 
dogged by wretched luck. If Rostam seizes our capital, we shall lose everything 
in an instant. We must attack like spreading fire and ambush him, and make the 
plain flow with his blood like another Oxus. And if Kay Khosrow comes after us 
two sections of his army will never see the walls of their cities again.” All his 
army, including Afrasyab’s councilors, agreed with his words; they abandoned 
their baggage and set off across the desert as rapidly as a moving fire. 

Meanwhile a scout came from the desert to Kay Khosrow and said, “The dust 
of an army on the move is darkening the air; the plain is covered in tents and 
pavilions, but they are empty—there’s no one in them.” Khosrow knew that the 
king of Turan had struck camp without giving battle because he’d precipitately 
fled as soon he had heard of Gostaham’s and Rostam’s exploits. He sent a 
swiftly galloping courier to Rostam saying, “Afrasyab is retreating and hurrying 
to attack you. Get your men together and be on the lookout for danger; day and 


night keep your quivers and arrows with you!” The king’s courier was worthy of 
his position, a man able to find his way through trackless lands. He set off, and 
when he reached Rostam he saw that the lion-hearted hero was armed and ready 
for combat. His men had their maces on their shoulders, and their ears were 
cocked for any sounds they might hear. The courier delivered his message, 
which brought reassurance and peace of mind to Rostam. 

For his part, warlike Kay Khosrow rested and conversed with his troops. He 
distributed the wealth now in his possession to his army—pavilions, tents, 
thrones, and splendid trappings. He sought out the Persian dead, preparing 
shrouds for them and cleansing them of blood and filth. Following ancient 
custom he built a tomb for them. Then, turning from the dirt and blood of battle, 
he struck camp and led his army in pursuit of the Turkish king’s army. 

Afrasyab approached his capital, and believing that Rostam would be 
weighed down by sleep he gave his orders: “We shall ambush him, and so drive 
fear and the need for revenge from our hearts.” But he saw sentries waiting in 
the darkness and heard the neighing of horses nearby; he was astonished at 
Rostam’s precautions, and reflected that his own army was exhausted and 
scattered, and dreaming of sweet peace, while Rostam whose claws were always 
sharpened for battle confronted him, and that the Persian king and his mounted 
warriors were close behind him. He summoned one of his close companions and 
told him of what was in his heart. “How do you see the situation?” he asked. The 
man answered his king, who was seeking for some way out of the circumstances 
in which he found himself, “All the king’s wealth is in Gang Dezh, so why 
should we put up with the fatigue of flight? The city is eight parasangs by four, 
your wives and family are there, along with your wealth and a great quantity of 
soldiers—are you to endure hardship while your enemies snatch your crown and 
glory from you? An eagle cannot overfly those walls, no one has ever dreamt of 
such towering ramparts; there are provisions there, shelter and wealth and 
troops; your greatness and authority, your crown and throne, all are there. People 
call the place a paradise, it’s filled with pleasure, peace, and prosperity; it 
possesses springs and reservoirs of water as deep and as broad as an arrow’s 
flight. Wise scholars have been brought there from India and the west, the place 
has been made a veritable heaven, and from its walls a watchman can see who is 
coming from twenty parasangs away. Is all your life to be nothing but battles? In 
the end, the world moves on and belongs to no man.” 

The king was pleased to hear such words and gave up all thoughts of battle. 
Joyfully, he entered Gang Dezh with his army, together with all their weapons 


and equipment. He toured the city and saw no uncultivated land anywhere within 
it. There was a castle that rose high into the air, built at the king’s command, and 
there he dismounted and held court, distributing silver and gold to his troops. He 
sent companies of men commanded by princes to each gateway, and set sentinels 
on the watchtowers as lookouts during the day, sentries during the night. With 
his priests and councilors at his right hand he called for a scribe and dictated a 
letter to the emperor of China. He began with a thousand salutations, then went 
on: “The turning heavens have given me nothing but war. I brought up one I 
should have killed, and now my days are beset with difficulties. It would be 
fitting if the emperor of China should come here, since my soul bears witness to 
the friendship I feel for him, and if he himself does not come may he send me an 
army eager for war.” 

Afrasyab’s messenger arrived at the Chinese court as evening fell; as he 
approached the emperor’s audience hall he saluted that famous sovereign 
appropriately, then said all he had heard, handed over the letter, and explained 
everything within it. The emperor welcomed him warmly and assigned him 
pleasant quarters. 

Meanwhile in Gang Dezh, Afrasyab could neither rest nor eat nor sleep. He 
placed ballistas on the ramparts, had weapons stored at the ready in the towers, 
gave orders that huge heavy stones be placed on the battlements, summoned 
many Rumi engineers to help with the city’s defenses, and ranged his troops 
along the city walls. He placed an expert engineer in charge of the ballistas, 
catapults, crossbows, and shields of rhinoceros hide set up on the ramparts, and 
all the towers were a mass of armor and helmets. On every side groups of 
blacksmiths were occupied in making steel grappling irons that they affixed to 
long lances, so that anyone who approached the walls would be entangled in 
them or have to turn back and flee. 

Afrasyab distributed silver and provisions to his army, and rewarded 
everyone as was appropriate. He allocated countless helmets, swords, sets of 
barding, Chinese shields, bows, and arrows to his army, especially to the 
experienced fighters. When the preparations were complete he and his loyal 
companions who had helped prepare for the coming battle gave themselves over 
to pleasure. Every day a hundred bewitchingly beautiful musicians came to the 
king’s court; day and night the king called for music, the lips of lovely Turkish 
girls, and wine. Each day he scattered a treasure to the winds, and his today had 
no thought of any tomorrow. If sorrow is sure to come, it is better to banish grief 
while one can. 


Kay Khosrow Reaches Gang Dezh 

For two weeks Afrasyab lived joyfully in this way; who knows whose heart will 
be happy tomorrow? During the third week Kay Khosrow approached, ready for 
battle, and heard the clamor of flutes and the sound of harps. He laughed and 
went around the city walls, astonished at this new turn of fate. He said, “The 
man who built these ramparts didn’t do so lazily or halfheartedly; he had spilt 
Persian royal blood and knew he had ignited the fires of vengeance in us.” He 
was amazed to see such a place, a veritable heart-delighting heaven rising up 
before him. He said to Rostam, “Great champion, you should consider with a 
clear mind what God, the World Creator, has done for us in granting us victory 
over this wicked man, this wretch renowned for his evil, his anger, his crooked 
dealings and foolishness, who has fled from us into this citadel in order to rest 
and refresh himself. If from now on I am not grateful to God may I not live 
through three watches of the night; His is the victory, His is the power, who 
created the sun and the moon.” 

There was a mountain to one side of the city, and this served it as a defense 
against attack. On the opposite side there was a river, whose waters rejoiced 
men’s hearts. Kay Khosrow’s army pitched camp on the plain, which became 
dotted with warriors’ tents on every side. From end to end, the army’s camp 
occupied seven parasangs. Rostam pitched his pavilion on the right wing and 
asked his king for troops to lead; to the left Fariborz, the son of Kavus, and Tus 
erected their pavilions, and their stirring standards could be seen there, together 
with their war drums; meanwhile Gudarz chose to pitch camp by the river. At 
night the sound of bells and the cries of the sentries could be heard on every 
side, and it seemed the earth’s heart would be wrenched from its place by the 
elephants’ trumpeting mingled with the din of bugles and flutes. 

When the sun’s rays appeared in the heavens and tore apart the musky veil of 
night, Kay Khosrow mounted his horse Shabrang and made a tour of his troops. 
He said to mammoth-bodied Rostam: “Noblest and greatest of this company, my 
hope is that Afrasyab will never see the world again, not even in his dreams; 
whether he dies or lives, it’s the sword of God’s servant that he’ see. I think 
reinforcements will come from every direction to assist him, because he has the 
power to demand this; they’re afraid, and they’ ll give their help out of fear, not 
out of a desire to fight us or out of the valor that delights warriors’ hearts. Before 
he can unite these forces we must try to cut off their access to him; we must raze 
his city’s walls, and use the stones and rubble to block the river. The army has 


endured difficult days but now the stress of war has turned to rest and repose. 
When an enemy takes refuge behind defensive walls an army need have no fear 
of its attacks or hostility. Their king is sick at heart in that city, which will surely 
be a wasteland soon. We should remember Kavus’s words and commit our souls 
to the cause of justice. He said: “Time’s dust will not obliterate this tree 

Of vengeance, whose new shoots perpetually 

Spring up; from son to son, hatred will last 

Till sixty thousand years of war have passed, 

And like a tree whose new leaves crowd the sky 

New kings will fight and feel no fear to die; 

Fathers will pass, and sons will then ensure 

That others will devote themselves to war.’” 


His nobles hailed his words, calling him Khosrow of the pure faith, and said, 
“May you wreak vengeance for your father’s death, and know nothing but joy 
and victory!” 


Afrasyab Sends a Message to Kay Khosrow 

On the next day, as the sun rose above the mountain slopes, displaying its golden 
banner in the heavens, a great cry could be heard from within the city walls, and 
Khosrow was puzzled as to what it might mean. At that moment the gates of the 
city were opened and the hidden face of the mystery was revealed. Jahn, 
accompanied by ten grave, wise, and knowledgeable horsemen, came out of the 
gates and approached the entranceway to Khosrow’s pavilion, where he and his 
companions dismounted. The court chamberlain came to his king and said, “Jahn 
is here, with ten horsemen.” The king of kings seated himself on his ivory throne 
and placed on his head the crown that delighted men’s hearts; then the hero 
Manushan conducted wise Jahn into his presence. 

As this prudent warrior appeared before Khosrow, Jahn was astonished to see 
that the king’s face was covered in tears; he removed his royal headpiece, 
approached the throne, and made obeisance before the king. He said: “O 
renowned king, may you rejoice in the world always! May our country be 
auspicious for you, may the eyes and hearts of those who wish you ill be torn 
out! May you live happily always, serving God and dealing generously with our 
land, royal in your reign, joyful in your coming here, well disposed in all your 
words! I bring a message from Afrasyab, if the king will be patient enough to 
hear it.” When the king heard his words he ordered that a golden chair be 


brought for Jahn, and when it had been brought Jahn was seated and delivered 
his father’s message. 

He said to the king: “Afrasyab sits grieving, his eyelashes wet with tears. 
First, I convey greetings to your majesty from the king of Turan, whose heart is 
sorely afflicted. He says: “Thanks be to God our refuge that my grandson should 
be here. Through his father his ancestors were kings descended from Qobad, 
through his mother he is descended from Tur; he can raise his head higher than 
all the kings of the earth, and in China his name is the crowning jewel of the 
royal throne. The eagles whose wings traverse the clouds and the fierce monsters 
of the sea are the sentinels that guard your throne; the animals of the earth 
rejoice in your good fortune, and the nobles of the earth with their crowns and 
jewels are your servants. Of all the evil that has been perpetrated by demons, 
who have never wished anything but sorrow for us, what is more astonishing 
than this, that with all my kindness and honesty they led my heart into 
wickedness so that the son of Kay Kavus, the innocent Seyavash, was slain by 
my hand? This matter tears at my vitals, I sit apart from others unable to sleep or 
eat. I did not kill him, it was the work of that impure demon who snatched all 
fear of God from my heart. The world was Seyavash’s to inherit and I had 
nothing but excuses; mere rumors led me to attack him. But you are wise, and a 
king, and you love men who are pure-hearted: look then at how many noble 
cities filled with orchards, porticoes, public squares, and palaces have been 
destroyed in this war of vengeance, and all because of this matter of Seyavash 
and Afrasyab; how many brave horsemen are there, mammoth-bodied, with the 
strength of sea monsters, whose shrouds are the maws of lions, whose heads lie 
severed from their bodies. Not a building is left standing in this desert, our land 
is nothing but a desolate plain, and our fame will mean no more than vengeance 
and the wounds made by swords till the Last Judgment comes. The World’s 
Creator will not look kindly on us, and our end will be to writhe in torment. If 
you are set on war, then you can be sure that your heart will have no rest from 
strife. Look how the heavens turn and make their turning your only teacher. 
Consider that I am living in my fortified city, and you are camped on an open 
plain while your head is filled with longings for revenge, your heart with the 
thirst for blood. I call this Gang Dezh my paradise, the fruitage of my land and 
its labors; I have treasure here and my army, I have my royal seal and crown; I 
have provisions here, the harvest of what I have sown, and here too are my lion- 
warriors ready for the day of battle. But for you the days of summer and 
indolence are over, the roses and tulips, with all their bright colors, are gone. 


Winter and its cold are coming, when a man’s hand grows numb with grasping 
his lance; and when the clouds gather over our mountain slopes, this land 
becomes a river. When I summon them armies will come to my aid from every 
quarter, and you will not be able to fight against the turning of the sun and moon. 
Now you think that the heavens will give you victory in every battle, but the 
heavens move on and another man will profit from your labors. And if you say 
to yourself, “I’ll capture these Turks and Chinese warriors, I’ll bring the heavens 
crashing down to the earth, I’ll settle this business with my sword,” thinking that 
I’ll be your prisoner, don’t believe it; for the future is uncertain, and what is not 
destined to be crushed will not be crushed. I am royal Zadsham’s grandson, of 
the seed of Feraydun and Jamshid; I possess God-given wisdom and the royal 
farr, and my honesty is like that of the angel Sorush who has two wings and but 
one face. When misfortune hems me in I turn for advice to no teacher; at God’s 
command, when I’m asleep, I shall fade away as a star fades before the sun. Or I 
shall cross into Tartary, beyond the river Kimak, and leave to you both my 
country and my army; or Gang Dezh will be my tomb and neither the king nor 
his forces shall set eyes on me again. But if the day comes when we are to fight 
then our armies will be made ready, and I shall face you and show my mettle 
wherever the battle is joined. However, if you drive thoughts of vengeance from 
your mind and enchant this land with your kindness, I shall open to you my 
treasuries filled with crowns and belts, with gold coins and thrones and jewels, 
the treasures that Tur, the son of Feraydun, never gave to Iraj, and you shall take 
them for your own and forget all thoughts of vengeance. And if you desire China 
and Machin so be it, whatever your heart wishes for is yours. Khorasan and 
Makran will be yours, I shall be content with however much or little you wish 
for. I shall send you as many troops as you wish, along the road that King Kavus 
himself once took. I shall strengthen all your army, and I shall bestow on you a 
golden throne and crown; I shall be your ally in every war, and I shall call you 
my king in every assembly. But if you turn aside from my advice and still seek 
to be revenged on your own grandfather, when my messenger has returned 
prepare for war, since I am like a leopard, ready for combat.’” 


Kay Khosrow’s Reply to Afrasyab 

When Kay Khosrow had heard Jahn’s message he glanced at him and laughed. 
This was his answer: “You’re eager for fame, and I’ve listened to everything 
you’ve had to say. It’s my hope that your good wishes concerning my throne and 
crown and royal seal will all be fulfilled. I hope too that the salutations you bring 


from Afrasyab, whose eyelashes you say are filled with tears, will come to pass 
and that my crown and throne will bring nothing but joy and victory. As for his 
saying, “Thanks be to God that I see my God-fearing grandson to be more 
blessed with good fortune, more loved, and more victorious than all the kings of 
the earth,’ it is God who has given me all that he says, and may wisdom be the 
partner to these advantages! Tell him: ‘For all your smooth talk you are neither 
pure in heart nor God-fearing. The actions of a person whose strength comes 
from understanding are better than his words. The great Feraydun did not 
become a star, he has not risen up from the dark earth, and yet you say that you 
shall ascend into the heavens; in saying this you have washed all shame from 
your face. Your heart is a mass of deceit, and your tongue’s words are mere 
meretricious glitter. Glib garrulous talk and a lying heart make no impression on 
a wise man. Don’t say that my murdered father, Seyavash, was the king of the 
world, when not a bone of his is to be found. And you were so incensed that you 
dragged my mother from her women’s apartments into the public highway, 
bringing down fire upon my head before I was even born. Everyone who has 
ever stood before you in your court has cursed your malevolent soul, since never 
has any man in all the world, neither king nor nobleman, nor any man who is a 
man, done what you did in dragging a woman, your own daughter, into public 
view and handing her over to his executioners to be whipped so that she should 
miscarry her child. But wise Piran heard what was happening and intervened, 
since it was God’s command that I should lift my head high over every 
assembly. Because Fate had a secret destiny in store for me, He turned aside the 
harm and hurt that you intended for me. And when I was born from my mother, 
while I was still a helpless child, you had me sent to live among shepherds, to be 
fed on goat’s milk; my nurses were goats, my domestics were shepherds, and I 
knew neither rest by day nor sleep by night; and so my days passed until Piran 
brought me back from the wilderness. He took me to you, and you looked me 
over, wondering whether I was worthy of a throne and crown, whether you 
should sever my head, as you had done to Seyavash, and leave my body without 
a shroud. But God made me tongue-tied, and I sat there bewildered, so that you 
thought I had neither heart nor wisdom, and you didn’t rush to do the evil deed 
you’d contemplated. Think of Seyavash, of how righteously he acted, and what 
evil and privation he suffered. From the entire world he chose you as his refuge, 
as befitted a nobleman. He gave up Iran, his throne, and his crown, and came to 
you, calling you alone, from the whole world, his king; he looked for loyalty and 
returned the crowd of hostages you’d sent so that you wouldn’t say he was a 


man who broke his oath. But when you saw his noble stature, his manliness, his 
heroism, his mild manner, your evil nature leapt up in you, and you destroyed 
that pure youth; you severed his crowned head as if it were a sheep’s head. There 
never has been such an evil nature from the time of Manuchehr until now. This 
evil began with Tur, who sinned against his father, and so it has gone on from 
son to son, this flouting of the ways of nobility and faith. You cut the throat of 
King Nozar, a descendant of kings who was a king’s father, and you killed your 
brother—kind, good-hearted Aghriras, whose only desire was to leave behind a 
noble name. Since birth you’ve been evil, a follower of the ways of Ahriman; if 
a man were to count up your evil deeds they would come to more than the sky’s 
daily revolutions. You’re a transplant from hell, don’t claim that you were born 
from human beings! As for your saying that a foul demon led your heart and 
mind into evil ways, this is what Zahhak and Jamshid said when they despaired 
of goodness—their cry was, “Eblis led our minds astray, depriving us of every 
virtue.” But adverse fate did not spare them because their wicked natures had 
been tricked by an evil guide. The heart of a person who does not turn his head 
away from righteousness will experience neither deceit nor defeat. And in this 
recent war the ground turned to sludge with the blood of men slain from 
Gudarz’s clan; you look for nothing but trouble and ways to do harm. And now 
you’ve come to the Oxus with thousands upon thousands of Turkish horsemen 
ready for battle, and you send Shideh against me, hoping to see my severed 
head, so that you can then lay waste my country. 


But God who rules the world is now my friend, 

And all my foes’ Good Luck is at an end; 

You say you’re happy Fortune favors me, 

That you’re delighted by my destiny— 

But which of all your deeds should I review 

That will persuade me what you say is true? 

My sword’s sharp blows, from now till Judgment Day, 
Will be the only words you’ll hear me say. 

I call now to my aid my army’s might, 

My strength, my wealth, the sun and moon, the light 
Of my good star, that they may be beside me; 

I pray to God that He alone will guide me 

To cleanse this garden of its evil weeds 

And so renew the world by righteous deeds.’ 


Now tell my grandfather all I have said, so that he will stop trying to avoid the 
coming battle.” 


Jahn Returns to His Father 

The king gave Jahn a crown encrusted with emeralds, a golden torque, and a pair 
of earrings. Immediately Jahn went back to his father and told him everything 
that had been said. When he heard Kay Khosrow’s answer Afrasyab started up in 
fury, his heart filled with pain, his head with impatience. He distributed a 
treasury of cash to his army, as well as helmets, swords, thrones, and crowns. 
Throughout the darkness of the night, until the sun shone over the mountains, 
making them as pale as a white elephant’s back, Afrasyab drew up his army, and 
not a Turkish horseman among them slept. As the din of drums rose up from 
Gang, the ground turned to iron, the air became ebony with dust. 

At daybreak, benevolent Khosrow, the wisest of men, mounted his horse and 
rode around the city’s outer walls, considering how he should attack. He ordered 
Rostam to direct his forces, massive as a mountain slope, against one side of the 
city; he sent Gostaham, the son of Nozar, to take up a position on the opposite 
side; on the third side he placed cunning Gudarz, and on the fourth he stationed 
himself, the great king, with his war drums, elephants, and cavalry. He provided 
his army with everything they needed, and his forces approached the high walls. 
Then the king ordered that a ditch be dug around the whole city; everyone who 
had any knowledge or experience of siege warfare, whether they were from Rum 
or China or India, quickly set to work in every way they could to encompass the 
city. They dug a ditch two lance-lengths deep and drew up the army all around 
it, so that the Turks would be powerless to make a night sortie. Over against 
each gate they set up two hundred ballistas; behind the troops they positioned 
two hundred catapults, and two hundred bowmen watched each gateway, so that 
when the enemy showed themselves above the parapet stones rained down like 
dew and crushed their heads. Behind the catapults waited soldiers from Rum, 
equipped and ready for war. 

Then the king gave orders that two hundred elephants drag tree trunks to the 
walls; tunnels were dug beneath the fortifications and these tree trunks were 
wedged there, artfully supporting the walls and keeping them in place. Next, 
following the king’s clever stratagem, the wooden pillars were soaked in black 
oil. From above, the hail of arrows and missiles from the catapults would make 
the stubborn defenders’ faces turn sickly with fear, from below fire would surge 
upward from the wood and oil, and ahead they’d face the blows of heavy maces. 
According to Kay Khosrow’s plan, the attack was now ready to be launched 
from all four directions. At this point the world’s king turned aside from his 


army to pray in secret to the World’s Creator. In his longing for revenge he 
writhed in the dust like a snake, calling on God to aid him. He said: “Success 
and greatness come from You; in all 

Our trials it is to You alone we call; 

If You perceive my cause as just, I pray 

You’ll let me stand my ground and fight today. 

Bring down this wizard from his throne; grant me 

Good Fortune, happiness, and victory.” 


Then he raised his head from prayer and put on his cuirass; tightening his 
belt, he placed his helmet on his head and returned to the battle as quickly as 
wind-blown smoke. He gave orders that each army begin a fierce attack on the 
gates, that the oil-soaked wooden pillars be set alight, that stones be launched to 
rain down on their enemies’ heads. The air was filled with the creaking of 
crossbows, billowing smoke obscured the shining sun, the dust sent up by the 
rocks flung by ballistas and catapults darkened the air and obscured the ground; 
what with elephants’ roars and chieftains’ cries, the glitter of swords and heavy 
maces, the hail of arrows and thick swirling dust, it was as if the very sun and 
moon were grappling with one another. The black oil spread flames through the 
tree trunks, and God saw to it that all the wood piled there caught fire, and when 
the city wall collapsed you’d say a mountain was disintegrating; as it fell, a 
number of brave Turks fell with it, like lions that suddenly tumble into a 
concealed pit, and in this way these unfortunate wretches perished. A cry of 
victory went up from the king’s army; everyone turned toward the breach in the 
city walls, and Rostam came rushing forward, eager for combat. 

News was brought to Afrasyab that the city’s fortifications had been 
breached; like dust blown by the wind he made his way to where Jahn and 
Garsivaz were fighting, and shouted, “Forget the walls! An army’s protection 
must be its swords! Fight for your country, your children, your families; ready 
yourselves for battle once more, and don’t let the enemy through!” 

Like a mountain, an army of Turks descended on the breach; they fought like 
lions, and on both sides a mighty cry went up. The Turkish cavalry trembled like 
willows, despairing of their country’s fortunes. Then the king ordered Rostam to 
have the infantry with lances go forward into the breach, and he and his men to 
follow after them in two columns, armed with quivers, arrows, swords, and axes. 
The cavalry were to be their protectors where the battle was at its fiercest. From 
each side, infantry and cavalry came forward like moving mountains. Eager for 


combat, like a ravening lion, Rostam led his men into the breach. The infantry 
swarmed up the walls like wind-blown dust and overturned the black banner 
planted there, setting up in its place the purple banner with the device of a lion, 
belonging to Iran’s commander. A shout rang out from the battlefield, hailing the 
Persian king’s victory. Many were the Turks who were killed when Good 
Fortune deserted them in this battle. Where the battle was most hard fought 
Rostam seized two Turks in his grasp; one was Garsivaz and the other fierce 
Jahn, the two pillars of the Turkish throne, one Afrasyab’s brother, the other his 
illustrious son; this bitterness was ordained to them by Fate. 

Their hearts burning with the desire for vengeance, the army entered the city 
and gave themselves over to plunder and slaughter. The wailing of women and 
children could be heard as they ran from the Iranian troops; how many women 
and little children were trampled beneath the feet of elephants! The whole city of 
Turanians fled like the wind, none of them giving a thought to their country. The 
luck of the Turkish troops was at an end, and they wept, their eyes filled with 
bloody tears. Their wives and children were now captives; their souls had been 
wounded by the turning of the heavens, their bodies by arrows. Afrasyab entered 
his palace, his heart filled with pain, his eyelashes with tears. He went up on the 
palace walls to gaze at his city; he saw that two sections of his army had been 
slain, and the third had fled from the battlefield. He could hear the shouts of 
horsemen, the cries of women, and the din of kettledrums carried on elephants’ 
backs; he saw elephants driving the living before them, crushing their backs 
against the ground; he saw that all the city was in an uproar, and filled with fire, 
looting, and confusion; while one rejoiced another grieved, filled with pain and 
anguish, as is the way of the fleeting world. When Afrasyab saw what was 
happening, and the horror of his defeat, in which neither son nor brother, neither 
country nor wealth, neither throne nor sovereignty, neither crown nor belt were 
left to him He said, “My heart is filled with misery— What have the turning 
heavens done to me? 

I see the day in which my death appears 

Will be the least of all my petty fears.” 

He came down from the palace walls and then 
Addressed his throne: “When shall we meet again? 
And, seeing you, shall I presume to say 

Peace and prosperity are mine that day?” 


And after this he disappeared; it was as if all his calculations and plans had 
flown away like birds. In the castle he had built there was an underground 
passageway, of which no one in his army was aware. He selected two hundred of 
his nobles and disappeared into the desert with them by means of this secret 
passage. All his army were astonished at his absence, since he gave no sign to 
anyone of where he was going; in this way he suddenly became a homeless 
wanderer. 

When Kay Khosrow entered Afrasyab’s palace, trampling his star in the dust, 
he took his seat on the golden throne and sent his army in search of the Turanian 
king. They looked in many places but could find no sign of the commander of 
his once proud forces. The king questioned Jahn and Garsivaz as to the 
whereabouts of the king of Turan, saying, “How has he escaped? Where is he 
hiding? There’s no sign of him here; where has he taken refuge?” They 
answered at length and Khosrow listened but without anything becoming clearer 
to him. The victorious king said to the Persians: “Our enemy is now a fugitive, 

A homeless wretch who has no will to live; 

His name and fame are gone, and in this state 
Both life and death are an indifferent fate.” 
Then he chose men of wisdom and good sense, 
Learnéd men, tempered by experience, 

And said to them, “My lords, may you live long, 
And may your hearts be just, your bodies strong! 
This Turkish wretch’s town and wealth are yours 
To guard; see that your vigilance ensures 

Their welfare, see not even sunlight falls 

Within the circuit of his palace walls; 

Keep his veiled women safe now and discreet, 
Their voices mustn’t stray into the street.” 


He sent out sentries to take charge of the flocks of animals that were 
wandering around the city, and, as became a king, he permitted no harm to come 
to any of Afrasyab’s family. When his warriors saw this behavior the army was 
filled with murmuring and gossip. Men said, “The way Kay Khosrow is acting, 
you’d say he had arrived at his father’s house as a guest! Can’t he remember 
how his father’s head was unjustly hacked off, and how his mother was dragged 
from her throne and thrust into the public street? This harmless king was brought 
up by shepherds, and it was sheep’s milk that suckled him. Why doesn’t he grab 


this family in his sharp claws like a leopard and slaughter them, and flatten 
Afrasyab’s palace, and burn everyone in his entourage?” 

Little by little this talk of the Persians reached Kay Khosrow; he summoned 
his wise advisors and spoke to them at length. He said, “Anger is not always 
appropriate, and it’s not always right to praise those who thoughtlessly stir up 
discord. It’s better that we temper revenge with justice, and that even as we 
satisfy our desires we remember our good name, so that our benevolence will be 
our memorial in the world, since no man lives forever. The turning heavens are 
able to bring enough evil and suffering to everyone.” 

Then the king of the world gave orders that the court’s veiled women be 
brought before him, all the royal daughters and those who never left purdah to 
go into the streets. When the Persians heard this they hurried to the palace, their 
hearts filled with the longing for vengeance; the warriors thought that Khosrow 
would bring these women’s days to an end, and they wanted to take part in their 
humiliation; they prepared themselves for plunder and murder. From within the 
palace a cry went up to the heavens, “Great king, do not stoop to injustice! You 
know that we are wholly helpless, but we deserve neither dishonor nor blame.” 
Trembling as she walked, the principal queen came before the king with her 
daughters. Each of the young women was preceded by a servant girl wearing a 
diadem of rubies; and the jewels and gold woven into their clothes glittered like 
the sun. Their hearts were terrified of what the king might do, and they bowed 
their heads in shame, as they carried to him golden bowls filled with musk, 
rubies, gold, and jewels. In one hand each of them held a bowl, and in the other a 
censor in which ambergris and sandalwood were burning. You would say that 
Saturn was scattering stars down from the firmament upon the earth. 

The principal queen came before the throne and made a deep obeisance, and 
the beautiful young women, who had been brought up so gently and luxuriously, 
did the same. All of them began to weep together, since grief was indeed now 
their life. The queen said, “In our day of need, look kindly on those who have 
known nothing but pleasure and kindness.” In their sorrow they called down 
blessings upon the king, and the queen went on, “O kind-hearted, noble 
Khosrow, how wonderful it would be if your heart were not filled with pain and 
hatred because of the land of Turan! You would come here now with rejoicing 
and celebrations, greeted with a royal welcome, and as this land’s king and lord 
you would take your place on your grandfather’s throne. Seyavash would not 
have been foolishly murdered, though this is what the sun and moon in their 
turning brought about. This was done by the evil-natured Afrasyab, who does 


not even dream of asking your forgiveness. I gave him good advice but to no 
avail, as he foolishly ignored what I said. As God is my witness I wept tears of 
blood for this act of his, as did your relative, Jahn, whose two legs are now 
fretted by your shackles. What grief there was in my household for Seyavash, 
and all because Afrasyab heard plenty of good advice but in his malevolence 
would not act on it, until his days were numbered and his sovereignty was at an 
end; he threw his crown and royal belt to the winds, his days darkened, and his 
head was beaten down. Such a life is worse than death, and all glory to whoever 
tears his skin from his body! Look on us, who are innocent, as it befits a king to 
look. We are all Khosrow’s dependents and will hear no name in all the world 
but his. Do not vent your anger on the innocent because of that wizard 
Afrasyab’s evil deeds. Do not rush to humiliate those without guilt, do not harm 
them, or spill their blood; it is unworthy of a king to cut off the head of someone 
who has done no wrong. O king, you will not always be here, no one remains 
forever in this fleeting world; act so that when the Creator questions you on the 
Day of Reckoning you will not turn your head aside in shame.” 

When Khosrow heard her words he felt profound sympathy for these 
beautiful women who had met with such misfortune. He pitied the pain and 
suffering that had made the humiliated faces of the secluded inhabitants of the 
harem glow like rubies. Wise men’s hearts were contorted with grief as they 
thought of their own women and children, and the army’s nobles, its fierce, hard- 
bitten chieftains, called down God’s blessings on their great king that he had no 
desire to wreak vengeance on these captives. Wise Khosrow said, “I shall not 
visit on others what I would not want for myself, no matter how much my vitals 
long for revenge. I am well aware of the evil that powerful king did to my 
virtuous mother, and I will not bring such evil down on another person’s head.” 
Then this nobly born leader ordered the women to return to their quarters, saying 
to them: “Be confident that nothing now will grieve you, 

Ignore ill-natured men who would deceive you. 
Fear me no longer, since my heart is free 

Of both malevolence and treachery; 

No one will injure you—should someone try, 
The instant that he does so he will die! 

Live safely in your quarters now, and there 
Devote your bodies and your souls to prayer.” 


To the Persians he said, “The God of Victories has given us the land, the 
crown, and the throne of Turan; the whole country is in our hands. Your home is 
Iran; expel all thoughts of hatred from your hearts, act in this land with kindness; 
so much blood has been spilt here that the earth has turned to mud, and the 
inhabitants are terrified of us. I shall hand over to you Turan’s treasure, and in 
doing so I ask one thing—work hard for justice; you have suffered winter’s cold, 
bring springtime to this land. Soon I shall distribute the Turkish treasure to the 
army, but see that you drive the desire to spill blood from your hearts. You must 
not cut off the heads of the innocent, and it is not worthy of a man to attack 
others needlessly or to trample on those whom we have defeated. Turn your 
heads away from those who are veiled when you see them in the streets, and 
don’t covet others’ possessions, since covetousness will make a friend into an 
enemy, and God will not look kindly on those who harm the harmless. The man 
who wants my approval will not lay waste the land I’ve conquered; anyone who 
destroys any part of this country will be considered unjust and contemptible.” 

Then he ordered his army to open the military treasuries of Turan, except for 
that belonging to Afrasyab himself, to which no one was given access. He 
straightaway distributed everything—the wealth, armor, thrones, and crowns—to 
his soldiers. From every side innumerable scattered groups of Turkish soldiers 
came before the king; he welcomed them, pardoned them, and quickly saw that 
their needs were provided for. He gave his chieftains a portion of the spoils, 
assigning each of them a city in Turan, and any Turk who did not submit soon 
lost his life at the hands of his brave warriors. As the edicts confirming his 
chieftains in their lands were promulgated, the inhabitants became his subjects; 
from every side noble messengers came, bringing gifts and letters that affirmed 
their submission to the king, and prostrated themselves before him. 


Kay Khosrow’s Letter to King Kavus 

Kay Khosrow summoned a scribe and dictated a fitting message. He began his 
letter with praise of God who had cleared the land of evils, overturned the lord of 
sorcery, and reawakened Khosrow’s sleeping star, since all power, knowledge, 
and justice come from Him who is the sole recourse of the oppressed throughout 
the world. Then he continued: “By the good fortune of the mighty and 
auspicious Kay Kavus, who has gathered so much knowledge of the world, 
Afrasyab’s Gang Dezh is in our hands, and his destiny droops in sleep. In a 
single battle, forty thousand of his haughty warriors with their heavy maces were 
overcome at Golzaryun; a great wind sprang up that uprooted this royal tree and 


stripped it of its branches. Many from his army who had attacked us fell into the 
river there, while Afrasyab himself fled to Gang Dezh, a fortress that became 
crammed with defenders. But this unjust tyrant’s skills and luck were unable to 
save him; his army was scattered over the countryside, and he himself has 
disappeared from the face of the earth. From now on I shall send the king news 
of any day when glory and victory are mine.” 

Then he lived at ease, his wine servers before him, until spring appeared, and 
the earth became a paradise of tints and scents; flowers made the ground gleam 
like colored silk, and the sky was dotted with clouds like a leopard’s back. 
Onagers and deer galloped across the plains and Khosrow’s days were passed in 
the company of beautiful musk-scented serving girls, or in hunting with cheetahs 
and hawks; the hunters’ horses were like onagers in their speed, their straining 
strong necks like those of lions, their ears and heads as delicate as deers’. 

Kay Khosrow sent out spies in every direction, to learn what was afoot in the 
world. News came from China and Khotan that their forces had rallied to 
Afrasyab’s cause; the emperor of China had become his ally, and all his forces 
were at Afrasyab’s disposal. From China as far as Golzaryun the land was 
covered with their soldiers, under their leader’s command. No one could 
compute the value of the slaves and caparisoned horses he had sent to Afrasyab, 
and his great army hailed him as king. All of Piran’s wealth, six thousand camel 
loads of gold coins, was also now in his hands, and with the wealth he’d 
received from China he had gathered a great army. 

When news of this spread among the Turanian soldiers whom Kay Khosrow 
had spared, they all deserted the Iranian side and readied themselves for 
vengeance. Afrasyab advanced from Khotan with such a formidable army that 
you would say the earth could not carry their weight, that they were more 
innumerable than the stars. Filled with pain and fury, he led his forces intent on 
revenge against Kay Khosrow. As soon as Kay Khosrow learned of this he sent 
out scouts to watch the approaches. He ordered Gudarz, the son of Keshvad, as 
well as Giv, Roham, and Farhad to remain where they were, to be just and wary, 
and to see that sentries were posted day and night. He said to Gudarz, “These 
men are yours, and when action comes they are your responsibility; whenever 
you see a Turk who talks with any sympathy about our enemies, string him up 
alive immediately, head down, on a gibbet. But be harmless to the mass of those 
who are harmless; be their protector and see their wealth is safe.” 

A din of drums and trumpets rang out from the tents, and such an army issued 
forth from Gang that it seemed the sun itself was eager for battle. When his army 


had left the city Kay Khosrow had his men drawn up in ranks and led them 
toward Khotan. At a space of two days’ journey between the armies, the world 
commander called his proud chieftains to him and said, “Do not sleep tonight, 
it’s not appropriate for soldiers to drop their guard.” He posted lookouts on the 
plain to patrol around the camp all night. For a week Khosrow waited there, 
preparing for battle, and on the eighth day a lookout came to him saying, “Their 
army’s approaching.” Kay Khosrow deployed his warriors with such panoply 
that the sun and moon looked down in wonder; when Afrasyab saw Khosrow’s 
forces he drew up his army’s ranks to oppose them. He said to his councilors: 
“Fighting is feasting, and my heart’s delight 

Is that we’ll face our enemies and fight— 

Id fight when men should sleep, if they held back 

Reluctantly, I’d charge them and attack. 

So long I hid myself, so long I fled 

That rage for vengeance fills my heart and head; 

Who’s Fortune’s favorite? I or Kay Khosrow? 

Who’ll win, who’ll lose this battle? I don’t know— 

But I shall face and fight him here, and I 

Shall either grasp my heart’s desire or die.” 


Then, one and all, his councilors, whether they were his own kin or strangers, 
said, “If the king wishes to fight hand to hand, why are these armies and all this 
military might here? China and Turkestan are at your command, whether we are 
your allies or your own people. May our bodies and souls be sacrificed on your 
behalf; this is what we are determined on and this is what we have sworn to. 
Even if a hundred thousand of us should die, do not underestimate our strength. 
We are all your well-wishers and live in the glory of your crown.” 


Afrasyab Sends a Letter to Kay Khosrow 

A great cry went up from Afrasyab’s army, so that the world seemed filled with 
the noise of warfare. The stars came out, twinkling in the dusk, and the yellow 
face of the sun was darkened. The commander of the Turks chose two 
experienced men from among his forces and sent a letter to the king: “You have 
traveled a long and weary journey; it’s a thousand parasangs from Iran to Gang 
Dezh. The mountains, deserts, hillsides, and wastelands have been covered with 
two armies as numerous as ants and locusts; the earth has become like a sea of 
blood in this war of vengeance between Iran’s and China’s and Gang Dezh’s 


warriors. If God thought to concentrate all the blood of these slain men into one 
place it would be like the Red Sea, and both armies would be lost in its depths. If 
you want treasure from me, or an army, or the land of the Turks together with its 
throne and crown, I shall hand them over to you, and I shall disappear; I can give 
you everything but my soul, the key to which I do not possess. Go no further in 
this business; I, who am of the seed of the magician Feraydun, have been mother 
and father to you, and if you are so maddened by your father’s spilt blood that 
you have no respect for me, you should realize that this was the fault of 
Seyavash himself; he was to blame, and my heart was wrung with pain and grief 
at what happened. And it was the will of the turning heavens, the source of both 
our safety and our injuries. Many years have gone by since I last led my nobles 
on the battlefield, while you are young, the king of Iran, possessed of a lion’s 
claws. Choose a remote place for combat, one that’s far from our armies and 
from kings’ partisans, and in that distant spot let us fight one another. If I am 
killed by you, since your nets can slay even sea monsters, don’t make war on 
your own family, your mother’s people; give up this war of vengeance and act 
with moderation. And if you are killed by me, I swear that as I hope for God’s 
mercy not a soul from your army shall suffer because of me or so much as see 
the dust of battle.” 

The king heard the messenger out and then said to Rostam, the son of Zal, the 
son of Sam, “This evil-minded, duplicitous Turk cannot tell when his fortune is 
waxing and when it’s waning. He escapes from us by a trick and then acts as if 
he’s seated on the throne of Iran! He talks so much about combat—is he looking 
for another tomb like Shideh’s? I’m not ashamed to fight against this descendant 
of Feraydun and the son of Pashang.” 

Rostam replied, “My king, don’t let the desire for combat flare up like fire in 
your heart. It would be shameful for the king to fight in this way, even if your 
opponent were a leopard. As for his request that you not fight against his forces, 
his family, and his country, you have an army here that stretches from sea to sea, 
and they are of a quite different opinion! You have sworn before God an oath 
concerning your grandfather, and there should be no trace of prevarication in 
your heart. Lead out your whole army in battle, and ignore such idle, specious 
talk.” 

Hearing Rostam’s words, Khosrow changed his mind and said to the 
messenger, “That malignant man talks to me about combat, but he gave many 
more assurances than this of his good intentions to Seyavash, and his talk was 
filled with lies, his heart with deceit. The army’s commander will not gain glory 


by deception; his tongue shoots a fine arrow, but his heart is full of lies. If now 
he wishes for nothing more than combat, there are other men who are ready to 
fight with him. Mammoth-bodied Rostam is here, and brave Giv who would be 
happy to fight against a male lion. If king is to fight against king why is this 
plain so filled with men? I shall lead my whole army out to fight, and I shall so 
darken his days that he will be hard put to survive.” 

The messenger returned as quickly as the wind and repeated everything he 
had heard to Afrasyab, whose soul was filled with pain, since he was in no hurry 
to do battle. But since the king was leading out his army for war, his opponent’s 
army had no choice but to face them. One army eager for battle, the other 
holding back, made the land as tumultuous as an ocean. So many arrows were 
shot that it seemed they rained down from the clouds like dew, and from dawn 
until the sun turned red in the west the ground beneath the cavalry’s horseshoes 
was awash with blood. As dusk came on, the armies withdrew, since the riders’ 
eyes grew dark and bewildered. When the army’s leader returned in triumph to 
his camp he said to Tus, “Today the battle didn’t go as Pashang’s son Afrasyab 
wished. Tonight I think he’!l make a surprise attack, to satisfy the ancient lust for 
vengeance that’s in his heart.” He ordered that a ditch be dug on the side of the 
camp that faced the Turanian army; no one was to show light by burning 
anything, and there was to be no noise from the animals’ bells. Then he chose a 
group of horsemen and placed them under Rostam’s command; another group he 
ordered to attack, and these men were handed over to Tus who was told to lead 
them to the mountain slopes. Mammoth-bodied Rostam led his contingent into 
the plain. The two groups were to stay far apart from one another, one on the 
right and the other on the left of the plain. On neither side were sentries posted, 
and no candles or lamps were lit. All this was so that if Afrasyab was to attack 
by night the two groups of men could close ranks behind him and cut off his 
escape route. 


Afrasyab’s Night Attack Against Kay Khosrow 

There were now troops on two sides in front of the ditch, and behind the ditch 
the king waited with his army and elephants. As night fell the leader of the Turks 
prepared to attack. He called his experienced warriors together and talked at 
length about past events. Then he said, “This shameless traitor has done so well 
against his grandfather’s army it’s certain his men are all sleeping now, and their 
army will be scattered over the plain and mountainside. Let us be men and drive 
fear from our hearts; before dawn we shall make a surprise attack on them. If we 


can defeat them tonight I shall rise up from this lowly state and be seated on my 
throne again; and if our venture fails to find glory, a man’s efforts are as wind, 
and valor is a lie.” Everyone agreed to this, and they prepared themselves for an 
attack by night. Afrasyab chose fifty thousand experienced dagger-wielding 
warriors from his army; scouts went ahead of them, men equally experienced 
and eager for battle. Their leader approached the enemy camp; he heard no 
sentries’ cries and saw no activity at all ahead of him. There were no guards, no 
fires, not a breath of wind stirred; it seemed that no one was concerned with the 
Turkish forces. Seeing this he hurried back to his forces and said, “Not a man of 
them has his wits about him; they’re all asleep, lying there like the dead as 
though they’d spent the whole of yesterday drinking wine. There’s not a sentry 
to be seen, and there’s nothing to impede us on the plain but thorns.” Afrasyab’s 
heart lit up with joy when he heard these words. He sent his men ahead, mounted 
his horse, and prepared to give battle. Like a flowing river the Turks surged 
forward in their haste to attack, but there was no jostling or clanking of weapons, 
no bugle calls or war cries, until they were close to the Persian lines; then the 
squeal of trumpets rang out, together with the din of drums attached to their 
saddles, as the warriors rode behind the black banner at their army’s head. The 
vanguard urged their horses forward and many tumbled into the ditch dug there, 
while the rest tugged at their horses’ heads and turned tail to flee. From one side 
Rostam advanced across the plain, clogging the air with the black dust sent up 
by his horsemen, and from the other Giv, Gudarz, and Tus charged forward. The 
forces around the king of kings advanced with their elephants and drums, 
preceded by the Kaviani banner, and the air was thick with their glittering 
swords. Now the give and take of battle began; men were captured or killed, 
horses were tried beyond their strength, and men took leave of their senses. Not 
ten in a hundred of the Turkish warriors survived, and an evil star harried those 
that were left alive. When news of the battle reached the king of Turan he was so 
heartsick that even his wounded warriors wept for him, lamenting at their king’s 
grief. He said: “The heavens turn, and knowledge has no force 

To change them or outwit their destined course. 

Our enemy destroys us, let us then 

Make one last effort here as fighting men 

To die in our despair or with renown 

To rally now and seize the royal crown!” 


A great cry went up from both camps, and the world was filled with the 
squeal of trumpets. Swords and javelins were grasped again and the battle lines 
extended for three parasangs. The battle was like an ocean above which neither 
the sun nor the moon could be seen; like waves whipped up by the wind warriors 
came forward squadron by squadron, and as the sun rose in the turning heavens 
you would say that the plain and mountain slopes were nothing but blood. The 
face of the heavens was blackened, men had no pity on their own bodies, and at 
that moment a fierce wind arose, worse than anything in man’s memory; it 
swirled up dust from the battlefield, flinging it in the faces of the Turanian 
watriors and tearing their helmets from their heads. The Turkish king stared in 
astonishment; all the plain was a mass of brains and blood, the color of the fruits 
of the red jujube tree. The Turkish horsemen, who in their days of leisure had 
thought nothing of hunting leopards, saw there was no fighting against the 
heavens that raised even the dust against them. 

When Kay Khosrow saw the wind’s effect, he realized that good fortune 
favored the rejoicing Persians. Preceded by drums, he went forward from his 
army’s center, as did Rostam, Giv, Gudarz, and Tus. War cries went up from his 
massed men; Rostam was on one side, the king on the other. A cloud of dust 
darkened the air, but what a cloud, one whose rain was arrows and swords. 
Everywhere there were mountainous heaps of dead, from which flowed rivers of 
the blood of men belonging to both armies. The air was like a dark blue tent, the 
ground like a sea of blood, arrows made the sky like an eagle’s wings. Afrasyab 
looked and understood; he saw the fluttering purple banner of Khosrow and had 
his own banner hidden in the midst of his men. His army was drawn up in ranks 
for battle, but he himself led his chieftains away; with a thousand men fit for 
fighting he headed for the trackless wilderness, and by wearying his body saved 
his soul from his enemies. 

Kay Khosrow searched for his grandfather; he hurried to the center of the 
Turanian camp, urging his mount forward, but found no trace of the king of the 
Turks. When the army of Turan could not see Afrasyab’s black banner at the 
center of their forces, they flung down their weapons and begged Kay Khosrow 
for clemency. The king received them kindly and had quarters constructed for 
them separate from his own forces. Then he gave orders that a golden throne be 
placed within a pavilion decorated with Chinese splendor; wine was brought and 
musicians summoned, many of his army’s leaders were called into his presence, 
and until dawn the night was celebrated in a manner fit to waken the dead buried 
in the dark earth. 


When daylight showed its hand in the sky, scratching with its nails night’s 
face, the king of kings, Iran’s king, washed his head and body, took the Zend- 
Avesta in his hand, and went to a place where no Persian could see him and no 
animal could hear his voice. From dawn until the moon was seated on her ivory 
throne and placed her enchanting crown upon her head, he prayed before God, 
thanking Him for the happy fortune the heavens had bestowed on him; 
repeatedly he pressed his face against the ground, while his eyes wept two 
streams of tears. Then he returned to his crown and throne, blessed by Fortune, 
with joy and peace in his heart. 

The fallen Persian forces, whether dead or alive, were gathered from the 
battlefield, while the corpses of their enemies were left where they lay. A tomb 
was constructed for the dead, and Khosrow gave to his army whatever booty 
could be found on the battlefield. Then he marched in triumph into Gang, with 
his army in good order and well armed. 

When news reached China and Inner China of what had happened between 
the Turkish and Persian kings, the Faghfur and Khaqan trembled in terror, and 
spoke to one another about the greatness of the Persian throne. They regretted 
their alliance with Afrasyab and anxiously sought for some remedy. The Faghfur 
said, “Afrasyab won’t see glory again, not even in his dreams; our sending him 
troops and treasure is certainly going to harm us. How we shall regret this when 
our land is destroyed!” 

They prepared gifts from Khotan and China, expending a great deal of wealth 
on them, summoned a pure-hearted messenger, gave him a fitting message to 
speak, and dispatched him on his way to the Persian king. They sent with him 
whatever kinds of rare artifacts could be found in China, as well as gold coins 
and uncut gems, in order to placate the king. The messenger and his escort of 
Chinese nobles made good speed and traveled from China to Gang in a week. 
The victorious lord of the world made much of them, giving them every honor 
that was their due and accepting their gifts of rarities, purses of gold, and slaves. 
Then he said to the messenger, “Tell your master not to be so foolish as to betray 
me again; Afrasyab must not be received by him secretly, in the dark night, 
when men are asleep.” 

The messenger returned and, as quickly as wind-blown dust, came into the 
Faghfur’s presence, where he reported what he had been told. When he heard 
Kay Khosrow’s words the Faghfur sent someone to Afrasyab, at dead of night, 
to say, “Keep away from the borders of China and Khotan, and repent of the evil 


you have done! The man who loses his way will find that evil comes from the 
evil he has done in the past.” 

When Afrasyab heard these words he regretted his past deeds. In sorrow he 
gave up his glory and went into the trackless wastelands. His days were passed 
in suffering, in pain and sorrow, until he reached Mount Aspruz. Day and night 
he hid from those who wished him ill, and his food was whatever his warriors 
were able to hunt down. His body was chafed and sore from his armor, and so he 
went forward until he reached Lake Zereh. As he came close to this deep lake he 
could see neither its center nor its shores. A boatman hailed him, “Your majesty, 
you’ll find no way across this lake. I’m eighty-eight years old and I’ve never 
seen any vessel or boat to cross it.” The noble Afrasyab replied, “Lucky the man 
who perishes in the water, who is not killed by his enemy’s sword, whom the 
world does not grasp in its fist like a seal ring.” He ordered his chieftains to 
launch boats and to sail for Gang Dezh; he was a man who held up his head in 
both prosperity and misfortune. Once he arrived he slept and ate in safety, and 
rested from his campaigns and battles. 


He said, “We’ll rest here and forget the past, 
And when my darkened star revives at last 
We’ll launch our boats on Lake Zereh again— 
Revenge and glory will renew my reign!” 


When Kay Khosrow heard about this speech and that this aged man was 
revolving new plans, he said to Rostam, “Afrasyab has crossed the lake and 
reached Gang Dezh.* This act of his confirms what he told me, that the sky 
above is his companion in good fortune; he’s crossed Lake Zereh on boats and in 
so doing made all our efforts like so much wind. My only speech to my 
grandfather must be my sword; I shall not give up this ancient cause, and with 
the help of the Lord of Victory I’ll prepare to avenge the death of Seyavash. I’ Il 
send my warriors through China and Makran, and cross the sea of Kimak; when 
China and Inner China are mine I’! look for allies from Makran, and if the 
turning heavens look favorably on us I’1l ferry my army across Lake Zereh. No 
matter how long it takes me, my grasp will close at last on that bloodthirsty man. 
You have suffered much, and you have left behind a prosperous homeland; 
endure this effort too, since it is better than handing the world over to our 
enemy; our fame, and our enemy’s flight, will be remembered until the Last 


Judgment.” But his nobles reacted angrily; their mouths were filled with foolish 
talk, their faces with frowns. They said: “We are so numerous, and how are we 

To voyage for six months now across the sea? 

Who knows how many of us won’t survive 

Or who’ll come out of this sea voyage alive? 

This Afrasyab is evil and he’s brought 

Evil upon our army and our court. 

We fight on land—among the ocean waves 

Lurk monsters who will lure us to our graves.” 

But Rostam said, “Chieftains well tried in war, 

Who know what we have fought and suffered for, 

Our hardships must not be in vain or cease 

Because we’re now beguiled by hopes of peace. 

Think how our king has been victorious— 

His star will surely win our goal for us. 

We’ve traveled from Iran to Gang, and we’ve 

Seen nothing yet but war; let him achieve 

What he has come for, let this war be won; 

What he is here to do, let it be done!” 


When the army had heard Rostam speak, they gave a different answer. The 
knowledgeable nobles rose and spoke appropriately: “We are all the king’s 
slaves, and as his slaves we wish him well. Whether for dry land or for the sea 
we are yours to command, your majesty; we are your subordinates, ready to 
serve you.” The king was pleased at their response and gratefully acknowledged 
them according to their ranks. He opened his grandfather’s treasuries, overriding 
the obligations their relationship laid on him. Brocade, gold coins, a thousand 
jewels were loaded onto pack animals; ten thousand strong oxen were loaded 
down with arms, and camels carried two thousand silver coins. Then, as night 
fell, he gave orders that Afrasyab’s veiled womenfolk, those from his family and 
those who were his dependents, whether they were his daughters or his servants, 
were to be brought in litters from their quarters to the area before his court; he 
also had a hundred of Afrasyab’s nobles, each of them a brave warrior worthy of 
war, brought before him. When Afrasyab’s relatives were assembled in this way, 
grief for their king still filled their eyes with tears. There were also present 
Turkish hostages taken from the cities, and a thousand Chinese soldiers, as well 
as men like Jahn and noble Garsivaz who had sworn allegiance to Afrasyab 


while still in their cradles. He chose ten thousand of his Persian troops and 
placed them under Giv’s command, saying, “Your ways bring good fortune; lead 
this army to Kay Kavus.” 


Kay Khosrow Sends Giv to King Kavus 

Kay Khosrow had a scribe summoned, who brought paper and Chinese silk. He 
ordered that a letter concerning the business of Afrasyab be written with ink 
made of pitch, musk, and rose water. 

He began with praise of the just Lord, “Who creates and destroys, in whose 
hands are both time and the world, who has fashioned both the ant and the 
elephant, within whose power exists both the least sliver of straw and the River 
Nile, the Lord of all that is and is not. The heavens will not turn harshly against 
one whom He has nourished; may He bless the Persian king, since the warp and 
weft of peace are His to bestow. I have reached Dezh, the place that Afrasyab 
considered his safe haven, where he could rest undisturbed; within it are his 
throne and crown, his greatness resides here, his diadem, his treasure, and his 
army. Continuously, for forty days, we fought, and many were killed and many 
wounded. Giv will tell your majesty the details of what happened during this 
war. When you open your lips to pray before God, pray for me, night and day. I 
have led my army to China and Inner China, and from there to Makran; now, if 
God aids me, I shall cross Lake Zereh.” 

Giv left the king’s presence and set off with his huge army of brave soldiers. 
He traveled along the way as quickly as the wind and reached the territory of 
King Kavus, to whom news was brought of the approach of this fortunate, nobly 
born man. He sent an escort of worthy warriors to welcome him. Giv appeared 
before King Kavus with his entourage; it was as though the plain swarmed with 
lions, and when his eyes beheld the king he bent and kissed the ground before 
the throne. When he saw this Kavus jumped up and laughed, and took the 
warrior’s face in his hands; he asked after the prince and his army, and about the 
turning sun and the shining moon. Brave Giv told him all he had seen 
concerning the Persian heroes and their great prince, and hearing what he had to 
say the old king became young again. Then Giv gave the letter to a court scribe, 
and when the scribe read the letter to the Persian king everyone present was 
astonished. King Kavus descended from his throne and took the Kayanid crown 
from his head. He fell writhing to the ground, praising and thanking God; then 
he seated himself again, and his heart was swathed in joy. Giv told the king what 
he had seen, and he heard the Persian king’s news in return. Wine was brought, 


musicians were summoned, as were Iran’s chief warriors, and the talk went back 
and forth deep into the night; then each of them, preceded by servants bearing 
candles, went with a happy heart to his own quarters. 

When the sun lifted its lance in the turning heavens and night tugged at its 
horse’s reins to turn his head aside, the din of drums rang out from the court, and 
the country’s noblemen made their way there. The world’s king summoned Giv 
and seated him on a royal throne. Then he ordered that the wealth and warriors 
that had accompanied him be brought in, as well as the innocent veiled women 
who had suffered so much in their seclusion, together with Jahn, and Garsivaz 
who had plotted against and then slain Seyavash. When he saw the evil 
Garsivaz, Kay Kavus cursed him, and his curses were well deserved. Jahn was 
shackled and brought before the throne; the prisoners were accorded various 
fates, some were handed over to guards, some shackled, according to the king’s 
wishes. Then Kavus turned to Afrasyab’s womenfolk, and his eyelashes were 
wet with tears; he assigned them a place in the royal women’s quarters, and 
appointed a guardian and servants to care for them. He also assigned quarters to 
Jahn and saw that he was provided with food, servants, and an attendant to watch 
over him. There was a dark chamber in his castle, a heartless place, like a tomb, 
and this was allocated to Garsivaz. 


And so the heavens turn. A righteous king, 
Whose heart is pure, is blessed in everything; 
He knows the world will pass from him, and he 
Avoids unwise, imprudent company; 

Doctors say one whom lusts and envy rule 
Should be described as nothing but a fool. 


Then he distributed the wealth he had received, the gold coins and uncut 
gems, to the poor, and men praised the Persian king for this act. He handed the 
captives over to his nobles and kept none back for himself, neither the wellborn 
nor the commoners. Then, when the court had been cleared of strangers, he had a 
scribe prepare paper and make his pen point as sharp as a diamond. A letter was 
written to the lords of every country that said, “The reign of the king of the 
Turks and of China is at an end; the leopard and the lamb can drink at their 
watering place together.” He distributed coins among the indigent, whether they 
were his own people or strangers, and for two weeks there was such a crush of 
people crowding around the court that the road there disappeared. During the 


third week, in peace and glory, he took his place on his throne; the court was 
filled with the sounds of flutes and songs, and roses exchanged greetings with 
goblets of wine. For a week red wine flowed like a river in Kay Kavus’s castle. 
At the month’s end he had a robe of honor woven with gold and turquoise for 
Giv; also dishes of gold and goblets of turquoise, as well as belts and barding of 
gold; there were slaves wearing torques and earrings, bracelets and jeweled 
crowns; there were cloths and splendid carpets to spread. Then Giv was 
summoned into his presence and seated on a golden chair; the gifts were brought 
in, and Giv prostrated himself, pressing his face to the king’s throne. 


Kay Kavus’s Letter in Answer to Kay Khosrow 

A scribe came, bringing paper, musk, and ambergris. The king’s answer to 
Kay Khosrow said: “Thanks be to God for all He has given, for the good fortune 
in which we rejoice; our grandson is victorious, deserving of greatness, and of 
the crown and throne. By your efforts, this evil man who held the world in the 
grip of havoc and warfare has become a homeless wanderer; and no one says his 
name now except in secret. Every year this man put his sweat and effort into 
shedding blood; he cut off the head of King Nozar, a man of ancient royal 
lineage; he killed his own brother, he was evil through and through, he killed a 
king; he was malevolent, infamous, and embittered. Do not let his foot touch the 
earth again, neither in Turan, nor Makran, nor on the shores of the sea of China. 
May the earth be rid of him, may the sweat and effort of this wretch receive its 
due! May the one just God guide you in your endeavors, so that you may cleanse 
the earth of evildoers’ mischief, and of the words and acts of the unwise. Rejoice 
in the justice of the World’s Creator, may you be a new foundation of goodness 
in the world; may I see you again in your good fortune, and may the hearts of 
those who wish you ill be full of pain! From now on I shall do nothing but pray 
before God, since it is from Him all hope and fear come; my prayer shall be for 
your victory and happiness, and that your head may flourish and your heart be 
filled with justice. May the World Creator be your guide and watch over your 
throne forever!” 

The king’s seal was placed on the letter, and Giv took it without any delay to 
Kay Khosrow in Gang. He made his obeisance and handed over his 
grandfather’s letter to him. The prince was pleased by what Giv told him and 
had wine, musicians, and stewards brought in. For three days, rejoicing in his 
victories, Kay Khosrow drank wine, and at sunrise on the fourth, in good spirits, 
he visited his army’s camp and distributed helmets and armor. He placed an 


army under the command of Gostaham, the son of Nozar, while he himself took 
the road from Gang to China, subduing the world with his sword as he went. No 
day or night passed without some incident; he sent out scouts by day and posted 
sentinels by night. And so he progressed until he reached the town his father had 
built, where he wept as he went forward, and his head was filled with thoughts 
of vengeance. He went around the gardens Seyavash had made and saw the spot 
where the dish that held Seyavash’s blood had been emptied. He prayed to the 
just God, “That You may be my guide until, in the same way, I shed Afrasyab’s 
blood like water in this same place.” Then he returned to his throne and spoke 
secretly with God. He chose messengers from his army, those who could speak 
well and listen well, and sent them to the Khagan of China, to the Faghfur, and 
to the lord of Makran. Their message was, “If you wish to follow justice and 
obey my orders, if you regret the evil you have done, send provisions for my 
troops, since as you see we are on the march; anyone who does not obey my 
orders and refuses to offer us hospitality, even if he remains far away from us, 
should prepare his army for battle.” 

Messengers came to the lords of each country. The Faghfur and Kahqan of 
China were filled with consternation, as were the lords of other lands. They 
welcomed the messengers with sweet and gentle words, saying: “We are all the 
king’s slaves, and we bow our heads before his commands. We shall inspect the 
lands through which your brave warriors will pass; we shall rebuild any 
devastated areas and see that your army is provided with food and other 
necessities.” Everyone of sense said, “If the king will pass through our lands 
without doing any harm, we shall give quantities of goods to the poor, and we 
shall welcome him with gifts and provisions.” Then they gave presents to the 
messengers, who returned pleased and well satisfied to Khosrow’s court. 

But when the messenger arrived at the court of Makran, the king’s heart there 
reacted quite differently. The messenger went before his throne and handed over 
the letter, as well as repeating what he remembered of the message. The foolish 
king treated him with contempt, which saddened the courtiers who were present. 
He said, “Tell the king of Iran that he shouldn’t try to lord it over me when he’s 
never set eyes on me. All this land is controlled by my throne, the world is bright 
with my glory and good fortune. When the shining sun rises into the heavens, it 
is this country on which his rays first alight.* I possess knowledge, abundant 
treasure, greatness, valor, and strength. If you ask me for safe passage I grant it 
to you; any living creature can walk on the earth as a king. I shan’t block your 
way; do no harm as you pass by with your troops. But if you bring an army 


against my country, understand that you have no right to my kingdom; I shall not 
allow you to set foot on my soil or to cross my frontier. However fortunate your 
star, I shall not allow you to win a victory over me.” 

When the king had heard their replies he led his renowned army proudly 
toward Khotan. The Faghfur and Khaqan of China, together with their nobles, 
came forward three stages of the road to welcome him; they greeted him with 
apologies for their past behavior and made their obeisance before him. They had 
made the bridges and roads as flat as a plain, and the valleys and plain itself 
were decorated like a royal court. All along the road garments and food, 
preparations for feasting, and spread carpets were provided. As the king 
approached the city, he was surrounded with festivities and decorations; brocade 
was hung from buildings’ walls, and saffron and gold coins were scattered 
before his feet. The Faghfur felt emboldened and preceded the king into the 
royal palace. He said to him: “We are the king’s subjects, if indeed we are 
worthy to be called such. The world flourishes because of your good fortune, 
and your friends’ hearts rejoice at this. If our palace is unworthy of you, I think it 
is at least not worse than the road.” With his head held high the king entered the 
palace and sat in the splendid audience chamber. As a welcoming gift the 
Faghfur brought in thirty thousand Chinese gold coins and stood before the king 
together with the lords of the marches. Khosrow and his army commanders 
stayed in China for three months, and during this time the Faghfur’s servants 
brought him new presents every day at dawn. During the fourth month, leaving 
Rostam behind in China, the Persian king set off for Makran. When he was close 
to the border he chose an experienced man from his army and sent him to the 
king of Makran, telling him to say, “May wisdom be the king’s partner! 
Consider where we have come from; we are not drunk, and neither do we lack 
ambition and sleep our time away. The world shines brightly from my plans and 
good fortune, and the greatest kings are my subjects. Prepare food for my army’s 
journey and make a suitable place ready to receive me, because when an army 
has no provisions its members will not accept this; if I cannot provide for them, 
they will take other people’s property. If they find no provisions ready they will 
resort to war, and their enemies will find themselves hard-pressed. If you do not 
pay attention to my words now, you will find yourself wading through the blood 
of many men. It will be you who brings devastation to Tiz and Makran if for no 
reason you attack my lion-warriors.” 

The envoy arrived and delivered the message, but there was no room in the 
recipient’s heart for either the message or justice. His foolish head was enraged 


by the letter’s language and his brain was a whirl of angry emotions. He 
gathered his scattered forces around him and prepared a site on the plains as a 
battlefield. 


And to the messenger he said, “Leave me, 

Go to my evil-minded enemy 

And say, ‘The turning heavens brought you success, 
Splendor, and glory, and great happiness; 

But when you come here you’ll discover who 

This hero is and what a man can do.’” 


The Battle Between King Kay Khosrow and the King of Makran 

As the king’s messenger returned, all of Makran was in an uproar. From 
mountain to mountain the land was filled with soldiers; their army occupied the 
whole of Tiz and Makran. Two hundred elephants were there, and you would 
say that there was no way forward through the press of troops. The neighing of 
horses and the clashing of armor made the moon lose its way in the heavens. A 
lookout came to Kay Khosrow saying, “Makran is black with dust sent up by the 
army there; the whole land is a mass of banners and elephants; the king can see 
this from two miles away.” Kay Khosrow ordered his men to form ranks and 
grasp their iron maces. 

A scout came across the plain, from Makran, and all night he prowled around 
the Persian army. The Persian watchman was a man named Tokhvar, who was 
always confident in combat; he came out and grappled with the enemy scout, 
and their fight was like that of a proud lion and an enraged elephant. Tokhvar 
slashed with his sword and cut his opponent in half; this struck terror into the 
king of Makran’s heart. 

The two armies were drawn up in ranks, and their dust obscured the sky. Like 
two mountains they advanced and then hurled themselves against each other. 
Tus advanced from the army’s center, and the world was filled with the squeal of 
trumpets, the din of drums. The Kaviani banner was at the forefront of the army, 
and behind the king came his heroes in their golden boots; the air was filled with 
lances and feathered arrows, the land heaved like a sea of pitch. In the midst of 
his troops, the king of Makran was mortally wounded by a spear. Someone cried, 
“My lord, let us cut off his head.” Kay Khosrow replied, “Do no such thing! 
Someone who cuts off a king’s head is worse than a child of Ahriman. Prepare a 
tomb for him, and pour there musk and rose water, as for a king’s sleep. His 


body must not be laid bare, with the place where he was wounded through his 
armor visible. Cover his face with Chinese brocade; this is how obsequies for 
great men should be.” 

Two thousand men from the army of Makran were killed, both horsemen and 
sword-wielding warriors. One thousand one hundred and forty men were taken 
prisoner, and the minds of those who remained alive were filled with terror. The 
Persians took possession of the enemy’s elephants and wealth, their pavilions 
and splendid thrones; Iran’s nobles became rich, and many of them now owned 
crowns and thrones. Then the brave victors set about the sack of Makran; the 
cities and plains rang with women’s cries, and all of Tiz and Makran was filled 
with scenes of violence. The towns’ gates were burned, the whole country was 
devastated. Many men were slain with arrows, and their women and children 
taken captive. When the king’s anger against his enemies abated, he ordered his 
army to withdraw. He told wise Ashkash to put an end to the looting and 
pillaging, to see that no one acted in a vile fashion or was harsh to those who 
were helpless. 

The nobles of the land came before the king, asking for mercy and saying, 
“We are innocent and helpless; continually we are oppressed by tyranny. It is 
worthy of a king when he sees the innocent suffer that he act graciously.” The 
king had a proclamation announced from his pavilion: “Great champions, if from 
now on there arises any cry against wrongdoing, looting, or violence, I shall take 
those criminals who do not fear God’s justice and hack them in two.” 

Kay Khosrow, at the head of his army, remained for a year in Makran and 
had boat builders summoned from every quarter. Spring came; the earth turned 
green, all the mountain slopes were dotted with wild tulips, the hunting grounds 
and horses’ pastures were filled with fruit trees’ blossoms. At this time Kay 
Khosrow ordered Ashkash to remain with an army in Makran and to rule there as 
king; he told him to pursue only righteousness and virtue, and to see that his 
justice never fell short. He himself set out across the desert, willingly 
undertaking the hardships of the journey. But God so arranged things that he and 
his men never saw the dust of the desert; the sky was filled with clouds, the 
ground with newly sprung grass, the world with wild tulips and fenugreek. Oxen 
pulled carts laden with food before the army; the plain was green and dotted with 
places to rest and sleep; clouds filled the sky and the earth was awash with 
water. 

When they drew near Lake Zereh, the soldiers loosened their chain mail 
cuirasses. The king had brought boat builders from China and Makran, and now 


he ordered them to do all that had to be done to build on dry land boats to launch 
on the lake. He ordered men to prepare provisions for a yearlong voyage. Then 
this audacious leader who was protected by a fortunate star went aside from the 
water’s edge, his face aglow with ardor; as a slave he bowed down and praised 
the World Creator, asking that He bring him to dry land again unharmed, 
together with his weapons and army, and the Persian nobles and his court. He 
said: “Lord of the world, who knows what is plain and what is hidden, You are 
the guardian of the dry land and of the sea, the lord of the heavens and the 
Pleiades. Be then the guardian of my soul and my army, of my treasure, my 
throne, and my crown.” 

The sea was so rough that there was no one who was not stricken with 
seasickness; for six months the boats sailed on, and each person slept where he 
could. In the seventh month, when they were in despair as to what the year 
would bring, the wind shifted violently from the north; the sails swiveled, 
making the boats yaw, and the sailors could not control the ships’ direction. The 
boats were driven toward a place that sailors call “The Lion’s Maw,” but God so 
managed matters that the contrary winds did not confound the king’s star. The 
army was astonished at the sea’s appearance and each man pointed his finger at 
the king. They saw lions and oxen in the waters, and the oxen were grappling 
with the lions; they saw men with hair like a lariat, their bodies covered with 
wool like sheep; some had the heads of water buffaloes, with legs before and 
hands behind; one had a body like a fish and a head like a leopard’s, another a 
body like an onager and a head like a crocodile’s. The men pointed out these 
wonders to one another, and called on God and His justice for help. By the grace 
of the Lord of the skies, the air grew calm and the wind dropped. They crossed 
the lake in seven months, and the wind never blew against them again. 

When Khosrow reached dry land he looked and saw the earth’s plains spread 
out before him. He came before God, weeping and pressing his face to the earth, 
and then quickly, as there was good reason to make haste, he had the ships and 
boats hauled up from the lake. Ahead of him was the desert, a sandy plain, and 
as he went confidently forward the sands moved beneath his feet. He saw towns 
that were like the towns in China, and the language spoken there was that of 
Makran; the king rested in these towns, and asked for food to feed his army. He 
made Giv the king of this land and said to him, “May fortune favor you! Do not 
act harshly here, not even against malefactors, because cities and wealth have 
become as nothing to me. From now on I make no distinctions between people; 
my only concern is to praise God, our protector and guide.” He chose from his 


army a renowned warrior who could comprehend the speech of all peoples and 
sent through him a message to the local kings, saying, “May anyone who seeks 
peace and prosperity, whose heart is happy and who is generous, come with all 
due ceremony to my court; anyone who ignores this message will suffer the 
consequences of his evil thoughts.” None of the summoned nobles ignored this 
message, and all of them came to the court as the king’s subjects. On their 
arrival, the king made much of them and raised their heads up to the turning sun. 
Then he asked them about Gang Dezh, Afrasyab, and the seat of royal power. 
The group’s spokesman said, “There are neither mountains nor water to get past 
between here and Gang Dezh. If you add the distance up, taking the good with 
the bad, it’s not more than a hundred parasangs from here to Gang. If you go the 
way that the king of Turan went, there are not many evil-minded people still 
there; but since he came from the lake he himself and his men are in Gang.” The 
king was pleased by this answer, and in his heart he felt that the difficulties he’d 
undergone were of no account. Robes of honor were prepared for the princes; 
then they asked these knowledgeable men for horses. The king sent them back to 
their cities, while he himself prepared to set off for Gang Dezh with his army. 
He drew up his forces, distributed provisions, and prayed to God from whom all 
benefits proceed. Then he said, “Any man who seeks to do evil will suffer God’s 
punishment; do not charge in a body into the city, since not even an ant must 
suffer in this onslaught.” 

When the world conqueror saw Gang Dezh, his face became covered in tears. 
He dismounted from his horse, placed his head upon the ground, and prayed to 
God, saying: 


“O God of purity and justice, here 

I wait, your slave, and filled with dread and fear. 
You’ve given me my royal sovereignty, 

My army, and my glorious Destiny— 

And now you let me see the city where 

My father’s well-built walls assault the air, 
Since Seyavash, by God’s help, raised on high 
These walls from earth to reach into the sky.* 
An evil tyrant laid him low, and when 

He did so pierced the hearts of all good men.” 


The army wept as one before the walls, thinking of the innocent Seyavash’s 
suffering and that he had been killed by a man whose malevolence had planted 
such seeds of vengeance in the world. 


Kay Khosrow Reaches Gang Dezh 

Then news came to Afrasyab that the world-conquering king had crossed Lake 
Zereh. He kept what he had heard hidden and went out into the dark night, 
telling no one. He left behind him both his entourage and strangers, and 
wandered alone with his heart filled with anguish. 

When Kay Khosrow entered Gang, his head was filled with sadness, his heart 
with suffering; he saw there a delightful garden, its rivulets glittering like the 
lamps of paradise. On every side there were watercourses and rose beds, and the 
ground was covered in hyacinths and trees that attracted nightingales. Everyone 
who came there said, “This is the place to be! Let us stay here happily until we 
die!” The wary king ordered them to search for Turan’s king, and his men took 
guides into the deserts and hillsides; they sought for him everywhere, like men 
who are confused and bewildered, trying to find some sign of his presence. In 
their eager search they found many of his followers, and they killed many who 
were innocent, but they found not a trace of the unjust king. 

Kay Khosrow stayed in Gang Dezh for a year, passing his time with wine and 
festivities. The world was like an enchanting paradise then, a place of roses, 
gardens, and cultivated vistas; the place captivated him, and the victorious, 
happy king had no wish to leave. Then one day all the nobles of the Persian 
army came before the king and said, “If the king has no desire to move on and 
gives no thought to the land of Iran, he should consider that Afrasyab in his 
malevolence may already have crossed to the other side of Lake Zereh; King 
Kavus on his throne has neither might nor glory nor treasure nor an army, and he 
is so old that if Afrasyab makes for Iran bent on vengeance, who will protect our 
homeland? If Afrasyab should regain a throne and crown all that we have gone 
through will count for nothing.” The king said to the assembled Persians, “Your 
warning is sensible.” He summoned the city’s nobles and went over with them at 
length everything he and they had suffered; he chose the most deserving among 
them, the most respected man in the city, and invested him with a robe of honor 
as the lord of the marches there. He said to him, “Rule here and be prosperous, 
and be on the watch for those who wish you ill!” He distributed whatever wealth 
was available, including horses and precious goods; the whole town was 
enriched by his gifts of torques, thrones, and crowns. 

At the time when roosters wake, the din of drums rang out in the court. 
Quickly the army set off for the desert, and the nobles and princes of each of the 
surrounding provinces came to pay their respects; they brought provender and 


provisions worthy of the king and his army. Along the road where the army 
marched the plains and valleys were like an endless market; in the mountains, 
the desert, and the villages there was no one who did not deal generously with 
them. The headmen of the area brought presents and cash to welcome the king, 
and he gave them robes of honor from his treasury, insisting that they not trouble 
themselves to accompany him on his way. 

Giv and his army, and the nobles of the country, came out to welcome him. 
When he saw the king’s head lifted high in glory, Giv dismounted and made his 
obeisance before him. The world conqueror made much of him and assigned him 
a place beside him, according to Kayanid custom. When Khosrow reached the 
ships he inspected them and delayed for two weeks at the lakeside. He told Giv 
of what he had seen and said repeatedly, “Anyone who has not seen Gang Dezh 
should not hesitate to hurry there!” Then he ordered that his men set to work to 
launch two boats and that all those familiar with sailing who were brave enough 
to venture over deep waters should hoist sail to begin the voyage. They made 
such good speed that they crossed the lake, which is normally a year’s journey, 
in seven months, and so smoothly did they sail to the other side that not a sleeve 
was splashed by contrary winds. When the army’s leader reached dry land he 
tethered the boats and saw the plains before him. He came forward, bowing his 
face to the dust and praising God. He gave food and clothing to the sailors and 
those who had been at the tiller; gold coins and robes of honor were distributed 
to everyone who had manned the boats. He set off from the lakeshore across the 
desert, and the world was astonished at his progress. When he heard of the 
king’s approach Ashkash came with his soldiers to welcome him; he dismounted 
from his horse and kissed the ground, praising the king. The whole of Tiz and 
Makran was decorated, and musicians were summoned; everywhere, along the 
way and in the trackless wilderness, music could be heard, and you’d have said 
that the air and music were the warp and weft of one cloth. The walls were hung 
with brocade, and sugar and silver coins were cast before the advancing 
column’s feet. Throughout Makran all the nobility and headmen and chieftains 
took presents to greet the victorious king, and Ashkash brought him the local 
goods he had obtained that were of value. The king accepted what he saw of 
Ashkash’s gifts, and chose a nobleman from among those who had come to greet 
him, making this man the lord of Makran, giving him gifts and robes of honor, 
and acknowledging him as the land’s ruler. As he and his proud nobles left 
Makran and approached China, Rostam, the son of Zal and grandson of Sam, 
rejoicing and celebrating with his army, came out to welcome him; when 


Rostam saw the royal parasol in the distance, he dismounted from his horse, 
bowing before him, until the triumphant king embraced him, and told him of the 
wonders he had seen on the lake, and how the evil wizard Afrasyab had 
disappeared. 

He stayed in China as Rostam’s guest for a week, but then he moved on to 
Machin, making for Seyavashgerd, where he arrived on the day of Ard in the 
month of Sefandormuz. When he reached his father’s town he felt heartsick, and 
his cheeks were wet with tears. He went to the place where the evil Garsivaz and 
Gerui, that accursed murderer, had cut off the Persian king’s head; he poured the 
dark earth that was there on his head, and tore at his face and chest. Rostam 
smeared his face with the earth, and swore black curses against the soul of Gerui. 
Kay Khosrow said: “My king, you left me in this world to be 

A living symbol of your memory; 

And for as long as this world lasts, my soul 
Will cherish only vengeance as its goal. 

I’ve smashed the throne of Afrasyab, and I’ Il 
Not rest or sleep from this day forward while 
There’s hope that I can capture him somewhere 
And make his world a place of black despair.” 


Then he turned his attention to his father’s treasury, the whereabouts of which 
his mother had told him, opening it and distributing payment to his soldiers; he 
stayed happily for two weeks in the town and gave two hundred purses of gold 
coins to Rostam, as well as a large amount of goods to Giv. When Nozar’s son 
Gostaham heard that the king was in his father’s town, he and a number of Iran’s 
nobles came to greet him; as soon as he saw the king’s head and crown in the 
distance he dismounted and walked the rest of the way on foot. His whole army 
paid homage to the just king, who ordered Gostaham to remount his horse, so 
that the two went forward hand in hand, leading their armies in triumph to Gang 
Behesht. Their trust in one another was like a fruit tree that continually produces 
anew crop. No one rested from feasting and the chase, neither the king nor any 
of his horsemen, and the local Turkish headmen and chieftains were well 
provided for through his generosity. He searched for Afrasyab in the bright day 
and in the night, but no one could give any news of him; throughout the world 
there was no mention of him. 

One night the world’s king washed his head and body and, taking the Zend- 
Avesta with him, went apart from his companions. He spent the night before 


God, weeping and with his head pressed to the ground. He said: “The soul of this 
weak slave is always filled with pain: I pace the mountains and desert sands and 
cross lakes and rivers in search of Afrasyab. He has not followed Your just 
ways, he despises everyone in the world; You know that he is not a just man, 
that he does not follow a righteous path, and that he has spilled the blood of 
many innocent people. May the just God be my guide to discover this wicked 
man. You know that I am grateful to You, and that I worship You, the world’s 
creator. Throughout the world there is no sign or trace of him; where he is 
remains hidden from me, but not from You. If You are pleased with him, O just 
God, turn my mind away from this desire to fight him; douse this flame of 
vengeance within my heart, and make my ways conform to Your ways.” 

The proud, young king, blessed by good fortune, returned from his place of 
prayer to the throne; he stayed in Gang Behesht for a year and rested from his 
eager preparations for war. After his long stay in Gang he felt the need to see 
Kay Kavus; he gave the land from Qachgar to the sea of China into the care of 
Gostaham, the son of Nozar, supplying him an unlimited number of soldiers. He 
said to him: “Be watchful and happy! Send messengers and letters to everyone in 
China and Makran asking for news of Afrasyab, so that we can rid the world of 
him.” Then he gathered together wealth of every sort—gold coins and uncut 
jewels, musk and golden bridles, clothes and horses, thrones and both male and 
female slaves, carpets and Chinese furnishings, and the produce of Makran. 
Forty thousand strong oxen were driven ahead of the king; everyone said that 
there had never been, and no one had ever seen, greater wealth than this. 
Traveling through the plains and mountains, the army was so large that it took a 
day and a night to go from camp to camp, so that as the rear guard reached one 
resting place the vanguard had already arrived at the next. In this way they 
reached Chach, where the crown was suspended over the ivory throne; for a 
week the king stayed in Soghdia, and everyone there wished him well. The dust 
of his army obscured the sky as he continued his march to Bokhara, where he ate 
and rested for a week. During the second week he put on new clothes and, 
weeping for ancient sorrows and the days gone by, he made his way to the fire 
temple with its inner courts built by Tur, Feraydun’s son. He distributed gold 
and silver to its priests, and scattered jewels over the sacred fire, and then he set 
off again, rejoicing in his heart at what he had accomplished. 


Kay Khosrow Returns from Turkestan to Iran 


Kay Khosrow crossed the Oxus and made for Balkh, having tasted much of 
the world’s bitterness. He stayed a month in Balkh and then continued his 
journey, and at each stage along the road he and his army were the guests of a 
local nobleman, and the ways and byways where the king went were decorated 
to welcome him. He came to Talqun and Marvrud, where the world was filled 
with the sound of flutes and lutes; the towns were decked out in his honor, and 
wine and music were everywhere; silver coins and saffron, gold coins and musk 
were scattered before him. Then he went on to Nishapour with his elephants, his 
army, and his treasures; there he relieved the poor and those who lived by their 
own labors by giving them silver coins, and in this way he distributed fifty-five 
purses of coins. After a week he moved on to Rey, and throughout the whole 
journey he was accompanied by musicians, music, and wine. For two weeks Rey 
benefited from his generosity, and in the third week he set off for Baghdad, after 
sending mounted envoys on ahead to Kay Kavus in Pars. 

The old man’s heart rejoiced to hear such news from his grandson, and you 
would say that Kay Kavus had become a new man of greater stature. He had 
golden thrones set out in the halls, and his palace was hung with Chinese 
decorations. The roads and plain, the houses, streets, and markets were adorned 
in splendor. The elders and nobility of each town welcomed him, everywhere 
arches were constructed to celebrate his triumph, and the world seemed to be 
fashioned from brocade and gold. Musk and jewels were mingled and poured 
over the heads of Khosrow and his entourage as they passed beneath the arches. 
When Kay Kavus left his city with his illustrious courtiers, the young king saw 
his grandfather in the distance and urged his swift steed forward; the two men 
wept, because for a while they had despaired of seeing one another again. Kay 
Kavus heaped praises upon the head of the young prince who had been so well 
favored by Fortune. He said: “May the world, and the throne of greatness, and 
the crown of the mighty, never be without you! The sun has never seen such a 
king as you, nor such armor, such a horse, such a throne, and such a crown. 
From the time of Jamshid and Feraydun the sky and earth have never looked on 
a king who was your equal; nor has any nobleman ever borne such trials or seen 
so deeply into what is plain and what is hidden in the world. May the world 
flourish beneath your reign, and may the hearts and souls of any who wish you 
ill be eradicated. If Seyavash himself were to return one day, he would be 
overwhelmed by your glory.” The prince replied to him: “All this was due to 
your good fortune; it is your tree that has produced such royal fruit.” Then he 
brought emeralds, rubies, and gold, scattering them over the king’s head in such 


profusion that the feet of his jewel-encrusted throne were hidden by the prince’s 
tribute. Kavus summoned his nobles and had tables set up in an adjoining room; 
the courtiers and their king feasted in a golden chamber as lovely as a rose 
garden. Kay Khosrow recounted the wonders he had seen when crossing the 
great lake, and in Gang Dezh, and his listeners’ lips sighed with astonishment to 
hear of such a wonderful city, its surrounding plains and hillsides, and its 
streams and gardens that glittered like shining lamps. Kay Kavus was astounded 
by the deeds he heard described, and he understood the measure of what his 
grandson had achieved. He said to him: “A young prince describing such new 
things is like a new day and a new moon. No one in the world has seen such a 
prince as you, and no ear has ever heard such a tale as yours; let us drink our 
wine to the health of this new star, this Khosrow! Wine and ruby-lipped wine 
servers were brought, and for a week wine flowed like a cresting wave in Kay 
Kavus’s palace. On the eighth day the king opened his treasury’s doors in order 
to recompense all that had been undergone. The chieftains who had been with 
Khosrow through all vicissitudes, in battles and in banquets, in joy and in grief, 
were given gifts according to their rank, choosing the most valuable things from 
the treasury; then they set off for their own lands, their heads held high as they 
led their illustrious warriors home. Next, Kavus turned to the army and gave 
each man silver coins equivalent to a year’s pay. And now this king who was 
ambitious to rule the world sat to take counsel alone with his grandson, without 
his courtiers. Khosrow said to King Kavus: “Who but the World’s Creator now 
can guide 

Us to the place in which he chose to hide, 

Since for a year we’ve searched the plains and seas, 

The mountain slopes and distant fastnesses, 

And sick at heart not one of us has found 

A sign in any place of this renowned 

King Afrasyab? If he should make his way 

To Gang again and there without delay 

Gather his troops, even with God’s help we 

Shall be hard pressed to salvage victory.” 


When he heard his grandson’s words, Kavus gave the advice of an old, 
experienced man: “Let us take two horses and ride quickly to the fire temple at 
Azargoshasp; there we’!l wash our heads and bodies and, taking the barsom in 
our hands like God-fearing men, we’ll reverently murmur our prayers before the 


World’s Creator. We’ ll stand before the sacred fire in the hope that God will be 
our guide, that He who shows justice to mankind will show us the way to our 
enemy’s hiding place.” Both agreed on this, and neither turned aside in its 
execution. They mounted their horses and rode like the wind to the temple at 
Azargoshasp. They entered in white clothes, their hearts filled with both hope 
and fear, and when they saw the fire they wept as though they were burned by its 
heat. The two kings stood there weeping, imploring God’s help; they distributed 
jewels to the priests, and as Kay Khosrow wept he poured gold coins over the 
Zend-Avesta. For a week they stood before God, but do not think that they were 
fire-worshippers; at that time fire was the mehrab, before which a worshipper’s 
eyes filled with tears, and no matter how long or hard you think, you can never 
be free of the need for God. For a month the two kings and their freeborn 
companions stayed in the temple. 


THE DEATH OF AFRASYAB 


Hum Captures Afrasyab 

Meanwhile, Afrasyab wandered everywhere without food, supplies, or rest, 
knowing neither peace in his soul nor health in his body. He searched the world 
for a place where his soul could be safe and his body could regain its strength. 
Near Barda, high on a mountainside, he found a cave unknown to the world; 
there was nowhere above it for a hawk to alight, and beneath it was the spoor of 
neither lions nor wild boar. He took victuals there, and fearing for his soul he 
constructed a high platform inside the cave. The place was far from every city 
and close to a water source; now it is known as “Afrasyab’s Cavern.” He stayed 
for a while in this cavern, regretting his past deeds and with his heart steeped in 
sorrow. When a highborn person’s heart becomes bloodthirsty, he will not sit on 
his royal throne for long. No matter how splendid a monarch he may be, no 
matter how far his reign extends or how blessed by Fortune he is, when he sheds 
blood enemies will appear; it is well for that king who does not shed royal 
blood! 

In those days there was a good man descended from Feraydun, possessed of 
the Kayanids’ glory and loyal to his monarch, who used to distance himself from 
other men and their worldly pleasures, and visit this mountain to pray. The name 
of this fine man who liked to pray in solitude was Hum. At the mountain’s peak, 
far from any habitation, there was a cleft in the rock near to where Hum prayed. 
One day, dressed in a woolen shepherd’s coat, he had prepared the place where 
he prayed, when a cry came to his ears from the cleft in the rock. It said: “Great 
king, the judge of those who judge, whose reign Was over other kings, whose 
wide domain 

Included Turkoman and Chinese lands Subservient to your edicts and 
commands, 

Your kingdom’s now a cave! Where now are all 

Your noble chieftains at your beck and call, 


Your crown, your throne, your strength and bravery, Your plots, and 
schemes, and clever trickery? 

Where are your armies, where are your might and pride Now that a 
narrow cave’s where you must hide, 

Now that the land you rule’s no more than here, 

This stony stronghold where you’ve fled in fear?” 


When Hum heard these words, which were spoken in Turki, he interrupted 
his prayers and went to one side, saying, “These wailing words, spoken when 
men are asleep, can only be from Afrasyab.” Then he thought for a while and 
took heart, and in the darkness searched for an entrance in the rock face, and as 
he looked he came on the opening to Afrasyab’s cavern; he stripped off his 
woolen coat and entered the cave like a ravening lion, clutching his long belt to 
use as a lariat. He grabbed at the king and tied his arms, and then exited from the 
cave, dragging the king behind him like someone who is insensible. 

It’s only right if you are astonished at this turn of events; anyone who is a 
king in the world should choose only the glory of a good name and live humbly. 
Afrasyab chose a cave as his appropriate place of refuge; how was he to know 
that it would be the site of his undoing? 

When Hum tied the king’s arms and dragged him from where he had been 
hiding, Afrasyab said to him, “You are an intelligent, God-fearing, pious man; 
what do you want of me? I am a king in the world, and I have been keeping 
myself hidden in this cave.” Hum replied, “This is not where you should be; the 
world is filled with your name. Which of the world’s kings has killed his 
brother? Who quarreled with God, killing Aghriras, and renowned Nozar, and 
Seyavash who was loved throughout the earth? You should not have shed royal 
blood, and then you wouldn’t have had to hide yourself away in the depths of a 
cave!” Afrasyab said, “You’re a clever man, so tell me, who in the world do you 
know of who is without sin? It was the turning of the high heavens that ensured 
that pain and suffering and hardship would come from me, and no one can evade 
God’s commands, even if he should trample a dragon’s eyes beneath his feet. 
Take pity on me in my wretchedness, no matter how much of a tyrant I’ve been, 
I am a descendant of the great Feraydun; untie me from these bonds! Where do 
you want to take me, tied up in this humiliating way? Don’t you fear God on the 
Day of Judgment?” Hum said, “You are evil, and your thoughts are evil, and you 
have not long to live now. Your words are like weeds in a rose garden, and your 
life is in Kay Khosrow’s hands.” Nevertheless, Hum’s heart was moved to pity, 


and he loosened the bonds that tied his captive’s arms; seeing that this good man 
had been touched by a king’s complaint, Afrasyab wrenched his hands free and 
dived into Lake Chichast, where he disappeared. 


Gudarz Meets up with Hum 

It happened that Gudarz Keshvad was riding with Giv near the king’s residence 
and by chance he glanced at the lake. He saw Hum there, with a rope in his hand, 
desperately running up and down at the lake’s edge; he also saw that the water 
was dark and muddied, and that Hum was staring distractedly at it. He said to 
himself, “Is this fine man thinking of fishing in Lake Chichast? It’ll be a 
crocodile that he’ll catch, and that’!l surprise him!” He said to Hum, “You seem 
a good person, tell us what you’re hiding there! What are you looking for in this 
lake’s water? Or are you thinking of washing your filthy body in it?” 

Hum replied, “My lord, look at what’s happened to me for a moment. I’ve a 
place on the summit of that mountain there, where I go to pray, in order to be 
away from other people. Well, last night I was praying there in the darkness, I’d 
been praying all night, and then at cockcrow I heard a wailing noise. And 
immediately my clear heart thought, ‘I can pull up the root of all this vengeance 
that’s in the world,’ because who else could this wailing in the middle of the 
night be from but Afrasyab? So I began to search the mountainside and caves, 
until I came to the cave where whoever was in there was lamenting. And there 
he was, lying in the cave, weeping about his crown and throne. When I went in 
he jumped up and set his feet firmly against the granite walls, but I tied up his 
arms as hard as stone with my belt, so tightly in fact that blood spurted from 
beneath his fingernails. Then I dragged him down the mountain while he was 
weeping and wailing like a woman, and he made such a noise with his crying 
and screaming that I loosened his bonds a bit, and as soon as I’d done so he 
twisted away from my grip, and my heart and soul are lacerated that he got 
away. He’s hidden somewhere here in Lake Chichast, and now I’ve told you 
everything that’s happened.” 

When Gudarz heard this story he was reminded of ancient sayings; deep in 
thought, like a man who has no sense of his surroundings, he made his way to 
the fire temple. First he praised God, praying before the fire, then he disclosed to 
Kay Kavus and Kay Khosrow all he had seen and the secret he had learned. 
Immediately the two kings mounted their horses and left the temple. Wondering 
at what he had heard King Kavus approached the pious man with whom Gudarz 
had talked. When Hum saw the kings’ crowns he made his obeisance before 


them, and in return the kings called down God’s blessings upon him. King 
Kavus said to him, “Thanks be to God who is our refuge that we have seen the 
face of a God-fearing man, one who is powerful, wise, and strong.” And Hum 
replied, “May the earth flourish beneath your justice! May the young prince here 
see glorious days, and may the heart of any man who wishes him ill be torn out! 
I was giving thanks to God on that mountain when the prince passed here on his 
way to Gang Dezh, and I prayed that God would make the earth prosper through 
his rule. When I saw him on his way back I smiled and praised God in my 
happiness. And suddenly one night the angel Sorush revealed a secret to me; I 
heard a cry come from a bottomless cave, and I listened to what was said. 
Someone was bitterly wailing about his ivory throne and his lands and army and 
crown. I came down from the mountaintop toward the cave, gripping my belt in 
my hand to use as a lariat. Then I saw Afrasyab, who had made himself a place 
to rest and sleep there. I tied him up as tight and as hard as a stone, and dragged 
the wretch out of his narrow hiding place. But then because of his pleas I 
loosened the knots with which I’d bound him, and when we reached the 
lakeshore he slipped the rope off and disappeared into the water; all trace of this 
man must be eradicated from the earth! If the heavens will that he be recaptured, 
we can do it through Garsivaz, his brother, because his heart is easily wrung for 
him. If your majesty gives the command Garsivaz can be brought here, with his 
feet in shackles, and he can be sewn in a cow hide until his strength gives out; 
when Afrasyab hears him scream he’!l appear from the water.” 

The king gave orders that the royal guards with their swords and Gilaki 
shields bring Garsivaz to the lakeside, and then he commanded the executioner 
to rip from his face the veil that covered his shame and to sew his shoulders into 
a cow’s hide so that it would force all strength from his body. Garsivaz’s skin 
split and he begged for mercy, calling on God to help him. When Afrasyab heard 
his voice he emerged weeping from the water; as he heard his brother’s cries 
coming to him from the dry land he swam to the shore, and what he saw there 
was worse than death to him. Garsivaz saw him emerge from the water, his eyes 
filled with blood, his heart with anguish, and he gave a great cry: “O king of all 
the world, chieftain of all, Crown of the great who held the earth in thrall, Where 
is your splendor now, your crown, your gold, Your regal court so glorious to 
behold? 

Where are your knowledge, strength, experience, 
Your courtiers and their bold magnificence? 
Where is your noble prowess when you fought, 


The feasts and wine and wealth that graced your court? 
What laggard star is yours that you must take 
Refuge within the waters of a lake?” 


As Afrasyab heard this he wept, and his bloody tears dripped into the water. 
He answered, “I have been about the world, both openly and in secret, in hopes 
that I could outwit this evil fate, but out of evil a worse evil has come upon me. 
Life is now worthless to me, and my soul shudders at your fate—a descendant of 
Feraydun, a son of Pashang, to be in the grip of such a monster! Your skin splits 
beneath that cow hide, and I see no one here whose eyes hold tears of shame.” 

Whilst the two royal brothers were talking in this way, Hum’s soul was intent 
on a trick. Watching Afrasyab, and listening to his weeping and groaning, this 
pious man came out onto a little spit of land, where he could see him from afar. 
He unwound the Kayanid lariat from his waist and scrambled forward like a 
spirited lion, then flung the lariat so that it looped over Afrasyab’s head. As he 
dragged him out of the water onto dry land, Afrasyab lost consciousness. God- 
fearing Hum secured his arms with the rope, handed him over to the Iranian 
kings, and disappeared so quickly that you would have said he was a partner to 
the wind. 


Kay Khosrow Kills Afrasyab and Garsivaz 

Kay Khosrow came forward holding a sharp sword, his head filled with the 
desire for vengeance, his heart with rage. Half-conscious, Afrasyab said, “I saw 
this day once, in a dream; if the heavens have turned many times, they now draw 
back the veil from their secrets.” Then, raising his voice, he said, “So, you’re 
intent on revenge! Why do you wish to kill your own grandfather? Speak!” And 
Kay Khosrow answered, “Your deeds are evil, and you deserve every kind of 
condemnation and reproach. First I remind you that you shed the blood of your 
brother, who never did any harm to any nobleman; and then with a sharp sword 
you slit the throat of the world’s king, Nozar, a great monarch descended form 
Iraj, an act that raised such tumult in the world it was as if the day of God’s 
Judgment had come; and third, there was Seyavash, the noblest of all horsemen, 
whose head you cut off like a sheep’s, defying the high heavens with your 
wickedness. Why did you murder my father? Why didn’t you consider the evil 
you were doing on that day? You were quick enough to commit evil, and now 
you will suffer evil’s punishment.” 


Afrasyab replied, “Great king, what has happened has happened, and I must 
listen to you telling the story of my deeds. But let me see your mother’s face 
first, then tell your tales.” Kay Khosrow said, “As for my mother, listen first to 
the evils you brought down on my head. My father was innocent, and while I 
was as yet unborn think of the wickedness you spread about the world. You cut 
off the head of so noble a prince that the royal crown and ivory throne wept for 
him. But this is the day of God’s retribution, and God’s punishment for evil is an 
evil end.” Then he smote Afrasyab’s neck with an Indian sword, and his frail 
body lay stretched in the dust. His white hair and beard were stained with ruby- 
colored blood, and seeing this his brother despaired of life. 

The royal throne was empty of his presence, and the days of his greatness 
were at an end; evil came to his body from the evil deeds he had committed. My 
son, do not seek the key to evil’s chains, and if you seek it know that evil will 
come to those who commit evil. This was a king endowed with divine glory, but 
his anger always meant chains and a dungeon; if a king sheds blood he will be 
abhorred by the turning heavens, which will see he receives his punishment. A 
priest once said to King Bahram, who was so impetuous, “Do not shed the blood 
of the innocent! If you wish your crown to stay on your head, see that you stay 
always patient and compassionate. Think of what your crown itself has said to 
your head, ‘May your brains and wisdom be constant companions!’” 

When he saw what had happened to Afrasyab, Garsivaz’s two cheeks turned 
sallow, and his heart was in a tumult. The executioner dragged him forward, 
laden with heavy chains and surrounded by guards ready to slaughter him, as is 
the fate of malefactors. In his agony he stood before Kay Khosrow, and his 
cheeks that had turned a pallid blue were stained with bloody tears. The king of 
kings, the king of Iran, spoke then of the dish and the dagger used in the murder 
of Seyavash, of Tur and Feraydun and tyrannical Salm, and of Iraj, who had 
been a great king. Then with anger filling his heart he ordered the executioner to 
draw his sharp sword; the man slashed the general’s body in two, at the waist, 
and the soldiers there were terror-stricken as they watched. The two bodies were 
heaped together, and those who were present gathered around them. 

When the king had received the fulfillment of his wishes from God, he 
returned from the lake to the temple of Azargoshasp; he scattered a great deal of 
gold over the sacred flame and murmured his thanks to God. He and Kay Kavus 
stood for a day and a night in prayer before He who guides and holds the world. 
When Kay Khosrow’s treasurer, Zarasp, arrived, he donated wealth to the 
temple, giving robes of honor to the priests, together with gold and silver coins 


and all manner of goods. He also gave wealth liberally to the inhabitants of the 
city, to both the indigent and those who lived by their own labor, making the 
world loyal to him by his generosity. Then he seated himself on the Kayanid 
throne, giving audience and listening silently. Letters were written to every 
country, to every nobleman and chieftain, to the east and the west, to everywhere 
that there was a ruler of noble lineage; the letters stated that the face of the earth 
had been freed from the dragon’s evil by the sword of Kay Khosrow, who had 
neither rested nor divested himself of his armor till he had achieved victory by 
the strength of God. Through him, the soul of Seyavash lived again, and all the 
countries of the world had become subject to him. Then the world’s king added, 
“Chieftains and nobles, take your women and children out of your cities, take 
food and festivities out onto the plain, be generous to the poor, and to your 
servants and dependents.” When he had done this he gave himself to pleasure 
and celebrations; the heroes of great lineage, and everyone from Zarasp’s family, 
came to the temple at Azargoshasp where they stayed for forty days with King 
Kavus, rejoicing with music and wine. 

When the new moon shone in the sky like a golden crown on the head of a 
new king, the great men of the court set off for Pars, having had their fill of both 
battle and the back and forth of discussion. In every city they passed through, a 
crowd came before the prince, who opened his purses of gold to enrich God- 
fearing men. 


THE OCCULTATION OF KAY KHOSROW 


Once Kavus felt that his land was safe, he opened his heart to God and said: “O 
thou who art the guide to every blessing and who art higher than all fate, through 
you I found farr, glory, good fortune, greatness, my crown and my throne. You 
have given no one else the treasure and fame that you gave to me; I asked you 
for a warrior who would avenge the blood of Seyavash, and I saw my farsighted 
grandson, ambitious, glorious and wise, a man who outshines all former kings. 
But now I have lived for a hundred and fifty years and my hair that was as black 
as musk has turned as white as camphor. My body that was as straight and 
elegant as a cypress is bent like a bow, and if my days are to come to an end I 
shall not see death as a misfortune.” 

A short while later he died; all that remained of him in the world was his 
name. The lord Kay Khosrow came from his palace and sat himself down on the 
black earth: dressed in black and dark blue, devoid of all glory, the Persian 
nobles walked before him on foot. They mourned their king for two weeks, and 
built him a palatial tomb, ten lariat-lengths high. His body was treated with a 
salve compounded of camphor and musk, and then wrapped in robes of silk and 
brocade. Attendants placed him on an ivory dais, and anointed his head with 
camphor and musk. Kay Khosrow left the chamber, and the door to the king’s 
resting place was sealed. No one ever saw Kavus again: he rested from war and 
revenge forever. 


Such is the passing world that you must leave, 

All men must die, and it is vain to grieve. 

No learning will suffice against Death’s hand, 

Whose might no arms or helmet can withstand; 

And—king or prophet—in the end you must Descend to dirt, and slumber 
in the dust. 

Pursue desire, consider life a game 

And, if you can, look out for luck and fame— 

But know the world’s your enemy; your head 


Will lie in dust, the grave will be your bed. 


The king mourned his grandfather for forty days, shunning the crown and throne 
and pleasure. Then he sat himself on the ivory throne and placed on his own 
head the heart-delighting crown. The army assembled and the nobility came 
before him in their golden diadems: they acclaimed him as king and scattered 
jewels over his crown. The victorious champion was enthroned, and from end to 
end the world rejoiced. 


Kay Khosrow Becomes Sated with Kingship 

Sixty years passed, and all the world was under the king’s command. The king’s 
great soul began to brood on his power and on the passing of time. He said, “I 
have cleansed all inhabited lands of malevolent souls, from India to China to 
Byzantium, from the east to the west; mountains and wastelands and deserts and 
fertile plains—all are under my command. The world has no fear now of evil 
beings, and I have lived for many days. Although it was revenge I sought, God 
granted me all that I wished. My soul must not become filled with hubris, with 
foul thoughts and the ways of Ahriman. I shall then be as evil as Zahhak, or like 
Jamshid who suffered the same fate as Tur and Salm. On the one side I’m 
descended from Kavus, and on the other from that wicked wizard Tur: my 
ancestors are Kavus and Afrasyab, who even when he slept dreamt only of 
crookedness and trickery. One day I shall become ungrateful to God, terror will 
touch my soul’s radiance, the divine farr will leave me and I shall swerve toward 
crookedness and evil; I shall go forward into darkness until my head and crown 
are tumbled in the dust. I shall leave an evil name behind me, and my fate before 
God will be evil. My flesh will decay and my bones will lie scattered on the 
ground; virtue will fail, ingratitude will take its place, and in the other world my 
soul will dwell in darkness. When another has taken my crown and throne, and 
trampled on my fortune, all that will remain of me will be an evil name; the rose 
that grew from my age-old struggles will be a briar, no more. 

“Now that I have sought vengeance, adorned the world with splendor, killed 
those who rose against God and whom it was necessary to kill, there is not a 
place on earth which does not recognize my authority: however wealthy or 
strong they may be, the great of the earth are my servants. I am grateful to God 
that he has given me this farr, and that the heavens’ revolutions have looked 
favorably on me. It is best that I turn now toward God, that I seek him while I 
can still do so honorably, as one who has prayed to him privately: he will take 


my soul to the abode of the blessed, for this crown and throne will perish. No 
one will ever have more fame or happiness or greatness or peace of mind than I 
have enjoyed: I have reached life’s bourn, I have seen the world’s secrets, its 
good and evil, what is plain and what is hidden, and I have seen that whether a 
man tills the soil or reigns as a king he must finally pass through death.” 
The king ordered his chamberlain to send away anyone who might come 
seeking him, and to do this politely, with sweet words, avoiding all harshness. 
He shut the doors to his court, loosened his clothes, and began to lament his 

state. He washed his head and body preparatory to praying: with the torch of 
wisdom he sought out a path toward God. Then he strode to the place where he 
prayed, and spoke to the Judge of all secrets: “O higher than all souls, of 
unmatched worth, 

Who makes fire spurt forth from the darkened earth, 

Look on me now, vouchsafe me wisdom here 

To know the truth, to know what I should fear. 

Ill pray to you incessantly and strive 

To do good deeds whilst I remain alive— 

Absolve me of the evil I have done, 

Let me not trespass against anyone. 

Drive sin out from my soul and keep me free 

From demons and their cunning sorcery: 

Let me control desire that won control 

Over Zahhak’s, Kavus’s, Jamshid’s soul. 

If devils hide the road to what is right 

Evil will triumph when I come to fight— 

Save me from demons’ wiles, let me avoid The snares by which my soul 

will be destroyed: 
Lead me, protect me, be my constant guide 
To where the just eternally abide.” 


The Persians Plead with Kay Khosrow 

Day and night he stood in prayer; his body was in the palace but his soul was in 
another place. After a week his strength began to fail; he found he could stand no 
longer and on the eighth day he returned to his throne. The champions of the 
Persian army were bewildered by their king’s behavior, each of them ascribing it 
to a different cause. 


The king took his place on the throne, and the chamberlain drew back the 
curtain that separated him from his courtiers. The commanders entered, their 
arms crossed in humility over their chests; among them were Tus, Gudarz, brave 
Giv, Gorgin, Bizhan, and the lion-like Roham. When they saw the king they 
prostrated themselves before him and said: “O brave and just king, possessor of 
the world, noblest of the noble: no king like you has ever assumed the throne. 
All champions serve you, and we live only because you keep watch over us. You 
have laid all your enemies low, and there is no one left in the world for you to 
fear. We have no notion why the king’s thoughts should be darkened at a time 
like this; now is the time for you to rejoice in your good fortune, not to grieve 
your life away in anxiety. Whether we have done something to upset the king, or 
whether it is another matter that is no fault of ours, may he tell us what troubles 
him, so that we can reassure him and bring fire back to his cheeks. And if some 
secret enemy disturbs his peace may the king inform us who it is: each king who 
has worn the crown has seen the value of his wealth and might in this, that he 
could cut off his enemies’ heads, or sacrifice his own head when he put on a 
waitrior’s helmet and rode out to war. Tell us what you are hiding, and we will 
find a remedy for it.” 

The great king answered: “Set your minds at rest my champions: the world 
contains no enemy that troubles me, and my wealth is all intact; nothing the 
army has done has offended me, and none of you is guilty of sin. When I rode 
out in vengeance for my father’s death I spread justice and righteousness 
throughout the world; there is no portion of the black earth that has not known 
my seal’s imprint. Sheathe your swords, and grasp the winecup; drink, rejoice, 
and replace the noise of bowstrings with the sounds of flutes and harps. For a 
week now I’ve prayed before God: I have a hidden desire which I long for God 
to grant me. When he answers my prayer this will be a blessing for me and I 
shall tell you openly what it is. Meanwhile you too should pray to God on my 
behalf, for it is he who gives us strength for good and evil. Pray to him for 
guidance, then give yourselves to wine and cheerfulness, forgetful of all sorrow. 
Know that this unstable world makes no distinction between a king and his 
subject, that it snatches away both the old and the young, and that from it both 
justice and tyranny come to us.” 

Sadly and anxiously the nobles left his presence, and the king ordered his 
chamberlain to admit no one to him. That night he returned to the place of prayer 
and opened his lips to the Lord of Justice: “O higher than the highest, show to 
me 


The ways of righteousness and purity: 
Guide me to heaven, let me leave behind 
This fleeting habitation of mankind, 

And let my heart shun sin, so that I might 
Pass to the realms of everlasting light.” 


Giv Travels to Zabol 

After a week had passed and Khosrow had still not reappeared, a confused 
murmuring could be heard: the nobles gathered together and there was much 
discussion of the ways of great kings, both those who were god-fearing and 
those who had lived as tyrants. Finally, Gudarz, Giv’s father, turned to his son 
and said, “Fortune has favored you and you’ve always given your support to the 
crown and throne; you’ve undergone many troubles for Iran’s sake, putting your 
loyalty before your family and homeland. Now a crisis is before us, and we 
should not take it lightly: you must travel to Zabol and tell Zal and Rostam that 
the king has turned away from God and has lost his way. He has barred his 
court’s door to the nobility, and takes council with demons. We’ve tried to 
reason with him, and our words were meant well, but though he heard us out he 
gave us no answer: we can see that his heart is confused, and his head is full of 
wind. We’re afraid that he’ll go astray as Kavus did, and that demons will lead 
him into evil paths. Tell Rostam and Zal that they are heroes, that they are the 
wisest and most capable of men: have them assemble the astrologers and sages 
of Zabol and bring them here to Iran. Since Khosrow has hidden his face from 
us, the kingdom is full of rumors: we have tried every remedy and now all our 
hopes rest on Zal and his son.” 

Giv chose a number of warriors as his retinue and set off for Sistan. There he 
told Rostam and Zal what he had seen and heard: Zal was saddened by his words 
and said, “Truly, grief has become our companion.” Then he ordered Rostam to 
call together the astrologers and priests of Sistan and Kabol, so that they could 
accompany them on the journey to Iran. Sages of all kinds gathered at Zal’s 
court, and the group set out. 

The king prayed for seven days and on the eighth, at daybreak, he returned to 
his throne and had the chamberlain draw back the curtain from the outer door. 
The chieftains and priests streamed into the audience hall, and Khosrow received 
them graciously as befits a king, motioning them to their places. But they stood 
before him, their hands crossed in reverence over their chests, and none sat in the 
place where he had been assigned. They said, “Immortal soul, just lord of all the 
world, might and the royal farr belong to you, and from the sun to the fish 
beneath the earth is yours. Your clear soul knows all beings: speak wisely to us. 
We stand before you as your slaves and champions: tell us what we have done 
that you forbid us access to you. Days have passed like this, and our hearts are 
filled with foreboding. Tell your secret to us, the guardians of your distant 


frontiers; if your sorrow is from the sea we shall dry it up, and spread it with a 
mantle of powdered musk; if it is from a mountain we shall level it and with our 
daggers spit your enemies’ hearts; if wealth will cure your sorrow there will be 
no lack of cash. We are all guardians of your glory, and we weep in sympathy 
for your sorrows.” 

The world’s lord answered: “I am not without need of my champions; but my 
heart has no anxiety about my might or men or wealth, and no country’s 
produced an enemy for me to worry about. My heart has conceived a desire 
which Ill not relinquish: in the dark night and the bright day I have hopes of its 
fulfillment. When I achieve it I will tell you what my secret prayers have been. 
Go now, victorious and happy, and rid your minds of evil thoughts.” All his 
nobility paid him homage, but their minds were clouded with sorrow. When they 
had left, the king ordered that the curtain be lowered; and he who had won so 
many victories sat weeping by the door, with despair in his heart. 


Kay Khosrow Sees the Angel Sorush in a Dream 
Again the world’s lord stood in prayer, asking for guidance: 


“Lord of the heavens, Lord of unmatched might, 
Of goodness, justice, and celestial light, 

What shall my kingdom profit me if you 

Remain unsatisfied with all I do? 

But, good or evil, may my deeds suffice 

To win for me a place in paradise.” 


He prayed before God, wailing and groaning in his anguish, and after five weeks 
of prayer, one night, as the moon rose, he fell asleep. He slept, but his bright soul 
became wisdom’s companion and did not sleep. In his dream he saw the angel 
Sorush whisper in his ear, “O king, good fortune and benevolent stars have 
guided you, and you have seen enough of torques and crowns and thrones. If you 
would leave this world you have found what you are seeking; you will find a 
home beside the Source of Righteousness, there is no need for you to sojourn in 
this darkness any longer. Give your treasures to those who are deserving; 
relinquish this fleeting world to another. When you enrich the poor, and your 
own people, you will be made stronger. You will not remain here long now; 
choose a king in whom all creatures, down to the smallest ant, can place their 


trust. And when you’ve given away the world, you cannot rest: you must prepare 
for your departure.” 

When the exhausted king woke he saw that the place where he had been 
praying was awash with water: he wept and placed his face against the ground, 
giving thanks to God. He said, “If I can soon move onward, God has given me 
all I desire.” He dressed himself in clothes that had never been worn before and 
ascended his throne: there he sat, but wearing neither his torque, nor the royal 
jewels, nor his crown. 


Zal and Rostam Reach Iran 

At the week’s end Rostam and Zal arrived in Iran full of apprehension as to what 
was afoot. Hearing of their approach a group of heavy-hearted Iranian nobles led 
by Tus and Gudarz hurried out to greet them. They said: “The devil Eblis has led 
our king astray. What is his court but his army? And yet for days and nights now 
no one has seen him except during the brief moments when the court doors are 
opened to us. My lords, Khosrow has changed from that cheerful and glorious 
monarch you knew; his cypress stature is bent, and the roses of his cheeks have 
turned pale as a quince. I don’t know what evil eye has struck him, and why he 
withers like a shriveled petal, unless it is that the Persians’ luck is clouded and 
misfortune strikes him from an evil star.” 

Brave Zal said to them: “It may be that the king is sated with power; all 
seems well and then difficulties arise, pleasure and pain both come to us. Do not 
grieve over this, grief will only weaken your grip on life: we shall talk with him, 
our advice will make the stars favorable again.” 

The group traveled to the court, where immediately the curtain was drawn 
back and they entered in good spirits. Zal, Rostam, Tus, Gudarz, Gorgin, Bizhan, 
Gastahom, and a great many other nobles and their retainers crowded into the 
audience chamber. When Khosrow heard Rostam’s voice from beyond the 
curtain, and saw Zal’s face, he was puzzled and leapt up from the throne; he 
extended his hand to them and asked them why they had come. Then he 
questioned the sages of Zabol and its environs, and motioned them to seats in his 
court: the Iranian nobles too were assigned places according to their rank. 

Zal greeted the king and wished him long life, listing the great monarchs of 
the past and saying that he had seen none who equaled Khosrow in stature and 
possession of the Divine farr, in chivalry, victory, and benevolence: he hoped 
that the king would reign forever, continuing to bestow justice on the world and 
enjoying the fruits of conquest, for there was no noble who was not as dirt 
beneath the king’s feet, no poison for which the king’s mere name was not a 
remedy. Then he continued: “We have heard unwelcome news, and hearing it we 
hurried to your court: we have consulted astrologers with their Indian charts, 
seeking to know the heaven’s secrets and why it has exiled Iran from its 
benevolence. A messenger came saying that the victorious king has ordered that 
the curtain that guards his court not be drawn back, and that the king hides his 
face from his people. Sympathy for the Persians has made me fly here like an 
eagle, like a skiff over water, so that I might ask the world’s lord what secret 


anxiety is troubling him. Three things cure all ills, and make the throne wholly 
secure. These three are wealth, effort, and chivalrous men: without these no 
battles can be fought. And the fourth is that we praise God, praying before him 
day and night, for it is he who helps his slaves, and saves them from harm. We 
shall give great wealth to the poor, in hopes that God will clarify your soul, and 
that wisdom will course through your brain again.” 


Kay Khosrow’s Answer to Zal 

When Khosrow had heard Zal out he gave him a wise answer. He said: “Old 
man, your words and thoughts are always welcome; from the time of Manuchehr 
until now you have advised the court well. And your mammoth-bodied son 
Rostam has been a prop to the Kayanid kings, the cynosure of the court: it was 
he who brought up Seyavash and taught him virtue. When an army caught sight 
of his massive mace, his helmet and mighty stature, many would flee without 
fighting, abandoning their bows and arrows on the battlefield. He guided my 
ancestors in their wars of vengeance. If I list all your exploits I will be talking 
for a hundred generations, and if my words seem flattery they will, if examined 
truly, be seen to underestimate you. But as to your question about why I have not 
granted audience; the world has become contemptible to me, and for five weeks 
now I have stood in prayer before God, the Just Guide, asking that he absolve 
me of past sins and illuminate the darkened moon of my life; asking that he take 
me from this fleeting world and that I suffer here no longer. I have been close to 
abandoning the ways of righteousness, to twisting my head aside as other kings 
before me have done; now that I have achieved all I sought I must prepare to 
leave this world, and good news has reached me. Last night at dawn I slept and 
an angel came to me from God, saying ‘Rise, the time for your departure has 
come, your sleepless sorrow is over.’ My reign, and all my concern for the army, 
crown, and throne, are drawing to an end.” 


Zal Advises Kay Khosrow 

The courtiers listened to him in bewilderment, and sorrow filled their hearts. But 
Zal was angered, and heaved a cold sigh. He said to the assembled Persians: 
“This is not right, wisdom has no place in his mind. I have never seen a king 
who talked in this way, and since he has spoken his mind so must we. When he 
says such things we are under no obligation to agree with him. It’s as if a demon 
has been advising him; he’s abandoned the path of God. Feraydun and the god- 
fearing Hushang never grasped at such straws: I shall tell him the truth even if it 
means I shall suffer for it.” The Persians answered him: “No Kayanid has ever 
talked like this: we are all behind you in what you tell the king.” 

Zal stood and addressed Kay Khosrow: “Just king, listen to the words of an 
old and experienced man, and if my advice seems crooked to you make me no 
answer. Speech in support of what is right is bitter, and this bitterness closes the 
door against injury and loss. You should not be offended by the true words that I 
say here, in this company. Your mother bore you in Turan, and you grew up 
there; you’re the grandson on one side of Afrasyab, who practiced black magic 
even in his sleep. Your other grandfather was that malevolent king Kavus whose 
dissembling face hid a heart filled with trickery and cunning. He ruled from the 
east to the west but he wanted to fly up to the heavens and count the stars there. I 
advised him at length not to try this, and my words were bitter: he heard my 
advice but it did him no good and I left him with a heart full of sorrow and pain. 
He rose into the air and tumbled to earth; God granted him his life but he felt no 
gratitude, his head was filled with dust, his mind with terror. You led a hundred 
thousand armed warriors to battle on the Chorasmian plain, and before the 
armies you fought on foot with Pashang. If he had conquered you, Iran would 
have been open to Afrasyab’s forces, but God delivered him into your hands. 
You were able to kill whoever men feared, whoever gave no thought to God’s 
law. I told you to cease your wars then, that the time for forgiveness and 
rejoicing had arrived. But now worse times than ever have come to Iran, and 
men’s hearts are filled with a more terrible fear; you’ve abandoned God’s ways, 
and strayed into an evil path. You’ll get no profit from this, and it will not please 
God. My king, if this is what you want no one will support you; you’|l regret 
these words, think of what you’re doing and don’t follow demons’ orders. If you 
persist in this devilish plan God will cut you off from his farr; you will live a life 
of pain and sin and no one will call you king again. If you ignore my advice you 
are following Ahriman; pain will be yours, and you will lose good fortune, the 


homage due to a king, and the throne itself. May wisdom guide your soul, may 
your mind remain pure and steadfast!” 

Zal fell silent and the whole company spoke in his support, saying: “We 
agree with all that this old man has said: the doorway to truth should not be 
concealed!” 


Kay Khosrow’s Answer to Zal When Khosrow had heard him out he 
said nothing for a while, and remained lost in thought. Then he 
spoke quietly, weighing his words. “You have seen the world’s ways 
Zal, and you have lived long years chivalrously and well. If I spoke 
coldly to you here before this assembly, God would not approve of 
such an evil act. Also, Rostam would be upset, and when he is upset 
Iran suffers; his efforts on Iran’s behalf far outweigh the wealth he 
has received as a reward. The heavens made him my shield, the 
scourge of evildoers, leaving them time for neither sleep nor food. I 
shall answer you mildly, my words won’t break your heart.” Then in 
a voice that all could hear he said, “My victorious lords, I have 
heard everything that Zal has said before this assembly. I swear by 
God himself that I am far from obeying demons: it is to God that my 
soul inclines, for I see him as the cure to my suffering. In clarity of 
heart I have looked on the world, and wisdom has become my armor 
against evil.” Turning to Zal he said, “There’s no need for such 
anger; speak as is fitting. First, you said no wise or perspicacious 
person was ever born of Turanian stock: I am the son of the great 
Seyavash, the scion of an invincible Kayanid king, the grandson of 
Kavus who was a wise, fortunate, and well-loved monarch. On my 
mother’s side I am descended from Afrasyab, whose hatred deprived 
me of rest and food; his forebear was Feraydun and there is no 
shame in such an ancestry, for Iran’s lion-like warriors fled to the 
sea in terror before Afrasyab. Then you said that Kavus built 
himself a flying chariot, and tried to go beyond what is fitting for a 
king: but you should know that ambition is not a fault in a king. 
Next, I sought revenge for my father’s death and won victory in all 


the world: I killed my enemies who had spread injustice throughout 
the land. My task in the world is complete; no trace remains of the 
evildoers against whom I fought. Whenever I think deeply about 
prosperity and enduring royal power I see the examples of Kavus 
and Jamshid before me; I fear that Ill forget my status as they did, 
that I’Il become corrupt like Zahhak and Tur, whose evil sickened 
the world. I fear that when the thread of my days draws to an end I, 
like them, shall be headed for hell. 


“For these five weeks in which I have prayed day and night, know that the 
great God has freed me from the sorrows of this dark earth. I am sated with my 
army, the crown, and the throne: I am unencumbered now, and ready to depart. 
You Zal, with all the experience of your advanced age, say that I have fallen into 
a demon’s trap, that I am wandering far from the right road in darkness and sin: 
but I cannot see how I have done evil, or where you can find God’s punishment 
in all this.” 


Zal Asks for Forgiveness 

When Zal heard these words he turned aside in shame; a cry came from his lips 

and he addressed Khosrow: “Great king, my words were hasty and unwise, 
Wisdom is yours, and I apologize; 


If demons have deluded anyone 

I am that person—forgive what I have done. 
I’ve lived for countless years, and always shown 
Unswerving loyalty to Persia’s throne, 

Till now I’ve never seen a monarch pray 

For heaven’s holy guidance in this way, 

But Kay Khosrow is now my sapient guide, 

And may I stay forever at his side. 

Throughout Iran all virtuous men will grieve 

To learn the king we’ve served now longs to leave, 
How can we hope for this? But what he chooses 
No loyal subject of the king refuses.” 


When Khosrow heard Zal’s words he accepted his apology, knowing that all he 
said came only from his love for him: he took Zal by the hand and sat him next 
to himself on the throne. Then he said: “Go now with Rostam, Tus, Gudarz, Giv, 
and the rest of our nobility, and pitch tents and pavilions on the plain outside the 
city. Display our banners, assemble our troops and elephants there as if for a 
splendid celebration.” Rostam did as the king ordered: the nobles brought tents 
and pavilions out of storage and filled the valley from mountain side to mountain 
side with white, black, purple, and blue tents; flags of red, yellow, and purple 
fluttered there, and in the midst of all stood the Kaviani banner. Zal’s tent, with 
its black flag, was pitched next to the king’s and on its left was Rostam’s tent, 
where the dignitaries he had brought from Kabol were gathered. In the 
foreground were the tents of Tus, Gudarz, Giv, Gorgin, Kherrad, and Shapur; 
immediately behind them those of Bizhan, Gastahom, and the other important 
chieftains. 


Kay Khosrow Addresses the Persians 

The king sat on his golden throne and took the ox-headed mace in his hand. On 
one side, like a great mammoth and a savage lion, were Zal and Rostam and on 
the other Tus, Gudarz, Giv, Roham, Shapur, and Gorgin. All stared at the king, 
waiting to hear what he would say. He addressed them in a loud voice: “My 
champions, favored by Fortune, each of you with sense and wisdom knows that 
both good and evil pass away: we too, and the world itself, are ephemeral. Why 
then do we suffer such pain and sorrow and grief? We build with our hands and 
what we build we leave to our enemies, while we ourselves must depart: but the 
ox of our sorrows is still not skinned, since rewards and punishments are with 
God. Fear God then, and do not rejoice in this dark earth, for this day passes 
from everyone, and time counts every breath we breathe. From Hushang to 
Kavus there have been kings possessed of farr, the crown, and the throne; 
nothing remains of them but their names. No one can compute the number of 
those who have gone before us. Many turned against God, and in their last days 
they feared the evil they had done. I am a slave like them, and though I have 
striven and suffered I see that no one remains on this earth. Now that I have torn 
my heart and soul from this fleeting world, I have brought my grief and pain to 
an end. I have gained all I sought, and I have turned my face aside from the royal 
throne. I give to anyone I have offended whatever wealth he desires. I shall tell 
God, who knows all that is good, of the actions of those heroes who have helped 
me. I donate my possessions, my weapons, my treasuries, to the nobility of Iran. 
I have listed and hand over my cash and slaves and flocks, for I am setting out 
on a journey and have separated my heart from this earthly darkness. Rejoice 
now for a week, give yourself to pleasure and food and drink: wish me well, 
pray for my safe passage from this world, and that I may depart without 
suffering.” 

When the king finished speaking the heroes of Iran were bewildered and 
uncertain what to make of his words. One said, “This king is mad: wisdom and 
his heart are utter strangers to one another. Who knows what will become of 
him, or of the crown and throne?” 

The plain and mountain slopes were filled with warriors; they formed groups 
and began to feast. The valley re-echoed with the sounds of flutes and singing 
and drunken shouts: the revels went on for a week, and no one gave a thought to 
pain or sorrow. 


Kay Khosrow’s Words to Gudarz 

On the eighth day Kay Khosrow sat on his throne, but he wore neither the royal 
crown nor torque, and the royal mace was nowhere in evidence. Since he felt 
that the time for his departure was at hand he opened one of his treasuries and 
said to Gudarz: “Consider how the world passes, and take note of what is hidden 
as well as what is plain. There is a day for amassing treasure and a day for 
distributing it: look at our ruined frontier forts and bridges, at our crumbling 
reservoirs, destroyed by Afrasyab; look at our motherless children, at our 
widowed wives who sit alone and desolate, at our indigent old people, at those 
who harbor secret sorrows. Don’t hold back the contents of our treasuries from 
those in need; distribute wealth to them, in fear of future bad fortune. And I have 
a treasury called ‘Badavar’ which is filled with jewels and diadems: use this for 
our ruined cities that have become lairs for leopards and tigers, for our smashed 
fire temples left without officiating priests, for those who are old and poor 
because they gave away their wealth when they were young, for our dried up 
wells left waterless for years. In the city of Sus there is another treasury built up 
by my grandfather; its name is ‘Arus’; give its contents to Zal, Giv, and 
Rostam.” 

He then consigned the contents of his wardrobe to Rostam, together with his 
torques, royal jewels, corselet, and heavy maces. His flocks of horses he gave to 
Tus; his orchards and gardens to Gudarz; tired now of war, he gave his armor, in 
which he had endured so much, to brave Giv. To Fariborz, Kavus’s son, he gave 
his castles, tents, pavilions, and stables, as well as his helmet and diadem. He 
gave to Bizhan a torque brighter than the planet Jupiter, and two famous rings 
set with rubies, with his name engraved on them, saying as he did so, “Take 
these in memory of me, and see that you sow only seeds of righteousness in this 
world.” 


The Persians Remonstrate with Kay Khosrow 

The king said, “My life draws to an end, and I long for another dispensation. Ask 
from me what you will; the time has come for this assembly to disperse.” All the 
nobles wept at the prospect of losing their sovereign lord, and said, “Who will 
inherit the king’s crown?” 

Zal, who had always been loyal to the Persian throne, kissed the ground and 
stood to speak: “Lord of the world, it is right that I express my desires openly. 
You know what Rostam has done for Iran; the pains he has taken, the labors he 
has undergone, the battles he has fought. When Kavus went to distant 


Mazanderan and was captured by demons, along with Gudarz and Tus, Rostam 
went there alone on a journey that pitted him against deserts, darkness, demons, 
a lion, a dragon, and a sorceress. He won through to the king in Mazanderan; he 
cut the White Demon in pieces and did the same to other demons there too, and 
he severed the head of Sanjeh, whose screams re-echoed to the heavens. Because 
of Kavus’s enmity, he killed his son Sohrab, whose like the world had never 
seen, and wept for him for months and years. If I were to describe all the tales of 
his prowess I would never finish. If the king is tired of his crown and throne 
what will he leave to this loyal, lionhearted warrior?” 

Khosrow replied, “Who but God himself, the lord of justice and love, can 
know all that Rostam has done on my behalf, the struggles he has undertaken, 
the sorrows he has suffered? His valor is no secret, and no one has seen his equal 
in all the world.” 

He ordered that a scribe bring paper, musk, and ambergris, and a document 
was written, by Khosrow’s command, conferring on Rostam, the mammoth- 
bodied warrior who was praised by all men, the lordship of Sistan. The 
document was affixed with the royal seal and Khosrow handed it to Rostam, 
saying, “May this land remain forever under Rostam’s sovereignty.” He then 
gave robes, gold, silver, and a goblet filled with jewels to the astrologers who 
had come to court with Zal. 

Then Gudarz rose and addressed the king: “Victorious king, I have seen no 
occupant of the throne to equal you. From the time of Manuchehr to that of Kay 
Qobad, and throughout noble Kavus’s reign, I stood ready and vigilant in our 
kings’ service. I had seventy-eight sons and grandsons; eight are left to me and 
the others have perished. My son Giv lived as a fugitive in Turan for seven 
years; wild asses were his food, and he clothed himself in their skins. When the 
king reached Iran he saw all that Giv had endured on his behalf. And now that 
the lord of all the world is tired of the throne and crown, Giv hopes for a reward 
for his labors.” 

The king replied: “He did far more than this, and may he be blessed a 
thousand times! May God protect him, and may his enemies’ hearts be lacerated 
with thorns! All I have is yours; I pray that you survive in health and glory!” He 
ordered that a charter be written on silk, conferring sovereignty of Qom and 
Esfahan, the cradle of champions, on Gudarz; a gold seal was attached to it, and 
Khosrow pronounced his benediction saying, “May God be pleased with Gudarz, 
and may his enemies’ hearts be filled with confusion.” To the Persian nobility he 
said, “My hope is that Giv will never tire of his noble deeds: know that he will 


be a remembrance of me in the world, the defender whom I leave to you. Obey 
him, and do not slight either his or his father’s commands.” 

When Gudarz had taken his seat again, Tus rose and kissed the ground before 
Khosrow. He said: “Long live the king, and may evil never touch him! I alone of 
those here am descended from Feraydun, and I headed this clan until Kay Qobad 
came. I have led the Persians in battle, and have never relaxed my vigilance, not 
for a single day. In the mountains of Hamavan I endured the wounds my armor 
inflicted on my shirtless body; in the battle of revenge for Seyavash I kept watch 
every night; when Kavus was imprisoned in Mazanderan, Tus was imprisoned 
with him: I have never deserted our troops and no one has ever complained of 
my conduct. Now that the king, who knows all my abilities and faults, has grown 
tired of his crown and throne and prepares to leave this fleeting world, what 
orders does he give me? What authority does he leave me?” 

Khosrow replied, “You have striven and suffered beyond measure; be lord of 
the Kaviani banner, commander of my armies, and the sovereign of Khorasan.” 
This too was recorded before the nobles, written on a royal charter, and sealed 
with gold. 


Kay Khosrow Confers the Crown on Lohrasp 

When the king had dealt with his nobles’ affairs, he sank back, exhausted and 
weak. One who had not been mentioned yet as a beneficiary of the king’s 
bequests was Lohrasp, and Khosrow ordered Bizhan to bring this chieftain 
before him. As he entered, the king rose and opened his arms in welcome. 
Descending from the throne, he lifted the crown from his own head and gave it 
to Lohrasp saying, “I bestow on you sovereignty over the land of Iran: may this 
crown that is new to you bring you good fortune, and may all the world be as 
your slave. I hand over to you here the sovereignty and treasure which I have 
built up with such struggle and pain. Henceforth see that only justice issues from 
your mouth, since it is justice that will bring you victory and prosperity; if you 
would have your luck remain ever young and fresh, allow no demons access to 
your soul. Be wise, harm no one, and always guard your tongue.” Then he turned 
to the Persians assembled there and said, “Rejoice in his throne and good 
fortune!” 

The Persians were astonished by this turn of events, and bridled like angry 
lions; none could accept that they would have to call Lohrasp their king. Zal 
strode forward and said aloud what he felt in his heart: “My lord, is it right for 
you to dignify such dirt in this way? My curses on anyone who calls Lohrasp his 


king, no one here will submit to such injustice! I saw Lohrasp when he arrived in 
Iran; he was a wretch with one horse to his name. You sent him off to fight 
against the Alans, and gave him soldiers, a banner, and a sword belt. How many 
wellborn Persians has the king passed over for this man, whose family I’ve never 
set eyes on, whose ancestry’s all unknown? No one has ever heard of such a man 
becoming a king.” 








As soon as Zal finished speaking a roar of agreement came from the courtiers 


there 


! If Lohrasp is to be king he 


ll serve no longer 


’ 


“We 


and voices cried out, 


’ 


When Khosrow heard 


and calm your rage: a man who speaks 


3” 


can count on us for neither his banquets nor his battles. 


Zal’ 


“Not so fast, 


3 


s words he said to him 


unjustly is more interested in smoke than fire. God does not approve of our 
doing evil, and the wicked will tremble before the revolutions of Fate. When 
God makes a man fortunate, deserving of sovereignty, an ornament to the throne, 
that man has wisdom then, as well as farr, dignity, and royal ancestry; he will be 
just and victorious, and his justice will bring him prosperity. As God is my 
witness, Lohrasp is possessed of these qualities. He is descended from the pure- 
souled Hushang, who was lord of all the world; he will cleanse the earth of evil 
magicians and establish the ways of God; the world will be renewed through his 
guidance, and his son will continue his legacy. Greet him as your king, and as 
you love me do not turn aside from my advice. Any man who ignores my words 
has destroyed whatever credit he may have built up fighting for me; he is 
ungrateful before God and his soul will be assailed from every side by terror.” 

When Zal had heard him out he touched the earth with his fingers and 
smeared black dirt on his lips. Loudly, he greeted Lohrasp as king, and said to 
Khosrow, “Live in happiness my lord, and may evil never touch you. Who but 
the king of victory and justice could have known that Lohrasp was of royal 
descent? I have sworn repentance for what I said, blackening my lips with dirt; 
may my sin be cancelled.” The chieftains scattered jewels over Lohrasp, hailing 
him as king. 


Kay Khosrow Bids Farewell 
The great king said to his people, “The road I take now is the one you will take 
tomorrow: when I have left this wretched earth behind me I shall commend you 
to God.” His eyelashes were wet with tears as he kissed each of them farewell: 
weeping openly, he embraced the heroes one by one. He said, “Would that I 
could take all of this company with me.” Such a cry went up from the army that 
the sun lost its way in the heavens: women and little children wept for him in the 
streets and bazaars, and the houses were filled with groans and lamentation for 
the king’s passing. The king said: “Glorious for your deeds, and glorious in 
descent, 

Rejoice in God’s commands and be content. 

Now I prepare my soul for death; my name 

Shall live henceforth with undiminished fame, 

Sorush has come to guide me, and my heart 

Withdraws from life: I’m ready to depart.” 


He called for a horse, and as his soldiers lamented, he rode toward the royal 
apartments, his cypress-stature bent with age and weakness over the pommel. He 
had four women who were as beautiful as the sun, such that no man had ever 
seen except in dreams: he summoned them and told them what was in his heart. 
He said: “It is time for me to leave this fleeting world; I am tired of the earth’s 
injustice, and you will never see me alive again. Keep your hearts free of pain 
and grief.” 

But the four fainted, and when they revived they wailed aloud for love and 
sorrow: they scored their cheeks and tore out their hair, they ripped their fine 
clothes and destroyed their jewelry, and cried out to him, “Take us with you 
from this hateful world, be our guide to the happiness you seek.” The king 
answered, “The road I take now is the one you will take tomorrow: there 
Jamshid’s sisters live, and great kings in their pomp and glory; my mother, 
Afrasyab’s daughter, is there, who fled across the Oxus with me, and Tur’s 
incomparable daughter Mah Afarid. The bed and pillow of them all is dust, and I 
do not know whether they dwell in hell or heaven. Don’t try to deflect me from 
my journey; it will be easy enough to find me.” He wept and called Lohrasp to 
him and said to him, “These are my womenfolk, the glory of my bedchamber: 
while you are king, grant them the same privileges and quarters they have 
always had. See that they are no cause of shame to you when God summons you 


to His presence: remember, you will see me there, next to Seyavash. Do nothing 
that will humiliate you when you stand before us in the other world.” Lohrasp 
agreed to all he said, promising to maintain the king’s women in respectable 
privacy. 

Then the king bound on his sword belt and went out to address his men, to 
whom he said: “Have no pain or fear in your hearts because of me. Do not rush 
to embrace this world, for its depths are but darkness: live in justice and 
happiness, and think only well of me.” Iran’s chieftains bowed their heads to the 
ground and said that they would remember his advice as long as they lived. He 
told Lohrasp to take up residence in the palace, saying that his own days were 
now at an end. “Maintain the royal throne in glory, sow only seeds of 
righteousness in the world: when nothing threatens or troubles you, see that the 
crown and luxury and wealth do not corrupt your soul. Remember that your 
departure will not be delayed for long, and that the days of your life narrow 
toward their end. Seek justice, act with justice, free those who are just from 
evil.” 

Lohrasp wept and dismounted from his horse and kissed the ground. Kay 
Khosrow said to him, “Farewell, be the warp and woof of justice in this world.” 

Zal, Rostam, Gudarz, Giv, Bizhan, and Gastahom, together with Kavus’s son 
Fariborz who made a seventh and Tus who made an eighth, accompanied by 
their separate bands of troops, went with Kay Khosrow as he made his way from 
the plain to the mountain foothills. There they rested for a week, moistening 
their dry lips, wailing and weeping at the king’s decision: no man could 
reconcile himself to such sorrow, and the priests said in secret that no one had 
ever heard of a king acting in this way. 

When the sun rose over the mountain peaks, groups came from every 
direction, a hundred thousand Persian men and women, weeping before the king; 
all the mountain side was filled with the sounds of mourning, and the granite 
slopes re-echoed with their cries. They said: “Great king, what has filled your 
bright soul with such pain and confusion? If you are angry with the army, or if 
you’re tired of the crown, tell us why, but do not quit the Persian throne, or hold 
the crown in contempt. Stay, and we shall be the dust beneath your horse’s 
hooves, the slaves of your eternal flame. But where is your knowledge, your 
judgment, your wisdom? The angel Sorush never appeared to a king before, not 
even to Feraydun: we pray before God and in our fire-temples that God will 
grant our desire, and that the priests’ hearts will look favorably on us.” 


The king was astonished at this outpouring and called his priests to him. He 
said, “What happens from now on is a blessing, and why should men weep at a 
blessing? Be grateful to God, be pure and Godfearing: do not grieve at my 
departure for we shall all be reunited soon enough.” Then he turned to his 
chieftains and said, “Descend this mountain side without your king: the road 
ahead is long, hard, and waterless, without vegetation or shade. No one can 
traverse these slopes unless he has the divine farr to help him.” Three of the 
heroes, Zal, Rostam, and Gudarz, heard him and obeyed: but Tus, Giv, Fariborz, 
Bizhan, and Gastahom did not turn back. 

The group went forward for a day and into the night, weakened by the 
wilderness and lack of water. Then they came on a stream, where they refreshed 
themselves and rested. The king said to his followers, “We’|l stay the night here 
and talk over the past: you won’t see me for much longer now. When the shining 
sun unfurls its banner and turns the purple land a liquid gold, the time for me to 
part from you will have come. Then I shall meet Sorush: if my heart trembles at 
this last journey I shall tear its darkness from my side.” 


Kay Khosrow Disappears 
When part of the night had passed, Khosrow bent over the stream and washed 
his head and body in its clear water, murmuring the words of the Zend Avesta as 
he did so. Then he addressed his companions: “Farewell forever. When the sun’s 
first beams 

Appear, henceforth I’Il come to you in dreams 

But you will never see me here again. 

Go back tomorrow to the Persian plain— 

Even if musk should rain down far and wide 

Don’t linger on this lonely mountain side; 

A wind will blow here soon, a wind to freeze 

The mountain slopes and uproot stalwart trees, 

From dark clouds snow will fall, you’ll lose your way 

Back to your Persian home if you delay.” 

Weary and saddened by his words they wept, 

Uneasily, at last, the heroes slept: 

And when the dawn’s light touched their resting place The king had 

gone, leaving no earthly trace. 

They searched the desolate mountain slopes, but as they found no sign of him 
they returned to the stream like men insensible with grief, and in their hearts 
they bade a last farewell to the world’s king. 

Fariborz said, “I can’t believe that Khosrow’s words were wise: the earth is 
warm and soft, and the weather’s clear; given what we’ve suffered I don’t think 
it’s reasonable for us to set off immediately. We should rest and eat, and after 
we’ ve slept we can leave this stream and go back.” They camped by the stream 
and went over what Khosrow had done, saying that no one had ever seen or 
heard of such a wonder (nor would he even if he remained in the world for a 
long time) as this departure of the king which they had witnessed. They 
lamented his good fortune and wisdom, his greatness and nobility; but they 
added that the wise would laugh at the notion that a man could go before God 
while he was still alive. Who knew what had befallen Khosrow, and what could 
they say when people refused to believe them? Giv said, “No hero has ever 
heard of a man who was his equal, not for manliness, generosity, wisdom, valor, 
appearance, stature, glory, or lineage: leading his troops in battle he was massive 
as a mammoth, and presiding crowned at his banquets he was radiant as the full 
moon.” 


Tus, Fariborz, Giv, Bizhan, and Gastahom Die in the Snow 

They ate the provisions they had with them and soon fell asleep. But a wind 
sprang up and black clouds amassed; the air became as dark as a lion’s maw, a 
blizzard began to blow, and the snow piled higher than the heroes’ lances. One 
by one they were buried in the snow; for a while they struggled beneath its 
canopy, trying to clear a space to survive, but finally their strength gave out and 
their sweet souls sought release. 

Rostam, Zal, and Gudarz had waited for three days further down the 
mountain side. As the fourth day dawned they said, “This has gone on too long, 
how long must we wait here on these stony slopes? If the king has disappeared 
from the world, like a wind that blows through a group of heroes and is gone, 
what has happened to our chieftains? Didn’t they follow Khosrow’s advice?” 
They waited for a week on the mountainside, but when the week was over they 
despaired of seeing their companions again. They mourned for them, and Gudarz 
tore out his hair and scored his cheeks with his nails. He said: “No man has ever 
seen such evil as has come to me from the seed of Kavus: I had an army of sons 
and grandsons, ambitious and noble youths all of them, and all were slain in the 
wars of revenge for Seyavash, so that our tribe was broken and lost its luster. 
And now another has disappeared from my sight; who has seen such sorrows as I 
have endured?” 

Zal counseled him at length: “To be wise is to accept God’s justice: they may 
yet find a way through the snow and return. But we should not stay on this 
mountain side and lamentation will not help us. We can send footsoldiers out to 
look for some trace of them.” Weeping, they made their way down the mountain 
side, each thinking of one or another of the lost heroes, of his son or relative or 
friend, and of the king who had been like a cypress overtopping all the orchard. 


So turns the world; her favors are soon passed, 

All whom she nourishes must die at last. 

One she will raise from earth to heights unknown, 

One she will cast down from a royal throne; 

But there’s no cause to triumph or complain, 

Such is the way she turns, and turns again: 

Where are those heroes now, those champions, where? 
Drive out such mortal thoughts, that bring despair. 


L ohrasp became king of Iran, as Khosrow had directed. He had two sons 
Goshtasp and Zarir, and while still a young man Goshtasp demanded that his 
father name him as heir to the throne. His father refused to do this, and 
Goshtasp left the court in high dudgeon and traveled to India. His brother Zarir 
was sent to fetch him home again, but no sooner was he back in Iran than he 
quarreled with his father and set off on his travels again, this time to Rum, 
where he lived in disguise. There he tried his hand at various occupations but 
his royal qualities rendered him unfit for all of them. He was seen by Katayun, 
the King of Rum’s daughter and she fell in love with him. Reluctantly the king 
allowed his daughter to marry the stranger, who then ingratiated himself with 
the court by killing a wolf and a dragon. Once established as his father-in-law’s 
favorite, he began to threaten Iran. When he finally returned to Iran 
accompanied by his Rumi bride Katayun, Lohrasp ceded him the throne and 
went into religious retirement at Balkh. 

At this point Ferdowsi includes in his text an account, by the poet Dagqigi, of 
the coming of the prophet Zoroaster to Goshtasp’s court, and the acceptance by 
the court of the new religion promulgated by him. 

A new king, Arjasp, now reigned in Turan, and at the prompting of Zoroaster 
Goshtasp demanded tribute from him. In response Arjasp attacked Iran. 
Goshtasp’s brother Zarir was killed in the ensuing war, and it was only the valor 
of Goshtasp’s son, Esfandyar, that was able to drive the Turanian army back. 
Esfandyar is presented as ambitious, but also righteous, chivalrous, and an 
invincible warrior: he embraced the court’s new faith of Zoroastrianism with 
great zeal, and propagated the faith by the sword. But his enemies at court made 
his father suspicious of his ambitions for the throne: Goshtasp believed the 
calumny and imprisoned Esfandyar. 

Hearing of this Arjasp sent an army against Balkh: the city was sacked, the 
aged Lohrasp killed, and many Persian prisoners, including Esfandyar’s sisters, 
were taken back to Turan. Goshtasp appealed for help to Rostam, but the now 
aged hero made his excuses and refused to have anything to do with the 
situation. Goshtasp himself led the counter attack and was defeated, barely 
escaping from the battlefield with his life. His counselor Jamasp advised him 
that only Esfandyar could save the situation: Esfandyar was released from 
prison and drove back the Turanian army. 

Goshtasp then asked Esfandyar to travel deep into Turanian territory to rescue 
his sisters, who were being held in a fortress made of brass. Esfandyar’s journey 


to the brass fortress involved him in a series of seven trials, which closely 
parallel the trials undergone by Rostam when he traveled to Mazanderan to 
rescue Kavus from captivity. During the rescue, Arjasp was killed, and 
Esfandyar then returned in triumph to Iran, fully expecting to be given royal 
honors by his father. But Goshtasp had one more task in store for him. 


ROSTAM AND ESFANDYAR 


I heard a story from a nightingale, repeating words come down to us from 
ancient times. 

One night, drunk and dejected, Esfandyar came from his father’s palace and 
went to see his mother Katayun, the daughter of the king of Rum. He embraced 
her, called for more wine, and said: “The king treats me badly; he told me that 
once I’d avenged the death of his father by killing king Arjasp, freed my sisters 
from captivity, cleansed the world of evildoers and promoted our new faith of 
Zoroastrianism, then he would hand over to me the throne and crown; I’d be 
king and leader of our armies. When the sun rises and he wakes up I’m going to 
remind him of his own words: he shouldn’t keep from me what’s rightfully 
mine. By God who guides the heavens, I swear that if I see any hesitation in his 
face Ill place the crown on my own head and distribute the country to its local 
lords; I’ll be as strong and fierce as a lion, and make you queen of Iran.” 

His mother’s heart was saddened at his words; her silk clothes pricked like 
thorns against her skin. She knew that the king was in no hurry to hand over his 
crown, throne, country, and royal authority to his son. She said: “Brave boy, 
don’t be so angry with your fate. The army and treasury are yours already, don’t 
over-reach yourself. What’s finer in all the world than a young lionlike warrior, 
girded for war, standing ready to serve his father? When Goshtasp dies, his 
crown, throne, greatness, and splendor will all be yours.” 

Esfandyar replied: “It was a wise man who said a man should never tell his 
secrets to women, because as soon as he opens his mouth he finds his words on 
everyone’s lips. And he also said a man shouldn’t do what a woman tells him to, 
because none of them have any sense.” His mother’s face clouded with pain and 
shame, and she regretted having spoken to him. 

Esfandyar went back to his father’s palace and spent two days and nights 
there drinking, surrounded by musicians and his womenfolk. Goshtasp brooded 
on his son’s ambitions for the crown and throne, and on the third day he 
summoned his councilor Jamasp, and had Esfandyar’s horoscope cast. He asked 
whether the prince would have a long and happy life, reigning in safety and 


splendor, and whether he would die at another’s hand or greet the angel Sorush 
from a peaceful deathbed. 

When Jamasp consulted the astrological tables, frowns furrowed his forehead 
and his eyes filled with tears. He said: “Evil is mine, and my knowledge brings 
me only evil; would that I had died before your brother Zarir, and not seen his 
body weltering in blood and dust, or that my father had killed me and this evil 
fate had not been mine. Esfandyar subdues lions, he has cleared Iran of its 
enemies, he is fearless in war, he has driven your foes from the face of the earth, 
he tears the dragon’s body in two. But will not sorrow come from this, and the 
taste of bitterness and grief?” 

The king replied, “I trust you to tell me what you know, and not to deviate 
from wisdom’s ways. If he is to die as Zarir did, my life will be a misery to me. 
You frowned at my question, but tell me what you see: at whose hand will he 
die, bringing me tears and sorrow?” 

Jamasp said, “My lord, misfortune will not hold back because of me. He will 
die in Zabolestan, fighting with Zal’s son, Rostam.” 

Then the king said, “Take seriously what I’m about to say: if I give him my 
treasury, the throne and sovereignty, and if he never travels to Zabolestan, will 
he be safe from the turnings of Fate, will fortunate stars watch over him?” But 
the astrologer replied, “The heaven’s turnings cannot be evaded; neither strength 
nor valor will save you from the dragon’s claws. What is fated will surely come 
to pass, and a wise man does not ask when.” The king grew pensive, and his 
thoughts made his soul like a tangled thicket. He brooded on the turnings of 
Fate, and his speculations turned him toward evil. 

At dawn the next day the king sat on his throne, and Esfandyar stood humbly 
before him, his arms crossed on his chest. The court was filled with famous 
watriors, and the priests stood ranged before the king. Then the mighty 
champion Esfandyar spoke, and suffering was evident in his voice. He said: 
“Great king, may you live forever, blessed by the divine farr. Justice and love 
emanate from you, and the crown and throne are made more splendid by you. 
Father, I am your slave, prompt to carry out all you desire. You know that in the 
wars of religion with Arjasp, who attacked us with his Chinese cavalry, I swore 
before God that I would destroy any idolater who threatened our faith, that I 
would slash his trunk in two with my dagger and feel no fear. And when Arjasp 
came I did not flee from the leopard’s lair. But drinking at your banquet you 
believed Gorazm’s slander, and had me hung with heavy chains and fettered in 
the fortress of Gonbadan, despised among strangers. You abandoned Balkh and 


traveled to Zavol, thinking all battles were banquets, and forgetting the sight of 
your father Lohrasp pierced by Arjasp’s sword, lying prone in his blood. When 
your councilor Jamasp came and saw me worn away by captivity, he tried to 
persuade me to accept the throne and sovereignty. I answered that I would show 
my heavy chains to God on the Day of Judgment. He told me of the chieftains 
who’d been killed, of my imprisoned sisters, of our king fleeing before the 
Turkish hordes, and asked me if such things did not wring my heart. He said 
much more besides, and all his words were filled with sorrow and pain. Then I 
smashed my chains and ran to the king’s court: I slaughtered his enemies and 
rejoiced the king’s heart. If I were to describe my seven trials the account would 
never end. I severed Arjasp’s head from his body and avenged the name of 
Lohrasp. I brought here their treasure, their crown, their throne, and their women 
and children. I did all you had commanded me, kept to all your orders, never 
swerved from your advice. You’d said that if you ever saw me alive again you 
would cherish me more than your own wellbeing; that you would bestow the 
crown and ivory throne on me, because I would be worthy of both. And now 
when our nobles ask me where my treasure and army are, I blush for shame. 
What excuse do you have now? What’s the point of my life? What has all my 
suffering been for?” 

The king answered his son: “There’s no way forward but the truth. You have 
acted as you say, and may God favor you for it. I see no enemy in all the world, 
neither open nor secret, who does not shudder at the mention of your name: 
shudder I say, he gives up his soul there and then. No one in all the world is your 
equal, unless it be that foolish son of Zal. His valor lifts him above the skies, and 
he thinks of himself as no king’s subject. He was a slave before Kavus, and he 
lived by the grace of Khosrow; but about me, Goshtasp, he says, ‘His crown is 
new, mine is ancient; no man anywhere is my equal in battle, not in Rum nor 
Turan nor Iran.’ Now, you must travel to Sistan and there use all your skill, all 
your ruses and devices. Draw your sword and your mace, bind Rostam in chains; 
do the same with Zavareh and Faramarz, and forbid them to ride in the saddle. I 
swear by the Judge of all the world, by Him who lights the sun and moon and 
stars, that when you do what I have commanded, you shall hear no more 
opposition from me. I shall hand over to you my treasury and crown, and I 
myself will seat you on the throne.” 

This was Esfandyar’s response: “O noble and resourceful king, you are 
straying from the ancient ways; you should speak as is appropriate. Fight with 
the king of China, destroy the lords of the steppe, but what are you doing 


fighting against an old man whom Kavus called a conqueror of lions? From the 
time of Manuchehr and Kay Qobad all the kings of Iran have delighted in him, 
calling him Rakhsh’s master, world-conqueror, lion-slayer, crown-bestower. 
He’s not some young stripling making his way in the world; he is a great man, 
one who entered into a pact with Kay Khosrow. If such pacts are wrong then he 
shouldn’t be seeking one with you, Goshtasp.” 

His father said: “My lionhearted prince, you’ve heard that Kavus was led 
astray by the devil, that he attempted to fly into the skies on the wings of eagles 
and fell wretchedly into the sea at Sari; that he brought a devil-born wife back 
from Hamaveran and gave her command of the royal harem; that Seyavash was 
destroyed by her wiles and the whole royal clan put in peril. When a man has 
broken his promise before God, it’s wrong even to pass by his doorway. If you 
want the throne and crown, gather your troops and take the road for Sistan. 
When you arrive bind Rostam’s arms, and lead him here. Watch that Zavareh, 
Faramarz, and Sam don’t trick you: drag them all on foot to this court. And then 
no one, no matter how rich or illustrious he might be, will disobey my 
commands again.” 


The young prince answered: as he spoke he frowned, 
“Enough! It isn’t them you’re circling round, 

You’re not pursuing Zal and Rostam—I, 

Your son, am singled out by you to die; 

Your jealous passion for your sovereignty 

Has made you want to rid the world of me. 

So be it! Keep your royal crown and throne, 

Give me a corner to live in alone. 

I’m one of many slaves, no more; my task 

Is to perform whatever you may ask.” 


Goshtasp replied: “Don’t be too impetuous, but if you’re to achieve greatness 
don’t hold back either. Choose experienced cavalry from our army; weapons, 
troops, and cash are all at your disposal, and any holding back will be because of 
your own suspicious mind. What would treasure, an army, the crown, and throne 
be to me without you?” 

Esfandyar said, “An army will be of no use to me in this situation. If the time 
to die has come, a commander can’t ward it off with troops.” Troubled by 


thoughts of the crown, and by his father’s words, he left the court and made his 
way to his own palace; there were sighs on his lips, and sadness filled his heart. 


Katayun’s Advice to Esfandyar 

Weeping and in a turmoil of emotion, the beautiful Katayun came before her 
son, to whom she said: “You remind us of the ancient heroes, and I have heard 
from Bahman that you mean to leave our gardens and journey to the wastes of 
Zabolestan. You are to capture Zal’s son, Rostam, the master of sword and 
mace. Listen to your mother’s advice; don’t be in a hurry either to suffer evil or 
commit it. Rostam is a horseman with a mammoth’s strength, a river’s force is 
nothing against him; he ripped out the guts of the White Demon, the sun is 
turned aside in its path by his sword. When he sought revenge for the death of 
Seyavash, and made war on Afrasyab, he turned the world to a sea of blood. 
Don’t throw your life away for the sake of a crown; no king was ever born 
crowned. My curses on this throne and this crown, on all this slaughter and 
havoc and plundering. Your father’s grown old, and you are young, strong, and 
capable; all the army looks to you, don’t let this anger of yours put you in harm’s 
way. There are other places in the world besides Sistan; there’s no need to be so 
headstrong, so eager for combat. Don’t make me the most wretched woman both 
here and in the world to come; pay attention to my words, they come from a 
mother’s love.” 

Esfandyar replied: “Dear mother, listen to me: you know what Rostam is, 
you’re always talking about his greatness. It would be wrong to kill him, and no 
good can come of the king’s plan: there’s no one in Iran who’s finer or more 
noble than Rostam. All this is true, but don’t break my heart, because if you do I 
shall tear it from my body. How can I ignore the king’s orders, how can I refuse 
such a mission? If heaven wills it I shall die in Zabol, but if Rostam accepts my 
orders he’!] hear no harsh words from me.” 

His mother said, “My mammoth warrior, your strength makes you careless of 
your soul, but you won’t be strong enough to defeat Rostam. Don’t leave here 
without warriors to help you, offering your life up to Rostam like this. If you’re 
determined to go, this mission is the work of Ahriman; at least don’t take your 
children to this hell, because the wise will not think well of you if you do,” and 
as she spoke she wept bloody tears and tore at her hair. 

Esfandyar replied, “It’s wrong to keep youngsters away from battle. If a boy 
stays shut up with women he becomes weak and sullen; he should be present on 


the battlefield and learn what fighting means. I don’t need to take an army with 
me: men from my own family and a few noblemen will suffice.” 

At cock-crow the next morning the din of drums rang out; Esfandyar 
mounted his horse and set off like the wind at the head of a band of warriors. 
They went forward until they came to a place where the road forked; one track 
led to the fortress of Gonbadan and the other toward Zabol. The camel that was 
in the lead lay down on the earth as if it never meant to rise again, and though its 
driver beat it with a stick it refused to budge, and the caravan halted. Esfandyar 
took this as a bad omen, and gave orders that the beast’s head be severed, hoping 
to deflect the bad luck he foresaw. This was done, and although Esfandyar was 
alarmed he made light of it, saying: “A noble warrior whose audacity 

Lights up the world and brings him victory 
Laughs at both good and evil, since he knows 
Both come from God, whom no one can oppose.” 


Inwardly afraid of what lay ahead, he reached the River Hirmand, the border of 
Rostam’s territory. A suitable place was selected, and the group pitched camp in 
the customary fashion. In Esfandyar’s pavilion a throne was placed, and his 
warriors assembled before him. The prince called for wine and musicians, 
Pashutan sat opposite him, and as he drank and relaxed Esfandyar’s face opened 
like a blossom in spring. He said to his companions: “I haven’t carried out my 
father’s orders; he told me to capture Rostam quickly, and not to hold back in 
humiliating him. I haven’t done what he ordered me to, because this Rostam is a 
lionhearted warrior, who has undergone many trials, whose mace has set the 
world in order, and in whose debt all Persians live whether they are princes or 
slaves. I must send him a messenger, someone who’s wise and sensible, a 
horseman who has some dignity and presence, someone whom Rostam can’t 
deceive. If he’ll come to me and dispel this darkness in my soul, if he’!l let me 
bind his arms and in so doing bind the evil that haunts me, and if he has no 
malevolence against me, I will treat him with nothing but kindness.” 

Pashutan said, “This is the right path; stick to it, and try to bring peace 
between men.” 

Esfandyar ordered his son Bahman to come before him, and said to him: 
“Saddle your black horse, and dress yourself in a robe of Chinese brocade; put a 
royal diadem studded with fine jewels on your head, so that whoever sees you 
will single you out as the most splendid of all warriors and know that you are of 
royal blood. Take with you ten reputable priests and five horses with golden 


bridles. Make your way to Rostam’s palace, but do so at a leisurely pace. Greet 
him from me, be polite, flatter him with eloquent words, and then say to him: 
‘No one with any sense ignores a king’s commands. A man must be grateful 
before God, who knows eternally what is good. If a man augments what is good 
and holds his heart back from evil, God will fulfill his desires and he will live 
happily in this fleeting world. If he abstains from evil he will find paradise in the 
other world; a wise man knows that in the end his bed will be the dark earth and 
his soul will fly up toward God. One who can distinguish between the good and 
evil of this world will be loyal to his king. 

““Now we wish to reckon up what you have done, neither adding to nor 
diminishing your achievements. You’ve lived for many years and seen many 
kings come and go in the world, and if you follow the way of wisdom you know 
that it was not right for someone who has received so much in the way of wealth 
and glory from my family to have refused to visit Lohrasp’s court. When he 
passed on sovereignty over the land of Iran to his son, Goshtasp, you paid no 
attention. You wrote no congratulatory letter to him, you ignored the duties of a 
subject, you didn’t travel to his court to pay homage: you call no one king. Since 
the time of Hushang, Jamshid, and Feraydun, who wrested sovereignty from 
Zahhak, to the time of Kay Qobad, there never was such a king as Goshtasp, not 
for fighting or feasting or hunting. He has adopted the pure faith, and injustice 
and error have hidden themselves away: the way of God shines out like the sun, 
and the way of demons is destroyed. When Arjasp attacked with an innumerable 
army, Goshtasp confronted him and made the battlefield a graveyard for his 
dead: great men will talk about this exploit until the end of the world. He breaks 
the back of every lion, and all the east and west are his: travel from Turan to 
China to Byzantium and you’!l see that the world is like wax in his hands. The 
desert Arabs brandishing their lances send him tribute, because they have no 
heart or strength to fight against him. I tell you all this because the king is 
offended by your behavior. You haven’t gone to his palace or seen his noble 
courtiers; instead, you’ve hidden yourself away in this remote province. But how 
can our leaders forget you, unless they have neither brains nor hearts remaining 
to them? You always strove for the good, and held yourself ready to do your 
kings’ bidding. If your pains are reckoned up they exceed the treasure you’ve 
accumulated, but no king has ever accepted that his subject could act in this 
contemptuous way. Goshtasp has said to me that Rostam is so wealthy now that 
he sits drunk in Zavolestan and gives no thought to us. One day in his fury he 
swore an Oath by the shining day and darkness of the night that no one would 


ever see you at his court unless it were in chains. Now, I have come from Iran 
for this purpose, and the king ordered me not to delay in carrying it out. Draw 
back now, and fear his anger. If you will go along with this and give up your 
contemptuous ways, I swear by the sun, by the spirit of Zarir, by my lionlike 
father’s soul, that I will make the king take back his words, and that your glory 
will shine with splendor once again. Pashutan is my guide and witness that I 
have tried to fathom the king’s purposes in this, and see no fault in him. My 
father is my king and I am his subject; I can never refuse his orders. Your whole 
clan—Zavareh, Faramarz, Zal, and all the rest of your tried and true chieftains— 
should hear my words and take my advice. This house must not be left a prey to 
Persian warriors and destroyed. When I take you bound before the king, and then 
go over your faults with him, I’1l calm his anger and make him forget all 
thoughts of vengeance. I am a prince, and I give you my word that I will not let 
even the wind touch you.’” 


Bahman Goes as a Messenger to Rostam 

Bahman dressed himself in cloth of gold, placed a princely crown on his head, 
and set out from the encampment, his banner fluttering behind him. A proud 
young man, on a splendid horse, he made his way toward the River Hirmand, 
and as soon as the lookout saw him he shouted out to his companions in 
Zabolestan, “A fine warrior on a black horse is coming our way; his harness 
tinkles with golden bells, and he’s followed by a group of mounted soldiers; he’s 
already crossed the river with no difficulty.” 

As soon as he heard this Zal rode to the lookout post, his lariat coiled at his 
saddle and his mace at the ready. When he caught sight of Bahman he sighed 
and said, “This lordly young man with his royal clothes must be someone from 
Lohrasp’s clan; may his coming here be auspicious for us.” Pensively, his heart 
filled with foreboding, he rode back toward his castle. Radiating princely pride, 
Bahman approached; he did not recognize Zal, and raising his arm he called out, 
“My noble friend, where can I find great Rostam, the prop of our times? 
Esfandyar has camped by the river, and is looking for him.” 

Zal replied, “There’s no need for such hurry, young man! Dismount, and call 
for wine, and calm yourself. Rostam is out hunting with Faramarz and a few 
friends; they’Il be back soon enough. Rest here with your retinue, and drink a 
little wine.” 

But Bahman answered, “Esfandyar said nothing to us about wine and rest: 
find someone to guide us to the hunting grounds.” 


Zal said, “What’s your name? Whose clan do you belong to, and what have 
you come here for? I think you’re kin to Lohrasp, and descended from Goshtasp 
too.” 

Bahman said, “I am Bahman, son to invincible Esfandyar, lord of the world.” 

When he heard this Zal dismounted and made his obeisance before him. 
Bahman laughed and dismounted as well, and the two embraced and kissed. Zal 
urged him to stay, saying that his haste was unnecessary, but Bahman replied 
that Esfandyar’s message could not be treated so lightly. And so Zal chose a 
warrior who knew the lie of the land and sent him with Bahman to where 
Rostam was hunting. He was an experienced man called Shirkhun, and after he 
had led him a fair distance he pointed out the way and went back, leaving 
Bahman to go on ahead. 

Bahman urged his horse up a mountain slope, and when he reached the 
summit he gazed at the hunting grounds spread out below. He saw there a 
mighty warrior, a man massive as the cliff of Bisitun, who had uprooted a tree 
and was using it as a spit on which to roast a wild ass, which he handled as 
easily as if it weighed no more than an ant. In his other hand he held a goblet full 
of wine, and in front of him a young man was standing ready to serve him. 
Nearby, close to a stream and a clump of trees, Rakhsh stood cropping grass. 
Bahman said, “This is either Rostam, or the sun itself. No one has ever seen such 
a man in all the world, or heard of his like among the ancient heroes. I fear that 
Esfandyar will be no match for him, and will flinch from him in battle. I’ II kill 
him here and now with a rock, and so break Zal’s heart.” He tore a granite 
boulder from the mountain side and sent it tumbling down the slope. Zavareh 
heard the rumble of its descent and saw it plunging toward them; he shouted out, 
“Rostam, a great rock is rolling down the mountain.” Rostam made no move; he 
didn’t even put down the wild ass he was roasting. As Zavareh hung back in 
alarm, Rostam waited until the boulder was almost on him, and the dust it sent 
up had obscured the mountain above; then he kicked it contemptuously aside. 
Zavareh and Rostam’s son Faramarz cheered, but Bahman was horrified at the 
exploit, and said, “If Esfandyar fights with such a warrior he’!l be humiliated by 
him; it’ll be better if he treats him politely and circumspectly. If Rostam gets the 
better of Esfandyar in combat he will be able to conquer all Iran.” Bahman 
remounted his horse, and with his heart full of foreboding descended the 
mountain slope. 

He told a priest of the wonder he had seen, and made his way by an easier 
path at the foot of the mountain toward Rostam. As he approached, Rostam 


turned to a companion and said, “Who is this? I think it’s someone from 
Goshtasp’s clan.” Then he caught sight of Bahman’s retinue waiting on the 
mountain side, and he grew suspicious. He and Zavareh, and the rest of the 
hunting party, went forward to greet their guest. Bahman quickly dismounted 
and greeted Rostam civilly. Rostam said, “You’ll get nothing from me until you 
tell me who you are.” Bahman replied, “I am Esfandyar’s son, chief of the 
Persians; I am Bahman.” Rostam immediately embraced him and apologized for 
his tardy welcome. 

Together they made their way back to Rostam’s camp and when Bahman had 
sat himself down he greeted Rostam formally, and conveyed to him the greetings 
of the king and his nobility. Then he went on: “Esfandyar has come here and 
pitched camp by the River Hirmand, as the king ordered him to. If you will hear 
me out, I bring you a message from him.” 

Rostam replied: “Prince, you’ve taken a great deal of trouble and traversed a 
great deal of ground; first we should eat, and then the world is at your disposal.” 
A cloth was spread on the ground, and soft bread was placed on it; then Rostam 
set a roasted wild ass, its flesh still hot, before Bahman. He called for his brother 
Zavareh to sit with them, but not the rest of his companions. He had another wild 
ass brought, since it was his custom to eat a whole animal himself. He sprinkled 
it with salt, cut the meat, and set to. Bahman watched him, and ate a little of the 
wild ass’s meat, but less than a hundredth of the amount Rostam consumed. 
Rostam laughed and said: “A prince who’s so abstemious surely needs 

An army to assist him in his deeds: 

I’ve heard that in your father’s battles you 
Fought with him: what exactly did you do? 
You eat so little you’re too weak to wield 
A warrior’s weapons on the battlefield.” 


Bahman replied: 


“A noble prince will neither talk at length 

Nor eat too much: he’d rather save his strength 
For battles than for banquets, since it’s war 

That shows a warrior’s worth, not who eats more.” 


Rostam laughed long and loud and said, “A fighting spirit won’t stay hidden 
long!” He called for enough wine to sink a ship: filling a golden goblet, he 


toasted the memory of noble heroes, then handed another to Bahman and said, 
“Toast whoever you want to!” Seeing the proffered goblet Bahman hesitated, so 
Faramarz drank first, saying, “You’re a princely child, we hope you enjoy the 
wine, and our drinking together.” Bahman took the goblet and reluctantly drank 
a little; he was as astonished by Rostam’s capacity for food and drink as he was 
by his massive body, arms, and shoulders. When they had finished their meal, 
the two heroes rode together for a while, side by side, and Bahman told Rostam 
the details of Esfandyar’s message. 


Rostam’s Answer to Esfandyar 

As he listened to Bahman’s words, the old man grew pensive. He said, “I’ve 
heard your message through and I’m pleased to see you. Now, take my answer 
back to Esfandyar: ‘Great, lionhearted warrior, any man who is wise considers 
the realities of a situation. A man like you who’s rich, brave, and successful in 
war, who has authority and a good name among other chieftains, should not give 
his heart to malice and suspicion. You and I should act justly toward one 
another; we should fear God and not make evil welcome. Words that have no 
meaning are like a tree without leaves or scent, and if your heart’s given over to 
greed and ambition, you will toil long and hard and see no profit for your pains. 
When a nobleman speaks he should weigh his words well and avoid idle talk. 
I’ve always been happy to hear you praised, to hear people say that no mother 
ever bore a son like you, that you surpass your ancestors in bravery, chivalry, 
and wisdom. Your name is known in India and Rum, and in the realms of 
wizards and witches; I praise God for your glory day and night and I have 
always longed to set eyes on you, to see for myself your splendor and 
graciousness. I welcome your arrival, and I ask that we sit together and drink to 
the king’s health. I’1l come to you alone, without my men, and listen to what the 
king has commanded. I’ ll bring you the charters past kings, from Kay Qobad to 
Kay Khosrow, have granted my family, and I’ll make known to you the pains 
I’ve suffered, the difficulties I’ve endured, the good I’ve done for past princes, 
from ancient times up to the present day. If the right reward for all I have 
undergone is to be led in chains, would that I had never been born, or that once 
born I had soon died. Am I, who broke elephants’ backs and flung their 
carcasses in the ocean, to come to court and publish all my secrets to the world, 
my arms tied, my feet hobbled in leather bonds? If it becomes known that I’ve 
committed any sin, may my head be severed from my body. May I never speak 
unseemly words, and you should keep yours for cursing devils; don’t say these 


things that no one has ever said, and don’t think your valor will enable you to 
catch the wind in a cage. No matter how great a man is, he can’t pass through 
fire, or survive the seas if he can’t swim, or dim the moon’s light, or make a fox 
a lion’s equal. Don’t provoke me to a fight, because fighting with me will be no 
trivial matter: no man has ever seen fetters on my ankles, and no savage lion has 
ever made me give ground. 

““Act as becomes a king; don’t let yourself be guided by devils and demons. 
Be a man, drive anger and malice out of your heart, don’t see the world through 
a young man’s eyes. May God keep you happy and prosperous; cross the river, 
honor my house with your presence, don’t refuse to see someone who offers you 
his allegiance. As I was Kay Qobad’s subject, so I will serve you, willingly and 
cheerfully. Come to me without your armed companions, stay with me for two 
months; there’s good hunting here, the waterways are full of fowl, and if you tire 
of this you can watch my swordsmen in combat with lions. When you want to 
return to the Persian court I’Il load you with gifts from my treasury and travel 
side by side with you. I’ll enter the king’s presence and gently ask his pardon: 
when I’ve kissed his head and eyes and feet in sign of submission, I’1l ask him 
why my feet should be shackled.’ Now, remember everything I’ve said and 
repeat it to noble Esfandyar.” 

Bahman went back with his retinue of priests: Rostam remained in the 
roadway for a while, and called Zavareh and Faramarz to him. He said, “Go to 
Zal and tell him that Esfandyar has arrived, and that he’s full of ambitious plans. 
Have a fine welcome prepared, something even more splendid than was 
customary in Kay Kavus’s time: place a golden throne in the audience hall and 
have royal carpets spread before it. The king’s son has come here and he’s bent 
on war; tell Zal that this prince is a famous fighter and that he’d feel no fear 
confronted by a whole plain filled with lions. I’1l go to him, and if he’!l accept to 
be our guest we can hope for a good outcome; if I see that he’s a well-disposed 
young man I’ll give him a golden crown set with rubies, and I won’t stint him 
jewels or fine cloth or weapons either. But if he turns me away and I come back 
here with no hope of a peaceful resolution, then you know that my looped lariat, 
which has caught wild elephants’ heads in its coils, is always ready.” 

Zavareh said, “Give the matter no thought: a man who has no quarrel with 
someone doesn’t go looking for a fight. I know of no stronger or more 
chivalrous warrior in all the world than Esfandyar. Wise men don’t act in evil 
ways, and we’ve done him no harm.” Zavareh made his way to Zal’s court, and 


Rostam rode to the shore of the River Hirmand, fearful of the harm he foresaw. 
At the river’s edge he tugged on the reins, halting his horse, and prayed to God. 


Bahman Takes His Father Rostam’s Message 
When Bahman reached camp, his father was standing before the royal pavilion, 
waiting for him, and he called out “What did the hero tell you then?” Bahman 
went over all he’d heard. He began by giving Rostam’s message and then he 
described Rostam himself. He told everything he’d seen, and much that he’d 
inferred, and ended by saying, “There’s no one like Rostam anywhere. He has a 
lion’s heart and a mammoth’s body, he could snatch a sea monster from the 
waves. He’s coming unarmed, with no corselet, helmet, mace, or lariat, to the 
banks of the Hirmand: he wants to see the king, and he has some private 
business I don’t know about with you.” 

But Esfandyar angrily turned on Bahman and humiliated him before their 
companions saying, 


“No self-respecting warrior would ask 

Advice from women for a warrior’s task, 

And no one who is soldierly or wise 

Would send a boy on such an enterprise. 

Just where have you seen champions, that you praise 
This Rostam for his fine courageous ways? 

He’s like a mammoth in the wars you say— 

D’you want my men to fight or run away!” 


Then he said in an undertone to brave Pashutan, “This Rostam still acts like a 
young man, age hasn’t broken him yet.” 

He gave orders that a black horse be saddled in gold, and then he led his men 
toward the bank of the Hirmand, his lariat coiled at his side. 


Rostam Comes to Greet Esfandyar 

Rakhsh neighed on one side of the river, and on the other the Persian prince’s 
horse answered. Rostam urged Rakhsh from dry land into the water: when he 
had crossed he dismounted and greeted Esfandyar. He said: “I have asked God 
continually to guide you here as you have now come, in good health and 
accompanied by your army. Now, let us sit together and discuss things 
courteously and kindly. As God is my witness, wisdom will guide me in what I 
say; I will not try to snatch any advantage from our conversation, nor will I lie to 
you. If I had seen Seyavash himself I would not rejoice as I do now seeing you; 
indeed, you resemble no one so much as that noble and unfortunate prince. 
Happy is the king who has a son like you; happy are the people of Iran who see 
your throne and your good fortune: and woe to whoever fights against you, since 
dust will overwhelm both his throne and his luck. May all your enemies be filled 
with fear, may the hearts of those who are against you be cut in two, may you 
remain victorious forever, and may your dark nights be as bright as the days of 
spring!” 

When he heard him Esfandyar too dismounted, embraced Rostam, and 
greeted him warmly and respectfully, saying “I thank God to see you cheerful 
and confident like this: you deserve all men’s praise, and our heroes are like 
your slaves. Happy is the man who has a son like you, who sees the branch he 
has put forth bear fruit: happy is the man who has you as his support, since he 
need fear nothing from Fate’s harshness. When I saw you I thought of Zarir, that 
lionlike warrior and tamer of horses.” 

Rostam replied, “I have one request, and if you grant it to me my desires are 
fulfilled: delight my soul by coming to my house. It is unworthy of you, but we 
can make do with what there is and so confirm our friendship.” 

Esfandyar answered, “You are like the heroes of old, and any man who has 
your reputation rejoices the land of Iran. It would be wrong to ignore your 
wishes, but I cannot turn aside from the king’s orders. He gave me no permission 
to stay in Zavol with its chieftains. You should quickly do what the king has 
ordered; place the fetters on your own feet, because a king’s fetters are no cause 
for shame. When I take you before him, bound like this, all the guilt will 
redound on him. I must bind you, but my soul is grieved by it, and I would rather 
serve you: I won’t let you stay in chains beyond nightfall, and I won’t let the 
least harm come to you. Believe me, the king will not injure you, and when I 
place the crown on my own head I will give the world into your safekeeping. 


This will not be a sin before God, and there is no shame in doing what a king 
demands; and when the blossoms and roses open, and you return to your 
Zavolestan, you’ |l find that I’ll be generous, and load you down with gifts to 
beautify your land.” 

Rostam replied, “I have prayed God that I might see you and rejoice, and now 
I’ve heard what you have to say. We are two noble warriors, one old, one young, 
both wise and alert; but I fear the evil eye has struck, and that I’ll never know 
sweet sleep again. Some demon has pushed in between us, ambition for a crown 
and glory has perverted your soul. It will be an eternal shame to me if a great 
chieftain like yourself refuses to come to my house and be my guest while he is 
in this country. If you can expel this hatred from your mind, and undo this 
demon’s work, I’ll agree to anything you wish, except to be chained: chains will 
bring shame, the ruin of my greatness, and an ugly aftermath. No one will ever 
see me in chains alive; my mind’s made up and there’s nothing more to be said.” 

Esfandyar answered: “The heroes of the past are met in you, all you have said 
is true, and perverse paths bring no man glory. But Pashutan knows the orders 
the king gave me when I set out: if I come now to your home, and stay there 
enjoying myself as your guest, and you then refuse to accept the king’s orders, I 
shall burn in hell’s flames when I pass to the other world. If you wish, we can 
drink together for a day and swear friendship to one another; who knows what 
tomorrow will bring or what will be said of this later?” 

Rostam replied: “I must go and rid myself of these clothes. I’ve been hunting 
for a week, eating wild ass instead of lamb; call for me when you’re seated with 
your people, ready to eat.” He mounted Rakhsh and deep in thought galloped 
back to his castle. He saw his father’s face and said, “I’ve visited this Esfandyar: 
I saw him mounted, tall as a cypress tree, wise and splendid, as if the great 
Feraydun himself had given him strength and knowledge. He exceeds the reports 
about him; the royal farr radiates from his face.” 

When Rostam rode away from the river Hirmand, Esfandyar was filled with 
foreboding. At that moment, Pashutan, who was his councilor, came into his 
tent, and Esfandyar addressed him: 


“We thought this would be easy, but we’ve found 
Our way’s unsure, and over rocky ground; 

I shouldn’t visit Rostam’s home, and he 

For his part ought to stay away from me. 

If he neglects to come I won’t complain 


Or summon him to sit with me again. 
If one of us should die in this affair 
The other will be vanquished by despair.” 


Pashutan said, “My lord, who has a brother to equal Esfandyar? When I saw that 
you two were not looking to fight with one another, my heart opened like the 
blossoms in springtime, both for Rostam and for Esfandyar. I look at what 
you’re doing here and I see that some demon has blocked off wisdom’s way 
forward. You’re a religious and honorable man, one who obeys God and his 
father: hold back, don’t give your soul over to violence; my brother, listen to 
what I’m telling you. I heard all Rostam said: he is a great man, your chains will 
never bind his feet and he will not lightly take your advice. The son of Zal will 
not walk into your trap so easily; I fear that this will be a long drawn out contest 
between two haughty warriors, and one with an ugly ending to it. You are a great 
man too, and wiser than the king; you’re a better soldier and a finer man than he 
is. One of you wants rejoicing and reconciliation, and the other wants battles and 
vengeance. Consider for yourself, which of you is more praiseworthy?” 
Esfandyar replied, 


“But if I turn away from what my king 
Commands there’s no excuse that I can bring, 
I'll be reproached in this world, and I fear 
God’s probing of my life when death draws near; 
For Rostam’s sake I cannot throw away 

My life both here and after Judgment Day— 
There is no needle that can sew the eyes 

Of Faith tight shut, no matter how one tries.” 


Pashutan said, “I’ve given my advice, and it will benefit you physically and 
morally. I’ve said all I can; now, choose the right way, but remember that 
princes’ hearts are not inclined to vengeance.” 

Esfandyar ordered his cooks to prepare supper, but he sent no one to summon 
Rostam. When the food had been eaten he lifted his winecup and began to boast 
of his past exploits, toasting the king occasionally as he did so. Rostam was in 
his castle all this while, waiting for Esfandyar’s invitation. But as time passed 
and no one came, and then supper time was over and he was still staring at the 
empty road, fury took possession of his mind. He laughed and said to his 


brother, “Have the meal prepared and call our men to eat. So this is our famous 
hero’s way of behaving, is it? See that you never forget his splendid manners!” 
Then he ordered that Rakhsh be saddled and richly caparisoned after the Chinese 
fashion, and said, “I’m going to tell this noble prince that he 

Has now deliberately insulted me.” 


Rostam and Esfandyar Meet for the Second Time 

The mammoth warrior mounted Rakhsh, whose neigh resounded for two miles, 
and made his way quickly to the river’s edge. The Persian troops there were 
astonished by his massive frame and martial bearing, and said to one another 
“He resembles no one but Esfandyar himself, and would be the victor in combat 
with an elephant. The king’s unwise obsession with his throne has made him 
send a splendid hero to his death; as he grows older all the king thinks of is 
wealth and his royal authority.” 

Esfandyar welcomed him, and Rostam replied, “My fine young warrior, it 
seems you’ve developed new customs, new ways of behaving. Why am I 
unworthy to drink with you? Is this how you keep your promises? Now, take 
seriously what I tell you, and don’t be so foolish as to get angry with an old man. 
You think you’re greater than everyone else and you take pride in your 
chieftains: you consider me a lightweight, someone whose opinions don’t matter. 
But know that the world knows I am Rostam, scion of the great Nariman; black 
demons bite their hands in horror at my approach, and I fling wizards into the pit 
of death. When chieftains see my armor and my Rakhsh like a raging lion they 
flee in terror; I have caught in my lariat’s coils warriors like Kamus and the 
Khagqan of China, I have dragged them from their saddles and bound their feet. I 
am the keeper of Iran and its lionlike chieftains, the support of its warriors on 
every side. Don’t slight my overtures to you, don’t think of yourself as higher 
than the heavens. I’m seeking a pact with you, and I respect your royal farr and 
glory. I have no desire for a prince like you to die at my hands. I am descended 
from Sam, before whom lions fled from their lairs, and you are the son of a king. 
For a long time now I have been the world’s first warrior, and I have never 
stooped to evil: I have cleared the world of my enemies, and I have suffered 
countless pains and sorrows. I thank God that in my old age I have met with a 
fine strong warrior willing to fight with a man of the pure faith, one whom all 
the world praises.” 

Esfandyar laughed, and said, “And all this anger is simply because no 
invitation came? The weather’s so hot and it’s such a long way that I didn’t want 


to put you to the effort of coming back. I said to myself that I’d go to you at 
dawn tomorrow and offer my apologies: I’d be happy to see Zal and I’d spend 
time drinking with you both. But now that you’ve taken the trouble to leave your 
house and cross the plain to get here, calm yourself, sit down, take the winecup 
in your hand, and put aside your anger and irritation.” And he moved over so 
that there was a place for Rostam to his left. But Rostam’s response was, “That’s 
no place for me, I’ll sit where I wish to.” Esfandyar ordered Bahman to vacate 
the space to the right, but Rostam retorted in fury, “Open your eyes and look at 
me: look at my greatness and at my noble ancestry, I’m of the seed of Sam, and 
if there’s no place worthy of me in your company I still have my victories and 
fame.” Then the prince ordered that a golden throne be brought and placed 
opposite his own: still enraged Rostam sat himself down on the throne, and 
toyed with a scented orange in his hand. 

Esfandyar addressed Rostam, “You’re a powerful and well-intentioned hero, 
but I’ve heard from priests, chieftains, and other wise men that Zal was nothing 
but demon-spawn, and can boast of no better lineage. They hid him from Sam 
for a long time, and the court was in an uproar because he was so ugly, with a 
black body and white hair and face; when Sam finally saw him he was in despair 
and gave orders that he be exposed on the seashore as a prey for the birds and 
fish. The Simorgh came down, flapping its wings, and seeing no signs of 
grandeur or glory in the child to deter him, he snatched him up and took him to 
his nest, but even though he was hungry Zal’s puny body didn’t seem worth 
eating. So he flung him naked in a corner of the nest, where the child lived off 
scraps. Finally, the Simorgh took pity on him, and after he’d subsisted on the 
Simorgh’s leavings for a number of years he set off, naked as he was, for Sistan. 
Now because Sam had no other children, and was old and stupid as well, he 
welcomed him back. My great ancestors, who were noble and generous men, 
gave him wealth and position, and when many years had passed he grew to be a 
fine tall cypress of a man. And a branch of this same cypress is Rostam, who by 
his valor and splendid appearance and fine deeds outreached the heavens, until 
his ambition and excesses have procured a kingdom for him.” 

Rostam replied; “Calm yourself; why are you saying such offensive things? 
Your heart’s filled with perversity and your soul’s puffed up with demonic pride. 
Speak as becomes a royal personage; kings say nothing but the truth. The lord of 
the world knows that Sam’s son Zal is a great, wise, and renowned man. And 
Sam was the son of Nariman, who was descended from Kariman, whose father 
was Hushang, the crowned king of all the earth. Haven’t you heard of Sam’s 


incomparable fame? There was a dragon in Tus, a monster that terrorized the 
beasts of the sea and the birds of the air; and then there was a wicked demon so 
huge that the sea of China reached only to its waist while its head towered into 
the sky and obscured the sun; it would snatch fish up from the ocean depths and 
store them beyond the sphere of the moon, and cook them by holding them 
against the sun; the turning heavens wept to see such a monster. These two 
hideous beings trembled before Sam’s courage and his sword, and perished by 
his hand. 

“My mother was the daughter of Mehrab, under whose rule India flourished, 
and who was descended, through five generations, from Zahhak, a monarch who 
lifted his head higher than all the kings of the world. Who has a more noble 
lineage than this? A wise man does not try to deny the truth. Any man who 
makes claims to heroism has to test himself against me. I hold my fiefdom by 
irreproachable treaty from Kavus, and it was renewed by the greatest of warrior- 
kings, Khosrow. I have traveled the world, and slain many unjust kings: when I 
crossed the Oxus Afrasyab fled from Turan to China; I fought for Kavus in 
Hamaveran and when I journeyed alone to Mazanderan, neither Arzhang, nor the 
white demon, nor Sanjeh, nor Kulad Ghandi hindered me. For that king’s sake I 
killed my own son, and there never was such a strong, chivalrous, war-tried hero 
as Sohrab. It is more than six hundred years since I was born of Zal’s seed: in all 
that time I have been the world’s heroic champion, and my thoughts and deeds 
have always been one. I’m like the noble Feraydun, who crowned himself, and 
dragged Zahhak from the throne and laid him in the dust. And then Sam, whose 
wisdom and knowledge of magic are unmatched in the world, is my grandfather. 
Thirdly, when I have girded on my sword our kings have lived free from all 
anxieties: there’s never been such pleasure at the court, or such security from 
evil’s inroads. The world was as I willed it to be, ordered by my sword and 
mace. 


I’ve told you this so that you’Il understand 

That though you govern with a princely hand, 
You’re new to this world’s ancient ways, in spite 
Of all your splendor and imperial might. 

You look out on the earth and all you see 

Is your own image and ability, 

But gazing at yourself you’re unaware 

Of all the hidden dangers lurking there. 


I’ve talked enough; let’s drink, and may the wine 
Dispel all your anxieties, and mine.” 


Hearing him, Esfandyar laughed, and his heart lightened. He said, “I’ve listened 
to the tale of your exploits and sufferings, now hear how I’ve distinguished 
myself. First, I have fought for the true faith, clearing the land of idol- 
worshippers, and no one’s seen any warrior slaughter them in such numbers as I 
have, covering the ground with their corpses. I’m Goshtasp’s child, and he was 
the child of Lohrasp, who was the child of Orandshah, a descendant of the 
Kayanid kings. My mother’s the daughter of Caesar, who rules in Rum and is 
descended from Salm, the son of Feraydun, the king who established the ways of 
faith and fair-dealing, and without whose glory there would be little enough 
justice in the world, as no one can deny. You’re a man who stood as a slave 
before my royal ancestors, you and your forebears too. I’m not saying this to 
cause dissension between us, but you received sovereignty as a gift from my 
family, even though you’ re now trying to kick over the traces. Wait now, and let 
me tell you how things are, and if there’s one lie in what I say, show it to me. 

“Since Goshtasp has been king my chivalry and good fortune have been at his 
service. I was the man who was praised for spreading the faith, even though I 
was then imprisoned because of Gorazm’s slanders. Because I couldn’t help him 
Lohrasp was defeated, and our land was overrun by enemies, until Jamasp came 
to release me from my chains. The blacksmiths tried to free me, but my 
impatient heart was the sword that finally broke my fetters: I roared at their 
delay, and it was my own strength that smashed the shackles binding me. Arjasp, 
our enemy, fled before me, and so did all his chieftains, and I harried their routed 
army like a savage lion. You’ve heard how lions and Ahriman beset me during 
my seven trials, how I entered the Brass Fortress by a trick, and destroyed 
everything there; how I sought revenge for our nobles’ deaths, how I took war to 
Turan and China and suffered hardships and privations there more terrible than a 
leopard inflicts on a wild ass, or than the sailor’s hook that torments a great 
fish’s gullet. There was a dark castle high on a distant ridge, shunned for its evil 
reputation and filled with depraved idol-worshippers: I took that castle, smashed 
its images against the ground, and lit the sacred flame of Zoroaster in their place. 
I came home with my God-given victory, and not an enemy of ours survived; not 
a temple or an idol-worshipper remained. 


These battles that I fought, I fought alone, 


No man has shown the valor I have shown. 
But we have talked enough: if you agree, 
Take up your wine, and slake your thirst with me.” 


Rostam replied: “Our deeds will be our memorial in the world. Now, in fairness 
to me, listen to the tale of an old warrior’s exploits. If I had not taken my heavy 
mace to Mazanderan where Kavus, Giv, Gudarz, and Tus were imprisoned, their 
hearing shattered by the din of wardrums, who would have disemboweled the 
White Demon? Who could have hoped to accomplish such a deed by his own 
strength? I took Kavus from his chains back to the throne, and Iran rejoiced to 
receive him. I cut off their wizards’ heads, and left their bodies unburied and 
unlamented. And my only companions were my courage, my horse Rakhsh, and 
my world-conquering sword. And then when Kavus went to Hamaveran and was 
imprisoned, I led a Persian army there and killed their kings in war. King Kavus 
was a prisoner, heart sick and wretched, and Afrasyab was harrying Iran. I freed 
Kavus, Giv, Gudarz, and Tus, and brought them and our army back to Iran. 
Eager for fame, careless of my own ease, I went on ahead in the darkness of the 
night, and when Afrasyab saw my fluttering banner and heard Rakhsh neigh, he 
fled from Iran toward China; the world was filled with justice and my praises. If 
Kavus’s blood had flowed then, how could he have sired Seyavash, who in turn 
fathered Kay Khosrow, who placed the crown on Lohrasp’s head? My father is a 
great warrior, and he swallowed the dust of shame when he had to call your 
insignificant Lohrasp his king. Why do you boast of Goshtasp’s crown and 
Lohrasp’s throne? 


Who says, ‘Go now, and shackle Rostam’s hands?’ 
The heavens themselves don’t issue such commands. 
I’ve never seen, not since I was a child, 

A man as headstrong, obstinate, and wild 

As you: my courtesy is your excuse 

To treat me with contemptuous abuse!” 


Esfandyar laughed with delight at his rage and grasped him firmly by the hand, 
saying: “Great, mammoth bodied warrior, you’re just as I’ve heard you 
described: your arm’s as massive as a lion’s thigh, your chest and shoulders like 
a dragon’s, your waist lean as a leopard’s.” As he spoke he squeezed Rostam’s 
hand, and the old man laughed at the young man’s efforts: lymph dripped from 


his finger nails, but he didn’t wince at the pain. Then he in turn gripped 
Esfandyar’s hand, and said, “My God-fearing prince, I congratulate king 
Goshtasp on having such a son as you, and your mother, whose glory is 
increased by bearing you.” He spoke and, as his grip tightened, Esfandyar’s 
cheeks turned crimson; bloody liquid spurted from beneath his nails, and the 
pain showed in his face. Nevertheless he laughed and said, “Enjoy your wine 
today, because tomorrow when we meet in combat you won’t be thinking of 
pleasure. Ill saddle my black horse, put on my princely helmet, and unseat you 
with a lance; that’ll put an end to your wrangling and rebellion. Ill bind your 
arms together and take you to the king. But I’11 tell him that I’ve found no fault 
in you; [’ll go before him as a suppliant, and clear up all this quarrel. I’ ll free 
you from sorrow and pain, and in their place you’|I find treasure and kindness.” 
Rostam too laughed and said, “You'll tire of battle soon enough. Where have 
you ever seen real warriors fight, or felt the wind a mace makes as it whistles by 
you? If the heavens will that no love’s lost between us, we’ll drink down 
vengeance, not red wine; our fate will be ambush, the bow and lariat, the din of 
drums instead of the sound of lutes, and our farewells will be said with sword 
and mace. When we meet man to man on the battlefield tomorrow, you’ll see 
which way the fight will go. I’ll pluck you from your saddle, and bear you off to 
noble Zal. There I’1l sit you on an ivory throne and place on your head a 
splendid crown that I had from Kay Qobad, and may his soul rejoice in heaven! 
Ill open our treasury’s gates and lay our wealth before you: I’ll give you troops, 
and raise your head up to the skies. Then, laughing and lighthearted, we’!l make 
our way to the king: I’ll crown you there, and that’s how Ill show my loyalty to 
Goshtasp. Only then will I agree to serve him, as I served the Kayanid kings 
before. My heart will grow young again with joy, like a garden cleared of weeds: 
and when you’re king and I’m your champion, a universal happiness will come.” 


Rostam Drinks with Esfandyar 

Esfandyar answered: “Too much talk is pointless: our stomachs are empty, the 
day’s half over, and we’ve said enough about battles. Bring whatever you have 
to our supper, and don’t invite those who talk the whole time.” When Rostam 
began to eat the others were astonished at his appetite; they sat opposite him 
watching him feast. Then Esfandyar gave orders that Rostam be served with red 
wine, saying “We’ll see what he wants when the wine affects him, and he talks 
about King Kavus.” A servant brought old wine in a goblet, and Rostam toasted 
Goshtasp and drank it off. The boy refilled it with a royal vintage, and Rostam 
said to him quietly, “There’s no need to dilute it with water, it takes the edge off 
an old wine. Why do you put water in it?” Pashutan said to the serving boy, 
“Bring him a goblet filled with undiluted wine.” Wine was brought, musicians 
were summoned, and the group watched in wonder as Rostam drank. When it 
was time for Rostam to return to Zal, Esfandyar said to him: “May you live 
happily and forever, may the food and wine you’ve consumed here nourish you, 
and may righteousness sustain your soul!” 

Rostam replied: “Prince, may wisdom always be your guide! The wine I’ve 
drunk with you has nourished me, and my wise mind wants for nothing. If you 
can be intelligent enough, and man enough, to lay aside this desire for combat, 
come out of the desert to my home and take your ease as my guest: I’ll do 
everything I promised, and I’ll give you good advice. Rest for a while, turn aside 
from evil, be civil, and come back to your senses.” 

Esfandyar replied: “Don’t sow seeds that will never grow. Tomorrow when I 
bind on my sword belt for combat you’ ll see what a warrior is. Stop praising 
yourself: get back to your palace and prepare yourself for the morning. A battle 
is as of little account to me as a drinking party. But my advice is that you don’t 
try to fight with me: do what I say, accept the king’s command that you be 
bound in chains, and when we go from Zabol to Goshtasp’s court you’ ll see that 
Ill be even more chivalrous than I have promised. Don’t try to cause me any 
more sorrow.” 


Then grief filled Rostam’s heart, and in his sight 
The world seemed like a wood bereft of light. 
He thought: “Either I let him bind my hands, 
And in so doing bow to his commands, 

Or I must fight against him face to face 


And bring on him destruction and disgrace. 
No good can come of either course, and I 
Shall be despised and cursed until I die: 

His chains will be the symbol of my shame, 
Goshtasp will kill me and destroy my fame— 
The world will laugh at me, and men will say 
‘Rostam was hung with chains and led away, 
A stripling conquered him.’ And all I’ve done 
Will be forgotten then by everyone. 

But if we fight each other and he’s slain 

I cannot show my face at court again; 

They’Il say I left a fine young prince for dead 
Because of one or two harsh words he’d said; 
In death I’Il be reviled, my name will be 

A byword for disgrace and infamy. 

And then if I’m to perish at his hand 

My clan will lose Zabol, our native land— 
One thing would still survive though, since my name 
Would be remembered and not lose its fame.” 


Then he spoke to his haughty companion, saying: “Anxiety robs my skin of its 
color; you talk so much about chains and binding me, and everything you do 
alarms me. What the heavens will is sovereign over us, and who knows how they 
will turn? You’re following a demon’s advice, and refusing to listen to reason. 
You haven’t lived many years in this world, and you don’t know how deceptive 
and evil it is, my prince. You’re a simple, straightforward man, and you know 
nothing about life: you should realize that evil men are trying to destroy you. 
Goshtasp will never tire of his crown and throne, and he will drive you 
throughout the world, make you face every danger, to keep you away from them. 
In his mind he searched the world, his intelligence hacking away like an axe, to 
find some hero who would not refuse to fight with you, so that such a man 
would destroy you, and the crown and throne would remain his. You blame my 
motives, but why don’t you examine your own heart? Prince, don’t act like some 
thoughtless youth, don’t persist in this disastrous course. Be ashamed before 
God and before my face, don’t betray yourself, and don’t think that combat with 
me would be a game. If Fate has driven you and your men here, you will be 


destroyed by me: I shall leave an evil name behind me in the world, and may the 
same fate be Goshtasp’s!” 

Esfandyar replied: “Great Rostam, think of what a wise sage once said, ‘A 
man in his dotage is a fool, no matter how wise or victorious or knowledgeable 
he’s been.’ You want to trick me and slip out of this, you want to convince 
people by your smooth talk, so that they’ll say ‘Rostam welcomed him warmly’ 
and call you a wise benevolent man, while they’1l say that I was unrighteous—I, 
who always act from righteous motives! You want them to say, “The prince 
refused to listen to him, so that he had no choice but to fight. All his pleas were 
treated with contempt, and bitter words passed between them.’ But I shall not 
swerve aside from the king’s commands, not for the crown itself: all the good 
and evil of the world I find in him, and in him lie both heaven and hell. May 
what you’ve eaten here nourish you and confound your enemies: now, go home 
and tell Zal everything you have seen here. Prepare your armor for battle, and 
bandy no more words with me. Come back at dawn ready to fight, and don’t 
draw this business out any further. Tomorrow on the battlefield you’ll see the 
world grow dark before your eyes: you’ ll see what combat with a real warrior 
is.” 

Rostam replied: “If this is what you want I’ll return your hospitality with 
Rakhsh’s hooves, and my mace will be a medicine for your head. You’ve 
listened to your own court telling you that no one can match his sword against 
Esfandyar’s; but tomorrow you’ll see me grasping Rakhsh’s reins, with my lance 
couched, and after that you’! never look to fight again.” 

The young man’s lips broke into bewitching laughter, and he said: “For a 
fighting man you’ve let our conversation anger you too easily! Tomorrow you’ll 
see how a man fights on the battlefield: I’m no mountain, and my horse beneath 
me’s no mountain either, I’m one man like any other. If you run from me with 
your head still on your shoulders your mother will weep for your humiliation; 
and if you’re killed I’ll tie you to my saddle and bear you off to the king, so that 
no vassal of his will ever challenge him again.” 


Rostam Addresses Esfandyar’s Tent 
When Rostam left Esfandyar’s pavilion he paused for a moment, and spoke to it: 


“O tent of hope, what glorious days you’ve known! 
Once you were shelter to great Jamshid’s throne, 
In you Khosrow’s and King Kavus’s days 


Were passed in splendor, pageantry, and praise— 
Closed is that glorious gate that once you knew, 
A man unworthy of you reigns in you.” 


Esfandyar heard him, planted himself in front of Rostam, and said: “Why should 
you speak to our pavilion so intemperately? This Zabolestan of yours should be 
called ‘Lout-estan,’ because when a guest has eaten his fill here he starts 
loutishly insulting his host!” Then he too addressed the royal tent: “You 
sheltered Jamshid once, who erred and strayed, 

Who heard God’s heavenly laws and disobeyed; 

Then came Kavus, whose blasphemous desires 

Sought to control the skies’ celestial fires— 

Tumult and plunder, plots, perfidy, pain 

Filled all the land throughout his wretched reign, 

But now your walls encompass King Goshtasp 

Who rules with his wise councillor Jamasp; 

The prophet Zoroaster, who has brought 

Heaven’s scriptures to us, shares his noble court, 

Good Pashutan is here, and so am I 

His prince, watched over by the turning sky, 

Protector of the good, scourge of the horde 

Of evildoers, who bow before my sword.” 


When Rostam had left, Esfandyar turned to Pashutan and said, “There’s no 
hiding such heroism: I’ve never seen such a horseman, and I don’t know what 
will happen tomorrow on the battlefield. When he comes armored to battle he 
must be like a raging elephant; his stature’s a marvel to gaze upon. Nevertheless, 
I fear that tomorrow he will face defeat. My heart aches for his kindness and 
glory, but I can’t evade God’s commands: tomorrow when he faces me in 
combat I’! turn his shining days to darkness.” 

Pashutan replied: “Listen to what I have to say. Brother, do not do this. I have 
said it before and I will say it again, because I will not wash my hands of what is 
right. Don’t harry him like this; a free man will never willingly submit to 
another’s tyranny. Sleep tonight and, when dawn comes, we’|l go to his castle, 
without an escort, and there we’ll be his guests and answer his every anxiety. 
Everything he has done in the world has been for the good, benefiting the 
nobility and the general populace alike. He won’t refuse your orders, I can see 


that he’ ll be loyal to you. How long are you going to go on with all this rage and 
anger and malice? Drive them out of your heart!” 

Esfandyar answered him: “Thorns have appeared among the roses then: a 
man of pure faith shouldn’t talk as you’re doing. You’re the first councilor to 
Persia’s king, the heart, eyes, and ears of its chieftains, and yet you think it right 
and wise to disobey the king like this? Then all my pains and struggles were 
pointless, and Zoroaster’s faith’s to be forgotten, because he has said that hell 
will be the home of whoever turns aside from his king’s command. How long 
are you going to tell me to disobey Goshtasp? You can say this, but how can I 
agree to it? If you’re afraid for my life, I'll rid you of that fear today: no man 
ever died except at his appointed time, and a man whose reputation lives on 
never dies. Tomorrow you’ll see how I’II fight against this fearsome warrior.” 

Pashutan said: “And for how long are you going to talk about fighting? Since 
you first took up arms, Eblis has had no control over your thoughts: but now 
you’re opening your heart to demons, and refusing to hear good advice. How can 
I drive fear from my heart when I see that two great warriors, two lions in battle, 
are to face one another, and what will come of this is all unknown?” 

The hero made no answer: his heart was filled with pain, and a sigh escaped 
his lips. 


Rostam Returns to His Castle 
By the time Rostam reached his castle he could see no remedy but warfare. 
Zavareh came out to greet him and saw his pallor, and that his heart was filled 
with darkness. Rostam said to him, “Prepare my Indian sword, my lance and 
helmet, my bow and the barding for Rakhsh: bring me my tiger skin, and my 
heavy mace.” Zavareh had the steward bring what Rostam had asked for, and 
when Rostam saw his weapons and armor he heaved a cold sigh and said, “My 
armor, for a while you’ve been at peace, 

But now this indolence of yours must cease— 

A hard fight lies ahead, and I shall need 

All of the luck you bring me to succeed: 

Two warriors who have never known defeat 

Like two enraged and roaring lions will meet, 

And in that struggle on the battlefield 

Who knows what tricks he’ll try to make me yield!” 


Zal Advises Rostam 

When Zal heard from Rostam what had happened, his aged mind was troubled. 
He said, “What are you telling me? You’re filling my mind with darkness. Since 
first you sat in the saddle you’ve been a chivalrous and righteous warrior, proud 
to serve your kings and contemptuous of hardships. But I fear your days are 
drawing to an end, that your lucky stars are in decline, that the seed of Zal will 
be eradicated from this land, and our women and children hurled to the ground 
as Slaves. If you’re killed in combat by a young stripling like Esfandyar, 
Zabolestan will be laid waste and all our glory will be razed and cast into a pit. 
And if he’s hurt in this encounter your good name will be destroyed: everyone 
will tell the tale of how you killed a young prince because of a few harsh words 
he’d said. Go to him, stand before him as his subject: and if you can’t do that 
then leave, go and hide yourself in some corner where no one will hear of you. 
You can buy the world with treasure and trouble, but you can’t cut Chinese silk 
with an axe. Give his retinue robes of honor, get back your independence with 
gifts. When he leaves the banks of the Hirmand, saddle Rakhsh and go with him: 
as you travel to the court swear fealty to him. And when Goshtasp sees you, 
there’s no danger he’Il harm you: it would be an act unworthy of a monarch.” 

Rostam replied: “Old man, don’t take what I’ve said so lightly. I’ve fought 
for years and have experienced the world’s good and evil. I encountered the 
demons of Mazanderan and the horsemen of Hamaveran, I fought against Kamus 
and the Emperor of China whose armies were so mighty the earth trembled 
beneath their horses’ hooves. But if I now flee from Esfandyar there will be no 
castles or gardens for you in Zabolestan. I may be old, but when I put on my 
tiger skin for battle it makes no difference whether I face a hundred maddened 
elephants or a plain filled with warriors. I’ve done all that you’re asking me to, I 
read the book of loyalty to him; he treats my words with contempt and ignores 
my wisdom and advice. If he could bring his head down from the heavens and 
welcome me in his heart, there’s no wealth in my treasury, no weapon or armor, 
that I wouldn’t give him. But he took no notice of all my talk and left me empty- 
handed. 

“If we were to fight tomorrow, you could despair of his life. But I won’t take 
my sharp sword in hand, I’ll bear him off to a banquet: he’! see no mace or 
lance from me, and I won’t oppose him man to man. I’ll simply lift him from the 
saddle and acknowledge him as king in Goshtasp’s place. I’1l bring him here and 
seat him on an ivory throne, load him with presents, keep him as my guest for 


three days, and on the fourth when the sun’s red ruby splits the darkness I’ II set 
off with him for Goshtasp’s court. When I enthrone him and crown him I’1l 
stand before him as his loyal subject, concerned only for Esfandyar’s commands. 
You remember how I acted with Qobad, and you know how it’s my 
quarrelsome, passionate nature that’s made my reputation in the world. And now 
you’re telling me either to run off and hide, or to submit to his chains!” 

Zal broke into laughter, shaking his head in wonder at his son’s words. He 
said, “Don’t say such things, even demons couldn’t put up with such foolish talk. 
You chatter about what we did with Qobad, but he was living obscurely in the 
mountains then, he wasn’t a great king with a throne, crown, treasure, and cash 
at his disposal. You’re talking about Esfandyar, who counts the emperor of 
China among his subjects, and you say you’ll lift him from the saddle and bear 
him off to Zal’s palace! An old, experienced man doesn’t talk like this. Don’t 
court bad luck by setting yourself up as the Persian king’s equal. You’re the best 
of all our chieftains, but I’ve given you my advice, and may you follow it!” 

Having spoken, he bent his forehead to the ground in prayer: “Just judge, I 
pray you to preserve us from an evil Fate.” And so he prayed throughout the 
night, his tongue untiring until the sun rose above the mountains. 

When day broke Rostam put on his mail and tigerskin, hitched his lariat to his 
saddle, and mounted Rakhsh. He summoned Zavareh and told him to have their 
army’s ranks drawn up in the foothills. Zavareh saw that this was done, and 
Rostam couched his lance and rode out from the palace. His soldiers called out 
encouragement as he went forward, followed by Zavareh who was acting as his 
lieutenant. Privately Rostam said to him, “Somehow, I’Il put paid to this evil 
devil’s spawn, and get my soul back into the light again. But I fear I shall have 
to harm him, and I don’t know what good can come out of all this. You stay with 
our troops, while I go to see what Fate has in store for me. If I find he’s still the 
same hothead, spoiling for a fight, let me face him alone, I don’t want any of our 
warriors hurt in this. Victory favors the just.” 

He crossed the river and began to climb the opposite bank, and wonder at the 
world’s ways filled his mind. 

He faced Esfandyar and shouted, “Your enemy has come: prepare yourself.” 

When Esfandyar heard the old lion’s words he laughed and shouted back, 
“T’ve been prepared since I woke.” He gave orders that his armor, helmet, lance, 
and mace be brought, and when he was accoutered he had his black horse 
saddled and brought before him. Then, glorying in his strength and agility, he 
thrust his lance point into the ground and, like a leopard leaping on a wild ass 


and striking terror into its heart, he vaulted into the saddle. The soldiers were 
delighted, and roared their approval. 

Esfandyar rode toward Rostam and when he saw his opponent had come 
alone, he turned to Pashutan and said, “I need no companions in this: he is alone, 
and I shall be too: we’ll move off to higher ground.” 

Pashutan withdrew to where the Persian soldiers waited, and the two 
combatants went forward to battle, as grimly as if all pleasure had been driven 
from the world. When the old man and his young opponent faced each other, 
both their horses neighed violently, and the noise was as though the ground 
beneath them split open. 

Rostam’s voice was serious when he spoke: “Young man, you’re fortune’s 
favorite, and your heart’s filled with the joys of youth; don’t go forward with 
this, don’t give yourself up to anger. For once, listen to wisdom’s words. If 
you’re set on bloodshed say so, and I’1] have my Zaboli warriors come here, and 
you can send Persians against them, and the two groups can show their mettle. 
We’ll watch from the sidelines, and your desire for blood and combat will be 
satisfied.” 

Esfandyar answered him: “How long are you going to go on with this 
pointless talk? You got up at dawn and summoned me to this hillside. Was that 
simply deception? Or is it that now you foresee your own defeat? What could a 
battle between your warriors and mine mean to me? God forbid I should agree to 
send my Persians into battle while I held back and crowned myself king. For a 
man of my faith, such an act would be contemptible. I lead my warriors into 
battle, and am the first to face the foe even if it is a leopard. If you need 
companions to fight with you summon them, but I shall never call on anyone’s 
aid. God is my companion in battle, and Good Fortune smiles on me. You’re 
looking for a fight, and I’m ready for one: let’s face each other man to man, 
without our armies. And let’s see whether Esfandyar’s horse returns riderless to 
its stable, or Rostam’s turns masterless toward his palace.” 


The Combat Between Rostam and Esfandyar 

They swore that no one would come to their aid while they fought. Again and 
again they rode against one another with couched lances; blood poured from 
their armor, and their lances’ heads were shattered, so that the combatants were 
forced to draw their swords. Weaving and dodging to right and left, they 
attacked one another, and their horses’ maneuvers flung them against one 
another with such violence that their swords too were shattered. They drew their 


maces then, and the blows they dealt resounded like a blacksmith’s hammer 
striking steel. Their bodies wounded and exhausted, they fought like enraged 
lions until the handles of their maces splintered; then they leant forward and 
grasped each other by the belt, each struggling to throw the other, while their 
horses reared and pranced. But though they strained against one another, 
exerting all their strength and massive weight, neither warrior was shifted from 
his saddle. And so they separated, sick at heart, their mouths smeared with dust 
and blood, their armor and barding dented and pierced, their horses wearied by 
their struggle. 


Zavareh and Nushazar Quarrel 

When the combat had gone on for some time, Zavareh grew impatient at the 
delay and shouted to the Persian soldiers: “Where is Rostam? Why should we 
hang back on a day like this? You came to fight against Rostam, but you’re 
never going to be able to bind his hands, and we won’t sit here while a battle’s 
going on.” Then he began cursing his opponents, and Esfandyar’s son Nushazar, 
who was a fiery ambitious youth, was enraged at the insults this provincial from 
Sistan was heaping upon them, and responded in kind. “Is it right for a noble 
warrior to make fun of a king’s commands? Our leader Esfandyar gave us no 
orders to fight with dogs like you, and who would ignore or override his wishes? 
But if you want to challenge us, you’ll see how real warriors can fight with 
swords and spears and maces.” 

In response, Zavareh gave the signal for Sistan’s warcry to ring out, and for 
his men to attack: he himself rushed forward from the rear of his troops, and a 
tumultuous noise of fighting began. Countless Persians were slaughtered, and 
when Nushazar saw this he mounted his horse, grasped his Indian sword in his 
hand, and headed for the fray. Among the Sistani troops one of their best 
walriors was a wild tamer of horses, a man named Alvad, who was Rostam’s 
spear bearer and always accompanied him into battle. Nushazar caught sight of 
him, wheeled toward him, and struck him a mighty blow with his sword: his 
head was severed and his body slid lifeless from its saddle into the dirt. Zavareh 
urged his horse forward and called out, “You’ve laid him low, but stand your 
ground and fight, because Alvad is not what I’d call a horseman.” With that 
Zavareh flung his lance, which pierced Nushazar’s chest, and a moment later the 
Persian warrior’s head lay in the dirt. 


Nushazar and Mehrnush Are Killed by Faramarz and Zavareh 

When the great Nushazar was killed, good fortune deserted the Persian army. 
His brother, Mehrnush, saw Nushazar’s death; at once weeping and enraged he 
urged his great horse forward to the fray, and the froth of fury stood on his lips. 
Faramarz stood before him like a massive maddened elephant, and attacked him 
with his Indian sword: a huge cry went up from both armies as the two noble 
fighters closed, the one a prince, the other a mighty champion. They fell on one 
another like enraged lions, but Mehrnush’s eagerness for combat was not 
sufficient to prevail against Faramarz: thinking to sever his opponent’s head with 
a sword blow, he brought his weapon down on his own horse’s neck, and his 


mount sank to the ground beneath him. Once he was on foot Faramarz was able 
to overcome him, and his red blood stained the dust of the battlefield. 

When Bahman saw his brother killed, and the dirt beneath him mired with his 
blood, he made his way to where Esfandyar had been in combat with Rostam, 
and said, “Lion-warrior, an army has come up from Sistan, and your two sons 
Nushazar and Mehrnush have been pitifully slain by them. While you’re here in 
combat, two of our princes lie prone in the dust, and the sorrow and shame of 
this will live forever.” Esfandyar’s heart clouded with rage, sighs escaped his 
lips, and tears stood in his eyes: he turned to Rostam and said, “Devil’s spawn, 
why have you forsaken the path of justice and good custom? Didn’t you say that 
you would not bring your troops into this conflict? You don’t deserve your fame: 
have you no shame before me, no fear of what God will demand of you on the 
Day of Judgment? Don’t you know that no one praises a man who goes back on 
his word? Two of your Sistani troops have killed two of my sons, and your men 
are still wreaking havoc.” 

When Rostam heard this, sorrow seized him and he trembled like a bough in 
the wind. He swore by the soul and head of the king, by the sun and his sword 
and the battlefield, by the fire that Kavus had lit and through which Seyavash 
had passed unscathed, by the Kayanid throne and the Zend Avesta, by the soul 
and head of Esfandyar himself: “I did not give the orders for this attack, and I’ve 
no praise for whoever carried it out. I shall bind my own brother’s hands if he 
has been responsible for this evil, and I shall bind my son Faramarz’s arms too, 
and bring him here to you. If they are guilty, kill them both in vengeance for 
your sons’ split blood. But don’t let your judgment be clouded by what has 
happened.” 

Esfandyar replied, 


“To avenge a peacock’s death, no king would take 
The worthless life of an ignoble snake: 

Look to your weapons now, you wretch, defend 
Yourself, your days on earth are at an end: 

I'll stake your thighs against your horse’s hide, 
My arrows will transfix you to his side 

And you and he shall be like water when 

It’s mixed with milk and can’t be found again. 
From now on no base slave shall ever strive 

To spill a prince’s blood: if you survive 


I'll bind your arms—without delay Ill bring 

You as my captive to our court and king, 

And if my arrows leave you here for dead 

Think of my sons, whose blood your warriors shed.” 


Rostam replied: “What good is all this talk, which only increases our shame? 
Turn toward God and trust in Him, who guides us to both good and evil ends.” 


Rostam and Esfandyar Renew the Battle 
They turned then to their bows and poplar wood arrows; the sun turned pale and 
fire flashed from Esfandyar’s armor where the arrow heads struck. He frowned 
with shame, since he was a man whose arrows no one escaped: he notched 
diamond headed shafts to his bow, bolts that pierced armor as if it were paper, 
and sorely wounded both Rostam and Rakhsh. Esfandyar wheeled round, 
circling Rostam, whose arrows had no effect, and who felt that he faced defeat. 
He said to himself, “This Esfandyar is invincible,” and he knew that both he and 
Rakhsh were growing weaker. In desperation he dismounted and began to climb 
the mountain side, while Rakhsh returned home riderless and wounded. Blood 
poured from Rostam’s body, and as his strength ebbed from him this great 
mountain of a man began to tremble and shake. Esfandyar laughed to see this, 
and called out: “Where is your mammoth strength, your warrior’s pride? 

Have arrows pierced that iron mountain side? 

Where is your mace now and your martial might, 

That glorious strength with which you used to fight? 

What are you running from, or did you hear 

A lion’s roar that filled your heart with fear? 

Are you the man before whom demons wept? 

Whose sword killed everything that flew or crept? 

Why has the mammoth turned into a fox 

That tries to hide among these mountain rocks 2?” 


Zavareh saw Rakhsh in the distance, wounded, returning home: the world 
darkened before his eyes, and he cried aloud and hurried to the place where 
Rostam and Esfandyar had fought. He saw his brother there, covered in 
unstanched wounds, and said to him, “Get up, use my horse, and I shall buckle 
on my armor to avenge you.” But Rostam replied, “Go, tell our father that the 
tribe of Sam has lost its power and glory, and that he must seek out some 


remedy. My wounds are more terrible than any disaster I’ve survived, but I 
know that, if I live through this night, tomorrow I shall be like a man reborn 
again. See that you look after Rakhsh, and even if I stay here for a long time I’ Il 
rejoin you eventually.” Zavareh left his brother and went in search of Rakhsh. 

Esfandyar waited a while, and then shouted: “How long are you going to stay 
up there: who do you think is going to come and guide you now? Throw your 
bow down, strip off your tiger skin, undo your sword belt. Submit, and let me 
bind your arms, and you’|| never see any harm from me again. I’!l take you, 
wounded as you are, to the king, and there I’ Il have all your sins forgiven. But if 
you want to continue fighting, make your will and appoint someone else to rule 
these marches. Ask pardon for your sins from God, since God forgives those 
who repent, and it would be right for Him to guide you from this fleeting world 
when you must leave it.” 

Rostam replied: “It’s too late to go on fighting: who wages war in the dark? 
Go back to your encampment and spend the night there; I shall make my way to 
my palace and rest, and sleep awhile. I’ll bind my wounds up, then I’Il call the 
chieftains of my tribe to me, Zavareh, Faramarz, and Zal, and I’1] set out to them 
whatever you command: we’I] accept your guarantee of justice.” 

Esfandyar answered him: “Old man, you’re infinitely clever, a great man, 
tempered by time, knowing many tricks and wiles and stratagems. I’ve seen your 
deceit, but even so I don’t want to see your destruction. I’ll give you quarter 
tonight, but don’t be thinking up some new dishonest ploy. Stick to what you’ve 
agreed to, and don’t bandy words with me any more!” 

Rostam’s only reply was: “Now I must seek help for my wounds.” 

Esfandyar watched him make his way back to his own territory. 

Once Rostam had crossed the river he congratulated himself on his narrow 
escape and prayed: “O Lord of Justice, if I die from these wounds, who of our 
heroes will avenge me, and who has the courage and wisdom to take my place?” 

Esfandyar saw him gain dry land and murmured to himself, “This is no man, 
this is amammoth of unmatched might.” In wonder he said, “O God of all 
desires, time and place are in your hands, and you have created him as you 
willed. He has crossed the river with ease, despite the terrible wounds he’s 
suffered from my weapons.” 

As Esfandyar approached his encampment, he heard the noise of lamentation 
for Nushazar and Mehrnush. The royal tent was filled with dust, and his 
chieftains had rent their clothes: Esfandyar dismounted and, embracing the heads 


of his two dead sons, spoke quietly to them: “Brave warriors, whose bodies here 
lie dead, 
Who knows to what abode your souls have fled?” 


Then he turned to Pashutan who knelt lamenting before him and said: “Don’t 
weep for the dead any longer: I see no profit in such tears, and it is wrong to 
trouble one’s soul in this way. Young and old, we are all destined for death, and 
may wisdom guide us when we depart.” 

They sent the two bodies in golden coffins, on teakwood litters, to the court, 
and Esfandyar sent with them a letter to his father: “The tree you planted has 
borne fruit. You launched this boat on the water: it was you that wanted Rostam 
as a Slave, So now when you see the coffins of Nushazar and Mehrnush, do not 
lament overmuch. My own future is still uncertain, and I don’t know what evil 
Fate has in store for me.” 

He sat on the throne, grieving for his sons, and then began to talk about 
Rostam. He said to Pashutan: “The lion has evaded the warrior’s grasp. Today I 
saw Rostam, the massive height and strength of him, and I praised God, from 
whom come all hope and fear, that such a man existed. He has done such things 
in his time: he has fished in the Sea of China and drawn forth monsters, and on 
the plains he has trapped leopards. And I hurt him so severely that his blood 
turned the earth to mud; his body was a mass of arrow wounds but he made his 
way on foot up that mountain side, and then, still encumbered with his sword 
and armor, he hurried across the river. I know that as soon as he reaches his 
palace his soul will fly up to the heavens.” 


Rostam Consults with His Family 

When Rostam reached the palace his kinsfolk clustered around him: Zavareh and 
Faramarz wept to see his wounds, and his mother Rudabeh tore at her hair and 
scored her cheeks in her grief. Zavareh removed his armor and tiger skin, and the 
leaders of the tribe gathered before him. Rostam asked that Rakhsh be brought to 
him, and that farriers be found to treat his wounds. Zal tore at his hair and 
pressed his aged face against Rostam’s wounds, saying “Woe that I with my 
white hairs should ever see my noble son in this state!” 

But Rostam said to him: “What use are tears, if heaven has decreed this? 
There is a harder task ahead of me, one that fills my soul with fear. I have never 
seen a warrior on the battlefield like this invincible Esfandyar, although I have 
traveled the world and have knowledge of what is plain and what is hidden. I 
lifted the White Demon by the waist and flung him against the ground like a 
willow branch. My arrows have pierced anvils and rendered shields futile, but no 
matter how many blows I rained on Esfandyar’s armor my strength was useless 
against him. When leopards saw my mace they would hide themselves among 
the rocks, but it made no impression on his armor, or even so much as damaged 
the silk pennant on his helmet. But how much more can I plead with him and 
offer him friendship? He is stubborn in all he does and says, and wants only 
enmity from me. I thank God that night came on, and that our eyes grew dim in 
the darkness so that I was able to escape this dragon’s claws. I don’t know 
whether I’ ll be able to survive these wounds: I see nothing for it but to leave 
Rakhsh tomorrow, and seek out some obscure corner where Esfandyar will never 
hear of me, even if this means that he’!l sack Zabolestan. He’ll get tired of that 
eventually, although his nature rejoices in the evils of conquest.” 

Zal said to him: “My son, listen to me, and think carefully about what I’m 
going to say. There is one way out of all this world’s troubles, and that is the 
way of death. But I know of a remedy, and you should seize on it. I shall 
summon the Simorgh, and if he will help us we may yet save our tribe and 
country. If not, then our land will be destroyed by this malevolent Esfandyar, 
who rejoices in the evil he does.” 


The Simorgh Appears Before Zal 
They agreed to the plan. Zal filled three braziers with fire, and with three wise 
companions set out from the palace. They climbed to a high peak, and there the 
magician drew a feather from its brocade wrapping; fanning the flames in one of 
the braziers he burnt a portion of the feather in the fire. One watch of the night 
passed, and suddenly the air turned much darker. Zal peered into the night, and it 
seemed as if the fire and the Simorgh’s flight were liquefying the air: then he 
caught sight of the Simorgh and the flames flared up. Fearful, with anguish in his 
heart, Zal sat and watched as the bird drew closer: next, he threw sandalwood on 
the braziers and went forward, making his obeisance to the Simorgh. Perfume 
rose up from the fires, and the sweat of fear shone on Zal’s face. The Simorgh 
said to him: “O king, explain to me what you desire 

That you have summoned me in smoke and fire.” 


Zal answered: “May all the evils that have come to me from this base-born 
wretch light on my enemies! The lionhearted Rostam lies grievously wounded, 
and my feet feel as though shackled by his sorrows. No man has ever seen such 
wounds and we despair of his life. And it seems that Rakhsh too will die from 
the arrow heads that torment him. Esfandyar came to our country, and the only 
gate he knocked at was the gate of war. He will not be content with taking our 
land and wealth and throne from us, he wants to uproot our family, to extirpate 
us from the face of the earth.” 

The Simorgh said: 


“Great hero, put away all grief and fear, 
Bring Rakhsh and noble Rostam to me here.” 


Zal sent one of his companions to Rostam who, together with Rakhsh, was 
brought up the mountainside. When Rostam reached the summit, the Simorgh 
saw him and said: 


“OQ mammoth-bodied warrior, tell me who 

Has laid you low like this and wounded you. 
Why did you fight with Persia’s prince, and face 
The fire of mortal combat and disgrace?” 


Zal said: “Now that you have vouchsafed us the sight of your pure face, tell 
me, if Rostam is not cured, where can my people go in all the world? Our tribe 
will be uprooted, and this is no time to be questioning him.” 

The bird examined Rostam’s wounds, looking for how they could be healed. 
With his beak he sucked blood from the lesions, and drew out eight arrow heads. 
Then he pressed one of his feathers against the wounds, and immediately 
Rostam’s spirits began to return. The Simorgh said: “Bind up your wounds and 
keep them safe from further injury for seven days: then soak one of my feathers 
in milk and place it on the scars to help them heal.” He treated Rakhsh in the 
same manner, using his beak to draw six arrow heads from the horse’s neck, and 
immediately Rakhsh neighed loudly, and Rostam laughed for joy. The Simorgh 
then turned to Rostam and said: “Why did you choose to fight against Esfandyar, 
who is famous for being invincible in battle?” 

Rostam replied: “He talked incessantly of chains, despite all the advice I gave 
him. Death is easier for me than shame.” 

The Simorgh said: “To bow your head down to the ground before Esfandyar 
would be no shame: he is a prince and a fine warrior, he lives purely and 
possesses the divine farr. If you swear to me that you will renounce this war and 
not try to overcome Esfandyar, if you will speak humbly to him tomorrow and 
offer to submit to him (and if in fact his time has come, he will ignore your 
overtures of peace) then I will assist you, and raise your head to the sun’s 
sphere.” 

Rostam was overjoyed to hear this, and was freed of the fear of killing 
Esfandyar. He said: “Even if heaven should rain swords on my head I shall keep 
faith with what you say to me.” 

The Simorgh said: “Out of my love for you, I shall tell you a secret from 
heaven: Fate will harry whoever spills Esfandyar’s blood, he will live in sorrow, 
and his wealth will be taken from him; his life in this world will be one of 
suffering, and torment will be his after death. If you agree to what I say, and 
overcome your enmity, I shall show you wonders tonight and seal your lips 
against all evil words. Choose a glittering dagger, and mount Rakhsh.” 

Rostam prepared himself, mounted Rakhsh, and followed the Simorgh as it 
flew until they reached a seashore. The air turned dark from the Simorgh’s 
shadow as it descended and came to rest on the beach. He showed Rostam a 
pathway that led over dry land, over which the air seemed impregnated with 
musk. He touched Rostam’s forehead with one of his feathers, and indicated that 
they should follow the pathway. They reached a tamarisk tree rooted deep in the 


earth, its branches reaching into the sky, and the Simorgh alighted on one of the 
branches. He said to Rostam: “Choose the straightest branch you can find, one 
that tapers to a point: do not despise this piece of wood, for it holds Esfandyar’s 
Fate. Temper it in fire, place an ancient arrow head at its tip, and fix feathers to 
the shaft. Now I have told you how to wound Esfandyar.” 

Rostam cut the tamarisk branch and returned to his castle, and as he came the 
Simorgh guided him, its talons clutching his helmet. The Simorgh said: “Now, 
when Esfandyar tries to fight with you, plead with him and try to guide him 
toward righteousness, and don’t attempt to trick him in any way. Your sweet 
words might remind him of the ancient days, and of how you have fought and 
suffered throughout the world for Persia’s cause. But if you speak fairly to him 
and he rejects your words, treating you with contempt, take this arrow, having 
steeped it in wine, and aim it for his eyes, as is the custom of those who worship 
the tamarisk. Fate will guide the arrow to his eyes, where his farr resides, and his 
death.” 

The Simorgh took its farewell of Zal, embracing him as if they were warp and 
weft of one cloth. Filled with hope and joy, Rostam lit the fire and watched the 
Simorgh fly serenely up into the air. Then he fitted the arrow head and feathers, 
as he had been instructed. 


Rostam Kills Esfandyar 

Dawn touched the mountain tops and dispersed the darkness of the night. 
Rostam put on his armor, prayed to the world’s creator, and, eager for combat, 
made his way toward the Persian army. As he rode he called out exultantly: 
“Brave lionheart, how long will you sleep? Rostam has saddled Rakhsh: rise 
from your sweet sleep and face Rostam’s vengeance.” 

When Esfandyar heard his voice, all worldly weapons seemed useless to him. 
He said to Pashutan: “A lion cannot fight with a magician. I didn’t think that 
Rostam would be able even to drag his armor and helmet back to his palace, and 
now he comes here riding Rakhsh, whose body yesterday was a mass of wounds. 
I have heard that Zal is a magician, that he stretches out his hands toward the 
sun, and that in his mantic fury he surpasses all other magicians: it would be 
unwise for me to face his son.” 

Pashutan said: “Why are you so hesitant today? Didn’t you sleep through the 
night? What is it between you and Rostam, that you must both suffer so much in 
this business? I think your luck is abandoning you; all it does is lead you from 
one war to another.” 

Esfandyar dressed himself in his armor and went out to Rostam. When he 
saw his face he cried out: “May your name disappear from the surface of the 
earth! Aren’t you the man who fled from me yesterday, shorn of heart, soul, 
courage, life itself? Have you forgotten then, you Sistani wretch, the power of 
my bow? It’s only through the magic you’ve practiced that you’re able to stand 
before me again: Zal’s magic cured you, otherwise you’d be food for wild cats 
by now. But this time I shall fill you so full of arrows that all Zal’s magic will be 
useless: I shall so batter your body that Zal shall never see you alive again.” 

Rostam replied: “Will you never tire of combat? I have not come to fight 
against you today, I have come humbly offering an honorable reconciliation. 
Fear God, and do not drive wisdom from your heart. Constantly you try to treat 
me unjustly, blinding yourself to wisdom’s ways. By God Himself, by Zoroaster 
and the pure faith, by the sacred fire and the divine farr, by the sun and moon 
and the Zend Avesta, I swear to you that the road you are following is one of 
harm and evil. Forget the harsh words that have passed between us. I shall open 
to you my ancient treasuries, filled with marvels I have gathered over many 
years: I shall load my own horses with wealth and you can give them to your 
treasurer to drive before you. I shall ride with you, and if you so command me | 
shall come into the king’s presence, and if the king then kills me or enslaves me 


I accept this as my due. Remember what an ancient sage once said, ‘Never seek 
to have shame as your companion.’ I am doing everything in my power to make 
you give up your thirst for combat.” 

Esfandyar said: “I’m not a fraud who looks one day for battle and the next 
day skulks in fear. Why do you talk so much about your wealth and possessions, 
washing your face with the waters of friendship? If you want to stay alive, 
submit your body to my chains.” 





Once more Rostam spoke: “Forget this injustice, prince. Don’t sully my name 
and make your own soul contemptible; only evil will come of this struggle. I 
shall give you a thousand royal gems, along with torques and pearls and ear- 
rings. I shall give you a thousand sweet lipped boys to serve you day and night, 
and a thousand girls, all from Khallokhi whose women are famous for their 
charm, to make your court splendid with their beauty. My lord, I shall open the 
treasuries of Sam and Zal before you and give you all they contain; I shall bring 
men from Kabolestan for you, fit companions for your feasting and fearless in 
war. And then I shall go before you like a servant, accompanying you to your 
vengeful king’s court. But you, my prince, should drive vengeance from your 





heart, and keep devils from dwelling in your body. You are a king, one who 

fears God, and you have other ways of binding men to you than by chains; your 

chains will disgrace my name forever, how can such an evil be worthy of you?” 
Esfandyar replied: 


“How long will you tell me to turn away 
From God and from my king? To disobey 

My sovereign lord and king is to rebel 
Against God’s justice and to merit hell. 
Accept my chains, or enmity and war— 

But bandy pointless words with me no more.” 


When Rostam saw that his offers of friendship had no effect on Esfandyar, he 
notched the wine-soaked tamarisk arrow to his bow and lifted his eyes to the 
heavens, saying: 


“Just Lord, who gives us knowledge, strength, and life, 
You know how I have sought to end this strife; 

Creator of the moon and Mercury 

You see my weakness and humility, 

And his unjust demands: I pray that you 

See nothing sinful in what I must do.” 


Rostam hung back for a moment, and Esfandyar taunted him: “Well, famous 
Rostam, it seems your soul’s grown tired of combat, now that you’re faced with 
the arrows of Goshtasp, the lion heart and spear points of Lohrasp.” 

Then, as the Simorgh had ordered him, Rostam drew back his bow. Aiming at 
Esfandyar’s eyes he released the arrow, and for the Persian prince the world was 
turned to darkness. The tall cypress swayed and bent, knowledge and glory fled 
from him; the God-fearing prince bowed his head and slumped forward, and his 
Chinese bow slipped from his hand. He grasped at his black horse’s mane as his 
blood soaked into the earth beneath him. 

Rostam addressed Esfandyar: “Your harshness has borne fruit. You were the 
man who said, ‘I am invincible, I can bow the heavens down to the earth.’ 
Yesterday I was wounded by eight arrows, and bore this silently: one arrow has 
removed you from combat and left you slumped over your horse. In another 
moment your head will be on the ground, and your mother will mourn for you.” 


Esfandyar lost consciousness and fell to the ground. Slowly he came to 
himself, and grasped the arrow: when he withdrew it, its head and feathers were 
soaked in blood. The news immediately reached Bahman that the royal glory 
was shrouded in darkness: he ran to Pashutan and said: “Our expedition here has 
ended in disaster: his mammoth body lies in the dirt, and the world is a dark pit 
to him.” 

They ran to him, and saw him lying soaked in his blood, a bloody arrow in 
his hand. Pashutan said: “Who of our great men can understand the world’s 
ways? Only God who guides our souls and the heavens, and the planets in their 
courses, knows its truth. One like Esfandyar who fought for the pure faith, who 
cleared the world of the evils of idol-worship and never stretched out his hand to 
evil deeds, dies in the prime of youth, and his royal head lies in the dirt; while 
one who spreads strife in the world, who torments the souls of free men, lives for 
many years unharmed by Fate.” 

The young men cradled the fallen hero’s head, wiping away the blood. With 
sorrow in his heart, his face smeared with blood, Pashutan lamented over him: 
“O Esfandyar, prince and world conqueror, who has toppled this mountain, who 
has trampled underfoot this raging lion? Who has torn out the elephant’s tusks, 
who has held back the torrent of the Nile? Where have your heart and soul and 
courage fled, and your strength and fortune and faith? Where now are your 
weapons of war, where now is your sweet voice at our banquets? You cleansed 
the world of malevolence, you were fearless before lions and demons, and all 
your reward is to reign in the earth. My curses on the crown and throne: may 
they and your faithless father king Goshtasp be forgotten forever!” 

Esfandyar said: “Do not torment yourself for me. This came to me from the 
crown and court: the killed body goes into the earth, and you should not distress 
yourself at my death. Where now are Feraydun, Hushang, and Jamshid? They 
came on the wind and were gone with a breath. My noble ancestors too departed 
and ceded their place to me: no one remains in this fleeting world. I have 
traveled the earth and known its wonders, both those that are clear and those that 
are hidden, trying to establish the ways of God, taking wisdom as my guide; and 
now that my words have gone forth and the hands of Ahriman are tied, Fate 
stretches out its lion claws for me. My hope is that I shall reap the reward of my 
efforts in Paradise. Zal’s son did not kill me by chivalrous means. Look at this 
tamarisk wood grasped in my fist: it was this wood that ended my days, directed 
by the Simorgh and by that wily cheat Rostam. Zal, who knows all the world’s 
sorcery, Cast this spell.” 


Hearing his words, Rostam turned aside, his heart wrung with anguish. He 
said: “Some evil demon has brought this suffering to you. It’s as he said; he 
acted honorably. Since I have been a warrior in the world I have seen no armed 
horseman like Esfandyar, and because in myself I was helpless against his bow 
and strength I sought for help rather than yield to him. It was his death that I 
notched to my bow, and released, since his time had come. If Fate had meant 
him to live, how could I have found the tamarisk? Man must leave this dark 
earth, and cannot prolong his life by so much as a breath beyond his appointed 
time. I was the means by which the tamarisk arrow struck him down.” 

Esfandyar said: “Now my life draws to an end. Come closer, don’t leave me. 
My thoughts are different now from what they were. Listen to my advice, and 
what I ask of you concerning my son, who is the center of my life. Take him 
under your wing, show him the path to greatness.” 

Hearing his words, Rostam came weeping to his side, lamenting loudly, with 
tears of shame flowing from his eyes. News reached the palace: Zal came like 
the wind, and Zavareh and Faramarz approached, bewildered with sorrow. Zal 
addressed Rostam: “My son, I weep heart’s blood for you, because I have heard 
from our priests and astrologers that whoever spills Esfandyar’s blood will be 
harried by Fate: his life in this world will be harsh, and when he dies he will 
inherit torment.” 


Esfandyar’s Last Words to Rostam 
Esfandyar spoke to Rostam: 


“All that has happened happened as Fate willed. 
Not you, your arrow, or the Simorgh killed 
Me here: Goshtasp’s, my father’s, enmity 
Made you the means by which to murder me. 
He ordered me to sack Sistan, to turn 

It to a wilderness, to slay and burn, 

To suffer war’s travails, while he alone 
Enjoyed the glory of his crown and throne. 

I ask you to accept my son, to raise 

Him in Sistan, to teach him manhood’s ways: 
He is a wise and willing youth: from you 

He’ll learn the skills of war, what he must do 
At courtly banquets when the wine goes round, 


How to negotiate or stand his ground, 
Hunting, the game of polo—everything 
That suits the education of a king. 

As for Jamasp, may his accursed name 
Perish, and may he waste away in shame!” 


When Rostam had heard him out he stood and laid his hand on his chest and 
said: “If you die I swear to fulfill what you have said: I shall seat him on the 
ivory throne and place the royal crown upon his head myself. I shall stand before 
him as his servant, and call him my lord and king.” 

Esfandyar answered: “You are an old man, a champion of many wars, but, as 
God is my witness, and by the Faith that guides me, all this good that you have 
done for the world’s kings will avail you nothing: your good name has turned to 
evil and the earth is filled with mourning for my death. This deed will bring 
sorrow to your soul, as God willed should happen.” Then he addressed Pashutan: 
“T expect now nothing but my shroud. When I have left this fleeting world, lead 
our army back to Iran, and there tell my father that I say to him: ‘As you have 
achieved what you desire, don’t look for excuses. The world has turned out 
entirely as you wished, and all authority is yours now. With my just sword I 
spread righteousness in the world and no one dared oppose you, and when the 
true Faith had been established in Iran I was ready for greatness. Before our 
courtiers you praised me, and behind their backs you sent me to my death. You 
have gained what you sought; rejoice and put your anxieties to rest. Forget about 
death, let your palace be filled with celebration. The throne is yours; sorrow and 
a harsh fate are mine: the crown is yours; a coffin and a shroud are mine. But 
what have the wise said? “No arrow can defeat Death.” Put no faith in your 
wealth and crown and court: I shall be watching for you when you come to that 
other place, and when you do we shall go together before the world’s Judge to 
speak before him and to hear his verdict.’ When you leave him go to my mother, 
and tell her that death has taken her brave ambitious son; that against death’s 
arrow his helmet was like air, and that not even a mountain of steel could have 
withstood it. Tell her that she shall come soon after me, and that she should not 
grieve her soul for my sake, or unveil her face before the court, or look on my 
face in its shroud. To see me would make her weep, and no wise man would 
praise her grief. And bid my sisters and my wife an eternal farewell from me. 
Evil came to me from my father’s crown; the key to his treasury was my life. 
Tell my womenfolk that I have sent you to the court to shame his dark soul.” He 


paused, and caught his breath, and said, “It was Goshtasp, my father, who 
destroyed me,” and at that moment his pure soul left his wounded body, which 
lay dead in the dust. 

Rostam tore his clothes and in an agony of grief smeared dust upon his head. 
Weeping he said: “Great knight, son and grandson of a king, famed throughout 
the world, Goshtasp brought you to an evil end.” When he had wept copiously 
he addressed the corpse again: “To the high heavens your pure soul has flown, 

May your detractors reap what they have sown!” 


Zavareh said to him: “You should not accept this trust. An ancient saying says 
that, if you rear a lion cub, when it cuts its teeth and the instinct for hunting 
grows in it, the first person it will turn on is its keeper. Our two countries have 
an evil history: evil has come to Iran with the death of Esfandyar, and Bahman 
will bring evil to Zabolestan. Mark my words, when he becomes king he will 
seek vengeance for his father’s death.” 

Rostam replied: “No one, good or evil, can deflect what the heavens will. I 
shall do what is wise and honorable: if he turns to evil, Fate will answer him. 
Don’t provoke disaster by your prophecies.” 


Pashutan Takes Esfandyar’s Corpse to the Court of Goshtasp 

They made an iron coffin lined with Chinese silk, and wrapped him in a shroud 
of gold brocade. His chieftains lamented for him as his body was clothed and his 
turquoise crown placed upon his head. Then the coffin was closed, and the royal 
tree that had borne so much fruit was hidden from men’s sight. The coffin was 
sealed with pitch and smeared with musk and sweet smelling oils. 

Rostam brought forty camels caparisoned in Chinese brocade, one of which 
bore the coffin, while the rest formed columns to right and left of the army. All 
who were there scored their faces and plucked out their hair, calling out the 
prince’s name as they did so. At the head of the army Pashutan led Esfandyar’s 
black horse, which had had its mane and tail docked: the saddle on the horse’s 
back was reversed, and Esfandyar’s mace, armor, helmet, and spear hung from 
it. The army made its way back to Persia, but Bahman stayed weeping and 
mourning in Zabolestan. 

Rostam took him to his palace, and looked after him there as if he were his 
own soul. 


Goshtasp Learns That Esfandyar Has Been Killed 


News reached Goshtasp that the young prince’s head had been brought low in 
death. The king rent his clothes, and poured dust on his head and crown: the 
palace resounded with the noise of lamentation, and the world was filled with 
Esfandyar’s name. 

Goshtasp said: “O pure of Faith, our land and time will never see your like 
again! Since Manuchehr reigned there has been no warrior to equal you: your 
sword was always at the service of our Faith, and you maintained our chieftains 
in their glory.” 

But the Persian nobles were angered by his words, and washed their eyes of 
all sympathy for the king. With one voice they said: “Accursed king, to keep 
your throne and crown you sent Esfandyar to his death in Zabolestan: may the 
Kayanid crown shame your head, may the star of your good fortune falter in its 
course!” 

When the news came to the women’s quarters his mother and sisters, together 
with their daughters, went out to meet the returning army: their heads were 
unveiled, and they went barefoot in the dust, tearing their clothes as they walked. 
They saw the weeping Pashutan approach, and behind him Esfandyar’s black 
horse, and the coffin. The women clung to Pashutan, weeping and wailing, 
begging him to open the coffin and let them see the slaughtered prince. Grief- 
stricken and hemmed in by the lamenting women who tore at their flesh in their 
anguish, Pashutan called to the army’s blacksmiths to bring tools to open the 
coffin. The lid was lifted and a new wave of lamentation broke out as his mother 
and sisters saw the prince’s face, and his black beard anointed with musk. The 
women fainted, and their black curls were clotted with blood. When they 
revived, they turned to Esfandyar’s horse, caressing its neck and back: Katayun 
wept to think that this horse had carried her son when he was killed, and said, 
“What hero can you carry off to war now? Who can you deliver to the dragon’s 
claws?” They clung to its shorn mane and heaped dust on its head, and all the 
while the soldiers’ lamentations rose into the sky. 

When Pashutan reached the king’s audience hall he neither paused at the 
door, nor made his obeisance, nor came forward to the throne. He shouted out: 
“Most arrogant of men, the signs of your downfall are there for all to see. You 
have destroyed Iran and yourself with this deed: wisdom and the divine farr 
have deserted you, and God will repay you for what you have done. The back of 
your power is broken, and all you will hold in your grasp from now on is wind. 
For the sake of your throne you imbrued your son in blood, and may your eyes 
never see the throne or good fortune again! The world is filled with evil, and you 


will lose your throne forever: in this world you will be despised and in the world 
to come you will be judged.” Then he turned to Jamasp and said: “And you, you 
worthless evil councilor, who knows no speech in all the world but lies, who 
turns all splendor to crooked deceit, who stirs up enmity between princes, setting 
one against another, all you know how to do is to teach men to desert virtue and 
cleave to evil. But as you have sown so shall you reap. With your talk you 
destroyed a great man, saying that Esfandyar’s life was in the palm of Rostam’s 
hand.” 

Pashutan paused, and then he told the king plainly what had passed between 
Rostam and Bahman. When he had heard him out the king regretted what he had 
done. The court was cleared and his daughters, Beh Afarid and Homay, came 
before their father, their cheeks scored and their hair torn out in their sorrow for 
their dead brother. 

They said: “Great king, haven’t you considered what Esfandyar’s death 
means? He was the first to avenge Zarir’s death, he led the attack against the 
Turks, it was he who stabilized your kingdom. Then on the words of some 
slanderer you imprisoned him, and immediately our army was defeated and our 
grandfather was killed. When Arjasp reached Balkh he struck terror into the 
land, and we who live veiled from men’s eyes were driven naked from the 
palace into the common highway. Arjasp extinguished the sacred fire of 
Zoroaster and seized the kingdom. And then you saw what your son did: he 
utterly destroyed our enemies and brought us back safely from the Brass Fortress 
where we’d been imprisoned. He was the savior of our country and of your 
throne. And so you sent him to Sistan, filling him with specious talk so that he’d 
give up his life for the sake of your crown, and the world would lament his 
death. Neither the Simorgh nor Rostam nor Zal killed him: you killed him, and 
as you killed him you have no right to weep and complain. Shame on your white 
beard, that you killed your son for the sake of greed. Before you, there have been 
many kings worthy of the throne; none killed his own son or tured against his 
own family.” 

The king turned to Pashutan and said: “Bestir yourself, and pour water on 
these children’s fiery rage.” Pashutan led the women from the court, saying to 
Esfandyar’s mother Katayun, “How long will you rage and grieve like this? He 
sleeps happily, and his bright soul rests from the strife and sorrow of this world. 
Why should you grieve for him, since he is now in heaven?” 

Katayun took his wise advice, and accepted God’s justice. For a year, in 
every house and in the palace, there was mourning throughout the country, and 


for many years men wept to think of the tamarisk arrow, and the Simorgh’s trick, 
and Zal. 

Meanwhile Bahman lived in Zabolestan, hunting, drinking, taking his ease in 
the country’s gardens. Rostam taught this vengeful youth how to ride, to drink 
wine, and the customs of a royal court. He treated him more warmly than if he’d 
been his own son, and rejoiced in his company day and night. When he had 
fulfilled his promise, the door of Goshtasp’s revenge was closed. 


Rostam’s Letter to King Goshtasp 

Rostam wrote a sorrowful letter, setting out his kindness to the king’s son. He 
began by invoking Zoroaster and then went on: “As God is my witness, and 
Pashutan can testify, I said many times to Esfandyar that he should lay aside all 
enmity and desire for war. I told him I would give him land and wealth, but he 
chose otherwise; Fate willed that he ignored my pleas, and who can oppose what 
the heavens bring about? His son Bahman has lived with me, and is more 
splendid in my eyes than shining Jupiter: I have taught him how to be a king, 
instructing him in the elements of wisdom. If the king will promise to forget the 
tamarisk arrow and accept my repentance, all I have is at his disposal—my body, 
soul, wealth, crown, my very flesh and bones are his.” 

When the letter arrived at Goshtasp’s court his courtiers soon learned of it. 
Pashutan came and confirmed everything Rostam had said: he recalled Rostam’s 
grief at having to face Esfandyar, and the way that he had counseled him. He 
spoke too of Rostam’s wealth, and of the land he ruled over. Pashutan’s remarks 
pleased the king and had a good effect. The king’s heart warmed toward Rostam, 
and he put aside his sorrow. Immediately he wrote a magnanimous answer to 
Rostam’s letter: “When the heavens will someone an injury, who has the 
wisdom to prevent this? Pashutan has told me of what you tried to do, and this 
has filled my heart with kindness toward you. Who can withstand the heavens’ 
turning? A wise man does not linger on the past. You are as you have always 
been, and more than this: you are the lord of Hend and Qannuj, and whatever 
more you desire, be it a throne or authority or arms, ask for it from me.” As his 
master had ordered him, Rostam’s messenger quickly took back the king’s 
answer. 

Time passed, and Prince Bahman grew to be a man. He was wise, 
knowledgeable, authoritative, every inch a king. Jamasp, with his understanding 
of good and evil, knew that the kingdom would one day be Bahman’s, and he 
said to Goshtasp: “My lord, you should consider Bahman’s situation. He is 


mature in knowledge, and an honorable man. But he’s lived in a foreign land for 
too long, and no one has ever read him a letter from you. A letter should be 
written to him, something as splendid as a tree in Paradise. Who have you but 
Bahman to cleanse the sorrow of Esfandyar’s fate from your mind?” 

Goshtasp was pleased by this suggestion and answered: “Write him a letter, 
and write one also to Rostam, saying: ‘God be thanked, great champion, that I 
am pleased with you, and my mind is at rest. My grandson Bahman, who is 
dearer to me than our own soul and is wiser than my councilor Jamasp, has 
learned all kingly skills from you: now you should send him back to me.’ To 
Bahman write: ‘As soon as you read this letter stay in Zabol no longer: I have a 
great desire to see you. Put your affairs in order and come as quickly as you 
can.’” 

When the letter was read to him, Rostam was pleased, and he prepared a 
parting gift for Bahman. He opened his treasury and brought out armor, shining 
daggers, barding for horses, bows, arrows, maces, Indian swords, camphor, 
musk, sandalwood, jewels, gold, silver, horses, uncut cloth, servants and young 
boys, gold belts and saddles, and two golden goblets filled with rubies. All these 
he handed over to Bahman. 


Bahman Returns to King Goshtasp 
Rostam came two stages of the road with the prince, and then sent him on his 
way to the king. When Goshtasp saw his grandson’s face, tears covered his 
cheeks and he said: “You are another Esfandyar, you resemble no one but him.” 
Bahman was intelligent and quick witted, and from then on he was called 
Ardeshir. He was a strong, fine warrior: wise, knowledgeable, and God-fearing. 
When he stood, his finger tips came to below his knees. In all things he was like 
his father, whether fighting or feasting or hunting. Goshtasp could not be 
separated from him, and made him his drinking companion. He would say: 
“Now, since my noble, warlike son has died, 

May Bahman live forever at my side.” 


THE DEATH OF ROSTAM 


Zal had a female slave who was a musician and storyteller. She gave birth to a 
son whose beauty eclipsed the moon’s: in appearance he resembled Sam, and the 
whole family rejoiced at his birth. Astrologers and wise men from Kabol and 
Kashmir came with their astronomical charts to cast the boy’s horoscope, and to 
see whether the heavens would smile on him. But when they had done so they 
looked at one another in alarm and dismay, and said to Zal: “You and your 
family have been favored by the stars, but when we searched the secrets of the 
heavens we saw that this boy’s fortune is not an auspicious one. When this 
handsome lad reaches manhood and becomes a warrior he will destroy the seed 
of Sam and Nariman, he will break your family’s power. Because of him Sistan 
will be filled with lamentation and the land of Iran will be thrown into 
confusion: he will bring bitter days to everyone, and few enough of you will 
survive his onslaught.” 

Zal was saddened by these words and turned to God in his anxiety: “Lord of 
the heavens, my refuge and support, my guide in all my actions, creator of the 
heavens and the stars: may we hope for good fortune, and may nothing but 
goodness and peace come to us.” Then he named the boy Shaghad. 

His mother kept him by her until he was weaned; he was a talkative, 
charming, and quick witted child. When his strength had begun to develop, Zal 
sent him to the king of Kabol. There he grew into a fine young man, cypress 
statured, a good horseman, and skillful with mace and lariat. The king of Kabol 
looked on him with favor, and considered him worthy of the throne: he bestowed 
his own daughter on him in marriage and provided her with a splendid dowry. 
Shaghad was the apple of his eye, and he thought nothing of the stars and the 
astrologers’ predictions. 

The chieftains of Persia and India told Rostam that every year the kingdom of 
Kabol was required to hand over as tribute the hide of a cow. But the king of 
Kabol was sure that, now his son-in-law was Rostam’s brother, no one would be 
concerned about a cow skin worth a few coins. 


But when the time came for the tribute to be paid it was demanded, and the 
people of Kabol took offense at this. Shaghad was disgusted by his brother’s 
behavior, but he told no one, except the king to whom he said, in secret: “I am 
tired of the world’s ways: my brother treats me with disrespect, he has no time 
for me. He’s more like a stranger to me than an older brother, more like a fool 
than a wise man. You and I should work together to entrap him, and this will win 
us fame in the world.” The two confabulated together, and in their own eyes they 
overtopped the moon: but listen to what the wise have said, “Whoever does evil 
will be repaid in kind.” 

All night, until the sun rose above the mountains, the two evaded sleep, 
plotting how to wipe Rostam’s name from the world, and make Zal’s eyes wet 
with tears of grief. Shaghad said to the king: “If we’re going to turn our words 
into actions, I suggest you give a banquet with wine, musicians, and entertainers, 
and invite our chieftains. Whilst we’re drinking wine, in front of all the courtiers 
and guests, speak coldly and slightingly to me. Then I’1l go to my brother, and to 
my father, and curse the lord of Kabol for a lowborn wretch, and complain about 
how he has treated me. Meanwhile, you should go to the plain where we hunt, 
and have pits dug there. Make them deep enough to swallow up both Rostam 
and Rakhsh, and in the base of the pits plant sharpened stakes, spears, javelins, 
swords, and so on. If you can dig a hundred pits rather than just five, so much 
the better. Get a hundred men together, dig the pits, and don’t breathe a word 
even to the wind. Then cover over the pits’ surface, and see that you mention 
what you’ve done to no one at all.” 

The king’s good sense deserted him, and he gave orders for a banquet to be 
prepared, as this fool had suggested to him. He summoned the chieftains of his 
kingdom to a splendid feast and, when they had eaten, they settled to their wine, 
watching entertainers and listening to musicians. When his head was well-filled 
with royal wine, Shaghad suddenly sprang up and bragged to the king: “I am the 
first in any company— What noble chieftain can compare with me? 

Rostam’s my brother, Zal’s my father, can 
Such boasts be made by any other man?” 


Then the king too sprang up and retorted: 
“This is your constant boast, but it’s not true, 


The tribe of Sam has turned its back on you: 
Rostam is not your brother, when has he 


So much as mentioned your base name to me? 
You’re a slave’s son, not Zal’s. And Rostam’s mother 
Has never said that you’re that hero’s brother.” 


Shaghad was infuriated by his words, and with a few Kaboli warriors he 
immediately set out for Zabolestan, revolving thoughts of vengeance in his heart. 
He entered his noble father’s court in a rage, and when Zal saw his son’s stature 
and splendor he made much of him, questioned him closely, and sent him to 
Rostam. 

Rostam was delighted to see him, thinking of him as a wise and pure hearted 
man, and greeted him warmly: “Sam is a lion, and his progeny produce only 
strong, courageous warriors. How is your life now in Kabol, and what do they 
say about Rostam there?” 

Shaghad’s answer was: “Don’t mention the king of Kabol to me. He treated 
me well before, addressing me with respect, but now as soon as he drinks a little 
wine he becomes quarrelsome, thinking he’s superior to everyone else: he 
humiliated me in front of his courtiers, and talked publicly about my low origins. 
Then he said, ‘How long do we have to pay this tribute? Don’t we have the 
strength to defy Sistan? Don’t tell me, “But it’s Rostam you’re dealing with.” 
He’s no more of a man than I am, and no more nobly born either.’ Then he said 
that I wasn’t Zal’s son; or that, if I was, Zal didn’t care about me. I was ashamed 
to be spoken to like this in front of his chieftains, and when I left Kabol my 
cheeks were pale with fury.” 

Rostam was enraged, and said: “Such talk won’t stay private for long. Don’t 
bother yourself with his army: my curses on his army and on his crown too. I’ll 
destroy him for these words of his, I’1] make him and his whole tribe tremble for 
what he’s said. I’Il place you on his throne, and I’|I drag his luck down into the 
dust.” 

He entertained Shaghad royally for a few days, putting a splendid residence at 
his disposal; then he picked his best warriors and ordered them to get ready to 
travel to Kabol. When the preparations for departure had been made, Shaghad 
came to Rostam and said, “Don’t think of going to war against the king of 
Kabol. I’d only have to trace the letters of your name in water for everyone in 
Kabol to be sleepless with anxiety. Who would dare to stand against you in war, 
and if you set out who is going to wait for you to confront them? I think that by 
now the king must regret what he’s done, that he’s searching for some way to 


neutralize the effects of my departure, and that he’ll send some of his chieftains 
here to apologize.” 

Rostam replied: “Here’s what we should do: there’s no need for me to lead 
my army against Kabol, Zavareh and about a hundred horsemen, together with a 
hundred infantry, should be sufficient.” 


The King of Kabol Prepares the Pits 

As soon as the malignant Shaghad had left Kabol the king hurried off to his 
hunting grounds. He took sappers renowned for their ability from his army, and 
had them excavate pits at various places on the road that led through the area. At 
the bottom of each pit javelins, spears, and sharp swords were stuck into the 
ground. Then the pits were covered over with straw and brush so that neither 
men nor their mounts could see them. 

When Rostam was ready to set out, Shaghad rode on ahead of him and told 
the king of Kabol that Rostam and his men were approaching, and that the king 
should go to meet them and apologize for what he had done. The king came out 
of the city, his tongue ready with glozing talk, his heart filled with poison and 
the longing for vengeance. 

As soon as he saw Rostam he dismounted. He removed his Indian turban and 
placed his hands on his forehead: then he removed his boots, began to weep, and 
bowed his face down to the ground, asking pardon for what he had done to 
Shaghad, saying that if he had spoken intemperately it was because he was 
drunk, and that Rostam should forgive him. He came forward, barefoot, but his 
mind was filled with thoughts of vengeance. 

Rostam forgave him, awarding him new honors, and told him to replace his 
turban and boots, and to remount his horse. 

There was a green, delightful garden in Kabol, filled with streams and trees. 
Seats were set there, and the king ordered that a banquet be brought; then he 
called for wine and musicians to entertain his chieftains and courtiers. Whilst the 
festivities were in progress he turned to Rostam and said: “What would you say 
to a hunting expedition? I have a place near here which includes both open 
country and mountain landscape, and it’s filled with game. There are mountain 
sheep, deer, and wild asses: a man with a good horse can run down any number 
of prey: it’s a pleasure no one should miss.” 

His description of the landscape with its streams and wild asses filled Rostam 
with enthusiasm: 


For when a man’s days reach their end, his mind 
And heart grow undiscerning, dim, and blind: 
The world has no desire that we should see 

The hidden secrets of our destiny. 

The crocodile, the lion, the elephant 

Are one with the mosquito and the ant 

Within the grip of Death: no beast or man 

Lives longer than his life’s allotted span. 


Rostam gave orders that Rakhsh be saddled, and that hunting hawks be made 
ready: he took up his bow, and rode out on the plain with Shaghad. Zavareh and 
a few of their retinue accompanied them. The group dispersed, some going 
toward solid ground, others to where the earth had been excavated; as Fate 
would have it, Zavareh and Rostam went to the area where the pits had been 
dug. But Rakhsh smelt the freshly dug earth: his muscles tensed and he reared up 
in fright, his hooves pawing at the ground. He went forward, placing his hooves 
with care, until he was between two of the pits. Rostam was irritated by his 
caution, and Fate blinded the hero’s wisdom. He lightly touched Rakhsh with his 
whip, and the horse bounded forward, searching for firm ground. But his 
forelegs struck where one of the pits had been dug, and there was nowhere for 
him to find a hold. The base of the pit was lined with spears and sharp swords: 
courage was of no avail, and there was no means of escape. Rakhsh’s flanks 
were lacerated by the weapons, and Rostam’s legs and trunk were pierced by 
them: exerting all his strength, he pulled himself from their points, and raised his 
head above the pit’s edge. 

















When in his agony he opened his eyes, he saw the malignant face of Shaghad 
before him. He knew then that Shaghad had tricked him, and that this evil was 
his doing. He said: “Illfated wretch, what you have done will leave 

Our land a desert where men curse and grieve: 
You will regret your evil, senseless rage; 
Tormented, you will never see old age.” 


Shaghad replied: “The turning heavens have dealt justly with you. How often 
you’ve boasted of the blood you’ve spilt, of your devastation of Iran, and of your 
battles. You won’t be demanding tribute from Kabol any more, and no kings will 
tremble before you now. Your days are at an end, and you shall perish in the 
snare of Ahriman.” 

At that moment the king of Kabol reached them: he saw Rostam’s open, 
bleeding wounds and said, “My lord, what has happened to you here in our 





hunting grounds? I shall hurry to bring doctors to heal your wounds, and to dry 
my tears of sympathy for your suffering.” 

Rostam replied: “Devious and lowborn wretch, the days when doctors could 
help me are over, and you need weep no tears for me. You too will not live long; 
no one passes to the heavens while still alive. I possess no more glory than 
Jamshid, who was hacked in two by Zahhak; and Gerui slit Seyavash’s throat 
when his time had come. All the great kings of Iran, all those who were lions in 
battle, have departed, and we are left here like lions at the wayside. My son 
Faramarz will demand vengeance from you for my death.” Then he tured to 
Shaghad and said: “Now that this evil has come to me, take my bow from its 
case: don’t refuse me this last request. String my bow and put it in front of me, 
together with two arrows: a lion may come looking for prey, and if it sees me 
helpless here it will attack me; my bow will defend me then. And if no lion tears 
my flesh, my body will lie beneath the earth soon enough.” 

Shaghad came forward and took out the bow; he strung it, and pulled back 
the string to test it. Then he laughed and placed it in front of Rostam, filled with 
joy at the thought of his brother’s death. With a mighty effort, Rostam picked up 
the bow, and notched an arrow to the string. His brother was filled with fear at 
the sight of the arrow, and to shield himself he went behind a huge, ancient plane 
tree, the trunk of which was hollow, although it still bore leaves. 

Rostam watched him go, and then, summoning his last strength, he drew back 
the bowstring and released the arrow. The shaft pierced the tree and his brother, 
pinning them to one another, and the dying Rostam’s heart rejoiced to see this. 
Shaghad cried out with the pain of his wound, but Rostam soon put him out of 
his misery. Then he said: “Thanks be to God, to whom for all my days 

I’ve offered worship and unceasing praise 
That now, as night comes on, with my last breath, 
Vengeance and power are mine before my death.” 


With these words his soul left his body, and those who stood nearby lamented 
and wept. 

In another pit Zavareh too died, as did those who had ridden with Rostam, 
both his chieftains and their followers. 


Zal Learns of Rostam’s Death 
But one of his retinue survived and, sometimes riding, sometimes on foot, made 
his way back to Zabolestan, where he said: “Our mammoth warrior is made one 


with the dust; Zavareh too, and all their men, are dead, and only I have escaped 
from the evil that befell them.” 

The noise of mourning was heard throughout Zabolestan, and execrations 
against Shaghad and the king of Kabol. Zal strewed his body with dust, and 
clawed at his face and chest in his grief. 


Then in his agony he cried aloud: 

“All I can bring you, Rostam, is your shroud; 
And Zavareh, that lion chief in war, 

That dragon in close combat, is no more: 

My curses on Shaghad, whose treachery 

Has ripped up by the roots our royal tree. 

Who would have thought a cunning fox could leave 
Our mammoth heroes dead, and me to grieve? 
Why could I not have died before them? Why 
Should I endure the world whilst they must die? 
What’s life to me that I should breathe and live, 
What comfort can my throne or glory give?” 


And he wept bitterly, lamenting Rostam’s departed greatness. His lion 
courage and bravery, his chivalry and good council, his mighty weapons and 
valor in war—all were gone, now that he was one with the earth. 

Then Zal cursed his son’s enemies and summoned Faramarz: he sent him to 
make war on the king of Kabol, to retrieve the dead bodies from the pits, and to 
give the world there cause for lamentation. 

But when Faramarz reached Kabol he found none of the nobility there: they 
had all fled from the town, weeping and terrified by the world-conqueror’s 
death. He made his way to the hunting grounds, where the pits had been dug, and 
when he saw his father’s face, and his body lying on the ground, soaked in 
blood, he roared like a lion in pain. He said: “Great warrior, who has done this 
evil to you? My curses on his boldness, and may dust cover his head in place of 
his crown! I swear by God and by your soul, by the dust of Nariman and Sam, 
that I shall not remove my armor until I have wreaked revenge upon this 
treacherous people for your death. I shall not leave one of those who were any 
part of this plot alive.” 

He removed his father’s armor, and the clothes beneath it, and gently washed 
the blood from his body and beard. The company burnt ambergris and saffron, 


and with it sealed his wounds. Faramarz poured rosewater on his father’s brow, 
and smeared camphor over the body. Then they wrapped him in brocade, over 
which they sprinkled rosewater, musk, and wine. Two great boards were 
necessary to carry his corpse, which seemed more like the trunk of a huge shade- 
giving tree, than the body of a man. A magnificent coffin was made of teak, with 
a design inlaid in ivory, and the nails were of gold: the joints were sealed with 
pitch that had been mixed with musk and ambergris. 

Then Rakhsh’s body was drawn up from the pit and washed, and draped in 
fine brocade: carpenters spent two days making a litter from heavy boards for 
the body, and this was loaded onto an elephant. From Kabol to Zabol the land 
was filled with lamentation. Men and women stood crowded at the wayside to 
see the procession, and the crowds passed the coffins of Rostam and Zavareh 
from hand to hand; so great was the number who did this that the burden seemed 
light as air. The journey took ten days and ten nights, and not once were the 
coffins set down. The world was filled with mourning for Rostam, and the plain 
seemed to seethe with sorrow; so great was the noise that no individual’s voice 
could be heard within the roar of sound. 

In a garden they built a great tomb whose roof reached to the clouds. Within, 
two golden daises were built, on which were laid the dead heroes: freemen and 
slaves came together and poured rosewater mixed with musk over the heroes’ 
feet, and addressed Rostam: “Why is it grief and musk that we must bring 

And not the glory that attends a king? 

You have no need for sovereignty, no need 

For armor, weapons, or your warlike steed, 

Never again will your largesse reward 

Courtiers with gifts from your rich treasure hoard. 
Justice was yours, and truth, and chivalry, 

May joy be yours for all eternity. ” 


Then they sealed the tomb and went on their way: so ended the lion hero who 
had lifted up his head in the world with such pride and valor. 


Faramarz Marches on Kabol 

When his father’s obsequies were completed, Faramarz gathered an army on the 
plain and equipped it from Rostam’s treasury. At dawn the tucket sounded, and 

was answered by the din of drums and Indian bells. The army set out for Kabol, 
the sun obscured by its dust. 


News reached Kabol’s king of their approach: he gathered his scattered army 
together and the ground became a mass of iron armor, while the air was 
darkened with dust. He marched his men out to confront Faramarz, and the sun 
and moon were dimmed. The armies met and the world was filled with the 
sounds of battle. A wind sprang up, and a dust cloud hid the earth and sky: but 
Faramarz at the head of his army never took his eyes from the enemy king. The 
din of drums rang out on each side, and Faramarz together with a small escort 
forced his way into the center of the Kaboli troops. There in the dusty darkness 
stirred up by the cavalry he closed in on the king and captured him. That great 
army scattered, and the warriors of Zabol fell on the retreating men like wolves: 
they ambushed them from every side, and pursued them as they fled. They killed 
so many Indian soldiers, so many warriors from Sind, that the dust of the 
battlefield was turned to mud with their gore: their hearts forgot their country 
and their homes, their wives and little children were left unprotected. 

Kabol’s king, his body covered in blood, was flung into a chest hoisted on an 
elephant’s back. Faramarz led his men to the hunting grounds where the pits had 
been dug. Then the king was dragged forward, with his hands bound, together 
with forty members of his tribe. They trussed the king so tightly that his bones 
showed through his skin, and he was suspended upside down in one of the pits, 
his body covered in filth, his mouth filled with blood. Next Faramarz had a fire 
lit in which the forty members of the king’s family were burnt; then he turned to 
where Shaghad was still pinned to the plane tree. Shaghad’s body, the tree, and 
the surrounding countryside were consumed by flames, that flared up like a great 
mountain of fire. When he set out again for Zabol, he brought the ashes of 
Shaghad to give them to Zal. 

Having killed those who had committed evil, Faramarz appointed a new king 
for Kabol, as the old king’s family had been annihilated. He returned from Kabol 
still filled with fury and grief; the brilliance of his days had turned to darkness. 
All Zabolestan shared his grief, and there was no man who had not rent his 
clothes in mourning. All of Sistan lamented for a year, and all its inhabitants 
wore the black and dark blue clothes of mourning. 


Rudabeh’s Madness 

One day Rudabeh said to Zal: “Weep for Rostam in bitterness of heart, for since 
the world has existed no one has ever seen a darker day than this.” Zal turned on 
her and said, “Foolish woman, the pain of hunger is far worse than this sorrow.” 
Rudabeh was offended and swore an oath, saying: “I shall neither eat nor sleep 


in the hopes that my soul will join Rostam, and see him in that blessed 
company.” 

In her heart she communicated with Rostam’s soul, and for a week she kept 
herself from eating anything. Weakened by hunger, her eyes darkened, and her 
slender body became frail and feeble. Everywhere she went, her serving maids 
followed her, afraid that she would harm herself. By the week’s end her reason 
had deserted her, and she was expected to die. 

When the world was asleep she went into the palace kitchen garden, and there 
she saw a dead snake lying in the pool. She reached down and picked it up by 
the head, intending to eat it, but a serving girl snatched the snake from her hand, 
and the girl’s companions led Rudabeh away to her apartments. They made her 
comfortable, and prepared food for her. She ate whatever they brought, until she 
was full, and then her servants laid her gently on her bed. 

When she woke her reason had returned, and she said to Zal: “What you told 
me was wise: the sorrow of death is like a festival to someone who has neither 
eaten nor slept. He has gone, and we shall follow after him: we trust in the world 
creator’s justice. Then she distributed her secret wealth to the poor, and prayed 
to God: “O Thou, who art above all name and place, 

Wash guilt and worldly sin from Rostam’s face: 
Give him his place in Heaven: let him be shown 
The fruitful harvest of the seeds he’s sown.” 


Bahman and Faramarz 

Goshtasp’s fortunes declined, and he summoned his councilor, Jamasp. He said 
to him: “My heart is seared with such sorrow for this business of Esfandyar that 
not one day of my life passes in pleasure: malignant stars have destroyed me. 
After me, Bahman will be king, and Pashutan will be his confidant. Keep faith 
with Bahman, and obey him: guide him in his duties, point by point, and he will 
add luster to the throne and crown.” 

He handed Bahman the keys to his treasury, and heaved a cold and bitter 
sigh. Then he said: “My work is over; the waters overtop my head. I have 
reigned for a hundred and twenty years, and I have seen no one else with my 
power in all the world. Strive to act justly, and if you do you will escape from 
sorrow. Keep wise men near you and treat them well, darken the world of those 
who wish you ill: act righteously, and you will avoid both deviousness and 
failure. I give you my throne, my diadem, and my wealth: I have experienced 
enough sorrow and grief.” He spoke, and his days on the earth came to an end. 


They built a tomb for him of ebony and ivory, and his crown was suspended 
over the coffin. 

When Bahman ascended his grandfather’s throne he acted with decision and 
generosity, giving his army cash, and distributing land among them. He called a 
council of the wise, the noble, and those experienced in the ways of the world. 

He said to them: “All of you, old and young, who have gracious souls, surely 
remember Esfandyar’s life and the good and evil that Fate dealt him: and you 
recall what Rostam and that old wizard Zal did to him in the prime of his life. 
Openly and covertly Faramarz does nothing but plot vengeance against us. My 
head is filled with pain, my heart with blood, and my brain is empty of 
everything but thoughts of revenge: revenge for our two warriors Nushazar and 
Mehrnush, whose agonies caused such sorrow, and revenge for Esfandyar who 
had revived the fortunes of our nobility, who was slain in Zabolestan, for whose 
death the very beasts were maddened with grief, and the frescoed portraits in our 
palaces wept. 

“Our ancestors, when they were brave young warriors, did not hide their 
valor in obscurity, but acted as the glorious king Feraydun did, who destroyed 
Zabhak in revenge for the blood of Jamshid. And Manuchehr brought an army 
from Amol and marched against Salm and the barbarous Tur, pursuing them to 
China in pursuit of vengeance for his grandfather’s death. I too shall leave such a 
tale behind me. When Kay Khosrow escaped from Afrasyab’s clutches he made 
the world like a lake of blood: my father demanded vengeance for Lohrasp, and 
piled the earth with a mountain of dead. And Faramarz, who exalts himself 
above the shining sun, went to Kabol pursuing vengeance for his father’s blood, 
and razed the whole province to the ground: blood obscured all the land, and 
men rode their horses over the bodies of the dead. I, who ride out against raging 
lions, am more worthy than anyone to take revenge, since my vengeance will be 
for the peerless Esfandyar. Tell me how this matter appears to you; what answer 
can you give me? Try to give me wise advice.” 

When they heard Bahman’s words everyone who wished him well said with 
one voice: “We are your slaves, our hearts are filled with goodwill toward you. 
You know more about what has happened in the past than we do, and you are 
more capable than any other warrior: do what you will in the world, and may 
you win praise and glory for your deeds. No one will refuse your orders, or 
break faith with you.” 

Hearing this answer Bahman became more intent on vengeance than ever, 
and prepared to invade Sistan. At daybreak the din of drums resounded, and the 


air was darkened by his armies’ dust: a hundred thousand mounted warriors set 
out. 

When he reached the banks of the River Hirmand he sent a messenger to Zal. 
He was to say on behalf of Bahman: “My days have been turned to bitterness 
because of what happened to Esfandyar, and to the two worthy princes Nushazar 
and Mehrnush. I will fill all the land of Sistan with blood, to slake my longing 
for vengeance.” 

The messenger arrived in Zabol and spoke as he had been instructed: Zal’s 
heart was wrung with sorrow, and he said: “If the prince will consider what 
happened to Esfandyar, he will see that this was a fated event, and that I too 
suffered because of it. You were here, and saw all that happened, both the good 
and the evil, but from me you have only seen profit, and no loss. Rostam did not 
ignore your father’s orders, and his fealty to him was heartfelt. But Esfandyar, 
who was a great king, in his last days became overbearing toward Rostam: even 
the lion in his thicket, and the savage dragon cannot escape the claws of Fate. 

“And you have heard of Sam’s chivalrous deeds, which he continued until 
Rostam, in his turn, drew his sharp sword from its scabbard. Rostam’s heroism 
in battle was witnessed by your forebears, and he acted as your servant, your 
nurse, your guide in the ways of warfare. Day and night I weep and mourn for 
my dead son, my heart is filled with pain, my two cheeks have tumed sallow 
with grief, and my lips are blue with my sufferings: my curses on the one who 
overthrew him, and on the man who guided him to do so. If you can consider the 
sorrow we now endure, and think well of us, if you can drive these thoughts of 
vengeance from your heart, and brighten our land with your mercy, I shall lay 
before you golden belts and golden bridles, and all my son’s treasures and Sam’s 
cash: you are our king, and our chieftains are your flock.” 

He gave the messenger a horse and money, and many other presents. But 
when the messenger reached Bahman and told him what he had seen and heard, 
the king refused to accept Zal’s words, and flew into a rage. He entered the city 
with pain in his heart, and still revolving thoughts of vengeance. Zal and the 
nobility of Sistan rode out to welcome him: when he drew near to Bahman, Zal 
dismounted, made his obeisance before him, and said: “This is a time for 
forgiveness, to put aside suffering and the desire for vengeance. I, Zal, stand 
before you, wretched and supported by a staff: remember how good I was to you 
when you were young. Forgive the past and speak of it no more: seek honor, 
rather than revenge for those who have been killed.” 


But Bahman so despised Zal that his words enraged the king: without further 
ado he had Zal’s legs shackled and, ignoring the protests of both councilor and 
treasurer, he gave orders for camels to be loaded with the goods in the castle. 
Cash, uncut gems, thrones and fine cloth, silver and golden vessels, golden 
crowns, earrings, and belts, Arab horses with bridles worked in gold, Indian 
swords in golden scabbards, slaves, bags of coins, musk, camphor—all the 
wealth that Rostam had accumulated with such effort, or received as presents 
from kings and chieftains, was collected and taken. Purses and crowns were 
distributed to Bahman’s nobility, and Zabolestan was given over to plunder. 


Faramarz Makes War on Bahman 

Faramarz was in the marches of Bost when he heard this; outraged by the 
treatment meted out to his grandfather, he prepared to take his revenge. His 
chieftains gathered about him and he said: “Zavareh would often sigh and say to 
my father that Bahman would seek revenge for the death of Esfandyar, and that 
this threat should not be taken lightly. But, for all his experience of the world, 
my father wouldn’t listen to him, and this is the reason that his territories are 
now laid waste. When his grandfather died Bahman ascended the throne, and 
raised his crown to the moon’s sphere; now that he’s king he’s once again intent 
on revenge for Esfandyar, and for Mehrnush and Nushazar too. He wants to 
destroy us as vengeance for their deaths, and he’s led here from Iran an army 
like a black cloud. He’s arrested and bound in chains my revered grandfather, 
who was a shield to the Persians in their wars, and always held himself ready to 
serve them. What will happen to our people now, what disasters will close in 
from every side? My father has been slain, my grandfather languishes in chains, 
all our land has been given over to plunder, and I am half mad with the grief of 
all this: well, my noble warriors, what have you to say about our situation?” 

They answered him: “O bright souled hero, whose leadership has been passed 
down from father to father, we are all your slaves, and live only for your orders.” 

When he heard this, Faramarz’s heart was filled with longing for vengeance, 
his head with thoughts of how to save his family’s honor: he put on his armor 
and led his army against Bahman, and as he marched he rehearsed in his mind 
Rostam’s battles. 

When the news reached Bahman he acted immediately: he had the baggage 
trains loaded up, and then led his army toward Ghur, where he stayed for two 
weeks. Faramarz pursued him, and his cavalry turned the world black with their 
dust. For his part Bahman drew up his battle lines, and the shining sun could no 


longer see the ground. The mountains rang with the squeal of trumpets and the 
clanging of Indian bells. The sky seemed to soak the world in pitch, arrows 
rained down from the clouds like dew, and the earth seemed to shudder with the 
din of battleaxe blows, the humming of released bowstrings. For three days and 
nights, by sunlight and moonlight, maces and arrows rained down and the sky 
was filled with clouds of dust. On the fourth day a wind sprang up, and it was as 
if day had turned to night: the wind blew against Faramarz and his troops, and 
king Bahman rejoiced to see this. His sword drawn, he charged forward, 
following the billowing dust clouds, and raised such a hue and cry it seemed that 
the Last Judgment had come. The men of Bost, the army from Zabol, the 
warriors of Kabol, all were slaughtered or fled, and not one of their chieftains 
remained. All tured tail and forgot their allegiance to Faramarz: all the 
battlefield was strewn with mountainous piles of bodies of men from both sides. 

With a few remaining warriors, his body covered in sword wounds, Faramarz 
fought on, for he was a lion fighter, descended from a race of lions. Finally, the 
long arm of Bahman’s might caught him, and he was dragged before the king. 
Bahman glared at him in fury, and denied him all mercy. While still alive, 
Faramarz’s body was hoisted upside down on a gibbet; and Bahman gave orders 
that he be killed in a storm of arrows. 


Bahman Frees Zal and Returns to Iran 

Pashutan was the king’s trusted advisor, and he was very troubled by this 
execution. Humbly he stood before his royal master and said: “Lord of Justice 
and Righteousness, if you desired vengeance you have achieved it. You would 
do well to give no more orders for plunder, killing, and warfare, and you should 
not take pleasure in such tumult. Fear God, and show shame before us: look at 
the turnings of the heavens, how they raise one to greatness, and cast another 
down to wretchedness and grief. Did not your great father, who brought the 
world beneath his command, find his coffin in Sistan? Was not Rostam lured to 
the hunting grounds in Kabol, and there destroyed in a pit? While you live my 
noble lord you should not harass those of exalted birth. You should tremble that 
Sam’s son Zal complains of his fetters, since his stars will advocate his cause 
before God who keeps us all. And think of Rostam, who protected the Persian 
throne, and who was prompt to undergo all hardships for Persia’s sake: it is 
because of him that this crown has come down to you, not because of Goshtasp 
and Esfandyar. Consider, from the time of Kay Qobad to that of Kay Khosrow, it 


was because of his sword that the kings were able to reign. If you are wise you 
will free Zal from his chains, and turn your heart away from evil paths.” 

When the king heard Pashutan’s advice, he regretted the pain he had caused, 
and his old longing for revenge. A cry went up from the royal pavilion: “My 
noble chieftains, prepare for our return to Iran and stop this rampage of plunder 
and killing.” He gave orders that Zal’s legs were to be freed from their fetters, 
and, as Pashutan suggested, he had a tomb built for the slain Faramarz. Zal was 
brought from the prison to his palace, and there his wife Rudabeh wept bitterly 
when she saw him, saying: “Alas for Rostam, for his noble race, 

Our hero lies in his last resting place, 

And when he lived, who could have guessed or known 
That Goshtasp would ascend the royal throne? 

His wealth is gone, his father’s now a slave, 

His noble son lies murdered in the grave. 

May no one ever know such grief, or see 

The fateful sorrows that have come to me! 

My curses on them: may the earth be freed 

From Bahman and his evil father’s seed!” 


News of her rage reached Bahman and Pashutan, and Pashutan grieved to 
hear of Rudabeh’s pain: his cheeks turned sallow with grief and he said to 
Bahman, “O king, when the moon has passed her zenith tonight, as dawn comes 
on, lead your army away from here. This business has grown weighty and 
serious: I pray that those who wish you evil cannot harm your crown, and that all 
your days may be passed in joy and festivities. My lord, it would be better if you 
remained in Zal’s palace no longer.” 

When the mountain tops turned red in the rising sun, the din of drums rang 
out from the court, and Bahman, who had looked for vengeance for so long, 
commanded that the army be drawn up in marching order. Drums, trumpets, and 
Indian bells sounded in the royal pavilion, and the army set out for home, as 
Pashutan had suggested. When they reached Iran Bahman rested at last, and sat 
himself on the imperial throne. He gave himself to the business of government, 
distributing money to the poor; and some were pleased with his reign, while 
others lived in grief and sorrow. 


B ahman, now also referred to as Ardeshir, had a son called Sasan. He also 
had a beautiful daughter named Homay, with whom he fell in love, and he slept 
with her, “according to the custom called Pahlavi.” When Homay was six 
months pregnant, Bahman became ill, and, realizing he was going to die, he 
resigned his throne to Homay and her heirs. 


But when Sasan heard this, in rage and shame, 

He fled to Nayshapour, forsook his fame, 

And inconspicuously lived out his life. 

A well-born local girl became his wife 

And she in time bore him a son, whom he 

Named Sasan too. Then, unexpectedly, 

The elder Sasan died. The son was wise 

But poverty obscured him from men’s eyes 

And as a shepherd he was forced to keep 

The King of Nayshapour’s rich flocks of sheep. 

From this lowly shepherd would come the last of the great pre-Islamic 
dynasties of Iran, the Sasanians. 


THE STORY OF DARAB AND THE FULLER 


Homay Entrusts Her Son to the Euphrates 

Bahman, also called Ardeshir, fell sick and died, and the throne became vacant. 
Homay, his daughter, who was pregnant by him, placed the crown on her own 
head and began a new reign. She reviewed the army and distributed wealth from 
her treasury, and as she inaugurated her rule she announced to the world her 
justice and generosity. Calling down blessings on the crown and throne, she 
cursed any who wished her ill, promised that she would act benevolently and 
harm no one, that she would help the poor, and that the rich and powerful had 
nothing to fear from her. Her wisdom and justice surpassed her father’s, and the 
world flourished beneath her righteous reign. 

When the time came for her to give birth, she hid herself away from the army 
and townsfolk. She enjoyed the fact that the throne was hers, and that the world 
was in her hands. Her son was born in secret, and she told no one, keeping the 
boy hidden. Secretly she entrusted the prince to a nobly born wet nurse and told 
anyone who had got wind of his birth that the boy had died. And so she kept the 
crown on her own head, victorious and happy in her occupancy of the throne. 
She sent her armies against powerful enemies wherever they sprang up, and 
nothing good or bad that happened in the world remained hidden from her. 
Everywhere, she pursued justice and righteousness and ruled well. The world 
became safe under her care, and the people of every country praised her. 

So eight months passed, but then the young prince began to resemble the 
dead king. Homay ordered a trustworthy carpenter to choose wood that could be 
delicately carved. She had him make a small chest, which was smeared outside 
with pitch, musk, and wax, and lined with soft brocade from Greece. A little 
mattress sewn with precious pearls was placed inside, and red gold together with 
rubies and emeralds were lavishly scattered there. A jeweled clasp was fastened 
to the still unweaned prince’s arm. 


Then while the unsuspecting baby slept 


His nurse embraced him and profusely wept; 
She laid the boy to whom she’d fed her milk 
Within the chest, beneath a shawl of silk. 

The lid was fastened down with pitch and musk; 
Now, silently, as night succeeded dusk, 

They took the casket to the riverside 

And launched it on the quickly flowing tide. 
Two men detailed to watch it through the night 
Were forced to run to keep the chest in sight— 
It bobbed along as if it were a boat. 

The broad Euphrates kept the craft afloat 

And bore it downstream on its watery way 
Until the sunrise brought another day. 


A Fuller Brings Up Homay’s Son 

At dawn the chest bumped against the riverbank. It had reached a place where 
the river had been deliberately narrowed, and stones had been placed in the 
channel; fullers worked there, washing and bleaching clothes. One of them 
caught sight of the little craft and ran over to free it from where it had stuck. 
When he opened the chest, and drew aside the rich cloths within, he was 
astonished at what he saw. He wrapped the chest in the clothes he’d been 
washing and ran home with it, full of hopes that this would mean a change in his 
fortunes. Meanwhile, the men detailed to watch what happened to the chest 
quickly went back to the palace and reported to Homay all that had occurred. 
The queen told them that they must not reveal to anyone else what they had seen. 

When the man who had found the chest arrived at his house unexpectedly, his 
wife said, “What brings you home at this time, with the clothes all wet still? 
Who’s going to pay you for work like that?” 

It happened that the couple had had a fine baby boy who had recently died, 
and the fuller’s heart was still grieving for his lost child; his wife too was still 
weeping and groaning, and had scratched her face with her nails in her grief. The 
man said to her, “Come on now, pull yourself together, all this crying and 
moaning isn’t doing you any good. Now, promise you’! keep a secret, my dear, 
and I’1l tell you something worth hearing. Next to the boulder where I beat the 
clothes, where I throw the clean clothes into the water to rinse them, I saw a little 
chest stuck in the channel, and hidden inside it was a baby. When I opened the 
lid and saw the little mite inside I could scarcely believe my eyes. Our own little 


one died after a short life, but now you’ve found another son, and there’s money 
with him and all manner of finery.” 

Then he set the clothes down on the floor, unwrapped them, and opened the 
chest; his wife stared in astonishment and called down God’s blessings on the 
baby over and over again. She stared at the infant’s shining face, which looked 
like Ardeshir’s, nestled in the silk, and at the pearls sewn into the mattress, the 
rubies and emeralds by his feet, the red gold piled on his left, and the royal 
jewels to his right. Quickly, overwhelmed with joy, she set the baby to her milk- 
filled breast; the little child and the wealth that was with him made her forget all 
her sorrows. Her husband said to her, “We must always protect this child, even 
at the risk of our own lives. He must be the son of someone important; perhaps 
he’s one of the world’s princes.” The fuller’s wife cared for the child as if he 
were her own. On the third day they named the child, and because he had been 
plucked from flowing water [ab], they called him Darab. 

One day the fuller’s wife, who was a sensible woman, said to him, “What are 
you going to do about the jewels? What do you think would be the wisest 
course?” He answered, “My dear, hidden jewels are no more use to me than dirt 
is. It’s better that we leave this town and all our past poverty and difficulties 
behind. We should go to a town where people don’t know whether we’re rich or 
poor.” The next morning they packed up their household and quitted their home, 
and they gave their country no further thought. They carried Darab in their arms 
and took with them the jewels and gold, and that was all. They traveled for about 
two hundred miles, and then settled in a town where they were strangers. Here 
they lived as relatively well-to-do people, being careful to placate the local lord 
with gifts of jewels, and he sent them cloth and cash in return. The wife, who 
was always giving her husband advice, said to him, “We don’t need to work any 
more: you’re a rich man now, and you needn’t worry about looking for a trade to 
follow.” But the fuller answered, “My dear, you’re a sensible woman and you 
give good advice, but what’s better than what you call a ‘trade’? A trade is the 
best thing a man can have. And yours is to bring up Darab properly and well, 
until we see what fate has in store for him.” They brought up the child with such 
care and tenderness that no harsh wind ever harmed him. 

In a few years he grew into a fine boy, strong, and with the royal farr visible 
in him. He’d challenge older boys in the street to wrestling matches and none of 
them were his equals in strength; then they’d rush at him in a group, but he 
would defeat them all. The fuller became exasperated with him. His own 
fortunes had declined, and he ordered the boy to beat clothes against the rocks 


with him, saying there was no shame in this. And when Darab ran away from the 
work, the man wept tears of rage and grief. He had to spend a good part of each 
day looking for the boy, either in the town or out on the plain. Once he found 
him with a bow in his hand and a thumbstall to protect his thumb as he loosed 
the arrows. He took the bow from him and coldly said, “You’re acting like a 
vicious, uncontrollable wolf: what business can you have with a bow and arrow? 
Why have you become such a troublesome young man?” 


And Darab answered, “Father, why must you 
Muddy the stream of everything I do? 

Send me to someone learned, one who teaches 
The customs that the Zend-Avesta preaches; 
Then you can put me to a trade. But don’t 
Think I'll be settled yet, because I won’t.” 


The fuller remonstrated with him for a long time but finally sent him to a group 
of teachers, where he learned to be a cultivated young man and stopped being so 
abusive and stubborn. Nevertheless he told his father, “I’m not cut out to wash 
clothes; stop worrying about me. The one thing I want in the world is to bea 
horseman.” His father found a fine horseman, a man with a good reputation as a 
horse-tamer who was also skillful with the bridle. He sent his son to him, and 
there Darab learned all that pertained to horsemanship: the use of the bridle, 
lance, and shield, how to control a horse in battle, how to play polo, how to 
shoot with a bow from the saddle, how to seek honor, and how to evade the 
enemy’s reach. 


Darab Questions the Fuller’s Wife About Himself and Becomes a 
Knight One day Darab said to his father, “There’s something I’ve 
kept hidden. I don’t feel any instinctive love for you, and your face 
doesn’t resemble mine at all. It always surprises me when you call 
me ‘son’ and when you make me sit with you at your work.” The 
fuller answered, “These words of yours bring back old sorrows. If 
you feel your nature is above mine, then go and find your father. 
Your mother knows the secret of all that business.” And when the 
fuller left one day for the river, Darab locked the house door and 
came before his mother with a sword in his hand. He said to her, 


“Don’t try any tricks or lies; give me an honest answer to everything 
I’m going to ask you. How am I related to you? Whose family do I 
belong to? And why am I living here with someone who washes 
clothes?” 

The man’s wife was terrified and begged Darab not to harm her. Invoking 
God to protect her, she said, “Don’t spill my blood; I’ ll tell you everything 
you’ve asked.” And then she described without prevarication all that had 
occurred, telling him about the chest containing the unweaned baby and about 
the coins and royal jewels. She went on, “We were folk who worked with our 
hands; we weren’t from a wealthy family. All we have in the way of fine clothes 
and wealth is from you. We served you and brought you up, but it’s for you to 
give the orders. We are yours body and soul, and you must decide what’s to be 
done.” 

Darab was amazed when he heard all this, and he brooded for a while before 
saying anything. Then he asked, “Is there any of the wealth left, or has your 
husband spent it all? We live wretchedly enough these days, but is there enough 
left to buy me a horse?” The woman answered, “There’s more than enough left 
for that, and besides we’ve bought profitable woodland, orchards, and pasture.” 
She gave him some money and showed him the jeweled clasp. Darab used the 
money to buy a fine horse, a cheap saddle, and a lariat. 

There was a great lord of the marches living in the neighborhood, a dignified 
and wise man able to give good guidance. His soul troubled by dark thoughts, 
Darab presented himself before this man, who took him into his service and saw 
that he came to no harm. It so happened that an army from the west attacked and 
began plundering the area. The lord was killed in battle, and his troops were left 
leaderless. When Homay heard this she sent her general, Reshnavad, to drive the 
enemy back and to destroy their strongholds. Reshnavad gathered an army and 
inspected and provisioned it. Darab was overjoyed at the news of the expedition 
and hurried to register his name as a warrior. Troops poured in from all sides, 
and when they were amassed Homay and her military chiefs came out of the 
palace to watch the troops pass by and be counted and to have their names 
checked. She caught sight of Darab and the farr radiating from him. With his 
great strength and the massive mace on his shoulders, it seemed as though only 
he were on the plain, and that the ground was there merely to bear his warhorse. 
And as she stared at his chest and his handsome face, her maternal breasts 
flowed with milk. She said to one of her entourage, “Where is that knight from? 
The one who seems to be such a strong, splendid young man? He looks like a 


nobleman, like a knight who’s experienced in warfare, brave, proud, and 
dignified, but his weapons aren’t worthy of him.” 

The army met with her approval, and she selected an auspicious day for them 
to begin the campaign. The leaders agreed on their strategy and led the army 
away. Homay sent her agents with them, so that nothing that transpired would be 
hidden from her and she would know everything that went on in the army, 
whether of good or evil, and her worries would be laid to rest. The army set out, 
filling the plain, marching by stages beneath the moon. 


Reshnavad Learns the Truth About Darab 

One day a violent wind began to blow; thunder crashed and the sky was filled 
with rain and lightning. The land was awash with water, and the army fled in all 
directions, trying to get out of the rain and looking for places to pitch their tents. 
The commander Reshnavad was worried by this turn of events. Darab too was 
bewildered by what was happening and tried to escape from the heavy rain. He 
Saw a mass of ruins with an archway that was still standing. High, ancient, and 
crumbling, it looked as if it had once been part of a royal edifice. Darab had no 
palace hall or women’s quarters at his disposal, not even a tent or a companion 
or pack animals; he was alone and friendless, and he had no choice but to sleep 
beneath the crumbling archway. 

While Reshnavad was trying to round up his scattered troops he happened to 
pass by the archway, and he heard a roaring sound coming from the ruins that 
seemed to say, “O ruined arch, be on your guard and keep 

The Persian king you shelter safe in sleep; 
He had no tent or friend, and so he lies 
Beneath you, sheltering from the stormy skies.” 


Reshnavad said to himself, “Is that the noise of thunder, or is it the howling 
wind?” And then he heard the roar again, “O arch, keep wisdom’s eyes awake, 
take care, 

King Ardeshir’s young son lies sleeping there.” 


And the roar sounded for a third time, at which he turned in astonishment to an 
advisor and said, “What can this mean? Someone should go and investigate who 
is sleeping under that arch.” A group went and saw a young man lying there; he 
looked both wise and warrior-like, but his clothes and horse were soaking wet 
and filthy, and his bed was the black earth. When Reshnavad was told what they 


had seen, the commander’s heart beat faster and he said, “Call him here quickly: 
who could endure to hear such a roar as we heard?” They went back and called 
out, “Hey, you lying asleep on the ground, wake up, get on your feet!” As Darab 
mounted his horse, the arch collapsed. Reshnavad fixed his eyes on Darab, 
scanning him from head to toe, and said, “This is a marvel among marvels, 
nothing more wonderful could be imagined.” Then he hurried the young man to 
his pavilion, praising God as they went. He ordered clothes to be brought and a 
place to be set aside for Darab. They lit a large fire on which they burned 
sandalwood, musk, and ambergris. 

When the sun rose above the mountain top, Reshnavad took a complete set of 
clothes, a saddled horse with a golden bridle, a bow, and a sword in a golden 
sheath to Darab. As he presented them, he said to the young man, “You’re 
lionhearted, a fine young man eager for fame, but who are you, what’s your 
lineage, and what country are you from? It would be best for you to tell me the 
truth.” Darab told Reshnavad everything, just as the woman he had thought was 
his mother had explained it to him. He told him about the chest and the rubies, 
the jeweled clasp on his arm, the gold coins, the brocade in which he had been 
wrapped, and his sleep in the casket where he had been concealed. At once 
Reshnavad said to a messenger, “Go like the wind and bring the fuller and his 
wife here; bring me this Mars and Venus, both of them.” 

The army then marched to the frontier with Greece, and Darab was made 
leader of the advance guard, the tips of whose spears had been dipped in poison. 
They met with the vanguard of a Greek force patrolling the borderlands. 
Suddenly the two armies were face to face, and the dust of battle rose into the 
sky. They fought hand to hand, and blood flowed like a river. Quick as wind- 
blown dust, Darab urged his horse into the melée and killed so many of the 
enemy soldiers that it seemed as if heaven itself wielded his sword. It was as if a 
lion attacked, a lion grasping a monster as a weapon and with a dragon for his 
mount. The lion pressed on to the Greek camp, guided by his sword’s search for 
victims, till the earth was awash with a sea of Greek blood. Having routed the 
enemy forces Darab returned in triumph to his commander. Reshnavad showered 
him with praise and said, “May the royal army never lack your presence. When 
we get back to civilization from this Greek expedition, you’ ll be richly rewarded 
by the queen; she’ ll give you horses, seal rings, swords, and diadems.” All night 
the army prepared its armor and horses for the coming day, and when the sun 
rose, illuminating the land like a lamp, the two armies met again and the dust of 
their encounter darkened the sun. Darab launched his attack, releasing the reins 


of his charger. He slew all the champions who rode forward from the Greek 
ranks and like a wolf made for their army’s heart, scattering the huge force 
before him. From there he turned against their right flank, plundering weapons 
and baggage as he went, with their troops fleeing from him pell-mell. The 
Persian warriors followed in his wake like lions, killing so many of the Greek 
troops that the ground turned to a quagmire with their blood. Darab killed forty 
of their priests and returned to his own lines with a captured cross in his fist. 
When Reshnavad saw the wonders Darab performed, his heart bounded with joy; 
again he showered Darab with praise, adding words of affection as well. Then 
night came on, the world tured black as pitch, and everyone turned back from 
the battlefield. 

Reshnavad made his headquarters in the captured Greek camp; there he rested 
and loosened his sword belt. When it came to the distribution of plunder, he first 
sent someone to Darab, telling him to take what he would like and to distribute 
the rest as he saw fit, as he was a finer warrior than even the great Rostam. 
Darab chose a fine lance and passed everything else back to Reshnavad, wishing 
him victory and joy in the days to come. 

After sunset, as darkness spread, it was as if a cloth of black brocade had 
covered the army. The commander made the rounds of the camp guards, and 
their shouts re-echoed in the darkness like the rumbling of an earthquake, or the 
roar of a wild lion. When the sun lifted its golden shield again, the sleeping 
warriors woke, donned their armor once more, and set off in pursuit of the Greek 
forces. They torched the towns they came on, and the name of Greece was 
obliterated from the land. Lamenting was heard throughout Greece for the loss 
of territory: its king felt himself hemmed in by the world’s fury, and his 
noblemen turned pale with shame and fear. His messenger arrived before 
Reshnavad, saying, “May your queen be just to us: we who desired war are 
exhausted by it, and Greece’s fortunes have declined. If you desire us to pay 
taxes, we will pay them; let us renew the peace treaty between us.” The Greek 
king also sent gifts of many kinds, in addition to numerous slaves bearing purses 
of cash. Reshnavad accepted whatever was sent, which included gold coins and 
uncut jewels. 


Homay Recognizes Her Son 

Darab and Reshnavad returned in triumph to the ruined arch where Darab had 
been found sleeping. Filled with fear and foreboding, the man who had found 
him in the chest, together with his wife, who had brought the jeweled clasp, were 


waiting for them, and as the two of them were called forward, they entrusted 
themselves to God’s protection. Reshnavad questioned them closely, and they 
told him all they could remember about the chest and the uncut jewel. 
Reshnavad said to them, “May you be prosperous now and live in glory, 

For no one’s ever heard so strange a story, 

No priest or chronicler has ever told 

A tale like this the two of you unfold.” 
Immediately he wrote to Homay, telling her of Darab’s sleep in the ruin and of 
his valor on the battlefield, of how the moment he mounted his horse the arch 
collapsed, of how a voice had resounded from the arch, and of the dread that he, 
Reshnavad, had felt on hearing it. Then he added all that the fuller had said 
concerning the chest, the baby it contained, and the riches. Next, he summoned a 
messenger, gave him the red jeweled clasp, and said, “Make the wind your 
partner as you travel.” The man brought the jewel to Homay, handed over the 
letter, and told the queen what he had heard from Reshnavad’s lips. And when 
she saw the jewel and read the letter, tears spilled from her eyelashes. She knew 
that the tall, splendid young man with a face as fresh as the springtime, the man 
she had seen that day she reviewed the troops drawn up on the plain, was none 
other than her own son, a noble shoot of her own stock. Weeping, she said to the 
messenger, “A master has come to the world. My mind has never been free from 
care; I have been filled with anxiety for the empire, fearing God and brooding on 
my ingratitude to him.” 

Coins were liberally distributed, wine, musk, and jewels were mixed together, 
and for a week the doors of Homay’s treasury stood open to relieve the poor. 
Wealth was given to all her provinces, and on the tenth day her army 
commander, together with his officers and Darab, entered the court. But nothing 
had been divulged concerning Darab’s identity. 

For a week, by the queen’s order, the curtain signifying that the court was 
closed to outsiders remained in place. She had a golden dais prepared, as well as 
two thrones studded with turquoise and lapis lazuli, a crown encrusted with royal 
jewels, two armbands, a jeweled torque, and royal clothes woven with gold and 
jewels. An astrologer sat before the queen, calculating the most propitious day 
for what she planned. Then, on the fourth day of the month of Bahman, the 
queen gave audience to Darab. She filled a bow! with rubies and another with 
topaz stones. As Darab approached she came forward and made her obeisance 
before him; she scattered the precious stones before him and, turning aside, wept 
bitterly. She clasped her son tightly to her breast, kissing him and running her 


fingers over his face; then she led him to the golden dais and stared at him in 
wonder. When he had taken his place on the throne, Homay brought the royal 
crown and placed it on his head, and in this way proclaimed his coronation to the 
world. As light flashed from the crown, Homay begged forgiveness for the past, 
asking him to consider all that had happened as the wind that passes by: her 
youth and sudden wealth and woman’s wiles, his father dead, and her position as 
a queen bereft of good counsel. She hoped he would pardon her evil deed, and 
from now on occupy no seat but the throne. 

The young prince answered his mother, “You are descended from champions, 
and it’s no surprise that ambition bubbled up in your heart. Why should you 
weep and wail so much for one bad act? May the Creator be pleased with you, 
and may the hearts of those who wish you ill be filled with smoke and dust. The 
things you talk about will ensure that I’m remembered, and my story will never 
grow old.” Then Homay in her splendor called down blessings on his head and 
said, “May you endure as long as the world endures!” 

Then the chief priest was called, and the wise men of every province, together 
with the army’s warlike chieftains: all were commanded to hail Darab as their 
sovereign, and as they did so, jewels were scattered over the throne. Homay 
confessed to what she had done in secret, and to the terrible suffering this had 
caused her. “Know,” she said, “that in all the world this prince is the sole heir to 
King Bahman: everyone must obey him, for he is the shepherd and his warriors 
are his sheep. Greatness, sovereignty and military might belong to him, and it is 
your duty to support him.” A shout of joy went up from the palace, and men said 
that they had seen a new shoot of the royal stock. So many gifts were brought 
from all sides that the young king was almost smothered by them: the world was 
filled with rejoicing and justice, and old sufferings were forgotten. Homay said 
to the priests, “I have handed over the empire and all its wealth to him, these 
things that have caused me such sorrow for thirty-two years. Rejoice and obey 
him, and take no breath without his advice.” 

Darab took his place on the throne with pleasure and wore the crown in 
contentment. Then the fuller and his wife appeared, and cried out, “Young 
prince, may the royal throne bring you good luck, and may your enemies’ heads 
be severed at the neck!” Darab ordered that ten purses of gold and a goblet of 
jewels, together with five bolts of various cloths, be given to them for all they 
had done and suffered. He said to the man, “Keep to your trade, and stay always 
alert: it may be that you’ll find a chest with a little prince in it!” The couple left 


the court calling down blessings on the king; the fuller’s fate was fulfilled, and 
he returned to his trade and the alkali ashes with which he cleaned clothes. 


The Reign of Darab 

When Darab was crowned he prepared himself to be a warrior and a generous 
benefactor to his people. He addressed his priests, counselors, and chieftains: “I 
did not scheme and struggle to rule the earth; God placed the crown on my head. 
No one in the world has ever heard a more remarkable tale than mine, and I 
know of no greater reward for justice than to be praised after my death. No one 
must suffer because of my ambition, or because I accumulate wealth. May the 
land prosper through my justice, and my subjects live in happiness.” 
Representatives came from India and Greece and from every inhabited country, 
bringing gifts and wishing the new king health and prosperity. 


Darab Defeats Sho’ayb 

And then a hundred thousand warlike Arabs attacked, under the leadership of a 
chieftain from the Qotayb tribe, called Sho’ayb. The king of Iran mustered 
innumerable troops, and when the two armies met, the world was filled with 
terror and destruction. The earth could hardly bear the weight of such forces, and 
such was the press of troops that no one could find a way through them. The 
land was awash with blood from the rain of javelins and arrows; cries resounded 
from all sides, and everywhere heaps of dead bodies could be seen. The battle 
lasted for three days and nights, and both sides were hard pressed, but on the 
fourth night the Arabs tured tail, abandoning the battlefield. Sho’ayb had been 
killed in the fighting, and the tide of battle had turned against the Arabs. In their 
flight they left behind many Arab horses with their poplar wood saddles, as well 
as lances, swords, and helmets. Homay’s son distributed the plunder to his 
soldiers and chose a man from the army who understood Arabic to be lord of the 
marches. He sent this man to the plains where the Arabs lived, to demand that 
year’s and the previous year’s tribute. 


Darab Fights Against Filqus and Marries His Daughter 

After Darab had defeated the Arabs, he marched his army against Greece. The 
king there was a man called Filqus, who was in league with the king of Susa. 
This man wrote to Filqus, saying that Homay’s son was attacking with an 
enormous army. When the Greek king heard this, he remembered the ancient 


feud between the two countries and gathered together an army of experienced 
warriors from the district of Amourieh. As Darab approached, the Greek nobles 
abandoned the border areas, while Filqus led his army down from Amourieh. 
Two fierce battles were fought during three days, but as the sun rose on the 
fourth day Filqus’s army broke ranks and fled, leaving behind even their helmets 
and Greek headgear. Their women and children were taken prisoner, and a 
number of men were put to the sword or killed with arrows. Filqus’s retreating 
army had been reduced by a third and the remnant traveled with their lances 
strapped on their backs. They took refuge in the fortress at Amourieh, and most 
of them were ready to sue for peace. 

A messenger from Filqus arrived before Darab. He was a wise, intelligent 
man, with the airs and graces of a courtier. He brought slaves, purses of coins, 
two chests filled with jewels, and the following message: “I ask one thing from 
God, who is my guide, 

That we should look for peace, and put aside 
Our ruinous deceit and enmity; 

Come, let us promise mutual amity. 

But if you think that in some covert way 

You’ll take my capital, Amourieh, 

There’ll be no banquet to confirm our pact. 
Honor will make me fight if I’m attacked. 

Do what befits a king: your father knew 

How kings conduct themselves, and so do you.” 


When Darab had heard him out he summoned his nobles and laid the matter 
before them, asking them what they thought of such talk, by which Filqus hoped 
to save face. They answered, “O perspicacious and pure-hearted king, lord of all 
lords, whose choice is to do that which is best: this chieftain has a daughter, 
elegant as a cypress tree, her face as fresh as springtime. No one has ever seen 
any idol in China as lovely as she is, she outshines all others in her beauty. If the 
king sees her, she will please him: this cypress would be well placed in his 
garden.” 

The king called in the Greek messenger, repeated what he had heard from his 
advisors, and said, “Go to your king and tell him this: ‘There is a young woman 
in your palace, who is the crown of all princesses; you call her Nahid, and you 
have assigned her a golden throne. If you want to preserve your honor and keep 
your country untroubled, give her to me, along with the tribute that Greece 


owes.’” The messenger traveled like the wind and repeated the message to the 
Greek king, who was overjoyed that his son-in-law would be the Persian king. 
There was some discussion about the tribute to be paid, but finally it was agreed 
that each year Greece would hand over a hundred thousand eggs made of gold, 
each weighing forty mesqals, and studded with jewels. 

Filqus gave orders that the roads to the borders of Greece be decorated, and 
then a magnificent escort bearing gifts set out with his daughter. They had 
prepared a golden litter and gathered together a group of noble attendants for 
her. There were ten camels carrying Greek brocade embroidered with jewels and 
gold, together with three hundred camel loads of carpets and necessities for the 
journey. The princess remained in her litter, guided by a bishop and a monk. 
Behind her came sixty maidservants, each of them adorned with a diadem and 
earrings and carrying a golden goblet filled with jewels. The bishop handed the 
beautiful princess over to Darab, and the jewels were counted out to his 
treasurer. After this Darab quit the military camp where he had been waiting and 
led his army back to Persia. He placed a crown on the princess’s head, and they 
set out happily for Pars. 


The Birth of Sekandar 

One night this lovely moon, arrayed in jewels and scents, lay sleeping beside the 
king. Suddenly she sighed deeply, and the king turned his head away, offended 
by the smell of her breath. This bad odor sickened him, and he frowned, 
wondering what could be done about it. He sent knowledgeable doctors to her; 
one who was especially expert was able to find a remedy. There is an herb that 
burns the palate, which they call “Sekandar” in Greece, and he rubbed this 
against the roof of her mouth. She wept a few tears and her face turned as red as 
brocade, because it burned her mouth, but the ugly smell was gone. But although 
this beautiful woman’s breath was now as sweet as musk, the king no longer felt 
any love for her. His heart had grown cold toward his bride, and he sent her back 
to Filqus. The princess grieved, because she was pregnant, but she told no one of 
this. 

When nine months had gone by she gave birth to a boy as splendid as the sun. 
Because of his stature and splendor, and the sweet smell that his flesh exhaled, 
she named him Sekandar, after the herb that had cured her of her malady. Her 
father the king told everyone that the boy was his and made no mention of 
Darab, because he was ashamed to tell people that Darab had rejected his 
daughter. The same night that Sekandar was born, a cream-colored mare in the 


royal stables, a huge warlike horse, gave birth to a gray foal with a lion-like 
chest and short pasterns. Filqus took this as a good omen, raising his hands to the 
heavens in gratitude. At dawn the next day he had both the newborn child and 
the mare and her foal brought to him and passed his hands over the foal’s eyes 
and chest, because he was exactly the same age as Sekandar. 

So the heavens turned and the years passed. Sekandar grew to have a princely 
heart, and his speech was that of a warrior. Filqus treated him even more 
attentively than a son and loved to dress him as a champion. In a little while the 
boy gained in wisdom; he became adroit, intelligent, grave in his manner, and 
knowledgeable. He was made the kingdom’s crown prince, and Filqus delighted 
in his presence. Sekandar learned the arts of kingship from his teachers, and it 
seemed he was born to administer justice, to occupy a throne, and to found an 
empire. 

In Persia, after Nahid had returned to her father, Darab took another wife. She 
gave birth to a fine, princely son who was a year younger than Sekandar. On the 
day he was born he was named Dara, and it was hoped that his good fortune 
would be greater than his father’s. Then, after twelve years, Darab’s star 
declined: he grew sick and wasted away and knew he would be called to another 
place. He summoned his nobles and counselors and spoke to them at length 
about the business of government and kingship. Then he added: “Dara, my son, 
will guide you well. Listen to him and obey him, and may your souls know 
peace in obedience to his commands. This royal throne is no one’s for long, and 
in the midst of pleasure we are called away. Strive to be kind and just, and 
rejoice when you remember me.” Having said this he heaved a sigh from the 
depths of his being, and the rosy pomegranate petal turned as pale as fenugreek. 


SEKANDAR’S CONQUEST OF PERSIA 


The Reign of Dara 

Dara grieved for his father’s death, and exalted the royal crown of Persia above 
the sun. He was young, fiery-tempered, quick to take offense, and his heart and 
tongue were hard enough to blunt a sword. From the throne he addressed his 
court: “Noblemen and warriors, I do not want my head to be brought down into 
the pit of servitude, and I will summon no one who is in that pit to approach my 
throne. Any man who ignores my commands can consider his head as no longer 
attached to his body, and if anyone so much as murmurs in his heart against me, 
my sword shall deal with him. No rich man is to use his wealth contrary to my 
wishes. I need no counselors: I am my own counselor and responsible for my 
own well-being. The pleasure, treaties, greatness, and sovereignty of the world 
are mine.” He summoned a learned scribe and after some discussion had him 
write a letter as trenchant as a dagger, in the name of Dara, the son of Darab, the 
son of Ardeshir, to every other king and independent ruler. The letter read: 
“Whoever opposes my policies or orders will learn how I can lop off heads. 
Whether you command souls or your soul is commanded by others, see that you 
obey my edicts.” 

Then he opened his father’s treasuries, summoned his warriors, and 
distributed their pay. He raised the stipend of those who had received four coins 
to eight, paying one man with a goblet full of coins, another with a bowlful. He 
gave experienced commanders border provinces as gifts and saw that everyone 
in his army received something of value. Representatives bearing presents and 
tribute came from all countries and kings, from India, China, Greece, and other 
lands, since no one felt able to stand against him. He built a city called Noshad 
—New Happiness—and the province of Ahvaz rejoiced in his reign. He was just 
to the poor, and he distributed wealth to whoever asked him. 


The Death of Filqus: Sekandar Becomes King 


It was at about this time that Filqus died, and Greece mourned for him. Sekandar 
ascended his grandfather’s throne and was a man who sought good and impeded 
the reach of evil. There was a famous man named Arestalis in Greece, in whom 
the whole country rejoiced: he was a wise, intelligent, and resourceful person. 
This man came before Sekandar and said, “Fortune smiles on you now my lord, 
but even you can lose your fame. The royal throne has seen so many kings like 
you, and it belongs to no one forever. Whenever you say to yourself, ‘I have 
reached my goal, I need no one to guide me in this world,’ know that at that 
moment, when you will not listen to a wise counselor’s words, you are the 
stupidest of men. We are made and born from dust, and we have no choice but to 
return to dust. If you act well, your name will survive you and you will prosper 
during your reign; and if you sow evil, you will reap evil, and not sleep easily in 
this world for a single night.” 


King Sekandar approved of what he said 
And instantly decided he’d be led 

In banquets and in battles by this guide, 
And see that he was always at his side. 


Then one day an eloquent and courteous messenger arrived from Dara, asking 
that Greece’s tribute be paid. But Sekandar became angry at the thought of this 
tax he’d inherited and said, “Go and tell Dara that the time for tribute from us is 
over. The hen that laid those golden eggs has died and there’s no more tribute to 
be had.” When he heard such language, the messenger was terrified and scuttled 
away from Greece. Sekandar, meanwhile, gathered an army together, told them 
of what had happened, and said, “Not even a good man can escape the turning of 
the heavens. I must travel the face of the earth, and reckon up what there is of 
good and evil in the world. And now you must prepare yourselves to bid your 
country farewell.” He opened the doors of his grandfather’s treasury and had his 
army equipped. At dawn an uproar could be heard outside the young king’s 
court: he set out followed by his banner, on which images of the bird of royal 
fortune, the homa, and the beloved cross were embroidered in red on a turquoise 
ground. 

The Greek army bore down on Egypt, and so thick were their ranks that not a 
mosquito or an ant could find a way through them. For a week the armies fought, 
and on the eighth day Sekandar defeated the Egyptian forces. So many prisoners 
and so much plunder were taken that the victors were at a loss as to what to do 


with everything: there were maces and horses, warriors’ armor and horse armor, 
Indian swords in golden scabbards, golden belts and golden saddles, brocade and 
more coins than their pack horses could carry; as well as the innumerable 
chieftains and horsemen who surrendered to them. 

From there this lionhearted warrior stretched out his claws toward Persia. 
When Dara heard that the Greek army was threatening his country’s frontiers he 
set out toward Greece with an army from Estakhr, and so numerous were its 
lances that they impeded the winds as they blew. When his men reached the 
Euphrates, their number was greater than the blades of grass on its shores; the 
river’s water was invisible beyond the press of their armor. 


Sekandar Acts as His Own Envoy 
Sekandar heard of the Persian troops’ approach and set out to meet them. When 
there were about two parasangs’ distance between the two armies, he summoned 
his counselors. But after a while he tired of their talk and said, “There’s only one 
way forward in this case: I’ll go myself and meet him face to face. 

I’Il be my own ambassador, and see 

The strengths and weakness of my enemy.” 


He put on a jeweled belt and a royal cloak worked with gold figures; his mount 
had a golden saddle, from which hung a golden scabbard. He picked ten Greek 
advisors who were skilled in languages to accompany him, and he and his 
chieftains and interpreters set off at dawn. 

As he approached Dara he dismounted and greeted the Persian king 
respectfully. Dara called him forward and motioned him to a seat at a lower level 
than the throne. Dara’s nobles were astonished by the handsome young man’s 
stature and splendor and by his courteous behavior. Silently, to themselves, they 
called down blessings on his head. He sat where Dara had indicated, then he rose 
and, as if he were a mere envoy, produced a letter from Sekandar. He began by 
wishing the king an eternal reign and then continued: “I have no wish to seize 
your country, nor To fight against you on the plains of war; 

My aim’s to travel round the earth, to see 
The spacious world in its entirety. 

I look for justice, and I understand 

That you are sovereign over Persia’s land, 
But if my progress here is not allowed 

I can’t go forward like an airborne cloud. 


You’ve come here with an army, unaware 

Of Sekandar’s intentions: but beware, 

If you desire to fight with me, I’ Il fight— 

I won’t retreat in ignominious flight. 

Say when you’re ready then: you name the day 
And see you don’t forget or run away: 

No overwhelming force will make me yield 
When once my army’s on the battlefield. ” 


Dara heard him out, and it seemed to him as if this young man were Dara 
himself, seated on the ivory throne, with the royal torque and armbands, 
resplendent with farr, and with the crown on his head. Dara answered him, 
“What’s your name and lineage? The royal farr shines from your forehead as if 
you were a Kayanid prince. You’re too fine a man to be anyone’s subject: I think 
that you are Sekandar himself! With this farr and stature and eloquence of yours 
you seem born to sit on a throne.” Sekandar answered, “Neither in peace nor in 
war has a king ever done what you’re suggesting. There are plenty of fine talkers 
in my monarch’s court; they’re the crown of all wise men. Sekandar is wise 
enough to follow his ancestors and not to act as his own envoy. My commander 
gave me the message as I have delivered it to you, your majesty.” 

A suitable pavilion was prepared for his stay, and when the evening meal was 
served Dara had the Greek envoy summoned to eat with him. Once they had 
eaten, musicians were called and wine was served. As soon as he had drunk his 
wine, Sekandar secreted the goblet beneath his clothes, and he did this a number 
of times. The cupbearer went to Dara and said, “Your Greek guest can’t be 
separated from the goblets I serve him.” Dara told him to ask why he kept the 
goblets in this way. “Why, my lion lord,” said the cupbearer, “are you keeping 
the goblets I give you?” Sekandar answered, “And isn’t his goblet the envoy’s 
reward? But if the custom is different in Persia, then take them back and place 
them in your king’s treasury.” Dara laughed to hear of such a custom, and had a 
goblet filled with jewels, surmounted by a splendid ruby, handed to him. 

Just at that moment the men who had gone to Greece to demand tribute 
arrived at the gathering. Their leader saw Sekandar’s face and as soon as he had 
made his obeisance before the king he said, “That man is the great Sekandar, 
whom I saw seated on his throne, crowned and holding the royal mace. As the 
king had ordered, we went to him and asked for our tribute: he humiliated me 
and talked insultingly about your majesty. We fled from his realm on horseback, 


by night. I saw no one like him in all of Greece, and now he has had the audacity 
to come to this country. He means to deprive you of your army, wealth, throne, 
and crown.” As he listened to the man’s words, Dara stared intently at Sekandar, 
who knew very well what was passing between them. As the sun set in the west 
he made his way to the tent he had been assigned, then, quickly mounting his 
horse, he said to his entourage, “Our lives depend on our horses: if they falter, 
we are finished.” The group galloped away and were lost to sight in the 
darkness. Dara sent someone to Sekandar’s tent, and as soon as it became clear 
that his guest had fled, he sent a thousand warriors after him. They rode like the 
wind, but in the darkness they lost their way, and when they caught sight of the 
Greek advance guards they turned back, having achieved nothing for all their 
pains. 

Sekandar reached his own camp, and the Greek nobles crowded round to see 
their prince return under cover of darkness. He showed them four goblets and the 
jewels he’d been given, and said, “Give thanks for my good fortune: I earned 
these cups at the risk of my life, and the stars seconded my attempt. I reckoned 
up the number of their troops, who are far more numerous than we had heard. 
Draw your swords for combat. We must march forward across this plain, and if 
you suffer in the battle, think of the kingdoms and wealth you will win. God is 
with me, and the stars are favorable to my plans.” The nobles congratulated him 
and wished for world prosperity beneath his reign. They said, “We are ready to 
sacrifice our lives for you, and we shall never break this promise. Who of all 
kings could claim to be your equal in manliness, stature, or glory?” 


Dara Makes War on Sekandar and Is Defeated 

The sun rose over the mountains, and the land glowed like a golden lamp. Dara 
mustered the ranks of his army, which covered the earth like a pitch-black cloak. 
He led his men, more numerous than blades of grass, across the Euphrates, and 
when Sekandar heard of their approach, he had the war drums sounded and his 
troops prepared. The two hosts could not be counted, but in all the world there 
was only one Sekandar. Dust loomed over the scene like a mountain, and the 
whole plain seemed a seething sea of weapons and warriors, of armor and Indian 
daggers, of war horses and barding. On each side the troops were drawn up, and 
the sun flashed on their swords. In the vanguard were the war elephants, and 
behind them the cavalry, men who had renounced all love of life. The very air 
seemed to cry out for blood, the land to groan with the warriors’ battle cries, the 
mountains to shake with the din of trumpets and Indian chimes. The horses’ 


neighing and the combatants’ shouts, the crashing of heavy maces on armor, all 
seemed to transform the plain to a mountain of warfare, and the air turned black 
with dust. For seven days the battle raged, and on the eighth a dust storm 
obscured the sun and blew against the blinded Persians, who fled from the 
battlefield. Sekandar’s men pursued them—the one host full of sorrow, the other 
of joy—back to the banks of the Euphrates, where innumerable Persians were 
killed. At first the Greek troops turned back from the river, but Sekandar ordered 
them across, and they entered the abandoned Persian camp in triumph. 


Dara’s Second Battle Against Sekandar 

When Dara fled from Sekandar, he sent mounted messengers in all directions, 
summoning Iran’s chieftains and lords. He distributed money and had the army’s 
quartermasters prepare to provision new troops. By the end of the month he had 
gathered a new army and renewed his commanders’ warlike ambition. Once 
more he crossed the river and drew up his troops on the wide plain. As soon as 
Sekandar heard of this, he left his army’s impedimenta in their camp and set out 
to face him. The two armies met and again the land was filled with the din of 
warfare. For three days they joined battle, until the heaped-up dead hemmed 
them in. Numberless Persians were slain, and the great king’s good fortune 
deserted him. Full of sorrow, he turned back from the battle, since the lord of the 
moon gave him no help, but Sekandar pursued him as quickly as wind-blown 
dust, praising the world creator as he came. He had his heralds cry out to the 
Persians, “You are subjects who have been misled, but you have no need to fear 
me, and my army has no desire to meddle with you. Go home safely to your 
houses and live God-fearing lives. Even though you have washed your hands in 
Greek blood, you have escaped safe and sound from the Greek army.” When the 
Persians heard they were being granted quarter, they submitted. Sekandar had 
the plunder heaped up on the battlefield and distributed to his troops, who now 
found themselves well equipped. He and his army rested in that area for four 
months. 

Dara meanwhile reached Jahrom, where he had access to treasure. Filled with 
grief and sorrow, his nobles came before him; sons wept for their lost fathers, 
and fathers for their lost sons. All the land of Iran was filled with the sounds of 
mourning, and tears stood in all eyes like dew. From Jahrom Dara made his way 
to the pride of Persian cities, Estakhr. Again messengers were sent out to all 
quarters, and an army gathered before the king’s palace. Dara sat there on a 


golden throne and his loyal troops paraded before him; then he addressed them: 
“My wise and warlike warriors, you see 

The straits we’re in, you know our enemy.” 

And as he spoke grief overwhelmed his voice. 

He wept, then said, “It is a better choice 

To die today as men, than to remain 

Alive and subject to an alien reign. 

The ancient kings who came before us here 

Were paid with foreign tribute every year. 

Once we were mighty, and in everything 

The Greek realm bowed before the Persian king. 

Our luck has turned, and Sekandar alone 

Will rule this land, and seize our crown and throne. 

Soon he’ll be here, too soon, and Persia then Will be a sea of blood, this 
country’s men, 

Its women and its children, will be made 

The captives of this conquering renegade. 

But if you’Il now make common cause with me 

We can drive back this pain and misery. 

These warriors were our prey once—filled with dread, When Persia 
threatened, they turned tail and fled. 

Now they’re the leopard, we’ve become the prey, When battle’s joined 
it’s we who run away. 

But if we stand together we can still 

Crush them and bend their country to our will. 

Whoever falters in this war and tries 

To save his selfish soul should realize 

It is the world that will be lost or freed— 

They are Zahhak, and we are now Jamshid. ” 


He wept as he spoke; his heart was filled with pain, his cheeks were yellow, and 
his lips blue with suffering. His wise, grief-stricken nobles rose and shouted in 
answer, “We have no desire to live without the king; we are ready for battle, and 
we shall make the world a harsh place for those who wish you ill. We shall fight 
together, whether we conquer lands and provinces, or find only the earth of the 
grave.” Dara distributed weapons and money to his army and to his country’s 
chieftains. 


The Third Battle Between Sekandar and Dara and Dara’s Flight to 
Kerman When Sekandar heard of Dara’s renewed bid for 
sovereignty, he led his army out from Iraq, and as he marched he 
prayed to God in Greek. Sekandar’s army had neither center nor 
limit, and Dara’s good fortune had deserted him. Nevertheless Dara 
led his army out from Estakhr and his troops were so numerous that 
they seemed to block the turning of the stars in the sky. The armies 
of the two countries were drawn up in ranks, the men clutching 
their lances, maces, and daggers. Such a cry went up from both 
hosts that it seemed to split the ears of the heavens; the warriors’ 
blood transformed the earth to a sea, and headless bodies lay strewn 
about the battlefield. For the third time Dara suffered defeat; 
Sekandar pressed forward with his attack, and in fear for his life 
Dara led his army toward Kerman. Sekandar meanwhile took up 
residence in Estakhr, the noblest of Persian cities, and from his 
court a bold proclamation was made: “Whoever seeks out God’s 
forgiveness for The deeds that he’s committed in this war, 

Or looks for my protection, will soon find 

That I’ve a merciful and generous mind. 

I'll help the wounded, and I will not shed 

The blood of enemies who were misled. 

Since I’m aware the God of victory 

Has given this imperial crown to me, 

My hand won’t touch what isn’t mine; my soul 

Has chosen light and wisdom as its goal. 

But as for those who’d thwart my wishes, they 

Will find a dragon standing in their way.” 


Then he distributed the plunder to his army. 

By the time Dara reached Kerman, two-thirds of his forces were nowhere to 
be seen, and wailing was heard among his troops, who were helmetless and 
dejected. He called together the chieftains who had been with him in battle, all of 
whom were weeping and bemoaning their fate. Dara addressed them, “There can 
be no doubt that the heavens have turned against us because of me. No one in the 
world has ever seen such a defeat, nor have we heard of one like this from those 


who know the past. Our royal women and children are captives, or they have 
been murdered with lances and arrows. What can you see that might save us, or 
that might make those who hate us turn back from their course? No country, no 
army, no throne or crown, no sovereignty, no heirs, no treasure or forces remain 
to us. If God does not have pity on us now we are ruined forever.” 

The nobles wept before the king and said, “Your majesty, we have all been 
wounded by fate’s malevolence. The army is beyond rallying, we are like men 
over whose helmets floodwaters are rising. Fathers have lost their sons and sons 
their fathers, and this is now the way of the turning heavens toward us. Our 
mothers, sisters, and daughters are in Sekandar’s hands, and the veiled women of 
your court who trembled for your life, together with the ancestral treasures you 
inherited—the noble women of our people and the wealth of our kings—are all 
in the palm of the Greek conquerors. Your one hope is to conciliate him, for the 
crown does not stay always with one man. You will have to truckle to him and 
speak fair words to him, and then we shall see whether all this will end with fate 
looking more favorably on us. Write him a letter, and try to enlighten his dark 
soul. The heavens turn above him too, and a wise man will understand this.” 
When he had heard them out, Dara did what seemed best to him and summoned 
a scribe. 


Dara’s Letter, Suing for Peace 

This is the grief-filled letter he wrote, beginning: “From Dara, the son of Darab, 
the son of Ardeshir, to the conqueror, Sekandar.” His cheeks gaunt with 
suffering, his eyes filled with tears, first Dara praised God, from whom come the 
good and evil of our days, then continued, “Certainly a wise man cannot escape 
the heavens’ revolutions, since it is from them that we are fortunate or wretched, 
that we are sometimes lifted up and sometimes cast down. It wasn’t human 
agency that decided this battle between us, but the dealings of the sun and the 
moon. Now what was fated has happened, and my heart is left in pain. What is it 
we can hope for from the blue vault above? Now if you will agree to sign a 
treaty with me, and repent of your war against Persia, I shall convey from my 
treasury to yours Goshtasp’s and Esfandyar’s treasures, including their royal 
torques and jewel-encrusted crowns, and also the treasures that I have 
accumulated by my own efforts. I shall be your ally in war, and day and night I 
shall be prompt in your service. If you will, send me my family members whom 
you now hold, my women and children—this is what I would expect of you, 
since a world conqueror is not a man to indulge in petty revenge, and great kings 


who enslave women receive nothing but reproaches. When my lord reads this 
letter, may he in his wisdom vouchsafe me an answer.” 

Quickly a messenger took the letter from Kerman to Sekandar, who was still 
hostile to Dara. But when he read it he said in answer, “May wisdom always be 
the companion of Dara’s soul! Anyone who stretches out his hand toward your 
family, either against your womenfolk or your children, will find that the only 
throne he will see will be his bier as he is laid in the grave, or he will be hanged 
from a tree limb. Your family is safe and comfortable in Esfahan, and God 
forbid that I should demand their wealth from them. If you come to Pars, all the 
sovereignty of this land is yours; I shall never swerve aside from what you say, 
and I shall not so much as breathe without asking your advice.” Like a skiff over 
the waves the messenger sped back to his king, whose eyes were filled with 
tears, his heart with grief. 


Dara Is Killed by His Entourage 
When Dara read this answer he saw the straits that the world had brought him to 
and was struck dumb. At last he said, “This is worse than death, that I should 
stand before Sekandar as his servant; a tomb will be better for me than such 
shame. Everyone turned to me for help in warfare, but now that it is I who need 
help, I see that I have no friend in all the world. God is now my only hope.” 
Since there was no one to come to his aid he wrote a humble letter begging for 
help to the Indian prince, Foor. He began by praising God, and then continued, 
“Lord of the Indian peoples, wise, knowledgeable, and clear-spirited, you will 
have heard of the calamity the stars have dealt me: Sekandar brought his army 
from Greece and has taken from me my country, family, children, throne, crown, 
treasuries, and army. If you can help me now, I shall send you from what I have 
left enough jewels and treasure that you shall never want for wealth in the future, 
and by this act you will also find fame in the world, and noble men will praise 
you.” He dispatched his messenger, who rode as quickly as the wind to Foor. 
But Sekandar learned of his plan and had the tucket sounded, and the noise of 
kettle drums and Indian chimes filled the camp. His army set out from Estakhr, 
and their dust was so thick that the sun in the heavens lost its way. A great cry 
went up when the two armies met, and the Greek warriors were impatient for the 
battle to begin. Sekandar drew up his army’s ranks, the air turned black with 
dust, and the earth could not be seen beneath the mass of men. But when Dara 
led out his men, they had no longing for battle: their hearts were weary and they 
were sick of warfare. Fortune had deserted the Persians. They hardly resisted the 


Greek onslaught; the once-savage lions fled like foxes. Dara’s commanders 
surrendered, and the crest of their glory was humbled in the dust. Seeing this, 
Dara turned tail and fled, lamenting as he did so, and about three hundred of his 
cavalry followed him. Two of his closest advisors were also with him on the 
battlefield that day; one was a Zoroastrian priest called Mahyar, and the other’s 
name was Janushyar. When these two saw that Dara’s situation was hopeless, 
one said to the other, “This wretch is now deserted and alone, 

He’s lost the glory of his crown and throne. 

A dagger in his chest and he’ Il be dead, 

A single sword blow could cut off his head, 

Then Sekandar will honor us and we 

Shall have a share in Persia’s sovereignty. ” 


The two rode with him, one on each side: Janushyar, who was his chief 
counselor, on the left, and Mahyar, who was his treasurer, on the right. And as 
they did so Janushyar plunged a dagger into the king’s chest. Dara slumped 
forward and his head hung down; as one man his remaining warriors fled from 
him. 


Dara’s Dying Words to Sekandar 

Dara’s counselors made their way to Sekandar and said, “Wise and victorious 
lord, we have killed your enemy: his days as king are over.” When Sekandar 
heard Janushyar’s words, he said to him and to Mahyar, “Where is this enemy of 
mine whom you’ve cast aside in this way? Take me to him.” The two led 
Sekandar, whose heart was bursting with rage, to where Dara lay with his chest 
covered in gore, and his face as pale as fenugreek. Sekandar gave orders that no 
one else should approach, and that Dara’s two counselors be detained. Quick as 
the wind he dismounted and laid the wounded man’s head on his thigh. He 
rubbed both his hands against Dara’s face until he began to revive and speak. 
Then Sekandar removed the royal diadem from Dara’s head and loosened his 
armor. No doctor was nearby, and when he saw Dara’s wounds, a few tears 
dropped from Sekandar’s eyes. “May this pass easily from you,” he said, “and 
may the hearts of those who wish you ill tremble in terror! Get up, and let me lay 
you in a golden litter, or if you have the strength, sit yourself in the saddle. I will 
bring doctors from India and Greece, and I shall weep tears of blood for your 
pain. I shall restore your kingdom to you, and when you have recovered, we 
shall swear friendship. This instant I shall hang from a gibbet those who have 


injured you. When I heard last night what had happened, my heart filled with 
sorrow, my soul with anger. We are from the same stock, the same root, the 
same people: why should we destroy one another for ambition’s sake?” 

When he heard Sekandar, Dara said, “May wisdom always be your 
companion! I think that you will find the reward for what you have said from 
God himself. You said that Iran is mine, and that the crown and the throne of the 
brave are mine; but death is closer to me than the throne. The throne is over for 
me, and my luck has run out. So the high heavens revolve; their turning is 
toward sorrow, and their profit is pain. Look at me before you say ‘I am exalted 
above all this great company of heroes.’ Know that evil and good both come 
from God, and see that you remain grateful to him for as long as you live. My 
own state shows you the truth of what I say. Look how I, who had such 
sovereignty and glory and wealth, am now despised by everyone. I who never 
injured anyone, who had such armor and such armies, such splendid horses, such 
crowns and thrones, who had such sons and relatives, and so many allies whose 
hearts bore my brand. Earth and time were my slaves, and remained so while my 
luck held. But now I am separated from good fortune, and have fallen into the 
hands of murderers. I despair of my sons and family; the earth has turned dark 
for me, and my eyes are white like the eyes of a blind man. Our own people 
cannot help us; my one hope is in God the Creator. I lie here wounded on the 
earth, fallen into the trap of death, but this is the way of the heavens whether we 
are kings or heroes. Greatness too must pass: it is the prey, and its hunter is 
death.” 

Sekandar’s pity made his face turn pale, and he wept for the wounded king, 
lying there stretched out on the earth. Dara said to him, “Do not weep, there is 
no profit in it. My part in the fires of life is now merely smoke. This was my fate 
from him who apportions our fates. This is the goal toward which the splendor 
of my earthly days has led me. Listen to the advice I shall give you, accept it into 
your heart, and remember it.” Sekandar said, “It is for you to order me: I give 
you my word.” Then Dara spoke quickly, going over his wishes and omitting 
nothing. He began by saying, “You have achieved fame, but see that you fear the 
world’s Creator, who has made the heavens and the earth and time, and the 
strong and the weak. Look after my children and my family, and my veiled wise 
women. Ask for my daughter’s hand in marriage, and keep her gently and in 
comfort in the court. Her mother named her Roshanak and saw that the world 
was always a place of happiness and delight for her. Do not despise my 
daughter, or let malevolent men speak badly of her. She has been brought up as a 


princess, and at our feasts she has always been the loveliest person present. It 
may be that you shall have a son with her, and that the name of Esfandyar will 
be renewed in him, that he will preserve the fires of Zoroastrianism and live by 
the Zend-Avesta, keeping the Feasts of Sadeh and No-Ruz and preserving our 
fire temples. Such a son will honor Hormozd and the sun and moon, and wash 
his soul and face in the waters of wisdom; he will renew the ways of Lohrasp 
and Goshtasp, treating men according to their station whether it be high or low; 
he will make our faith flourish and his days will be fortunate.” 

Sekandar answered him, “Your heart is pure and your words are wise, O 
king. I accept all that you have said, and I shall not stray from your words while 
I am within the borders of your kingdom. I shall accomplish the good deeds you 
recommend, and your wisdom will be my guide.” The master of the world 
grasped Sekandar’s hand and began to weep bitterly. 


He kissed Sekandar’s palm and said, “I pray That God will keep and 
guide you on your way. 

I give my flesh to dust, to God my spirit, 

My sovereignty is yours now to inherit.” 


He spoke, and his soul rose up from his body. All those gathered nearby began 
to weep, and Sekandar rent his clothes and poured dust on the royal diadem. 
Sekandar made a splendid tomb for him according to local custom and, now that 
the time for Dara’s eternal sleep had come, the blood was washed from his body 
with clear rosewater. His body was wrapped in brocade woven with gold and 
sewn with jewels; it was then covered with camphor, even his face, so that no 
one could see it. As Dara’s corpse was placed within its golden coffin the 
bystanders wept, and then it was carried in procession, passed hand to hand by 
the mourners, with Sekandar leading the cortege on foot, and as he approached 
the tomb, it seemed as if his skin would split with sorrow. The king’s coffin was 
placed within the tomb according to the ancient royal rites, and the huge doors of 
the building were sealed. Then Sekandar had two gibbets built, one bearing the 
name Janushyar and the other Mahyar, and the two regicides were strung up on 
them. The soldiers who were there took rocks in their fists and stoned them to 
death, as a warning to those who would kill a king. When the Persians saw how 
Sekandar honored Dara and mourned for him, they offered the young king their 
homage and loyalty. 


Sekandar Writes Letters to the Persians 

From Kerman a noble messenger traveled to Esfahan, bringing Sekandar’s good 
wishes to Dara’s womenfolk. He described Dara’s last days to them and said in 
Sekandar’s name, “It is not right for either friends or enemies to rejoice when 
just kings die. You are to consider me as Dara now; if he has gone from the earth 
I have appeared before you. The privileges and pleasures of your life will be 
increased, and there is no need to claw your faces in fear and grief. King and 
soldier, we are all destined for death, though to some it comes soon and to others 
later. Go to the city of Estakhr and prepare to celebrate our alliance with all 
pomp and splendor. Persia is as she always was, and you should rejoice and keep 
body and soul in good spirits.” 

Then a letter was sent, from Sekandar the Great, the son of Filqus, world 
conqueror and destroyer of those who would oppose him, to every province of 
Persia, and to every nobleman and chieftain, saying, “May the good will of the 
Creator who made the world and all things visible and invisible, who turns the 
heavens above us and who alone can be called mighty and wise, who is able to 
do all things and whose slaves we are, bless our nobles and augment their 
prosperity! In victory I have known grief, and sorrow came to me in the midst of 
rejoicing. I swear by the lord of the sun that I intended no harm to Dara: the man 
who killed him was from his own household, his slave and not a foreigner. Now 
that man has received God’s punishment; he acted evilly and evil came to him. 
But you must follow justice and swear allegiance to me, if you desire the 
blessings of heaven and to receive riches, slaves and high office from my hand. 
My heart is filled with grief for Dara, and I shall try not to stray from his advice. 
Whoever comes to my court will receive cash, ivory, and the confirmation of his 
crown and throne. If he prefers to remain in his own castle, as long as he does 
not go back on his word, he too will receive the treasures he desires from me. 
Mint coins in the name of Sekandar and see that you remain faithful to your 
treaties with me. Maintain your palaces as they have always been, and have the 
markets overseen as is proper, for such things reflect on my sovereignty. Show 
me your value by keeping watch on the frontiers so that thieves cannot despoil 
the countryside, and maintain yourselves in joy and prosperity. From every city 
send a slave girl, someone who is beautiful, modest, and intelligent, to serve in 
my women’s quarters, but send only those who are willing to come, as slaves 
should not be forced or abused. See that you treat travelers well, especially those 
who behave appropriately and speak soberly, who are pure in heart and content 
with poverty, whom men call Sufis; place them at the head of those to whom you 


give charity. But if you find that people are oppressed by their overlords, break 
the hearts and backs of those who are troubling them, destroy them root and 
branch. I shall seek out those who do evil and have them strung up on a gibbet, 
and those who ignore my commands will pay dearly in the end for their crimes.’ 

Sekandar presided over his court, welcoming the world in peace. From 
Kerman he made his way to Estakhr, where he placed the Kayanid crown on his 
own head. 


’ 


Don’t ask the world her secrets: she will hide Them from your gaze, and 
turn her face aside. 


THE REIGN OF SEKANDAR 


Sekandar took his place on the throne and said, “Kings’ souls should be imbued 
with wisdom, since it is God who gives victory in the world, and any king who 
does not fear him is evil. It is certain that both good and evil will pass, and that 
there is no escaping the clutches of fate. Whoever comes to my court seeking 
justice, even if it is against myself, and whether it is during a royal audience or 
in the middle of the night, will be answered as soon as he speaks. Since he who 
bestows sovereignty has given me glory and opened the gates of victory to me, I 
shall collect no taxes from any of my subjects for five years, whether they live in 
the mountains, the plains, by the sea, or in cities. I will distribute wealth to the 
poor and ask for nothing from the wealthy.” With this fine speech Sekandar 
showed that he was disposed to rule justly, and a cry of homage went up from 
his palace. Then the crowd dispersed and the world’s ruler sat closeted with his 
advisors. 


Sekandar’s Letter to Delaray, the Mother of Roshanak 

Sekandar summoned a scribe, who brought a Chinese pen and silk. The scribe 
dipped his pen in the ink, and Sekandar dictated a letter to Roshanak’s mother, 
Delaray, saying, “May God grant you grace and destroy your enemies. I have 
already written to you concerning your sorrows. When your husband’s good 
fortune deserted him and he was murdered by one of his own slaves, I buried 
him according to the royal rites and bade him God speed from this world. Before 
we fought I tried to make peace with him, but his days were numbered and he 
refused. Even his enemies felt sorrow when his blood was spilled, and may God 
conduct him to the blue vault of heaven. None of us can escape the claws of 
death, which is like the winds of autumn before which we are blown like leaves. 
The world now waits for your response to Dara’s dying wishes, which many 
witnessed: he gave Roshanak to me, saying that she was a suitable bride. Send 
her quickly to me, accompanied by serving girls, nurses, and Persian 
noblewomen, so that she may brighten my darkened soul. Keep Esfahan as your 


own, as it has been in the past, and see that it is looked after by the same wise, 
experienced, just, and humble administrators whom Dara appointed. And if you 
do not wish to reign there, all of Persia is yours to choose from. Fill your heart 
with civility toward me, and proclaim me before the world as the new Dara.” 

He sent a similar letter to Roshanak. It began with an invocation to the all- 
knowing God who maintains the world, and continued, “From royal stock none 
but noble offspring can come, delightful, wise and modest, well-spoken and soft- 
voiced. Shortly before he died, taking his glorious name to the grave, your father 
gave you to me. When you enter my apartments, you will be my chief desire, the 
first among my women: you will make the crown more splendid, the royal 
torque and ivory throne more glittering. I have written to your mother, asking 
her to send you to me in a manner fitting for your station, as a princess, preceded 
by the chief priest of Esfahan, in a splendid litter, and accompanied by your 
maidservants and the women who brought you up. Come to me with peace of 
mind, knowing you will be the first of my women, and may you always live 
securely and safely in my royal apartments.” 

When Delaray heard the messenger’s words she heaved a cold sigh from the 
depths of her being and wept bitter tears for Dara, who had been hurried 
ignominiously beneath the dust. Still weeping, she called in her scribe and 
dictated a shrewd and dignified reply. She began by invoking the world’s 
Creator, then said, “It was Dara’s glory that I sought from heaven, from which 
come war and peace and mercy, but since his time has passed and he has 
exchanged the throne for a wooden coffin, I wish you well in the world. I wish 
you greatness, victory, and sovereignty, and that the world’s affairs unfold as 
you desire, and I hide no secret meaning beneath my words. I have heard your 
offer of clemency, and may the heavens rejoice in the kindness of your soul. I 
have heard too of the tomb you made for Dara and the gibbets you made for 
Mahyar and that malignant slave Janushyar (when someone spills a king’s blood, 
he is not long for this world). I know too that you have desired peace and 
reconciliation, and that you have spent many days with your counselors 
pondering this matter. But kings do not beg, and no one expects a crowned head 
to act as a slave. You are now our sovereign, and since the sun has set, you are 
the moon for us. May the world know only your happiness, and may your name 
resound forever in its palaces! And it has made our hearts happy that you have 
thought in this way of Roshanak. She is your handmaid; we are your slaves, and 
our heads are bowed awaiting your commands. She sends you greetings and has 
written you a letter, an answer as lovely as paradise. The Lord of the world has 


chosen you, and no one can turn aside from his commands. I have written to my 
nobles and warlike chieftains, telling them that Dara’s sovereignty is now yours, 
and that no one should disobey you.” Then she gave the messenger robes of 
honor, a purse of gold, and all manner of precious objects. He returned to 
Sekandar’s camp and told the king all he had seen and heard concerning the 
court’s pomp and majesty, which was as splendid as when its former king still 
reigned there. 


Sekandar Marries Roshanak 

Sekandar sent for his mother, who was then at Amourieh, and told her of Dara’s 
dying words. “Go to Delaray,” he said, “and win her over with sweet 
conversation. See that you meet Roshanak, who lives in purdah there, and 
convey to her my regards. Take torques, bracelets, and earrings, and a royal 
throne studded with jewels. Take a hundred camels laden with carpets, and a 
hundred more laden with gold-worked brocade. Take thirty thousand dinars from 
my treasury, packed in purses, to be scattered before the bride. Take a hundred 
thousand Greek serving girls, each one reverently carrying a golden goblet, as is 
proper before a princess. Take slaves to look after you along the way, and see 
that your progress is carried out with royal splendor.” 

The king’s mother set out with ten wise and eloquent translators, and as she 
approached Esfahan the nobles of the city came forward in a throng to meet her. 
Delaray too came out from her palace, accompanied by her retinue of courtiers, 
and so many gold coins were scattered in the courtyard that men thought of 
silver as so much dirt. They sat within the palace, the nobles of the court 
crowded around them, and Delaray brought out such a dowry that it seemed the 
markets of the world had been emptied for the purpose. For parasangs there was 
camel after camel laden with gold, sliver, and colored cloths; there were clothes 
and carpets, cloths to spread and cloths to drape, Arab horses with golden 
bridles, Indian swords with golden scabbards, armor, and helmets and barding 
for horses, maces and Indian daggers; so much uncut cloth and so much cloth cut 
for clothes that no one had ever seen more in all the world. 

Slaves were summoned from the palace and forty golden litters were 
prepared; her heart filled with happiness, Roshanak took her place in a litter 
shaded by a parasol and surrounded by servants. The road was a mass of gold 
and silver and horses and escorts; the streets of the city were hung with banners, 
and there was laughter on everyone’s lips, excitement in everyone’s heart. They 
poured coins on the brocade parasol as it passed, and scattered musk in the 
procession’s path. 


Then, lovely as the moon, the princess dazed 
Sekandar’s wondering sight—he stared amazed 
At her as though she were compounded of 
Intelligence and beauty mixed with love: 

Her stature and her soul-bewitching face 


Made his apartments an enchanting place. 
He sat his mother on a golden throne, 

Then fixed his eyes on Roshanak alone. 

For seven days they sat there side by side, 
Sekandar talking always to his bride, 

And all his manner showed his sovereignty, 
His grace and wisdom, charm, and modesty. 


Gifts of gold and silver were distributed throughout Iran, and the whole country, 
together with the cities of China and Turan, sent their congratulations. All the 
world was filled with justice, and the places that had lain waste flourished again. 


Sekandar Leads His Army Against Kayd 

Mehran, the vizier of Kayd, the king of Qanuj, counseled his royal master, 
“Sekandar will come here with an army of chieftains chosen from Greece and 
Persia: if you wish to preserve your status be wise and do not look for war with 
him. You have four things the like of which no noble or commoner has ever seen 
in all the world. The first, which gives such luster to your crown, is your 
daughter, who is as lovely as paradise itself; the second is the philosopher you 
keep hidden, who tells you all the world’s secrets; the third is your physician, 
who is renowned for his skill; the fourth is the goblet you possess that can never 
be emptied whether by fire or the sun, or when someone drinks from it. With 
these four things you can save your position. When Sekandar comes, rely on 
these and, if you don’t want him to stay here a long time, don’t think of 
resistance; you have not the might to withstand his army, wealth, and glory. Now 
is the age of Sekandar, who is the crown of all nobles. When he comes, give him 
these four things, and I think he will ask for nothing else from you. If you satisfy 
him in this manner he will go on his way, because he is wise and seeks after 
knowledge.” When Kayd had heard Mehran’s words, he felt that the ancient 
days of his splendor had been renewed. 

Having secured Persia Sekandar led out his army, by roads and pathless 
wastes, toward India and King Kayd. As he went forward the cities opened their 
gates to welcome him. When his army reached the border city known locally as 
Milad, Sekandar, as eager as a lion that scents its prey, summoned a scribe and 
dictated a letter to Kayd. The letter began by praising those who wash their 
hearts in wisdom, who choose the ways of ease and look to enjoy their wealth, 
who turn to God for aid, placing their hopes and fears in him. It continued, 


“They are men who know that the throne derives from my power and that I, 
Sekandar, am the shadow of the world’s victorious Lord. I have written this 
letter to enlighten your dark soul; when your scribe reads it to you, do not put it 
aside, thinking to deal with it later. If it comes at night, do not wait till dawn; 
prepare immediately to obey me. And if you disregard what I say I shall trample 
your head, crown, and throne beneath my feet.” 

Kayd welcomed Sekandar’s envoy warmly and said, “I am filled with joy at 
his commands and will not turn aside from them for a moment. But before God, 
it isn’t right to hurry things along in this fashion, and for me to go before him 
with no preparation.” He summoned a scribe, who wrote at his dictation with an 
Indian pen on Chinese silk. First he praised the God of victory and fate, who is 
generous and just, and who rules over manliness, wisdom, and human skill, and 
then said, “Noble men will not ignore the king’s commands, and we should hold 
nothing back from the master of armies, the crown, and the sword. I have four 
things that no one else in all the world has, either openly or in secret, and no one 
else ever will have possessions like them. If the king commands me, I shall send 
them to him, and his heart will delight in them. And then, when the king orders 
me to, I shall come like a slave to pay homage to him.” 

When the messenger told Sekandar what he had heard, and handed over 
Kayd’s letter, Sekandar sent him back again, to ask what these four things were 
that no one else had. Kayd cleared his court and sat with his advisors. They 
called Sekandar’s envoy in and made much of him, and then Kayd said to him, 


“T have a daughter here whose lovely face 
Would make the sun dark if he glimpsed her grace; 
Her lips still smell of milk; her hair, pitch-black, 
Hangs like a woven lariat down her back; 

The cypress bows before her elegance, 

Roses are scattered by her eloquence; 

Her speech exceeds her beauty, all she says 
Seems taught by wisdom and beyond all praise, 
And when she chooses to be silent she 

Becomes the soul of gentle modesty: 
God-fearing and a princess, chaste and wise, 
Her like has not been seen by human eyes. 

Then there’s the wondrous goblet that is mine 
Which, when it’s filled with water or with wine, 


Stays always full. You and your chosen friends 
Could drink ten years, the liquid never ends. 
Next there is my physician, who can tell 

From one small drop of urine if you’re well 
And, if not, what is wrong: there’s no disease 
That can escape his cunning expertise; 

With him at court you could dismiss all fears 
Of sickness, and survive for countless years. 
And lastly there’s my court philosopher 

Who from the turning heavens can infer 

All that will come to pass, and everything 

He learns he’s prompt to pass on to his king.” 


The envoy returned, riding his horse as quickly as the wind, and when he told 
Sekandar what he had heard, the world conqueror’s heart opened like a flower in 
bloom. He said, “If all he claims is true, the world itself is hardly enough to pay 
for such things. When he sends these wonders to me, my dark soul will glow 
with light, and I shall not trample on him as I threatened, but leave his country as 
his friend.” 


Sekandar Sends Nine Knowledgeable Men to See the Four Wonders 
He chose a number of his advisors, all percipient and knowledgeable men, and 
sent a letter filled with honorifics and flattery to accompany them. “I am sending 
nine of my own trusted savants, all wise and reverend men who will not make 
any difficulties for you. Let the four wonders you mention stay where they are: 
show them to my envoys, and as soon as I receive a letter from these 
experienced graybeards saying they have seen these things with their own eyes, 
and that the world cannot show their like, I shall write a charter such as your 
heart would desire, confirming you as the king of India.” 

The nine Greek advisors made their way from Sekandar to Kayd, and the 
chancellor of Kayd’s court made them welcome with questions about their 
journey and had a suitable place set aside for their stay. On the next day, as the 
sky turned yellow with dawn and the sun drew its sword for battle, Kayd’s 
daughter was prepared for her audience, although the full moon needs no 
adornment. A golden throne was placed within the castle, and the room was 
decorated in the Chinese fashion. Her face as splendid as the sun, the princess sat 
on the throne, shining more brightly than Venus in the night sky. The nine sages 


came in, chattering pleasantries and ready to observe carefully. When they saw 
the princess’s face, and the light flashing from her bracelets and throne, they 
were so astonished that they couldn’t move, and their legs felt weak beneath 
them. The nine of them stood rooted to the spot, giving thanks to God for such 
loveliness; none of them could tear his eyes from her, or think how to turn away. 
They stayed so long that the king sent someone to fetch them, and he said, 
“What kept you so long? She has a lovely face, but she is human, endowed with 
her beauty by the stars.” The sages answered, “No palace contains a portrait as 
lovely as she is: each of us will write to our king saying how incomparably 
beautiful she is.” 

Then they took pen, ink, and paper and wrote to Sekandar. A messenger took 
their letters to the king, who was amazed by what he read: each letter described 
her in the same fashion. The king’s answer congratulated them on having seen 
the loveliness of paradise and continued, “There’s no need to inquire any further: 
return at once and bring these four wonders to me. Assure Kayd that his 
daughter will be well looked after, and set off with this marvel immediately. 
Kayd has treated me justly, and from now on no one will be able to harm him.” 


The Nine Sages Bring Kayd’s Four Wonders to Sekandar 

The messenger made his way back to the nine sages, who returned to Kayd’s 
audience hall with Sekandar’s answers. The Indian king was overjoyed that the 
threat of an invasion by Sekandar had been lifted. He chose a hundred wise, 
eloquent Indians as an escort, and from his treasury generously selected 
bracelets, crowns, jewels, uncut cloth, and other suitable gifts, which were then 
loaded onto three hundred camels. Another hundred camels carried silver coins, 
and a hundred more gold. A litter was fashioned from sweet-smelling aloes 
wood and hung with cloth of gold on which jewels were sewn; ten elephants 
carried golden howdahs, and the finest of them bore a splendid saddle. The 
princess wept bitter tears of farewell and set off together with the philosopher 
and the doctor. A nobleman carried the famous goblet, and the wine in it kept the 
accompanying courtiers drunk. 

When this beautiful princess, crowned with her musky hair, as elegant as a 
cypress topped by the moon, entered the inner apartments of Sekandar’s castle, 
no one there felt worthy to look at her. She wore her hair plaited on the top of 
her head, her eyebrows were arched like a bow, her eyes like paradisal narcissi; 
she seemed to be fashioned wholly from charm and loveliness. Sekandar took in 
her stature, her hair, face, head, and feet, and under his breath he praised God 


that he had created such beauty, saying, “This is indeed the light of the world.” 
He summoned all the wise men and priests of his entourage, and in their 
presence he asked for her hand in marriage, according to Christian custom. Then 
he poured over her so many gold coins from his treasury that it was only with 
difficulty that she could walk through them. 


Sekandar Tests the Philosopher, the Physician, and the Goblet 
When the lovely cypress had been taken care of and a place fitted out that was 
suitable for her, Sekandar turned his attention to the philosopher, to see how he 
would fare in a battle of wits. He sent him a large goblet filled with cow’s fat, 
saying he should rub all his trunk and limbs with it, until his fatigue was quite 
gone, and then he could come and fill Sekandar’s soul and mind with 
knowledge. But the philosopher looked at the fat and said, “I’m not fooled by 
this ploy,” and he poured a thousand needles into the goblet and sent it back to 
the king. Sekandar looked at the needles and then had blacksmiths melt them 
down and make an iron disk from them, which he sent to the philosopher. He in 
turn looked at the disk and rubbed it for a while, until he transformed the dark 
metal into a bright mirror. This was taken to Sekandar at night, who kept his 
own counsel. He placed the mirror outside, so that the dew turned it black, then 
he sent it back to the philosopher, and so the duel of wits continued. The sage for 
his part polished the metal again, making it as bright as water, and sent it back to 
the king, but this time he smeared an unguent on it, so that humidity wouldn’t 
quickly turn it black again. 

Sekandar summoned him and had him seated below the throne. He 
questioned him, beginning with the goblet of fat, to see if the philosopher had 
understood what was meant. The sage said to the king, “Fat penetrates deeply 
into the body, and you were saying that your knowledge goes deeper than that of 
any philosopher. In answer I said, ‘O king, the hearts of wise men are like 
needles that can penetrate feet and bones and split stones open.’ You in turn 
asked, ‘How can the subtle arguments of a wise man penetrate a heart that’s 
been darkened by feasting, warfare, bloodshed, and constant fighting against 
enemies?’ And I replied, ‘My wise soul and heart know secrets subtler than a 
hair, but your heart is not darker than iron.’ You said that in the passing of the 
years your heart had rusted with spilled blood, and how was it possible for this to 
be righted, and for you to frame words in such darkness? I answered that I would 
work on your heart with divine knowledge, until it became as bright as water and 
certain of truth.” 


Sekandar was delighted by the man’s ready answers, and he ordered that his 
treasurer bring him a set of clothes, gold and silver, and a goblet filled with 
jewels. But when these were given to the sage, he said, “I have a hidden jewel 
that brings me whatever I wish and provokes no enemies, and unlike wealth, 
does not bring Ahriman in its train. It has no guards to demand a salary from me, 
and I fear no bandits when I’m traveling. Wisdom, knowledge, and 
righteousness are what’s needed, and going astray from these will lead a man to 
knock at ruin’s door. The Lord of all that is visible and invisible can provide me 
with sufficient food and clothing; knowledge is my guardian at night, and 
wisdom is the crown of my active soul. Why should I rejoice in more than this 
and worry about guarding such wealth? Tell your servants to take these things 
somewhere else, and may wisdom be my soul’s guide.” Sekandar wondered at 
the sage and thought the matter over. He said, “From now on the Lord of the sun 
and moon will find no sin in me: I will follow your advice and pay attention to 
the profitable things you have said.” 


Sekandar Tests the Indian Physician 

Sekandar summoned the Indian physician, who could diagnose a man’s health 
from a drop of urine. He questioned him as to the cause of illnesses that make 
one weep with pain, and the physician answered, “Whoever overeats, and does 
not watch what he consumes during meals, will grow ill; a healthy person will 
not eat too much, and a great man is one who seeks to be healthy. Now I will 
prepare an ointment for you, from herbs gathered in various places, and by using 
this you will stay in good health. Your appetites will increase, but if you overeat 
there will be no harmful results. If you do as I instruct you, your blood and 
marrow will grow strong and your body more energetic, your heart will feel the 
happiness of springtime, your cheeks will flush with health, and you will be 
eager to do noble deeds. And your hair will not turn white (white hair makes one 
despair of the world).” 

Sekandar said, “I have never heard of such a thing, or observed it of any 
sovereign. If you can bring me this ointment, you will be my guide through this 
world; my soul will be at your service and your enemies will be unable to harm 
you.” He had a robe of honor and other fine gifts prepared for the physician, and 
made him the chief of all his doctors. 

This eloquent physician then made his way into the mountains, with a few of 
his own companions. His knowledge of plants was extensive, and he knew both 
poisons and their antidotes. He gathered a great many mountain herbs, throwing 
away the useless ones and choosing those that were beneficial; these he used to 
prepare the ointment. He rubbed Sekandar’s body with this concoction, and for 
years the king’s body remained healthy. 

Then the king began to devote his nights to carousing rather than to sleep. His 
mind was filled with the desire for women, and he sought out soft, enticing 
places to be with them. This way of life weakened the king, but he gave no 
thought to the harm he was doing his body. One day the physician noted signs of 
weakness in the king’s urine and said to him, “There’s no doubt that a young 
man grows old quickly by sleeping with women. It looks to me as though you 
haven’t slept properly for three nights. Tell me, am I right?” Sekandar answered, 
“T’m perfectly well, my body has not a trace of weakness in it.” But the Indian 
doctor did not agree with him, and that night he searched his books and prepared 
a remedy against bodily infirmities. That same night Sekandar slept alone, 
unaccompanied by any of his beautiful womenfolk. At sunrise the doctor came 
to examine his urine, and he found that there were no telltale signs in it this time. 


He threw away the remedy he’d mixed and ordered wine, a feast, and musicians. 
The king asked him, “Why did you throw away that medicine you’d taken such 
trouble to prepare?” He replied, “Last night the king of the world gave no 
thought to finding a companion; he slept through the darkness alone. And since 
you slept alone, my lord, you need no medicine.” Sekandar laughed, pleased to 
be free of the threat of illness, and said, “May the world never be without India! 
All the astronomers and great savants of the world seem to live there.” Giving 
the doctor a purse of gold, and a black horse with golden bells attached to its 
bridle, Sekandar said to him, “May wisdom always guide your noble soul!” 


Sekandar Tests Kayd’s Goblet 

Next he gave orders that the golden goblet be filled with cold water and brought 
to him. Then everyone drank from the goblet, from dawn to dusk, but the water 

in it did not decrease. The king said to the wisest philosopher of his time, “You 

mustn’t conceal from me what’s happening here: how is it that the water in this 

cup is always replenished? Is it something to do with the stars, or is it a skill the 
Indians possess?” 

The philosopher replied, “Your majesty, this goblet is not something to make 
light of. It took the makers many years and a great deal of toil to fashion this. 
Astrologers from every country gathered at Kayd’s court to produce this cup and 
worked on it through bright days and dark nights, consulting their tables for days 
on end. Think of what happens here as analogous to magnetism, which attracts 
iron. In a similar way this cup attracts moisture from the turning heavens, but it 
does so in such a subtle fashion that human eyes cannot see the process.” 
Sekandar was delighted with the answer, and he said to the elders of Milad, “I 
shall never break my treaty with Kayd; he is aman whom one must respect, and 
as he has given me these four wonders I shall demand nothing further from 
him.” 

Then Sekandar gathered together two hundred camel loads of precious goods, 
to which he added a hundred jeweled crowns, as well as uncut jewels and gold 
coins, and had all this hidden in the mountains. 


Once all this wealth had been concealed, the men 
Who’d done the deed were never seen again— 

Only the massive treasure’s sovereign lord 

Knew where the mountains hid this glittering hoard. 


Sekandar’s Letter to Foor 

Having hidden his treasure in this way, Sekandar led his army out from Milad 
and bore down on Qanuj like the wind. He wrote a threatening, bellicose letter, 
“From Sekandar, the son of Filqus, who lights the flames of prosperity and 
adversity, to Foor, the lord of India, favored by the heavens, commander of the 
armies of Sind.” The letter opened with praise of God the Creator who is eternal, 
saying that those to whom he gives victory never want for countries, crowns, and 
thrones, while those from whom he turns away become wretched, and the sun 
never shines on them. “You will have heard how God has given me farr, victory, 
good fortune, crowns, thrones, and sovereignty over this dark earth. But none of 
this will last, and my days draw on; another will come after me to enjoy my 
conquests. My only ambition is to leave a good name and no disgrace behind me 
on this sublunar earth. When they bring this letter to you, free your dark soul 
from sorrow; descend from your throne, do not consult with your priests or 
advisors, but mount your horse and come to me asking for my protection. Those 
who try to trick me only prolong matters, and if for one moment you disobey me 
by choosing arrogance and warfare, I shall descend on your country like a fire, 
bringing an army of picked warriors, and once you see my cavalry you will 
regret your delay in submitting to me.” The letter was sealed with Sekandar’s 
mark, and a soldier who was eager for fame was chosen to take it. The 
messenger arrived at the court, and when Foor was told of his arrival he was 
summoned into the royal presence. 

When Foor read Sekandar’s letter he started up in rage and immediately 
wrote a furious reply, planting a tree in the garden of vengeance. “We should 
fear God, and not use such presumptuous language, because a boastful man will 
find himself friendless and with no resources. Have you no shame that you 
summon me like this? Isn’t your wisdom disturbed by this kind of talk? If it 
were Filqus writing thus to Foor, that would be something, but you? You dare to 
stir up trouble in this way? Your victory over Dara has gone to your head, but 
the heavens had had enough of him, and fate deals in this way with people who 
won’t listen to good advice. And you found your quarrel with Kayd was like a 
feast, so now you think all kings are your prey to hunt down. The ancient kings 
of Iran never addressed us in this way. I am Foor, descended from the family of 
Foor, and we have never paid any attention to Caesars from the west. When Dara 
asked for my help, I sent him war elephants to buy time, although I saw that 
neither his heart nor his fortune were as they should be. When he was murdered 
by aslave, good fortune deserted the Persians. If evil came to him from an evil 


counselor, is that any reason for you to lose your good sense? Don’t be so eager 
for battle and so disrespectful toward me; soon enough you’!] see my war 
elephants and armies crowding the way before you. All you think of is your own 
glory, but inside you are the color of Ahriman. Don’t sow these seeds of strife 
throughout the world; fear misfortune and the harm that will come to you. I 
mean well by this letter, and may it gratify your heart.” 


Sekandar Leads His Army Against Foor 
After reading this letter, Sekandar immediately selected chieftains from his 
army, men who were worthy of command: old in their understanding but young 
in years. Then he led his men against Foor, and they were so numerous that the 
earth was like a heaving sea. They traveled by every pathway, so that there 
seemed to be no track that they didn’t take, over mountains, along the seashores, 
and through the most difficult terrain. The army grew weary of harsh traveling 
and fierce battles, and one evening when they pitched camp, a group of them 
came before the king. They said, “Sovereign of Greece and of all Asia too, 

Earth cannot hold the massive armies you 

Lead out against the world: Foor will not fight, 

And China’s emperor quails before your might. 

Why should your army’s valiant soldiers die 

For worthless lands beneath an alien sky? 

In all our ranks we cannot find one horse 

That’s fit for war; if we reverse our course 

The infantry and cavalry will stray 

By unfamiliar paths and lose their way. 

Before, we fought and gained our victories 

Against the strength of human enemies, 

But none of us desires to die in wars 

With mountains and the sea’s infertile shores; 

Men do not fight with rocks and ocean tides, 

With barren plains and rugged mountain sides. 

Do not convert the glory of our fame 

To ignominious and ignoble shame.” 


Sekandar was angered by their words, and he made short work of their 
complaints. He said, “In the war with the Persians, no Greek soldier was injured; 
Dara was killed by his own slaves, and none of you suffered. I shall continue on 


my way without you, and place my foot on the dragon’s heart alone. You will 
see that the wretched Foor will have no desire for either battles or banquets when 
I have dealt with him. My help comes from God and the Persian army, and I 
have no need of Greek goodwill.” Frightened by his anger, the army begged him 
to pardon them and said, “We are all our Caesar’s slaves, and we tread the earth 
only as he wills us to. We shall go on, and when there are no horses left, we shall 
fight on foot. If the earth becomes a sea with our blood, and the low places 
become hills of corpses, even if the heavens rain down mountainous rocks, no 
enemy will ever see our backs in battle. We are your slaves, here for you to 
command, and how could you suffer any injury from us?” 

Sekandar then formed a new battle plan. He chose thirty thousand Persian 
warriors headed by experienced, well-armored chieftains. Behind them he placed 
forty thousand Greek cavalry, and behind them his warlike Egyptian cavalry, 
who fought with swords. Forty thousand of Dara’s troops and men from the 
Persian royal family accompanied them. Sekandar picked out twelve thousand 
Greek and Egyptian cavalry to bring up the rear and scour the plains and valleys. 
With his army Sekandar had sixty astrologers and sages to advise him on the 
most auspicious days for combat. 

When Foor became aware of the enemy’s approach, he chose a place suitable 
for battle, and his troops crowded the plain for four miles, with elephants in the 
van and his warriors behind them. Meanwhile Sekandar’s spies told him of the 
war elephants in Foor’s army, and how with their overpowering trunks (that 
were under the protection of Saturn) they could destroy two miles of cavalry, 
who would be unable either to defeat them or to get back to their own ranks. The 
spies drew a picture of an elephant on a piece of paper and showed it to the king, 
who had a model of the animal made from wax. Then he turned to his advisors 
and said, “Who can think of some way to defeat this?” The wise men of his court 
pondered the problem and then gathered together, from Greece, Egypt, and 
Persia, a group of more than forty times thirty blacksmiths, all of whom were 
expert at their trade. They made a horse of iron, with an iron saddle and an iron 
rider; its joints were held together with nails and solder, and then they polished 
both the rider and his steed. It was mounted on wheels and filled with black oil. 
They pushed it in front of Sekandar, who was pleased by the device and saw that 
it would be very useful. He ordered that more than a thousand of these iron 
horses and riders be made. What king had ever seen an army of dappled, gray, 
bay, and black horses, all of them made of iron? The devices went forward on 
wheels, and looked exactly like cavalry prepared for war. 


Sekandar’s Battle Against the Indian Troops; He Kills Foor 

As Sekandar approached Foor’s forces, the two armies caught sight of each 
other; amid clouds of dust a great cry went up from each side, and the warriors 
advanced on each other eager for battle. Then Sekandar’s men set fire to oil in 
the iron horses and routed Foor’s forces. Flames flared out from the iron steeds, 
and as soon as the elephants saw this they plunged precipitately this way and 
that. Foor’s army was in turmoil, and when the elephants wrapped their trunks 
around the burning horses, they were maddened by their wounds, and their 
mahouts were bewildered as to what to do. The whole Indian army, including its 
mighty elephants, began to flee, and Sekandar pursued his malicious enemies 
like the wind. As the air darkened at nightfall there was nowhere left for the 
army to fight. Sekandar and the Greeks halted at a place between two mountains 
and sent out scouts to keep their camp safe from the enemy. 

When the sun rose like a gold ingot, making the world as bright as clear 
crystal, the din of trumpets, bugles, and fifes rang out, and the two armies, 
thrusting their lances into the heavens, prepared to fight again. Clutching his 
Greek sword, Sekandar came between the hosts and sent a horseman to shout 
from a distance to Foor, 


“Sekandar stands before his troops and seeks 
To talk with Foor, and hear the words he speaks.” 


When Foor heard this he hurried to the head of his troops. Sekandar said, 


“Two armies have been shattered on these plains 
Where feral scavengers eat human brains, 

And horses tread on bones. We’re brave and young, 
Each of us is a noble champion— 

Our warriors have been killed, or they have fled: 
Why should they flee, or be left here for dead? 

Why should two countries fight when combat can 
Decide who is the victor, man to man? 

Prepare to face me, one of us alone 

Will live to claim these armies and this throne.” 


Foor agreed to his proposal, thinking that his own body was like a lion’s and that 
his horse was the equal of any fierce dragon, while Sekandar was as thin as a 


reed, wore light armor, and rode an exhausted mount. He said, 

“This is a noble custom: hand to hand 

We will decide who’s ruler of this land.” 
Grasping their swords, they advanced on one another in the space between the 
two hosts. When Sekandar saw his massive opponent, his fearsome sword in 
hand and mounted on a huge horse, he was astonished and almost despaired of 
his life. Nevertheless he went forward, and as he did so Foor was distracted by a 
cry that went up from the rear of his army and turned toward it. Like the wind 
then Sekandar bore down on him, and struck the lion-like warrior with a mighty 
sword blow. The blade sliced through Foor’s neck and trunk, and he fell from his 
horse to the earth. 

The Greek commander was overjoyed and his warriors rushed forward; the 
earth and clouds re-echoed with the thunder of a lion-skin drum, and the blare of 
trumpets. The Indian warriors looked on Sekandar with fury and were ready to 
fight, but a voice rang out from the Greek ranks: “Foor’s head lies here in the 
dust, his mammoth body is hacked and torn, who is it you wish to fight for, who 
will benefit from more sword blows and destruction? Sekandar has become to 
you as Foor was; it is he you must look to now for battles and banquets.” With a 
roar the Indian warriors called out their agreement, and they came forward to 
gaze at Foor’s hacked and bloody body. A wail of sorrow went up from their 
ranks, and they threw down their weapons. Fearfully they went before Sekandar, 
groaning and heaping dust on their heads, but Sekandar returned their weapons, 
and his words were welcoming: “One Indian has died here, but you should not 
grieve. I shall cherish you more than he did and try to drive sorrow from your 
lives. I will distribute his wealth among you, and make the Indians powerful 
with crowns and throne.” Then he mounted Foor’s throne; on the one side there 
was mourning and on the other feasting. But this is the way of the passing world, 
which brings sorrow to those who dwell in it. 

For two months Sekandar sat on the Indian throne, distributing wealth to the 
army; then he placed there as his regent an Indian nobleman called Savorg, 
saying to him, “Don’t hide your gold away. Distribute and consume whatever 
comes to you, and put no faith in this passing world, which sometimes favors 
Sekandar, sometimes Foor, and sometimes gives us pain and rage, sometimes 
joy and feasting.” Savorg too distributed gold and silver to the Indian warriors. 


Sekandar’s Pilgrimage to the Ka’abeh 


Not long after Sekandar’s army had become wealthy in this way, the clatter of 
drums rang out as dawn broke, and the air became as brilliant as a rooster’s eye 
from the throng of red, yellow, and purple silken banners. Sekandar set out for 
Mecca, and some of his entourage were pleased by this, some alarmed. With 
drums rolling and trumpets blaring, he came to the house made with such toil by 
Abraham, the son of Azar. God named the site the House of Holiness, the goal of 
all God’s roads. He named it his own house, and called you to worship there: the 
world’s God has no need for food or pleasure or rest or comfort, but this has 
always been his place of worship since any place at all has existed, a place to 
remember God. 

Sekandar approached Qadesiya, laying claim to the land from Jahrom in Pars 
as he went. Nasr, the son of Qotayb, heard of his approach and went out to 
welcome him with a group of noble horseman bearing lances. A horseman 
hurried from Mecca to Sekandar telling him that the man who was coming to 
greet him had no desire for wealth or power and was a descendant of Esmail, the 
son of Abraham. When Nasr arrived Sekandar welcomed him, and assigned him 
a splendid place in his entourage; Nasr was overjoyed, and recounted to 
Sekandar the secrets of his lineage. The king answered him, “My honest and 
pure-hearted lord, tell me who is the noblest of your tribe, after yourself?” Nasr 
replied, “O ruler of the world, Jaza’ is the greatest man in this place. When 
Esmail departed this life, the world conqueror Qahtab appeared from the deserts 
with a host of savage swordsmen, and by main force took the land of Yemen. 
Many innocent men were killed at that time, and the fortunes of our tribe 
declined. But God was not pleased with Qahtab, and the heavens darkened for 
him. When he died Jaza’ took his place, an unjust and troublesome man. From 
the shrine here to the Yemen is all under his control, and his men fish the Red 
Sea. He has turned away from justice and gives no thought to the one God; he 
holds the lands here in his fist, and the tribe of Esmail welters in blood because 
of him.” 

When Sekandar heard these words he sought out everyone he could find from 
the family of Jaza’ and had them killed: the children’s souls were parted from 
their bodies, and not one of his race was left alive. With the help of his warriors 
he freed the Hejaz and the Yemen from their unjust rulers, and exalted the tribe 
of Esmail. Then he went on foot to the shrine, and the people of Esmail were so 
overjoyed at his presence that wherever he trod the king’s treasurer scattered 
gold coins before him. 


Sekandar Leads His Army to Egypt 

When he returned from his pilgrimage he bestowed gold on Nasr, enriching 
those who had been poor and obliged to find food by their own labors. Then he 
led his army to Jeddah, where he didn’t stay long. The soldiers were set to work 
making ships and a number of boats, in which the world conqueror and his army 
set off for Egypt. The Egyptian king at that time was named Qaytun, and he 
possessed an unimaginably large army; when he heard that a victorious world 
conqueror was coming with a following wind from the shrine at Mecca, he set 
out with a large company of soldiers to welcome him and took coins, slaves, and 
crowns as presents. Sekandar was pleased to see him and stayed in Egypt for a 
year, until he and his troops were well rested. 

Andalusia was ruled over by a woman; she was wise, had innumerable troops 
at her disposal, and ruled in prosperity and happiness. The name of this generous 
and ambitious woman was Qaydafeh. She sought out a painter from the ranks of 
her soldiers, someone who could make an accurate likeness, and said to him, 
“Go to Sekandar, and see that you make no mention of my country or of me. 
Look carefully at him, see what his complexion is, examine his face and stature, 
and then paint me a full-length portrait of him.” The painter heard her and 
immediately mounted his horse, ready to carry out his sovereign’s orders. As 
quick as a royal courier he made his way from Andalusia to Egypt and into the 
presence of Sekandar. He observed him when he gave audience and when he 
was in the saddle; then he took paper and Chinese ink, drew his portrait exactly 
as he was in real life, and returned to Andalusia. Qaydafeh was moved when she 
saw Sekandar’s face and sighed to herself, then hid the portrait away. 

Sekandar asked Qaytun, “Who is Qaydafeh’s equal in the world?” 


And King Qaytun replied, “In all the earth 
There’s no one of her glory and her worth; 
Unless he were to read the muster rolls 

No one could count the soldiers she controls. 
You won’t find anyone in any land 

Who has the wealth she’s able to command, 

Who has her dignity, her eloquence, 

Her wisdom, goodness, and magnificence. 

She’s built from stone a wide and wondrous town 
So strong no leopard’s claws could tear it down— 
Four parasangs in length, no man can measure 


Its endless width. And if you ask for treasure, 
Hers is uncountable; for years there’s been 
Talk in the world of this exalted queen.” 


Sekandar’s Letter to Qaydafeh 

Sekandar summoned a scribe and had a letter written on silk, from Sekandar, the 
slayer of lions and conqueror of cities, to Qaydafeh the wise, whose name is 
unequalled in glory. The letter opened by invoking God, who is generous and 
just and who bestows prosperity on those who merit it, and continued: “I have 
not rushed into war with you; rather, I have been weighing the reports of the 
splendor of your court. When they bring you this letter, may it enlighten your 
dark soul. Send tribute to me, and understand that you do not have the strength 
to oppose me. You are wise, so act with foresight, as a powerful and religious 
sovereign should. If you attempt any kind of trick against me, you will see 
nothing but adverse fortune come your way. You don’t have to look far to learn 
this lesson: consider what happened to Dara and Foor.” As soon as the ink had 
dried the letter was sealed with musk. 

A quick messenger took the letter at Sekandar’s command, and when 
Qaydafeh read it she was astonished at its language. Her answer was as follows: 
“Praise be to him who created the earth, who has made you victorious over Foor 
of India, over Dara, and over the nobles of Sind. Your victory over these 
warriors has made you willful. You have crowned yourself in victory, but how 
can you put me on their level? I am far greater than they were, in farr and in 
glory, in my armies, and in my royal wealth. How can I submit to a Greek 
overlord, and how can you expect me to tremble with fear because of your 
threats? My armies number more than a thousand thousand men, and princes 
command every one of those armies. Who are you that you should boast in this 
way? Your defeat of Dara has made you the prince of braggarts!” She placed her 
gold seal on the letter and dispatched the messenger, who rode like the wind. 


The Greeks Capture Qaydafeh’s Son 

Sekandar read her letter and then he had the trumpets sounded and his army led 
out. They marched for a month until they reached the borders of Qaydafeh’s 
lands. A king called Faryan reigned there, a man possessed of an army and 
wealth, and successful in his life. His city was built to withstand war, and its 
walls were so high that cranes could not overfly them. He and his army occupied 
this fortress, and Sekandar ordered that balistas and catapults be brought up to 


batter the walls. After a week of fighting his army entered the town, and the 
victor gave orders that no blood was to be spilled. 

One of Qaydafeh’s sons, named Qaydrus, was married to Faryan’s daughter, 
and was in the city, as his father-in-law delighted in his company. Qaydrus and 
his wife, however, had been captured by a man named Shahrgir; Sekandar knew 
of this and looked for some way to free them. He summoned his vizier, a wise 
and reasonable man named Bitqun, and showed him his crown and throne, 
saying, “Qaydrus and his bride will come before you, and I shall call you 
Sekandar, the son of Filqus. You will be seated on the throne here like a king, 
and I will stand ready to serve you. You will give orders that Qaydrus’s head is 
to be severed from his shoulders by the executioner. I will humble myself before 
you and plead for them; you will clear the audience hall of courtiers, and when I 
redouble my pleas, you will grant my request.” The vizier was very troubled by 
all this, as he was unsure what it meant. Sekandar continued, “This business 
must remain secret. Call me in as an envoy and talk a little about Qaydafeh; then 
cordially send me off to her with ten horsemen, saying, ‘Hurry and take this 
letter and bring me the answer.’” Bitqun replied, “I will do it: Pll carry out this 
deception according to your orders.” 

Dawn came, the sun drew its glittering dagger, and night fled away in fear. 
Bitqun sat on the royal throne, but there was shame in his face and anxiety in his 
heart. Sekandar stood before him as a servant: he had closed the doors to the 
court and opened the doors to deception. When Shahrgir led in Qaydafeh’s 
weeping son as a Captive, together with his young and beautiful wife, who was 
wringing her hands in grief, Bitqun quickly said, “Who is this man, who has 
cause to weep so much?” The young man answered, “Come to your senses! I am 
Qaydrus, Qaydafeh’s son, and this is Faryan’s daughter, my sole wife. I wish to 
take her home and cherish her like my own soul, but I am a prisoner in 
Shahrgir’s hands, my soul wounded by the stars, my body by arrows.” When 
Bitqun heard him he was distressed and angry. He started up and said to the 
executioner, “These two must be buried beneath the dust! Cut off their heads 
with your Indian sword: now, just as they are, in chains here.” 

Sekandar came forward and kissed the ground, and said, “Great king of royal 
lineage, if you will free them for my sake, I shall be able to hold my head up in 
any company. Why should you vengefully cut off the heads of innocent people? 
The world’s Creator will not look well on us for this.” Wise Bitqun answered 
him, “You have freed these two from death,” and to Qaydrus he added, “You’ve 
kept your head, which was already leaving your shoulders! Now I shall send you 


and this man who has interceded for you to your mother, and he can explain 
what has happened. It would be good if she would then send us tribute: this 
would mean that no one will lose his skin in this quarrel. Look after this vizier of 
mine, who will offer your mother war with me or prosperity; act well toward 
him as he has done toward you, since a noble man’s heart is moved to repay 
kindness. When he has received the queen’s answer, send him safely back to 
me.” Qaydrus replied, “I will not take my heart or ears or eyes 

From him: how could I treat him otherwise 

Since he has here restored to me my wife, 

My soul, the living sweetness of my life?” 


Sekandar Goes as an Envoy to Qaydafeh 

Sekandar selected ten suitable companions from among the Greeks: they were 
all privy to his identity and willing to keep his secret. He said to them, “On this 
journey address me as Bitqun.” Qaydrus led the group, and Sekandar watched 
him and listened to him attentively. Their splendid horses galloped forward like 
fire, until the travelers came to a mountain made all of crystal, yet with fruit 
trees and many plants growing on its slopes. They continued into the queen’s 
realm, and when Qaydafeh heard that her son, about whom she had been 
anxiously seeking news, was approaching, she went out to welcome him with a 
large escort of nobles. As soon as Qaydrus saw his mother he dismounted and 
made his obeisance before her. She told him to remount, and as they rode on 
together, she grasped his hand in hers. Qaydrus told her all that he had seen and 
heard, and he turned pale as he described his sufferings in Faryan’s city, and 
how he was now bereft of his crown, throne, army, and wealth. And he added, 
“This man who has come with us saved my and my bride’s lives; if he hadn’t 
intervened, Sekandar would have ordered that my head be cut off and my body 
burned. Treat him well, and don’t hold back with excuses that would make me 
break my promise to him.” 

Hearing her son’s words, Qaydafeh was distraught with grief. She had the 
messenger summoned from her palace where he had been installed and motioned 
him to a fine throne. She questioned him closely and made much of him and saw 
that a special residence was set aside for his stay. There she sent fine foods, 
clothes, and carpets. 

At dawn the next morning Sekandar made his way to the court to talk with 
the queen. Servants drew the curtain aside and let his horse enter. He stared in 
wonder at Qaydafeh on her ivory throne, with her crown studded with rubies and 


turquoise, wearing a Chinese cloak woven with gold, her many serving girls with 
their necklaces and earrings standing around her, her face shining like the sun, 
her throne supported on crystal columns, her gold dress woven with jewels and 
clasped with a precious black and white Yemeni stone. Under his breath he 
called on God repeatedly. He saw that her throne alone surpassed anything that 
Greece or Persia could provide. He came forward and kissed the ground, like a 
man anxious to make a good impression. Qaydafeh encouraged him by asking a 
number of questions; then, like the sun passing from the dome of the sky she 
declared that the audience for strangers was over, and summoned a meal, wine, 
and musicians. Tables made of teak and inlaid with gold on an ivory ground 
were brought in; various kinds of food were served, and wine was set out for 
when they had finished eating. Gold and silver trays were put before them; first 
they drank to Qaydafeh herself, and then, as she drank more deeply, the queen 
began to look closely at Sekandar. She said to her steward, “Bring me that 
shining silk with the charming face painted on it; bring it quickly, just as it is. 
Don’t stand there wringing your hands, go!” 

The steward brought the cloth and laid it before her. She stared at it for a long 
time and then looked at Sekandar’s face: she saw no difference between them. 
Qaydafeh knew that her guest was the Greek king and the commander of his 
armies, that he had made himself his own messenger and bravely come into her 
presence. She said to him, “You seem a man well favored by fortune. Tell me, 
what message did Sekandar give to you?” And he replied, “The world’s king 
spoke to me in the presence of our nobles. He said to tell the pure-hearted 
Qaydafeh, ‘Pursue only honesty, pay attention to what I say, and do not turn 
your head aside from my orders. If your heart harbors any rebellion, I shall bring 
an army against you that will break it in pieces. I have found evidence of your 
greatness, and I have not hurried to declare war on you. Wisdom and modesty 
are yours, and your subtle policies maintain the world in safety. If you willingly 
pay me tribute, you need have no fear of me; if you refuse to go the way of 
rebellion and disaster, you will see from me nothing but kindness and 
righteousness.’” 

Qaydafeh was infuriated when she heard this, but she thought that silence 
was the best policy. She said, “Go to your quarters now, and rest with your 
companions. When you come to me tomorrow, I shall give you my answer and 
some good advice for your return journey.” Sekandar went to the building that 
had been assigned to him and spent the night considering what he should do. 
When the world’s lamp appeared above the mountaintops, and the plains and 


foothills took on the appearance of glittering brocade, Sekandar made his way 
back to Qaydafeh’s court; his lips were full of smiles, his heart of grief and 
anxiety. The chancellor recognized him as the foreign envoy and, after 
questioning him, led him into the queen’s presence. The audience hall was full 
of strangers. The queen’s throne was crystal patterned with agates and emeralds 
surrounding gems of royal worth; its base was sandal and aloes wood and it 
rested on pillars studded with turquoise. Sekandar was astonished at the splendor 
and glory he saw, and he thought, “This is indeed a throne room, and no God- 
fearing man ever saw its like.” He came forward to the queen and was directed 
to a subsidiary golden throne. Qaydafeh said to him, “Well, Bitqun, why are you 
staring in this way? Is it that Greece can’t produce the like of what you see here, 
in my humble country?” 

Sekandar replied, “Your majesty, you should not speak contemptuously of 
this palace. It is far more glorious than the palaces of other kings and seems like 
a mine of precious stones.” Qaydafeh laughed at his reaction, and she felt delight 
in her heart that she was able to tease him in this way. Then she cleared the court 
and motioned the envoy to come closer to her. She said to him, 


“Filqus’s son, I see you’re fashioned for 
Battles and royal banquets, peace and war!” 


Sekandar turned pale at her words, and then blushed violently; his soul was filled 
with distress. He said, “Wise queen, such words are not worthy of you. I am 
Bitqun, don’t say that I am a son of Filqus. I give thanks to God that there is no 
one of noble lineage here, because if he reported what you have said to my king 
my soul would soon be separated from my body.” Qaydafeh replied, “Enough 
excuses! If with your own eyes 

You see yourself, then you must recognize 

The truth of what I say, and don’t attempt 

Either to lie or treat me with contempt.” 


Then she produced the silk with the charming face painted upon it and laid it 
before him; if the painted face had moved at all you would have said that it was 
Sekandar himself. Sekandar saw it and he nervously chewed his lower lip; the 
day had suddenly turned as dark as night for him. He said, “A man should never 
go out in the world without a hidden dagger!” Qaydafeh answered, “If you had 
your sword belt on and stood before me with a dagger, you’d have neither the 


strength nor an adequate sword nor a place to fight nor a means of escape.” 
Sekandar said, “A noble and ambitious man should not flinch at danger; a low- 
minded person will never rise in the world. If I had my arms and armor here, all 
your palace would be a sea of blood; I’d have killed you, or ripped open my own 
belly in front of those who hate me!” 


Qaydafeh Gives Sekandar Some Advice 

Qaydafeh laughed at his blustering manliness and his angry words. She said, “O 
lion-like king, don’t let yourself be led astray by your male pride! The Indian 
king Foor wasn’t killed because of your glory, and neither were Dara and the 
heroes of Sind. Their good fortune was at an end, and yours was in the 
ascendant; and now you’re so full of your manly valor because you’ve become 
the greatest man on earth at the moment. But you should know that all good 
things come from God, and while you live you should be grateful to him. You 
say the world is yours because of your knowledge, but what you say does not 
seem true to me. What will knowledge avail you when you go into the maw of 
the dragon death? Acting as your own envoy is sewing your shroud while you 
are still young. I am not in the habit of shedding blood, nor of attacking rulers. 
When a monarch has power and is merciful and just, that is when he becomes 
knowledgeable. Know that whoever spills a king’s blood will see nothing but 
fire as his reward. Be assured of your safety, and leave here with joy. But when 
you have gone change your habits: don’t go acting as your own messenger again, 
because even the dust knows that you are Sekandar. And I’m not aware of any 
great hero whose portrait I don’t possess, stored away with a reliable courtier. 
While you remain here I will call you Bitqun and seat you at court accordingly, 
so that no one will guess your secret or hear you name. I will send you on your 
way in safety, but you, my lord, must be reasonable and swear that you will 
never plot against my son, my country, or any of my people or allies, and that 
you will refer to me only as your equal, as the ruler of my own country.” 

Freed from the threat of being killed, Sekandar rejoiced to hear her words. He 
swore by the just God, by the Christian faith, and by the dust of battle that he 
would act only kindly and righteously toward her land, her son, and her noble 
allies, and that he would never plot their destruction. When she had heard his 
oath, Qaydafeh said, “There is one other piece of advice that should not be kept 
from you: know then that my son Taynush has little sense and pays scant 
attention to my knowledge and advice. He is Foor’s son-in-law and he must not 
in any way suspect that you and Sekandar occupy the same skin, or even that 
you are friends. He is eager to avenge Foor, and to confound the earth and sky in 
war. Now, go joyfully and safely to your own quarters, and have no fear of the 
world’s sorrows.” 


Sekandar Takes Precautions Against Taynush 
When Sekandar left the wise queen Qaydafeh, his grateful heart seemed huge as 
a mountain; his brow was cleared of furrows, and he had no intention of going 
back on his promise. At dawn the next morning he went to her again when she 
was Seated on an ivory throne with her commanders ranged about her. On the 
front of the throne was a design in gold, precious black and white Yemeni 
stones, surrounded by jewels, and before her there were bunches of musk- 
scented roses. Her sons Taynush, the breaker of horses, and Qaydrus stood in 
front of her, listening to her words. Her younger son said to his mother, “Just and 
fortunate queen, see that Bitqun leaves you well satisfied and with a guide to 
ensure that no one troubles him along the way or thinks of him as our enemy. I 
say this because he saved my life, and I think of him as my own soul.” His 
mother said, “I will see that his honors are augmented.” Then she turned to 
Sekandar and said, “Tell us what is hidden; what is it you desire, and what has 
Sekandar said? What message have you brought us from him?” Sekandar 
replied, “Noble queen, my stay with you has been lengthy. Sekandar told me to 
ask for tribute and said that if I delayed my return he would lead his army here 
and destroy this country together with its crown, its throne, its sovereign, its 
wealth, and its good fortune.” 

When Taynush heard Sekandar’s words he started up like a wild gust of wind 
and burst out, 


“You fool, you nobody, whom no one who 

Has sense considers human, who are you? 

And don’t you realize where it is you’re sitting? 

Stand, and hide your hands! Don’t you know what’s fitting 
Before a queen? Your stubborn head is full 

Of harebrained speeches—you’re contemptible! 

Who is this king of yours? If you don’t bow 


Respectfully before our sovereign now 

I'll lop your head off here as easily 

As I might pick an orange from a tree. 

Before our armies I’ Il display your head 

And Foor will be avenged when you are dead!” 


Seeing his bellicose rage, his mother shouted, “These are not his words, his 
friend sent him to our court and he speaks as his representative!” And she 
ordered that Taynush be taken out of the court. Then she turned to Sekandar and 
said to him privately, “This ignorant devil’s spawn must not be allowed to think 
up some plot against you in secret. You’re a wise and understanding man, what 
do you think should be done with him?” Sekandar answered, “This is not how he 
should be treated; it would be right to call him back.” The queen recalled her son 
and motioned him to his throne again, and Sekandar addressed him, “My lord, if 
you would accomplish your desires, you should act more calmly. I accept 
whatever you say and feel no resentment against you. My unfortunate position 
here is because of Sekandar, who rejoices in his throne and crown. It was he who 
sent me here to ask for tribute from Queen Qaydafeh, so that I could bear 
whatever unfortunate consequences there might be. I will soon give him his 
answer, and I suggest a plan that should have splendid consequences. If I take 
his hand in mine and bring him to where you’re sitting in such a way that you’ll 
see no army with him, and no sword or crown or throne either, what will you 
give me from your kingdom, if indeed you think well of my friendly offer?” 

Taynush responded, “These words of yours should be acted on now. If you’re 
being truthful and can do what you’ve described, I shall give you treasure and 
money, horses and faithful retainers, whatever you wish. I shall always be 
grateful to you and will make you a great lord. You’ll be my counselor and 
treasurer, here in this country.” Sekandar stood up and took Taynush’s hand in 
his, to seal the pact. Taynush asked, “But how can you manage this, what magic 
are you going to use?” 

Sekandar said, “When I leave this court you must accompany me, together 
with a thousand cavalry worthy of warfare. I saw a wooded area on the way 
here, and I'll hide you and your army there and you can wait in ambush. I’ll go 
on ahead to sound out Sekandar’s malevolent soul, and Ill say to him, 
‘Qaydafeh has sent you so much tribute that you’!] never want for wealth again, 
but their envoy says he’s afraid to meet you while you’re surrounded by your 
army. If you and your advisors will come to see Taynush, you will be able to 


receive the wonderful treasures he has brought. He’!l come forward if he sees 
you without your army, but if he decides to go back, the road is open and we 
can’t stop him.’ When he hears these flattering words of mine, it won’t cross his 
mind that I’m deceiving him; he’|l come into the shade beneath the trees, asking 
his treasurer to bring along wine, and his crown and throne. Then you will 
surround him with your troops and his days will be at an end. My vengeance and 
your heart’s desire will be accomplished together, an enormous amount of 
wealth will come into your hands, as well as slaves and caparisoned horses, and 
from then on no one will seek to disturb your peace.” 

Taynush was overjoyed when he heard all this and lifted up his head like a 
noble cypress tree. He said, “My hope is that his day will darken while mine 
grows bright. He will fall suddenly into my trap and pay for the blood he has 
spilled in the world, the blood of Dara, and of Sind’s nobility, and of brave Foor, 
the king of India.” When Qaydafeh heard Sekandar’s words, she saw well 
enough what his plan was; she smiled secretly, hiding her coral lips beneath her 
muslin veil. As Sekandar left her presence, his darkened soul was filled with 
anxiety. 


Sekandar’s Treaty with Qaydafeh and His Return 
All the long night he sought for some solution. When the sun showed the fringe 
of its Chinese royal robe, raising its golden banner above the mountains, and the 
purple silken banner of night dipped in submission, Sekandar made his way to 
the queen. A servant stood to greet him, and the world conqueror dismounted, as 
was customary, and walked into her presence. He was ushered forward, and the 
queen cleared the court of strangers. Seeing Qaydafeh on her throne, Sekandar 
said, “May the planet Jupiter accompany your deliberations. I swear by the 
Messiah’s faith, by his just commands, by God who is a witness to my tongue, 
by our rites and by our great cross, by the head and soul of your majesty, by our 
vestments, our clergy, and the Holy Ghost, that the soil of Andalusia will never 
see me again; that I shall send no army here, that I shall not seek to deceive you, 
that I shall do no harm to your loved son, neither through my commands or by 
my own hand. I shall remember in my soul how you kept faith with me and I 
shall not seek your harm in any way. Anyone who wishes you well is my 
brother, and your court is as sacred as the cross to me.” 

Qaydafeh considered his oath, his sincere heart, and his promise. She had 
golden thrones placed throughout her audience hall, and the front of the hall was 
hung with splendid Chinese cloths. She summoned her chieftains and assigned 


them thrones, and then had her two noble sons, as well as her extended family 
and her allies, called in. She said, “In this fleeting world it is right to avoid 
sorrow when we can, and I have no desire that the turning heavens should send 
me vengeance and warfare as my fate. Sekandar’s longing for wealth will never 
be sated, not if he brings the heavens down to the earth. For the sake of wealth 
he is seeking to harm us, but all the wealth in the world is not worth such pain 
and sorrow. I have no wish to make war on him, or to bring hardship on this 
realm. I shall send him a letter full of good advice; I will honor him and offer 
him good counsel. If then he still looks for war, he will find my advice will be 
followed by his defeat and imprisonment; if I lead my armies against him, the 
heavens and the moon will pity his plight. There is no harm in trying this, and it 
may be that we can remain friends. What do you say to my proposal? Answer 
me, and give me your counsel.” 

The assembly raised their heads and spoke in response. They said, “O just 
and righteous queen, whose like no one can remember having seen before, you 
say only what is best, and the land over which you rule is indeed fortunate! If 
this king does become your friend, this is an outcome that all good men would 
desire: your wealth will not be substantially diminished, and no wealth is worth 
your distress. If a man like Sekandar, who comes from Greece and turns 
countries into seas of blood with his sword, can be turned back from your door 
with a few gifts, we say that all the wealth in the world is not worth one coin if 
this can be achieved. We too desire only peace between you, and a man who 
seeks war is unworthy of respect.” 

Hearing her wise counselors’ words, she had her treasury opened and her 
father’s throne, together with his golden armbands and torques, brought out. 
There was also a crown, inlaid with jewels so splendid that no one in that 
country could put a value on them. She said to Sekandar’s supposed envoy, 
“This crown is priceless, and it would be wrong for anyone else but your king to 
have it. Since I see that he is worthy of such a crown I choose him to own it 
rather than my own sons.” The throne had been made in seventy sections, and it 
could be put together only by the man who had taken it apart, so cunningly were 
the pieces fitted to one another. Its feet were carved like dragons’ heads, and no 
one could compute the value of the jewels with which it was studded: there were 
four hundred rubies the color of pomegranate seeds, each weighing two mesqals, 
and four hundred uncut emeralds, the color of the green in a rainbow. Besides 
this she gave four hundred huge elephant tusks; the skins of four hundred 
Barbary leopards; a thousand dappled deer skins, colorfully embroidered with 


various pictures; a hundred hunting dogs and cheetahs that could see a gazelle 
quicker than the arrow flies; two hundred water buffalo led by slaves; four 
hundred ebony stools upholstered in silk brocade; and four hundred more of 
aloes wood with gold designs on them. A hundred noble and richly caparisoned 
horses bearing precious goods were led in, besides which there were a thousand 
Indian and Greek swords to which the queen added suits of armor and twelve 
hundred helmets. Then she said to her treasurer, “This is the greater part of what 
I wish to give. Count it out to Bitqun, and tell him that he must be ready to leave 
at dawn.” 

Dawn lifted its banner and turned the purple sky as white as camphor; the 
earth was renewed, the mountains glowed red as juniper dye, and from the royal 
court the din of drums rang out. Sekandar mounted his horse, ready for the 
departure Qaydafeh had commanded. Taynush prepared his escort of warriors 
and made his way to the queen’s palace. Those who were to leave bade her 
farewell, saying, “May your soul and the heavens be as the warp and weft of one 
cloth.” 

They traveled stage by stage until they had almost reached the Greek camp. 
Sekandar made a stop at the place in the woods that he had mentioned, where 
there was a flowing stream. He said to Taynush, “Rest here, and refresh yourself 
with wine. I shall go and do as I promised: I’ll keep my word in every way.” 
Sekandar traveled on with his men until they reached his army; a great shout of 
joy went up when he rejoined his troops, since they had despaired of ever seeing 
his face again. They prepared him a royal crown, congratulating him, and 
bowing their heads down to the ground in homage. Sekandar selected a thousand 
armored soldiers bearing ox-headed maces, and in battle order the men 
surrounded the wood where Taynush and his companions were. Then Sekandar 
cried out, “My headstrong lord, consider now and say 

Whether you want to fight or run away!” 


Taynush trembled in his encampment and regretted his former plans. He said, 
“Great king, choose kindness over contempt. Act toward me as you did toward 
my brother, Qaydrus: be magnanimous and just to me. This is not what you 
promised my mother; didn’t you tell her you wouldn’t go back on your word?” 


And Sekandar replied to him, “What’s made 
You turn so weak, and why are you afraid? 
Your heart should have no fear; you’re safe with me, 


As are all members of your family. 

I shall not break my word to Qaydafeh— 
My promise will be kept in every way: 
There is no good in lying kings who make 
Fair promises they then proceed to break.” 


Taynush quickly dismounted, kissed the ground, and began to weep. The king 
took his hand in his, just as he had done when they sealed their pact, and said, 
“Calm yourself, and think no more of this, I bear no grudge against you in my 
heart. Before your mother on the throne I put my hand in yours and said that in 
just such a fashion I would place the hand of the king of the world in yours. Now 
I fulfill my promise, since it is not right for kings to utter empty words. I am 
Sekandar, and I was Sekandar then, when I spun such tales at your court. 
Qaydafeh knew on that day that the hand in yours was a king’s.” Then he said to 
a servant, “Place a throne beneath that blossoming tree.” He commanded that a 
meal, music, and wine be provided, and gave Greek, Chinese, and Persian robes 
of honor to Taynush. He gave the prince’s companions gold and silver, and to 
those of appropriate rank he gave crowns and belts. Then he said to Taynush, 
“You should not stay here, this wood is far from your homeland. Say to 
Qaydafeh from me, ‘Wise, far-sighted, and accomplished queen, while I live I 
shall keep faith with you, and my soul is filled with kindness toward you.’” 


Sekandar Travels to the Land of the Brahmins 

Sekandar led his army quickly from that place to the land of the Brahmins, as he 
wished to learn from the ascetics who lived there of the land’s ancient practices. 
When the Brahmins heard that the king was approaching with his army, these 
God-fearing men made their way down the mountains and gathered together. 
They wrote a letter to Sekandar, which began by invoking God’s blessings on 
him, and wishing him victory and increasing knowledge and power. It continued, 
“O warlike king, God has given you the great world, so why do you come to this 
worthless land, the dwelling place of those who live in worship? If you have 
come here looking for wealth, you must be sorely lacking in wisdom: we have 
only patience and knowledge, and this knowledge fills our souls with 
contentment. Patience cannot be taken from us, and knowledge never harms 
anyone. You will see nothing in this place but a troupe of naked ascetics, living 
scattered here and there in the wind and snow; and if you stay here for long, you 
will have to live off the seeds of herbs.” 


A messenger, clothed only in a covering of roots and vegetation about his 
loins, came to Sekandar, who read their letter and decided to treat the man kindly 
and well. He left the army where they had halted, while he himself went forward 
with his Greek philosophers. The ascetics heard of the king’s approach and one 
by one they traveled to greet him. Since they possessed no wealth and had no 
produce or harvested grain to offer, they brought him small valueless things. One 
by one they greeted the magnanimous lord of the earth. Sekandar saw their 
faces, heard their chants, and saw them running with naked feet, bodies, and 
heads; he saw that their bodies were unprovided for but their souls were filled 
with the fruits of knowledge; their clothes were of leaves, their diet of seeds, 
they lived withdrawn from all fighting and warfare, and their food, sleep, and 
repose were in the plains and mountains. 

He questioned them about their food and repose, and their peace in the midst 
of war. One replied, “We have small need of clothes, carpets, and food: because 
a man is born naked from his mother and returns naked to the earth, it is wrong 
for him to fuss about what he should wear. Every place is a place of fear, 
despair, and terror. The earth is our mattress, the sky our covering, and we watch 
the road for death to come. An ambitious man struggles to gain something that is 
not worth the effort he has put forth, and then he passes from the world while his 
gold and treasure and crown remain here. Only his good deeds will accompany 
him, and his head and glory will both return to dust.” 

Sekandar questioned him: “Who is the king of our souls? Who always 
accompanies us toward evil?” The ascetic answered, “Greed is the king, the 
ground of vengeance and the place of sin.” Sekandar asked, “What is the reality 
of this thing that makes us weep with longing?” The sage replied, “Greed and 
need are two demons, wretched and malevolent; one is dry-lipped from longing, 
the other passes sleepless nights from excess. Time passing hunts down both, 
and blessed is the man whose mind accepts wisdom.” When Sekandar heard 
these words, his face turned pale as fenugreek; his cheeks became sallow, his 
eyes filled with tears, and furrows filled his once-smiling face. The great king 
asked, “What do you need that I can provide? I will not hesitate to give you my 
wealth, or to undergo suffering for you.” The ascetics answered, “Great king, 
close the door of death and old age for us.” The king answered, “But there is no 
pleading with death: no matter how one hangs back from this sharp-clawed 
dragon, even if one is made of iron, one cannot escape him. And no matter how 
long our youth lasts, we cannot evade old age.” The Brahmin said, “Wise and 
puissant king, since you know that there is no recourse against death, and that 


there is no disaster worse than old age, why do you long for the world in this 
way, why do you breathe in the scent of this poisonous flower so eagerly? All 
you will receive is suffering, while your enemies will inherit the wealth you 
acquire; to make oneself suffer for another’s profit is the act of an ignorant man 
or a fool. White hairs are a message from death, and what makes you hope that 
you can stay in the world?” 

The wise king replied, “Just as by God’s will a slave must die, this is my fate 
too, as the turning heavens direct; neither wise men nor warriors can struggle 
against fate. And the star of those who were killed fighting against me had 
declined: they deserved their grief and to have their blood shed, since an unjust 
man cannot escape his end. They experienced divine punishment, because they 
had strayed from the way of wisdom. No man can evade the will of God, or 
explain what fate brings.” 

Sekandar offered many gifts to the ascetics, but none of them took anything 
from him: greed was not a part of their natures. He did no harm in that place, and 
set off toward the west. 


Sekandar Reaches the Western Sea and Abyssinia 

The army journeyed on, stage by stage, exhausted by their travels, but still 
determined. After he left the land of the Brahmins, Sekandar saw a deep and 
boundless ocean. On its shores lived men who veiled themselves like women 
and dressed in colorful splendid clothes. Their language was not Arabic, 
Turkish, Chinese, or Persian. Their diet consisted of fish, and their land was cut 
off from the outside world. Sekandar was astonished to meet such folk, and 
when he saw the ocean he invoked the name of God. Just at that moment a 
mountain rose up out of the water; it was in two sections and glittered yellow 
like the sun. Immediately Sekandar asked for a boat so that he could look at it 
more closely, but one of his Greek philosophers advised him not to cross the 
ocean’s depths: he said Sekandar should send someone of less importance to 
look at it. Thirty Greeks and Persians manned the boat, but the yellow mountain 
was a huge fish and, as soon as the boat approached, it dived quickly beneath the 
surface, dragging the boat with it. Sekandar’s army watched in horror and called 
on God to protect them. The Greek philosopher said, “Knowledge is the best of 
all things, and a knowledgeable man is greater than all others. If the king had 
gone in that boat and been destroyed, all this army would have suffered in their 
hearts.” 


Sekandar led his army forward and came to another body of water, 
surrounded by reeds that were like plane trees, more than fifty cubits high with 
trunks forty cubits in circumference. All the houses there were made of wood 
and reeds, and the ground seemed to give beneath their weight. It was 
inadvisable to stay there long, and the water was so brackish that no one drank it. 
When they left this place they came to a deep lake. The land there seemed 
inviting, the soil smelled of musk, and the water was as sweet as honey. They ate 
and drank and lay down to sleep, but as they did so countless snakes came 
slithering out of the water, and from the bushes flame-colored scorpions 
appeared. The world darkened for the sleepers, and many died, both warriors and 
wise men. Boars attacked them from one side, their tusks glittering like 
diamonds, and from the other came lions larger than oxen that the soldiers had 
not the strength to fight against. The army retreated to the reedbeds, which they 
set fire to, and so killed the lions that made their escape so difficult. 

From there Sekandar went to Abyssinia, the land of the Habash. The country 
was crowded with men whose skin was as black as a raven’s feather, and their 
eyes as bright as lamps. They fielded a redoubtable army of tall, naked soldiers, 
and when they saw Sekandar’s army approaching, their war cries ascended to the 
clouds. The king’s eyes darkened when he saw them advancing in their 
thousands: they killed many men as they attacked, hurling bones instead of 
lances. Sekandar ordered his men to prepare their weapons for battle. The naked 
Habash pressed on with their attack, and many were killed by Sekandar’s lion- 
like forces, until those who survived fled from the battlefield. So much blood 
was spilled that the land from end to end was like the sea of China, with here and 
there mounds of the dead piled up. Straw was packed around these heaps of 
corpses, and Sekandar ordered that they be set on fire. 

That night a rhinoceros could be heard, and Sekandar donned his armor and 
helmet. Then the animal came into view, more massive than an elephant, with a 
dark horn on his head. He killed a number of soldiers and did not retreat even 
though he was attacked repeatedly. Finally, he was killed by the attackers’ 
arrows, and this conqueror of lions lay there like a huge iron mountain. Sekandar 
left the area in haste, giving thanks to God as he went. 


Sekandar Reaches a Land Where the Men Have Soft Feet and Kills 
a Dragon 

They reached a land where men have soft feet; the host of inhabitants was 
beyond numbering, and each man was as tall as a cypress tree, but they had 


neither horses nor armor nor swords nor maces. Their war cry was like the roll of 
thunder, and they attacked naked, as if they were devils. Against Sekandar’s 
army they hurled a hail of rocks, which rained down like an autumn wind 
bowing trees before it. But the army advanced with arrows and swords, and the 
day seemed to turn to night with the dust. When there were only a few of the 
soft-footed warriors remaining, Sekandar rested, and then led his army forward 
again. 

They quickly reached a city that seemed limitless; the inhabitants courteously 
and kindly came out to welcome them, bringing with them carpets, clothes, and 
food as gifts. Sekandar questioned them and treated them respectfully, and a 
sufficient area for his army’s camp was set aside. Tents were set up on the plain, 
and the army made no attempt to enter the city. Nearby there was an enormous 
mountain, which seemed almost to touch the skies. The few people on the 
mountain’s slopes didn’t stay there at night. Sekandar asked them the best way 
forward and by which paths he should lead his army. They made their obeisance 
before him and greeted him as the world’s king, and then said: “A path exists 
around this mountainside 

But first you’ll have to find a willing guide; 
Beyond the crest there lies a dragon’s lair, 

His poison sickens birds that venture there. 
The noxious vapors reach the moon, there’s no 
Safe route by which your warriors could go. 
His massive maw breathes fire, and he could snare 
An elephant with his two locks of hair; 

Our city doesn’t have the strength to fight. 

We have to take up five cows, every night, 

For him to feed on; and how fearfully 

We place them on the rocks for him to see, 
Afraid that if he finds us he’Il come down 

And, piece by piece, destroy us and our town.” 


Sekandar said, “Tomorrow, see that no one takes him any food.” When the time 
for his meal had passed, the dragon stood on the mountain slope breathing fire, 
and Sekandar ordered his troops to shoot a storm of arrows against him. The foul 
dragon exhaled fire and caught a few men in the blast. Sekandar had the war 
drums beaten, and the dragon drew back in fear from the echoing drums. 


The sun rose in Taurus, and the meadows resounded with the song of larks. 
When it was again time for the dragon to be fed, the king chose a number of men 
from his army and gave them money to buy five cows. He killed the cows and 
skinned them, leaving the hide attached to their heads. The hides were then filled 
with poison and oil and inflated; prayers were said and the cows were passed 
from hand to hand up the mountainside. The king approached the dragon and 
saw that he was like a huge dark cloud: his tongue purple, his eyes blood red, 
and fire issuing continuously from his maw. The soldiers rolled the cows down 
toward the dragon, their hearts anxious to see what he would do. Immediately, 
the dragon descended on the carcasses like the wind. He ate them, and the poison 
spread throughout his body, bursting his intestines and forcing its way even into 
his brain and feet. For a long time he beat his head against the rocks in 
desperation, and the army released a hail of arrows against him. The 
mountainous monster sank to his feet, and his body finally succumbed to the 
arrows. Leaving the creature’s body where it lay, Sekandar quickly led his troops 
out of that area. 

The adventurous hero led his men to another mountainous area, where he saw 
an astonishing sight. Perched on a summit sharp as a sword blade, far removed 
from all humanity, was a golden throne. On the throne was a dead man, and even 
after death he radiated farr and glory. He was wrapped in a brocade cloak, and 
on his head was a crown encrusted with jewels. So much gold and silver was 
scattered around him that no one could approach the throne, and anyone who 
went up the mountain hoping to take some of the dead man’s wealth would 
tremble in terror and die, and eventually rot there. Sekandar ascended the 
mountain and, as he stared at the man, and at the gold and silver, he heard a great 
voice that said, “O king, you have lived long enough in the world. You have 
destroyed so many thrones and raised your head up to the heavens, and you have 
laid low so many friends and enemies, but now the way of the world has 
changed.” Sekandar’s face glowed like a lamp, and he descended the mountain 
sick at heart. 


Sekandar Sees the Marvels of Harum 

Sekandar pressed on with his Greek chieftains and reached a city called Harum, 
a town inhabited only by women, to which no stranger was granted entrance. 
The right breast of these women was as that of all women, like a pomegranate 
resting on silk, but on the left their bodies were like that of a warrior who wears 
armor on the day of battle. As Sekandar drew near the city, he wrote a polite 


letter to the inhabitants, as was fitting for a wellborn man to do, addressing it 
from the king of Iran and the West to the sovereign of Harum. He began his 
letter in the name of the Creator of the heavens, from whom come blessings, 
justice, and benevolence, and continued, “Whoever possesses wisdom in his soul 
and lives wisely has heard what I have done in the world, how high I have raised 
the banner of glory, and how those who oppose my will find that their only 
resting place is the black earth. I desire that no site in the world be forbidden to 
my eyes. My coming here is not to make war on you; I wish for only peace and 
friendship between us. If there is anyone among you who is knowledgeable and 
wise and able to read this letter, send a person who is honored by you to meet 
me, and no one will be hurt by such an encounter.” He added some more 
eloquent phrases, and gave the letter to a Greek philosopher to deliver to the city. 

When the sage drew near he saw that the city was populated by women, and 
that no men were there. All those who had the right to express their opinions 
came out in a body on to the plain, to see the Greek visitor and to hear his 
message. Once the city scribe had read the letter aloud and they had some notion 
of Sekandar’s intentions, they sat and wrote an answer, as follows: “May you 
live forever, proud king. We have received your messenger and read through 
your letter. You speak about kings, victories, and your former battles; if you 
attack the city of Harum with your army, you will not see the earth for horses’ 
hooves. There are innumerable streets within our town, and a thousand women 
live within each street. We sleep each night in our armor, cramped together since 
there are so many of us. And of all these women not one of us has a husband, 
because we are all veiled virgins. Whichever way you approach our country you 
will see a deep lake. If a woman decides she wants a husband, she must leave us; 
in fair weather or foul, she has to cross this deep lake. After taking a husband, if 
she gives birth to a daughter and the girl is feminine by nature and interested in 
pretty colors and scents, then she will remain where she was born and breathe 
the air of that sky. But if she is a manly, confident child, she is sent to Harum. If 
she gives birth to a son he stays where he is and has nothing to do with us. 

“When on the day of battle any of us brings a warrior down from his horse, a 
golden crown is placed on her head, and she is given a throne more exalted than 
Gemini. There are thirty thousand women among us who possess a golden 
crown and earrings, because of such success in battle. You are a great and 
famous man; don’t slam the door on your own reputation, so that men say of 
you, ‘He fought with women on the battlefield, 

And when he fought them, he was forced to yield.’ 


Such a taunt will be shameful for you, and it will last for as long as the world 
does. If you wish to come with your Greek chieftains and go around our country, 
and if you act with honesty and chivalry, you will see nothing but kindness and 
festivities from us. We’ll bring so many of our warriors to greet you that you 
won’t see the sun or the moon for the dust.” 

A woman was chosen to deliver this reply; she wore a crown and royal 
clothes and was accompanied by ten beautiful outriders. As she approached the 
king’s camp, he sent an escort out a little way to greet her; she handed over the 
letter to Sekandar and repeated her fellow warriors’ message. When Sekandar 
saw their reply he chose a wise, understanding envoy and sent them an answer: 
“May men live with wisdom. In all the world there is no king or chieftain who is 
not my inferior, no matter how great or favored by the heavens he might be. 
White camphor dust and black earth are as one to me, and so are fighting and 
feasting. I have not come here to fight with elephants and war drums, and with 
an army whose horses’ hooves trample the mountains and plains to dust. My 
intention was to see your city, but if you come to me this will be sufficient. 
When I have seen you I will lead off my army; I shall not stay here for long. I 
want to find out about your customs and glory, your horsemanship, your beauty, 
everything about you. I shall ask discreetly about your births here, since how can 
there be women without men? When death comes, how are your numbers kept 
up? I want to know what the solution to this problem is.” 

The envoy delivered his message, and the nobles of the city gathered to give 
their response: “We have chosen two thousand wise, eloquent women. Each 
hundred of them will take ten jeweled crowns, making two hundred crowns in 
all, each of them worthy of a king; with its jewels each crown weighs three ratl. 
When we hear that the king has arrived, we shall go out to meet him one by one, 
since we have heard of his knowledge and glory.” The envoy returned and gave 
their reply; everyone spoke wisely in this business. 

Two thousand women crossed the lake, all of them crowned and wearing 
earrings. There was a delightful area nearby, filled with trees and streams, and 
there they spread colorful carpets on the grass and laid out a feast. When 
Sekandar reached Harum the women ceremoniously welcomed him with the 
crowns, together with clothes and jewels. Sekandar accepted their presents and 
made much of them, entertaining them royally. When night gave way to day he 
entered the city and looked closely at parts of it, searching out information about 
both big and small things, and staying there till his questions were resolved. 


Sekandar Leads His Army to the West 

Having asked his fill of questions, and seen the lake, Sekandar led his army 
toward the western lands. He came to a large town inhabited by a savage 
population: they had red faces and blond hair, and all of them were fine warriors. 
Ordered to appear before Sekandar they came in pairs, striking their hands 
against their heads. When their leaders were asked what marvels there were in 
that country, one answered, “O king favored by fortune and conqueror of cities, 
on the other side of our town there is a unique body of water; when the shining 
sun reaches that place it plunges into the water’s depths. Beyond the water the 
world is dark and the things of the world become hidden. We have heard endless 
tales about that darkness. A God-fearing and wise man says there is a source of 
water there, and he calls it the water of life. This wise man says, ‘How can 
anyone die, if he drinks the water of life? The water there comes from heaven, 
and the man who bathes there washes away all his sins.’” 

The king asked, “How can a horse get to this dark place?” The pious man 
answered, “A man must ride on a young mount to get there.” Sekandar ordered 
that the local herdsmen bring their herds of horses to his camp. He chose ten 
thousand of them, all four years old and capable of work. 


Sekandar Seeks the Water of Life 

With happiness in his heart, Sekandar set out, calling his shrewdest chieftains 
about him. He traveled until he reached a town that seemed to have no center or 
limit and that was well appointed with gardens, open spaces, palaces, and public 
buildings. He dismounted, and at dawn he went without his army to the water’s 
edge. He stayed there until the yellow sun descended into the dark blue waters, 
and saw God’s marvel, the sun disappearing from the world. His mind filled 
with endless speculation, he returned to his camp. In the dark night he was 
mindful of God, and thought too of the water of life. He chose his most patient 
waliriors to accompany him, packed provisions sufficient for forty days, and then 
set out impatient to see this wonder. 


He lodged his men within the town, then tried 
To find a capable and willing guide: 

Khezr was preeminent in all that land. 
Sekandar placed himself at his command 
And said to him, “I ask that you incline 

Your heart to this high enterprise of mine; 


If we can find life’s water we shall stay 

A long while in the world to watch and pray— 
The man who nourishes his soul, who gives 

His mind to God’s laws, does not die but lives. 

I have two seals that in the darkest night, 

When water’s near, will shine with brilliant light: 
Take one, go on ahead of us, and you 

Will guide and guard us there in all we do: 

The other seal I’ll keep with me, to show 

My soldiers where it’s safe and wise to go, 

And so we’ll see what God has hidden here.” 
Then, as the soldiers gradually drew near 

The stream of life, the plains rang with a cry 

Of “God is Great” that echoed in the sky. 

Then, for the next stage, Khezr said that they ought 
To leave behind them all the food they’d brought, 
And for two days and nights the soldiers went 
With mouths that never tasted nourishment; 

The road split into two the following day 

And in the dark Sekandar lost his way. 

Khezr journeyed on; his head reached Saturn’s sphere 
And when he saw life’s glittering stream appear 
He bathed his head and body there, and prayed 
To God, the only guardian he obeyed: 

He drank and rested, then went back again, 

And praised God as he crossed the empty plain. 


Sekandar Talks with the Birds 

But Sekandar emerged into light, and saw a great shining mountain before him, 
near the top of which were two columns of ebony that reached into the clouds. 
Each column supported a large nest, on which sat a fierce green bird. The birds 
spoke in Greek and addressed him as the victorious ruler of the world. When he 
heard them Sekandar hurried to the foot of the pillars, and one of the birds said 
to him, “You take pleasure in your pain, but what is it you seek from this fleeting 
world? If you raise your head to the high heavens, you must return in despair. 
But now that you are here, tell me, have you ever seen a house made of reeds, or 
one made of golden bricks?” Sekandar said, “Both these exist.” Hearing this 
reply the bird sat a little lower, and Sekandar, who was a God-fearing man, 
stared at it in wonder. The bird asked, “Have you heard the sound of lutes in this 
world, or the noise of drunkenness and singing?” The king answered, “People do 
not call any man happy who has not had some share of pleasure in the world, no 
matter how much he pours his heart and soul out to them.” The bird hopped 
down from its ebony column onto the ground and asked, “Is there more 
knowledge and honesty, or ignorance and lies in the world?” He answered, 
“Anyone who seeks knowledge raises his head above both groups.” The bird 
hopped back onto its column and cleaned its claws with its beak, then asked the 
king, “In your country, do God-fearing men live in the mountains?” Sekandar 
replied, “When a man becomes pure in thought, he goes into the mountains.” At 
that the bird, with an air of authority and independence, sat on its nest again and 
sharpened its beak with its claws. It told the king that he should climb, without 
any companions, up to the summit of the mountain, where he would see 
something that would make any happy man weep. 


Sekandar Sees Esrafil 

Sekandar made his way to the mountain summit alone. There he saw Esrafil, the 
angel of death, with a trumpet in his hand, his head raised at the ready, his 
cheeks filled with breath, his eyes brimming with tears, as he waited for God to 
order him to blow. Seeing Sekandar on the mountain Esrafil roared with a voice 
like thunder, 


“Stop struggling, slave of greed! One day, at last, 
Your ears will hear the mighty trumpet’s blast— 
Don’t worry about crowns and thrones! Prepare 
To pack your bags and journey on elsewhere!” 
Sekandar said, “I see that I’m to be 

Hurried about the world perpetually, 

And that I’Il never know another fate 

Than this incessant, wandering, restless state!” 


He descended the mountain, weeping and praising God, then set out on the dark 
road again, following his guides. 

Going forward in the darkness, the army heard a voice from a black mountain 
nearby, which said, “Whoever takes stones from this mountain will be sorry for 
what he holds in his hand, and whoever takes nothing will be sorry and look for 
a balm to ease his heart’s pain.” The soldiers listened to the voice, and wondered 
what the words could mean, since whether they took stones or didn’t, they 
couldn’t see what their future sufferings would be. One said, “The pain will be 
because of sin, that’s the regret for taking stones along the way.” Another said, 
“We should take a little; everyone has to suffer some pain.” Some took stones, 
some took none, some out of laziness took only a few. When they left the land 
where the water of life was, and found themselves on the plain once more, the 
road was no longer dark and each man looked at what he’d tucked in his sleeves 
or his tunic, and so the deceiving riddle was revealed. One found his clothes 
filled with rubies, another with uncut gems, and they were sorry they had taken 
so few and hadn’t taken emeralds as well. But those who had ignored the 
precious stones and taken nothing were even more sorry. Sekandar stayed in that 
area for two weeks, and when he was less fatigued he led his army forward 
again. 


Sekandar Constructs a Wall to Defeat Yajuj and Majuj 

Having seen the west, Sekandar turned his attention to the east, choosing to 
continue his wanderings in the world. He came to a town that seemed as if wind 
and dust had never blown against it, and when the trumpets were sounded from 
his elephants’ backs and the town’s nobility came out to welcome him, the 
procession stretched for two miles. The world wanderer greeted them warmly 
and asked, “What is the most astonishing thing about this place?” They began to 
weep and wail about the revolutions of fate, saying, “We face a difficult task, 
which we will tell to the victorious king. That mountain, whose summit is in the 
clouds, has made our hearts grieve and mourn: we cannot sleep because of Yajuj 
and Majuj, who live there and whom we have not the strength to resist. When a 
mob of them comes against our city, we know only pain and sorrow. They have 
faces like animals, with black tongues and bloodshot eyes; they have black skin 
and teeth like a boar’s. How can anyone stand up to them? Their bodies 
including the chest are covered with dark hair, and they have huge ears like an 
elephant’s; when they sleep they can fold an ear under them as a pillow, or 
spread it over them as a coverlet. All their females give birth to thousands of 
little brats, so that no one can count how many they are. They flock together like 
animals, running like wild asses. In spring when the clouds thunder and the 
green sea churns, the clouds suck up serpents from the waves and the air growls 
like a lion; then the clouds drop the serpents, and herds of these monsters come 
to feed on them. They eat them year after year till their chests and shoulders 
grow big and strong. After that they eat plants, which they collect from 
everywhere. When it’s cold they get very thin, and then their voices are like a 
dove’s, but if you see them in the spring they’re like wolves, and they roar like 
trumpeting elephants. If the king can find some remedy against them, so that our 
hearts can be freed from this sorrow, all of us will praise him, and our praise will 
resound in the world for a long time. We ask that you be magnanimous and rid 
us of our grief, for you too need God’s blessings.” 

Sekandar marveled at what they had told him. He was pensive for a while, 
then said, “I will provide treasure, your city must provide the labor and effort. 
With the help of God I will bring them under control.” All the townsmen said, 
“O king, may bad luck never be yours! We are your slaves while we live, ready 
to offer whatever is necessary. We’|l bring whatever you require, as nothing is 
more important to us than this.” Sekandar went out and inspected the mountain 
and then summoned his sages to him. He called for blacksmiths, together with 
huge quantities of copper, brass, heavy hammers, plaster, stone, and an 


immeasurable amount of firewood, as much as would be necessary for the job in 
hand. When the plans had been well thought out, masons, blacksmiths, and all 
manner of artisans came from throughout the world to help Sekandar with this 
project. Craftsmen from every country gathered there, and two walls were 
constructed on the opposite sides of the mountain, a hundred fathoms wide and 
stretching from the mountain’s base to its summit. One cubit was of charcoal and 
the next of iron with a little copper mixed into it, then sulfur was poured over it, 
following the method of the Kayanid craftsmen. Course was laid above course in 
this way, and then holes were drilled in it from its base to the summit. Next, oil 
and turpentine were mixed together and poured over the materials. Finally, a 
mass of charcoal was placed on the top of the walls, and the whole construction 
was Set alight. At the king’s command a hundred thousand blacksmiths fed the 
flames with air from bellows; a great roar went up from the mountain, and the 
stars seemed eclipsed by the fire. The result of all the blacksmiths’ labor, the 
bellows fanning the flames, the materials laid one above another and then 
melting in the flames, was that the world was freed from Yajuj and Majuj, and 
the earth was once again a place of peace and pleasure: the famous barrier of 
Sekandar had delivered the world from strife. The city’s nobles thanked him and 
wished him eternal life; they brought him many presents, but to their 
astonishment he accepted none of them. 


Sekandar Sees a Corpse in the Palace of Topazes 
The king and his army marched onward for a month and were sorely tried by 
their journey. They came to a mountain, where they saw no sign of either wild or 
domestic animals. The mountain’s crest was of lapis lazuli, and a palace stood 
there, made of topazes. It was filled with crystal chandeliers, and in its midst was 
a fountain of salt water. Next to this fountain was a throne for two people, on 
which was stretched a wretched corpse. He had a man’s body, but his head was 
like that of a boar; there was a pillow of camphor beneath his head, and a 
brocade covering had been drawn up over his body. Instead of a lamp a brilliant 
red jewel shone there, illuminating the whole area; its rays twinkled like stars in 
the water, and all the chamber glowed as if in sunlight. Whoever went there to 
take something, or even simply set foot within the palace, found himself rooted 
to the spot; his whole body began to tremble, and he started to waste away. 

A cry came from the salt water, saying, “O king, still filled with longing and 
desire, don’t play the fool much longer! You have seen many things that no man 
ever saw, but now it’s time to draw rein. Your life has shortened now, and the 


royal throne is without its king.” Sekandar was afraid and hurried back to his 
camp as fast as wind-blown smoke. Quickly he led his army away, weeping and 
calling on God’s name. From that mountain he headed toward the desert, 
afflicted with sorrow and concerned for his soul. And so he went forward, at the 
head of his troops, weeping and in pain. 


Sekandar Sees the Speaking Tree 

The desert road led to a city, and Sekandar was relieved when he heard human 
voices there. The whole area was one of gardens and fine buildings and was a 
place to delight any man. The city’s noblemen welcomed him, calling out 
greetings and showering him with gold and jewels. “It is wonderful that you 
have come to visit us,” they said. “No army has ever entered this town, and no 
one in it has ever heard the name of ‘king.’ Now that you have come our souls 
are yours, and may you live with bodily health and spiritual serenity.” Sekandar 
was pleased by their welcome and rested from the journey across the desert. He 
said to them, “What is there here that’s astonishing, that should be inquired 
into?” A guide said to him, “Victorious king, there is a marvel here, a tree that 
has two separate trunks together, one of which is female and the other male, and 
these splendid tree limbs can speak. At night the female trunk becomes sweet 
smelling and speaks, and when the daylight comes, the male speaks.” Sekandar 
and his Greek cavalry, with the nobles of the town gathered around, listened and 
said, “When is it you say that the tree speaks in a loud voice?” The translator 
replied, “A little after day has disappeared one of the trunks begins to speak, and 
a lucky man will hear its voice; in the dark night the female speaks, and its 
leaves then smell like musk.” 

Sekandar answered, “When we go beyond the tree, what wonders are there on 
the other side?” The reply was, “When you pass the tree there is little argument 
about which way to take, as there is no place beyond there; guides say it is the 
world’s end. A dark desert lies ahead of you, but no man is so weary of his own 
soul as to go there. None of us have ever seen or heard that there are any animals 
there, or that birds fly there.” Sekandar and his troops went forward, and when 
they came near the speaking tree the ground throbbed with heat and the soil there 
was covered with the pelts of wild beasts. He asked his guide what the pelts 
were, and who it was that had skinned so many animals in this way. The man 
answered, “The tree has many worshippers, and when they come here to 
worship, they feed on the flesh of wild animals.” 

When the sun reached its zenith Sekandar heard a voice above him, coming 
from the leaves of the tree; it was a voice to strike terror and foreboding in a 
man. He was afraid and said to the interpreter, “You are wise and mean well, tell 
me what the leaves are saying, which makes my heart dissolve within me.” “O 
king, favored by fortune, the leaves say, ‘However much Sekandar wanders in 
the world, he has already seen his share of blessings: when he has reigned for 


fourteen years, he must quit the royal throne.’” At the guide’s words Sekandar’s 
heart filled with pain, and he wept bitterly. He was sad and silent then, speaking 
to no one, until midnight. Then the leaves of the other trunk began to speak, and 
Sekandar again asked the interpreter what they said. He replied, “The female tree 
says, ‘Do not puff yourself up with greed; why torment your soul in this way? 
Greed makes you wander the wide world, harass mankind, and kill kings. But 
you are not long for this earth now; do not darken and deaden your days like 
this.’” Then the king said to the interpreter, “Pure of heart and noble as you are, 
ask them one question: Will this fateful day come in Greece; will my mother see 
me alive again, before someone covers my face in death?” 


The speaking tree replied, “Few days remain; 

You must prepare your final baggage train. 
Neither your mother, nor your family, 

Nor the veiled women of your land will see 

Your face again. Death will come soon: you’ll die 
In a strange land, with strangers standing by. 

The stars and crown and throne and worldly glory 
Are sated with Sekandar and his story.” 


Sekandar left the tree, his heart wounded as if by a sword. When he returned to 
his camp, his chieftains went into the town to collect the gifts from the town’s 
nobility. Among these was a cuirass that shone like the waters of the Nile and 
was as huge as an elephant skin: it had two long tusks attached to it and was so 
heavy it was hard to lift. There was other armor, as well as fine brocade, a 
hundred golden eggs each weighing sixty man, and a rhinoceros made of gold 
and jewels. Sekandar accepted the gifts and led off his army, weeping bitter tears 
as he went. 


Sekandar Visits the Emperor of China 

Now Sekandar led his army toward China. For forty days they traveled, until 
they reached the sea. There the army made camp and the king pitched his 
brocade pavilion. He summoned a scribe to write a letter to the Chinese emperor 
from Sekandar, the seizer of cities. The message was filled with promises and 
threats, and when it was completed Sekandar himself went as the envoy, taking 
with him an intelligent companion who was one with him in heart and speech 


and who could advise him as to what to do and what not to do. He entrusted his 
troops to the army’s commander and chose five Greeks as his escort. 

When news reached the Chinese emperor that an envoy was approaching his 
country, he sent troops out to meet him. Sekandar reached the court and the 
emperor came forward in welcome, but his heart was filled with suspicious 
thoughts. Sekandar ran forward and made his obeisance to him, and then was 
seated in the palace for a long while. The emperor questioned him and made 
much of him and assigned him noble sleeping quarters. As the sun rose over the 
mountains, dying their summits gold, the envoy was summoned to court. 
Sekandar spoke at length, saying what was appropriate, and then handed over the 
letter. It was addressed from the king of Greece, possessor of the world, lord of 
every country, on whom other kings call down God’s blessings. It continued, 
“My orders for China are that she remain prosperous, and that she should not 
prepare for war against me; it was war against me that destroyed Foor, and Dara, 
who was the lord of the world, and Faryan the Arab, and other sovereigns. From 
the east to the west no one ignores my commands, the heavens themselves do 
not know the number of my troops, and Venus and the sun could not count them. 
If you disobey any command of mine you will bring distress on yourself and 
your country. When you read my letter, bring me tribute; do not trouble yourself 
about this, or look for evil allies to make war on me. If you come you will see 
me in the midst of my troops, and when I see that you are honest and mean well 
I shall confirm you in the possession of your crown and throne, and no 
misfortune will come to you. If, however, you are reluctant to come before your 
king, send me things that are peculiar to China—your country’s gold work, 
horses, swords, seal rings, clothes, cloth, ivory thrones, fine brocade, necklaces, 
crowns—that is, if you have no wish to be harmed by me. Send my soldiers back 
to me, and rest assured that your wealth, throne, and crown are safe.” 

When the emperor of China saw what was in the letter, he started up in fury, 
but then chose silence as a better course. He laughed and said to the envoy, 
“May your king be a partner to the heavens! Tell me what you know about him. 
Tell me about his conversation, his height and appearance, and what kind of a 
man he is.” The envoy said, “Great lord of China, you should understand that 
there is no one else in the world like Sekandar. In his manliness, policy, good 
fortune, and wisdom he surpasses all that anyone could imagine. He is as tall as 
a cypress tree, has an elephant’s strength, and is as generous as the waters of the 
Nile; his tongue can be as cutting as a sword, but he can charm an eagle down 
from the clouds.” When he heard all this, the emperor changed his mind. He 


ordered that wine and a banquet be laid out in the palace gardens. He drank till 
evening brought darkness to the world, and the company became tipsy. Then he 
said to the envoy, “May your king be Jupiter’s partner. At first light I’1l compose 
an answer to his letter, and what I write will make the day seem splendid to your 
eyes.” Sekandar was half drunk, and he staggered from the garden to his quarters 
with an orange in his hand. 

When the sun rose in Leo and the heavens dispelled the darkness, Sekandar 
went to the emperor, and all suspicious thoughts were far from his heart. The 
emperor asked him, “How did you spend the night? When you left you were 
quite overcome with wine.” Then he summoned a scribe, who brought paper, 
musk, and ambergris, and dictated a letter. He began with praise of God, the lord 
of chivalry, justice, and ability, of cultivated behavior, abstinence, and piety, and 
called down his blessings on the Greek king. Then he continued, “Your eloquent 
envoy has arrived, bringing the king’s letter. I have read through the royal words 
and discussed its contents with my nobles. As for your claims concerning the 
wars against Dara, Faryan, and Foor, in which you were victorious, so that you 
became a shepherd whose flock consists of kings, you should not consider what 
comes about through the will of the Lord of the Sun and Moon as the result of 
your own valor and the might of your army. When a great man’s days are 
numbered, what difference does it make whether he dies in battle or at a 
banquet? If they died in battle with you this is because their fate was fixed for 
that day, and fate is not to be hurried or delayed. You should not pride yourself 
so much on your victories over them, because even if you are made of iron there 
is no doubt that you too will die. Where now are Feraydun, Zahhak, and 
Jamshid, who came like the wind and left like a breath? I am not afraid of you 
and I will not make war against you, neither shall I puff myself up with pride as 
you are doing. It is not my habit to shed blood, and besides it would be unworthy 
of my faith for me to do evil in this way. You summon me, but to no purpose; I 
serve God, not kings. I send with this more riches than you have dreamed of, so 
that there shall be no doubting my munificence.” 

These words were an arrow in Sekandar’s vital organs, and he blushed with 
shame. In his heart he said, “Never again shall I go somewhere disguised as my 
own envoy.” He returned to his quarters and prepared to leave the Chinese court. 

The proud emperor opened his treasuries’ doors, since he was not a man who 
found generosity difficult. First he ordered that fifty crowns and ten ivory 
thrones encrusted with jewels be brought; then a thousand camel loads of gold 
and silver goods, and a thousand more of Chinese brocades and silks, of 


camphor, musk, perfumes, and ambergris. He had little regard for wealth, and it 
eased his heart to be bountiful in this way. He had ten thousand each of the pelts 
of gray squirrel, ermine, and sable brought, and as many carpets and crystal 
goblets, and his wise treasurer saw to their being loaded on pack animals. Then 
he added three hundred silver saddles and fifty golden ones, together with three 
hundred red-haired camels loaded with Chinese rarities. He chose as envoy an 
eloquent and dignified Chinese sage and told him to take his message to the 
Greek king with all goodwill and splendor, and to say that Sekandar would be 
warmly welcomed at the Chinese court for as long as he wished to stay there. 

The envoy traveled with Sekandar, unaware that he was the Greek king. But 
when Sekandar’s regent came forward and the king told him of his adventures, 
and the army congratulated him on his safe return and bowed to the ground 
before him, the envoy realized that he was indeed the Greek king and 
dismounted in consternation. Sekandar said to him, “There is no need for 
apologies, but do not tell your emperor of this!” They rested for a night, and the 
next morning Sekandar sat on the royal throne. He gave gifts to the envoy and 
said to him, “Go to your emperor and tell him that I say ‘You have found honor 
and respect with me. If you wish to stay where you are, all China is yours, and if 
you wish to go elsewhere, that too is open to you. I shall rest here for a while, 
because such a large army as mine cannot be mobilized quickly.’” The envoy 
returned like the wind, and gave Sekandar’s message to the emperor. 


Sekandar Leads His Army to Babylon 

Sekandar camped there for a month, and then led his army toward Babylon, and 
the air was darkened with the dust of their march. They pressed on for a month, 
and no one had any rest during this time. They came to a mountain range so high 
that its summit was hidden by dark clouds, as if it reached to Saturn. The king 
and his army could see no way forward but over the mountains and so with 
difficulty they climbed up toward the crest. The climb exhausted them, but once 
there they saw a deep lake lying below them. Joyfully and praising God, they 
began their descent; there was game of all kinds on every side, and for a while 
the soldiers lived off what they hunted. 

Then in the distance a wild man appeared. He was covered in hair, and his 
body beneath the hair was a dark blue color, and he had huge ears, as big as an 
elephant’s. The soldiers captured him and dragged him to Sekandar, who called 
on God in his astonishment at being confronted by such a creature. He said, 
“What kind of a man are you? What is your name? What can you find to live off 


in this lake, and what do you want from life?” The man replied, “O king, my 
mother and father call me Pillow-Ears.” Then the king asked what it was that he 
could see in the middle of the lake, over toward where the sun rises. The man 
answered, “O king, and may you always be renowned in the world, that’s a town 
that is like heaven; you’d say that earth had no part in its making. You won’t see 
a single building there that isn’t covered with fish skins and fish bones. On the 
walls they’ve painted the face of Afrasyab, and he looks more splendid than the 
sun itself; and warlike Khosrow’s face is there too, and you can see his greatness 
and generosity by looking at it. They’re painted on bones; you won’t see one bit 
of soil in the whole city! The people eat fish there; that’s the only thing they 
have to nourish them. If the king orders me to, I’ll go there, but without any of 
your soldiers.” Sekandar said to the man with huge ears, “Go, and bring back 
someone from the town, so that we can see something new.” 

Pillow-Ears hurried off to the town and soon came back with some of its 
inhabitants. Seventy men crossed the water with him; some were young and 
some old, and they were dressed in various kinds of silks. The older, more 
dignified men each carried a golden goblet filled with pearls, and the young ones 
each carried a crown; they came before Sekandar with their heads reverently 
bowed. They made their obeisance to him, and he talked with them for a long 
time. The army stayed there that night, and at cockcrow next morning the din of 
drums rang out from the king’s pavilion. Sekandar continued the march to 
Babylon, and the air was dark with the dust sent up by his soldiers. 


Sekandar’s Letter to Arestalis and Arestalis’s Reply 

The king knew that death was close, and that his days were darkening, and he 
decided that no one of royal lineage should be left alive in the world: he wanted 
to ensure that no man would be able to lead an army against Greece. With his 
mind fixed on this arrogant scheme, he wrote a letter to Arestalis, saying he 
would invite everyone of royal lineage to his court, where they were to come 
unsuspecting of what was in store for them. When this letter was delivered to the 
Greek sage, his heart seemed to break in two. Immediately he wrote a reply, 
weeping as if his ink were tears. “The king of the world’s missive arrived, and 
he should give up this evil design of his. As for the evil you have already done, 
think no more of it but distribute goods to the poor. For the future, abstain from 
evil and give your soul to God; sow nothing but seeds of goodness in the world. 
From birth we are all marked for death, and we have no choice but to submit. No 
one who dies takes his sovereignty with him; he leaves, and hands on his 


greatness to another. Live within limits and do not shed the blood of the great 
families, which will make you cursed until the resurrection. And if there is no 
army or king in Persia, armies will sweep in from Turkestan, India, Scythia, and 
China, and it would be no surprise if whoever took Persia then marched on the 
west. The descendants of the Persian kings should not be harmed so much as by 
a breath of wind. Summon them to your court, but be generous to them, feast 
them, and consult with them. Treat each according to his rank and see that their 
names are listed in your pension rolls, since it is from them that you took the 
world, paying nothing for it. Do not give any of them power over another, or 
refer to any of them as king of the world, but make these royal nobles a shield to 
protect the west against foreign invasion.” 

Sekandar changed his mind when he read this letter. He summoned the 
world’s nobly born, all who were chivalrous by nature, to his court, and assigned 
them suitable places there. He wrote a charter, which designated the portion of 
each, with the stipulation that none was to encroach on another’s power: these 
nobles he called “kings of the peoples.” 

That night Sekandar reached Babylon, where he was joyfully greeted by the 
local nobility. During the same night a woman gave birth to an astonishing child 
that had a lion’s head, a human chest and human shoulders, a cow’s tail, and 
hooves. The baby was stillborn, and it would have been better if the woman had 
had no offspring at all rather than such a monster. Immediately they brought the 
child to Sekandar, who took it as an omen, and ordered that it be buried. He told 
his astrologers of the child, who grew pensive and silent. He demanded their 
opinion, saying, “If you keep anything back from me I’ll cut your heads from 
your bodies this minute, and your shroud will be a lion’s maw.” When the king 
stormed in this way, they said: “First then, as scribes have written, at your birth 

The lion’s emblem, Leo, ruled the earth. 
You saw the dead child had a lion’s head, 
Which means your majesty will soon be dead. 
The world will be a place of strife until 

A new king bends its peoples to his will.” 
The king grew pensive, then replied, “I see 
Death comes, for which there is no remedy. 
I’m not long for this world, I know, but I 
Refuse to brood on this until I die. 

Death comes to us on the appointed day— 
We cannot make fate hurry, or delay.” 


Sekandar’s Letter to His Mother 
That day, in Babylon, he fell sick, and he knew that his end was approaching. He 
summoned an experienced scribe and dictated what was in his heart, in a letter to 
his mother. He said, “The signs of death cannot be hidden; I have lived the life 
allotted to me in this world, and we cannot hurry or delay our fate. Do not grieve 
at my death, for this is not a new thing in the world: all who are born must die, 
be they kings or paupers. I shall tell our chieftains that when they return from 
this land to Greece they must obey you alone. I have established those Persians 
who fought against our armies as lords over their realm, so that they shall have 
no desire to attack Greece; our country will be secure and at peace. See that my 
body is buried in Egypt, and that you fulfill all that I say here. Every year 
distribute ten thousand gold coins of my wealth to the peasantry. If Roshanak 
bears a son, then my name will surely survive; no one but he must become king 
of Greece, and he will renew the country’s prosperity. But if, when her labor 
pains come to her, she bears a daughter, marry the child to one of Filqus’s sons 
and call him my son, not my son-in-law, so that my name shall be remembered 
in the world. As for Kayd’s innocent daughter, send her back to her father in 
India, together with the crowns and silver and gold and all the dowry she 
brought. Now I have completed my affairs and have no choice but to prepare my 
heart for death. First, see that my coffin is of gold and that my body’s shroud is 
worthy of me; let it be of Chinese silk impregnated with sweet scents, and see 
that no one neglects the offices due to me. The joints of my coffin should be 
sealed with pitch, as well as camphor, musk, and ambergris. Honey should be 
poured into the coffin, then a layer of brocade placed there, on which my body is 
to be laid; when my face has been covered there is no more to be said. When I 
have gone, wise mother, remember my words. As for the things that I have sent 
from India, China, Turan, Iran, and Makran, keep what you need and distribute 
the surplus. Dear mother, my desire is that you be sensible and serene in your 
soul; do not torment yourself on my behalf, since no one who lives in the world 
lives forever. When your days too draw to a close, my soul shall surely see yours 
again; patience is a greater virtue than love, and a person blown hither and 
thither by emotion is contemptible. For months and years you lovingly cared for 
my body; now pray to God for my soul; with these prayers you will still care for 
me. And consider, who is there in all the world whose soul is not cast down by 
death?” 

He sealed the letter and ordered that it be taken with all speed from Babylon 
to Greece, to give news there that the imperial glory had been eclipsed. 








Sekandar Dies in Babylon 

When the army learned of the king’s illness, the world grew dark before them. 
Their eyes turned toward the throne, and the world was filled with rumors. 
Knowing that he had few days left to live and hearing of his army’s concern, 
Sekandar gave orders that his sickbed be taken from the palace out to the open 
plain. His saddened troops saw his face devoid of color, and the plain rang from 
end to end with lamentations, as if the soldiers were burning in flames; they 
cried, “It is an evil day when the Greeks lose their king: misfortune triumphs, 
and now our country will be destroyed. Our enemies have reached their hearts’ 
desire, while for us the world has turned bitter, and we shall mourn publicly and 
in secret.” 


Then in a failing voice their king replied, 

“Live humbly, fearfully, when I have died, 

And if you’d grow and prosper see that you 
Keep my advice henceforth, in all you do. 

This is your duty to me when I’m gone 

Lest time undo the work that I have done.” 

He spoke, and then his soul rose from his breast: 
The king who’d shattered armies was at rest. 


An earsplitting wail went up from his troops as they heaped dust on their heads 
and wept bitter tears. They set fire to the royal pavilion, and the very earth 
seemed to cry out in sorrow. They cut the tails of a thousand horses and set their 
saddles on them back to front, as a sign of mourning. As they brought the golden 
coffin their cries resounded in the heavens; a bishop washed the corpse in clear 
rosewater and scattered pure camphor over it. They shrouded their king in 
golden brocade, lamenting as they did so, then placed him beneath a covering of 
Chinese silk, his body soaked from head to toe in honey. The coffin lid was 
fastened, and the noble tree whose shade had spread so widely was no more. 
They passed the coffin from hand to hand across the plain, and as they went 
forward, two opinions began to be heard. The Persians said, “He should not be 
buried anywhere but here: this is the land of emperors, what are they doing 
carrying the coffin about the world like this?” But a Greek guide said, “It would 
not be right to bury him here; if you hear my view you’|l see that I’m right. 
Sekandar should be buried in the soil that nourished him.” A Persian interrupted, 


“No matter how much you continue this conversation it won’t get to the root of 
the matter. I’ll show you a meadow near here that’s been preserved since the 
time of our ancient kings: old folk call it Jorm. There is a wooded area there, and 
a lake; if you ask it a question, an answer will come from the mountain nearby. 
Take an old man there, together with the coffin, and ask your question; if the 
mountain answers, it will give you the best advice.” As quickly as mountain 
sheep they made their way to the thicket called Jorm. And when they asked their 
question, the answer came, “What are you doing with this royal coffin? The dust 
of Sekandar belongs in Alexandria, the town he founded while he was alive.” As 
soon as they heard this, the soldiers hurried from the area. 


The Mourning for Sekandar 
When Sekandar’s body reached Alexandria the world was beset with new 
disputes. The coffin was set down on the plain, and the land was filled with 
rumor and gossip. As many as a hundred thousand children, men, and women 
flocked there. The philosopher Arestalis was there, his eyes filled with bitter 
tears; the world watched as he stretched out his hand to the coffin and said, 
“Where are your intelligence, knowledge, and foresight, now that a narrow 
coffin is your resting place? Why in the days of your youth did you choose the 
earth as your couch?” 

The Greek sages crowded round, each speaking in turn, lamenting Sekandar’s 
death. And then his mother came running, and placed her face on his chest, and 
said, 


“O noble king, world-conqueror, whose state 

Was princely, and whose stars were fortunate, 
You’re far away from me and seem so near, 

Far from your kin, far from your soldiers here. 
Would that my soul were your soul’s slave, that I 
Might see the hearts of those who hate you die.” 
Then Roshanak ran grieving to his side, 

Crying, “Where are those kings now, and their pride? 
Where’s Dara, who once ruled the world? Where’s Foor? 
Where’s Ashk? Faryan? The sovereign of Sharzoor, 
And all those other lords who put their trust 

In battle and were dragged down to the dust? 

You seemed a storm cloud charged with hail: I said 
That you could never die, that you had shed 

So much blood, fought so many wars, that there 
Must be some secret you would not declare, 

Some talisman that fate had given you 

To keep you safe whatever you might do. 

You cleared the world of petty kings, brought down 
Into the dirt an empire’s ancient crown, 

And when the tree you’d planted was to bear 

Its fruits you died, and left me in despair.” 


When the sky’s golden shield descended, the nobles were exhausted by their 
grief, and they placed the coffin in the ground. There is nothing in the world so 
terrible and fearful as the fact that one comes like the wind and departs as a 
breath, and that neither justice nor oppression are apparent in this. Whether you 
are a king or a pauper you will discover no rhyme or reason to it. But one must 
act well, with valor and chivalry, and one must eat well and rejoice: I see no 
other fate for you, whether you are a subject or a prince. This is the way of the 
ancient world: Sekandar departed, and what remains of him now is the words we 
say about him. He killed thirty-six kings, but look how much of the world 
remained in his grasp when he died. He founded ten prosperous cities, and those 
cities are now reed beds. He sought things that no man has ever sought, and what 
remains of him within the circle of the horizon is words, nothing more. Words 
are the better portion, since they do not decay as an old building decays in the 
snow and rain. I have finished with Sekandar now, and with the barrier that he 
built; may our days be fortunate and prosperous. 


THE ASHKANIANS 


What was said in that Book of the Righteous, concerning ancient times? What 
does it say about the period after Sekandar had gone? Who occupied the throne 
then? A knowledgeable landowner from Chach put it like this: no one occupied 
the ivory throne. The chieftains who claimed descent from Arash, who were a 
valiant, impulsive, and stubborn clan, were scattered about in different corners of 
the world, each of them cheerfully ruling a petty kingdom. Collectively they 
were Called the “kings of the peoples.” 


And so two hundred years went by: you’d say 
That monarchy itself had passed away. 

The local chiefs were happy to ignore 

Each other, and the earth was cleansed of war. 
Sekandar had foreseen and planned this peace 
To safeguard the prosperity of Greece. 


The first among the new kings was Ashk, of the family of Qobad; others 
included Shapur who was of equally noble birth, the Ashkanian prince Gudarz, 
the Kayanid prince Bizhan, Nersi, the mighty Hormozd, and Arash, who was a 
fearsome warrior. After him there was Ardavan, a wise, clear-sighted man. 
When the Ashkanian Bahram became king he distributed wealth among the 
deserving and was called Ardavan the Great because he was a man who 
protected his flock from the wolves’ claws. He held the area from Shiraz to 
Esfahan, which discerning men have called the seat of nobility, and by his 
authority Estakhr was ruled by Babak, a man whose snares terrified dragons. But 
all these ruled for such a short time and had so little influence that the chronicler 
did not record their lives in detail; I have heard nothing but their names, and seen 
nothing about them in royal records. All this was as the dying Sekandar had 
planned: Greece would remain safe and prosperous while the Eastern princes 
were preoccupied with local affairs, and so paid no attention to her. When a wise 
man becomes king, his knowledge ensures that such plans come to fruition. 


Babak Sees Sasan in a Dream 

When Dara was killed in battle and his family fell upon dark times, a wise, brave 
son, who was Called Sasan, survived him. When he saw that his father had been 
murdered, and that the Persians’ fortunes were in ruins, he fled before the Greek 
army and escaped from the general disaster. He died obscurely in India, but left 
behind him a son who bore his name, which continued in the family for four 
generations. They lived as shepherds, sometimes as camel drivers, and all their 
years passed in poverty and hard labor. The last, while still a child, presented 
himself before Babak’s chief shepherd and said, “Do you need a laborer, 
someone who can live out his wretched life here?” The shepherd hired Sasan, 
who worked hard day and night and pleased his masters, so that when he grew 
up he became chief shepherd in his turn. He was a man who lived in sadness, by 
the sweat of his brow. 

One night as Babak slept, his bright soul dreamt that Sasan was riding a war 
elephant, and in his hand was an Indian sword. Everyone who came before him 
bowed down to him; he made the earth flourish, and drove sorrow from men’s 
hearts. The next night Babak dreamed that a fire worshipper lit three fires on the 
plain; they were just like the fires in the temples of Azar-Goshasp, Khorad, and 
Mehr, and they shone like the turning heavens. All three burned before Sasan, 
who fed them with aloes wood. Babak woke in consternation from his dream and 
summoned oneiromancers. They gathered at his court and when Babak told them 
what he’d seen, they grew pensive. Finally, the most senior among them said, 
“Great king, we must consider what this means. Anyone who is seen in this way 
by others, in a dream, is destined to raise his head above the sun in sovereignty: 
and if the dream does not refer to him it will be fulfilled by his son.” 

Babak was overjoyed when he heard this, and rewarded each of those present 
according to his rank. Then he gave orders for his chief shepherd to appear 
before him. It was a bitterly cold day, and the man appeared dressed in coarse 
clothes, his sheepskin coat covered in snow, and his heart almost split in two 
with anxiety. Babak commanded that the court be cleared, and the servants and 
counselors left the two alone. He questioned Sasan, and was cordial to him, 
seating him beside himself. He asked him about his family and lineage, but the 
shepherd was terrified at first and made no answer. Finally, Sasan said, “Your 
majesty, if you will take pity on your shepherd, swear with your hand in mine 
that no matter what my lineage might be you will not seek to harm me, either 
openly or in secret.” Babak swore by merciful God that he would not harm him 


in any way; his intention was only to make him happy and treat him with 
respect. 

Then the young man said, “I am the son of Sasan, a descendant of King 
Ardeshir, who is remembered under the name Bahman, and who was the son of 
the great Esfandyar, the son of Goshtasp.” When he heard this, Babak wept that 
he had seen such dreams. He had splendid clothes and a royally accoutered horse 
assigned to Sasan and said to him, “Go to the hot baths while they prepare your 
court clothes.” He had a palace built for this man who had once been his chief 
shepherd, and when he was installed there Babak gave him slaves and attendants 
and every kind of necessity for life. He gave him more wealth than he could 
need, and lastly Babak gave him in marriage the crown of his life, his lovely 
daughter. 


The Birth of Ardeshir Babakan 

When nine months had gone by, this beautiful princess gave birth to a boy as 
splendid as the sun. He looked like Ardeshir, and he grew quickly into a brave, 
formidable child. His father called him Ardeshir, and his grandfather rejoiced to 
see him and was always cradling him in his arms. So time passed, and perceptive 
men referred to the boy as Ardeshir Babakan. He was taught all the skills a 
prince should acquire, and they made his kingly nature even more splendid: his 
face and manner were such that you’d say the heavens themselves shone with 
their borrowed light. 

News of the knowledge and courtly accomplishments of this young man, who 
was Said to be a raging lion in battle and as gracious as the goddess Nahid at 
banquets, came to Ardavan, who wrote a letter to Babak. It said, “Wise, prudent, 
eloquent, and renowned chieftain, I have heard that your grandson Ardeshir is a 
fine horseman, an eloquent boy, and a quick study. As soon as you read this 
letter, send him to me and I shall treat him well. I’ll give him all that he requires, 
and make him the first of my warriors. When he is with my sons I shall make no 
distinction between him and them.” 

Babak wept when he read this letter, and had Ardeshir and a scribe brought to 
him. He said to the young man, “Read Ardavan’s message and pay close 
attention to it. I shall write an answer to the king now and send it with a trusted 
servant. I shall say, ‘I send you this brave, fine, young man who is my heart, the 
apple of my eye; I have advised him on how to act when he reaches your exalted 
court. Act toward him as befits a king, and do not let even the winds of heaven 
blow against him.’” Then Babak quickly opened his treasury doors and made the 
young man’s heart happy with his gifts. He presented him with golden saddles, 
maces and swords, gold coins and brocade, horses and slaves, Chinese cloths 
and imperial textiles. He laid his wealth before him, holding back nothing from 
the boy who was to serve Ardavan. He also sent gifts with Ardeshir for the king 
—brocade and gold coins, musk and ambergris. And so the promising young 
man left his grandfather and set off for Ardavan’s court at Rey. 


Ardeshir Arrives at Ardavan’s Court 

Word was sent to the king as soon as Ardeshir arrived at the court, and Ardavan 
had him brought in. He talked with him for a while about Babak, seated him near 
the throne, and had quarters in the palace assigned to him. He also saw that food, 
clothes, and furnishings were provided for the young man. Ardeshir, and his 


companions, who had made the journey with him, went to the lodgings they had 
been given. 

When the sun placed its throne in the heavens, and the world turned as pale as 
a Greek’s face, Ardeshir called one of his servants and had him take to King 
Ardavan the presents that Babak had sent. Ardavan was delighted by them, and 
the young man who had brought them seemed to him to be a fine addition to the 
court. He treated him as his child and for a while saw that nothing disturbed the 
youth’s happiness. Whether they were drinking wine or at banquets or out 
hunting, Ardavan kept him always nearby, and there was no difference between 
Ardeshir and Ardavan’s own sons. 

And so it was that one day a group of courtiers and the king’s four sons, all 
fine young princes, had scattered across the plain in a hunting expedition; 
Ardeshir rode next to Ardavan, who was delighted to have the young man with 
him. Then in the distance a wild ass appeared, and cries went up from the 
hunters; everyone gave chase, and the company was covered in dust and sweat. 
Ardeshir outstripped the rest, and as he neared the prey he notched an arrow to 
his bow. When he loosed the shaft, it struck the animal in the flank, and the 
whole arrow, head, feathers, and all, passed right through the body. Just at that 
moment King Ardavan rode up; he saw the arrow fly and the wild ass lying 
dead, and exclaimed, “Bravo, whoever shot that arrow!” Ardeshir said, “I killed 
this wild ass, with my arrow.” But one of Ardavan’s sons said, “I killed this 
beast, and I’d like to see anyone else manage such a feat!” Ardeshir turned to 
him and said, “The plain is wide, and there are asses and arrows in abundance; 
let’s see you bring another one down in the same way. To a man with any pride, 
a lie is a sin!” But Ardavan was enraged by this remark and shouted, “This is my 
fault, since it was me who brought you up. Why should I have you at my 
banquets and take you hunting with me if you’re going to push ahead of my sons 
and lord it over everyone? Go and look after my Arab horses, and sleep in the 
stables with them. You can act the master there and be everyone’s boy for every 
job that’s to be done!” 

Ardeshir’s eyes filled with tears, but he had no choice other than to go and 
live in the stables. He wrote a letter to his grandfather Babak, and as he did so 
his heart was filled with sorrow, his head with wild schemes. He wrote of how 
Ardavan had acted toward him and added that he hoped the man would endure 
bodily pains and mental distress. He went over everything that had happened, 
and where and why Ardavan had erupted in rage. When this message reached 
Babak, he kept its contents to himself. He was upset, and he sent the young man 


ten thousand dinars from his treasury. Then he called in a scribe and dictated a 
letter to Ardeshir: “You’re a callow young man, and you haven’t much wisdom 
as yet. When you went hunting with Ardavan, what business had you attacking 
his son like that? You’re a servant there, not one of the family! You are your 
own worst enemy, and you’ve grown used to acting foolishly. Now you must try 
to please him and keep him satisfied with you: don’t deviate from his orders 
even for a moment. I’ve sent you some money, and here I’m sending you some 
advice. When you use the one remember the other, until this business is over.” 

An old experienced messenger quickly brought the letter to Ardeshir, who 
was pleased when he read it. His heart began to weave plots and plans. He chose 
a house near the stables and filled it with carpets, fine clothes, and good food, so 
that it was hardly suitable for the work he was supposed to be doing. He spent 
his days and nights eating and drinking; wine and entertainers were his 
companions. 


Golnar Sees Ardeshir; the Death of Babak 


King Ardavan possessed a slave whose face 
Lit up his palace with bewitching grace: 

She seemed a painting, lovely and bejeweled. 
Her name was Golnar, and this slave girl ruled 
The palace as her monarch’s counselor— 

His first advisor, and his treasurer. 

He loved her more than life itself: the sight 

Of Golnar filled the king’s heart with delight. 


One day Golnar went up onto the palace roof and glimpsed the merrymaking in 
Ardeshir’s courtyard. She was charmed by it, and when she saw Ardeshir’s 
smiling face, the young man slipped into her heart. That night, toward dawn, she 
knotted a rope and let it down from the battlements. Boldly, invoking God’s 
benevolence as she did so, she made her way to the ground. Wearing her jewels 
and scented with musk, she appeared before Ardeshir; he raised his head from 
his brocade pillow, emerging from sleep, and took her in his arms. The young 
man stared at the beautiful girl before him, at her hair and face and splendor, and 
said, “Where have you come from, to delight my sorrow-stricken heart in this 
way?” She answered, “I am a slave, and I live to see you alone, in all the world: 
I am King Ardavan’s treasurer, and the chief pleasure and solace of his soul. But 


if you accept me, I shall be your slave and fill my heart and soul with adoration 
for you. I shall come to you whenever you wish, and change the darkness of 
your days to splendor.” 

A little later Babak, who had brought up Ardeshir, died, and left his place in 
this world to others. When news of this reached Ardeshir his soul was darkened 
and he grieved for his protector. All the nobles vied to be appointed governor of 
Pars, but the king entrusted the post to his eldest son: he gave orders that the 
drums were to be sounded, and the army set off across the plain. Ardeshir’s heart 
was dark with grief for the benevolent old man who had guided and cherished 
him, and he took no pleasure in Ardavan’s rule or his army. The news made him 
look for another course; his heart was filled with resentment, and he looked for 
some means of escape. 

At that time King Ardavan, seeking to know who would be favored by the 
heavens, summoned astrologers to his court. He sent them up to Golnar’s 
quarters, whence they could observe the stars. For three days they worked there, 
casting the king’s horoscope. The treasurer overheard their conversation about 
the stars, and for three days and nights, through the third watch of each night, 
she eavesdropped on them, her heart filled with hope, her lips with sighs. On the 
fourth day the sages took their astrological tables from Golnar’s quarters to the 
king, and put before him what they had discovered. They told him in detail how 
the secrets of high heaven affected him, and said that in the near future 
something would happen that would bring anguish to the king’s heart. A servant 
who was valiant and of noble birth would flee from his court, and this man 
would become a great king, a ruler of the world, powerful and blessed by the 
stars. Ardavan’s heart was deeply troubled by their words. 


Ardeshir Flees with Golnar 
The land turned pitch black and the slave girl made her way to Ardeshir. He was 
a sea of anger and resentment, unable to have a single day’s peace because of his 
preoccupation with Ardavan. Golnar told him what the astrologers had told the 
king, and when he heard this he calmed down and was silent for a while. Her 
words concentrated his mind, and he decided on flight. He said to her, “If I’m to 
get to Pars, if I’m to see 

That land again where men are brave and free, 

I must know if you’ll come with me, or stay 

Behind here with King Ardavan in Rey. 

If you accompany me you’ll be the crown 

Of Persia, which will fill with your renown.” 

And she replied, between expressive sighs 

While flowing tears fell from her lovely eyes, 

“Tam your slave, I have one life to give 

And it is yours entirely, while I live.” 


Ardeshir said to the beautiful girl, “We have no choice but to do this tomorrow.” 
She returned to her own quarters, determined to take her life in her hands and 
risk everything. 

When dark night withdrew and the world turned gold with the rising sun, 
Golnar opened the treasury doors and began to choose among the jewels there. 
She selected rubies and other royal gems, as well as a sufficient number of gold 
coins for their purposes, then returned to her room. There she waited till night 
came up over the mountains, and Ardavan’s sleeping palace was deserted. Quick 
as an arrow then, clutching the jewels and cash she had taken, she came to the 
valiant Ardeshir; he stood with a wine goblet in his hand, the stable guards 
asleep at his feet. He had made them drunk so that they would not impede the 
escape, and he’d picked out and saddled two fine horses. When he saw Golnar’s 
face and the jewels and red gold she’d brought, he immediately set down the 
goblet and put the bridles over the horses’ heads. Armored, and with a glittering 
sword in his hand, he mounted one horse and helped Golnar on to the other; 
together they fled from the palace buildings and took the road to Pars, their 
hearts filled with joy and ambition. 


Ardavan Learns of What Golnar and Ardeshir Have Done 


It was Ardavan’s habit never to rise from his brocade bed, until he had first seen 
Golnar’s face as a good omen for the day. But when the time came for him to get 
up and to have his throne spread with brocade, and the slave girl still had not 
come to his pillow, he exploded with fury against her. The guards stood before 
his door; his throne, crown, and audience hall were ready for him, and his 
chamberlain came in saying, “Your warriors and the country’s nobility are 
waiting at the door.” The king said to his servants, “See what is the matter with 
Golnar; it never happens that she doesn’t come to my pillow; she knows what 
my habits are.” At that moment the chief scribe came in and said, “Some time 
last night Ardeshir fled; he’s taken from the stables a black horse and a gray, 
both of them mounts favored by the king. And at the same time the king lost his 
beloved companion, since it is clear that your treasurer has fled with Ardeshir.” 

Ardavan’s warlike heart was enraged and he set off with a large group of 
horsemen in pursuit of the fugitives. You’d have said that their horses trod on 
fire, so swiftly did they gallop. At the roadside they saw a well-populated 
settlement with a number of animals and asked if before sunrise anyone had 
heard the sound of galloping. A man volunteered that two figures on two horses, 
one gray and the other black, had galloped across the plain, closely followed by 
a pristine mountain sheep, which kicked up as much dust as the horses did. 
Ardavan asked his advisor why a mountain sheep should be running behind 
them, and the man replied, “That is his farr, an earnest of his good fortune and 
sovereignty. If this sheep sticks with him, do not struggle against the fact, or this 
will turn into a lengthy business for us.” Ardavan dismounted at the settlement, 
ate, and rested for a while, and then renewed the chase. With Ardavan and his 
advisor leading them, the group pressed on in pursuit of Ardeshir. 

Meanwhile the young man and the slave girl rode like the wind, without 
resting for a moment; whoever is favored by the high heavens cannot be harmed 
by enemies. When they were tired out by their efforts, Ardeshir caught sight of a 
lake beneath them as they crested a hill, and he turned to Golnar and said, “Now 
that we are both exhausted by the journey, we should ride down to that water; 
both we and our horses are weak and worn out. We can stay by the water and eat 
something, and ride on when we’ve rested.” But as they approached the lake, 
with their faces as yellow and sickly as the sun, Ardeshir saw two young men 
standing there, who shouted to him, “Stay in your stirrups now, shake out your 
reins, 

Continue on your ride across the plains— 
You have escaped the dragon’s deadly breath 


But if you drink here you’ll encounter death.” 


Ardeshir said to Golnar, “Remember their words.” Their stirrups became heavy, 
their reins light; Ardeshir lifted his glittering lance to his shoulders and on they 
rode. 

Tired and with darkness in his soul, Ardavan still rode after them like the 
wind, until at midday, when the sun had traversed half the sky, he saw a fine 
town. A number of its inhabitants came out to meet him, and he called out to 
their priests, “When did you last see a young man ride this way?” One of them 
answered, “Your majesty, benevolent and blessed by heaven, at the time when 
the sun sets and night spreads its dark veil over the land, two people rode 
through this town; they were covered in dust and their lips were dry with thirst. 
A mountain sheep followed one of them, and she was more splendid than any 
I’ve ever seen in a painting on a palace wall.” Ardavan’s advisor said to him, 
“The situation has changed; you should turn back here, muster an army, and 
prepare for war. His good fortune follows him, and our chasing after him like 
this is mere clutching at the wind. Write a letter to your son, telling him of the 
whole business; perhaps he can find some trace of Ardeshir. He must not be 
allowed to drink this sheep’s milk!” When Ardavan heard these words, he knew 
that his days were numbered and that his glory was fading. He dismounted at the 
town, and prayed to God from whom all blessings come. 

At dawn the following morning he gave orders for the return journey. He 
entered Rey at nightfall, his cheeks as pale as reeds. There he wrote a letter to his 
son, saying, “In our orchard, a twisted root has born fruit. Ardeshir has fled from 
my hearth quicker than any arrow. He has gone to Pars; find him, but do it 
discreetly, and tell no one in the world of this.” 


Ardeshir Gathers an Army 

For his part, Ardeshir reached the shore of a wide body of water, where he 
prayed, “Sole source of help, who has made me safe from my malevolent enemy, 
I pray that his body may never know health again.” Then he rested and talked 
with a ferryman there for a long time about the past. The ferryman, who was a 
wise old man, stared at Ardeshir’s face and stature and realized that he must be 
descended from the Kayanid kings; the prince’s farr and glory delighted him. 
Quickly he ferried Ardeshir across the water, and when the young man reached 
the other side and news of his coming spread, an army of supporters gathered 
there. Babak’s men from Estakhr came, overjoyed at the news of their new king, 
and all of Dara’s descendants came to him from the various provinces where 
they ruled. Joy at King Ardeshir’s presence made old men’s hearts young again, 
and band by band men poured in from the river valleys and mountains. Wise 
counselors came from every city and gathered about the ambitious youth. He 
addressed his followers: “Illustrious and righteous as you are, there is no one 
here who has not heard what the malevolent Sekandar, out of the baseness of his 
heart, did on this earth. One by one he killed my ancestors and unjustly grasped 
the world in his fist. Since I am descended from Esfandyar, it is right that I 
cannot recognize Ardavan as king here. If you are with me in this, I shall not let 
anyone usurp the title and throne that should be mine. What do you say? What’s 
your answer? Tell me clearly!” 

Everyone there, whether a warrior or a counselor, rose to his feet, and 
together they spoke from their hearts: “Those of us who are from Babak’s tribe 
rejoice to see your face, and those of us who are Sasanians will bind on our 
sword belts to serve you in war. Our souls and bodies belong to you, our joys 
and sorrows depend on you. Your lineage on both sides is nobler than anyone’s; 
kingship and heroism are your birthright. If you give the order, we shall make 
mountains level with the plains, and with our swords we shall make the ocean’s 
water into blood.” At such an answer Ardeshir’s mind out-soared the spheres of 
Venus and Mercury. He thanked the nobles gathered there and meditated war in 
his heart. 

At the edge of the water he built a city, which became the site of his 
preparations for war. A priest there said to him, “O fortunate and inspiring king, 
renewer of the monarchy, you must cleanse the province of Pars and then make 
war on Ardavan, because you are a young king and your star is still young. Of all 
those they call the ‘kings of the peoples,’ he is the richest, and besides, he has 


harassed and harried you. Once you have removed him from power, no one will 
have the strength to offer you any resistance.” This was what had to be said, and 
Ardeshir was happy to hear such words. As the sun rose above the mountain 
peak he left the shore and set off toward Estakhr. But when the news reached 
Bahman, Ardavan’s son, his soul darkened and his heart filled with pain; he did 
not sit idly on the royal throne but at once mustered his troops and prepared for 
war. 


Ardeshir’s Victory over Bahman 

There was a nobleman called Sabak, a just and well-meaning man in charge of 
armaments and troops, who ruled over the town of Jahrom. He had seven fine 
sons. When he heard what was afoot he defected from Bahman’s side and 
ceremoniously brought his army, with its war drums beating, to join forces with 
Ardeshir. As was customary, he dismounted and ran forward to kiss Ardeshir’s 
feet. The ambitious young king made much of him and acknowledged the value 
of his prompt defection. But he was suspicious of Sabak, and in his heart he 
feared him. He was guarded with him as they marched, aware of the might of 
Sabak’s large army. But Sabak was old and experienced, and he realized what 
Ardeshir was thinking. He came to the commander with the Zend-Avesta in his 
hand and said, “I swear by almighty God that Sabak’s life is worthless if my 
heart is not blameless toward you. When I learned King Ardeshir was gathering 
troops on that shore, I became disgusted with Ardavan, just as a young man will 
be disgusted by an old woman. Consider me as a kind, patient, trustworthy slave, 
who will bring you good luck.” Hearing this, Ardeshir changed his mind about 
Sabak; he thought of him henceforth as his father, and placed him in command 
of his other officers. 

With his heart freed from this anxiety, Ardeshir paused at the fire-temple of 
Ram-Khorad; there he prayed earnestly for God to guide him, to give him 
victory in all his undertakings, and to allow the tree of greatness to flourish for 
him. Then he returned to his pavilion, where his officers and men awaited him. 
He distributed cash to his troops, invoking God as he did so. His army was now 
like a valiant leopard, and he advanced against Bahman, the son of Ardavan, to 
give battle. 

As the two armies approached one another, each side formed ranks ready for 
battle, with lances and Indian swords grasped in their hands. Then they fell on 
one another like warring lions, and blood was spilled in rivers. So they fought 
until the sun turned pale, and the air was filled with dust, the ground with 


corpses. At dawn the next morning, when the sky’s veil turned the color of 
turquoise, Sabak’s troops entered the fray. A wind sprang up, and the dust made 
the air like pitch. Ardeshir attacked from the center, and such was his might and 
the strength of his farr that he slew many men with his mace. Bahman fled 
before him, his body wounded with arrows and his soul shrouded in darkness. 
King Ardeshir pursued him relentlessly, with trumpets sounding and arrows 
raining down, until they reached the city of Estakhr, the seat of Bahman’s power. 
At the the sound of Ardeshir’s voice a vast number of troops defected to him. He 
distributed to them the wealth that Bahman had toiled to accumulate, scattering 
the hoarded coins. Strong and confident, he led his armies out of Pars. 


Ardeshir’s War Against Ardavan; Ardavan Is Killed 

The news of Bahman’s defeat brought terror to Ardavan’s heart and his soul 
darkened. He said, “A man who knew the secrets of the turning heavens once 
said to me that whenever an evil surpasses our imagination, our efforts can have 
no effect on our fate. I would not have thought that Ardeshir could become so 
ambitious or turn into a conqueror of cities.” He opened his treasury’s doors, 
distributed provisions, mustered his army, and set off. He led his men through 
Gilan and Daylam, and the dust they sent up ascended to the moon. On the other 
side, Ardeshir too pressed forward; his men were so numerous that they stopped 
the wind in its tracks, and the columns resounded with the blare of trumpets and 
bugles, the jangling of bells, and the clashing of Indian cymbals. The armies 
were now two bowshots from one another, and the very snakes in the ground 
cowered away in terror. With a roar the columns attacked, their banners bravely 
fluttering, their swords lopping off heads, empurpled with blood. 

The fighting lasted for forty days. The common soldiers were hard pressed, 
their provisions ran out, and it was difficult to resupply them. So many corpses 
were piled there that the plain seemed like a mountain, and the wounded 
despaired of life. Finally, a fierce wind sprang up, and a black cloud that made it 
impossible to fight spread over the armies; the mountainside groaned, the ground 
shook, and the noise re-echoed in the heavens. Ardavan’s army was terrified; 
they all believed that this was a sign from God against their king, and that there 
was nothing to do for their forces now but weep. On that day, the tide of battle 
turned against them and they all surrendered. Ardeshir advanced from the center 
of his troops, through the clash of weapons and a hail of arrows. Ardavan, who 
had devoted his sweet soul to the crown, was captured by a man named Kharrad 
who seized his bridle and dragged him before the king. Ardavan dismounted 


before Ardeshir, wounded and in despair. Ardeshir turned to his executioner and 
said, “Take that enemy of the king and split him open with a sword: fill the 
hearts of those who plot against us with terror.” The man came forward and did 
as he had been ordered, and so this illustrious ruler was lost to the world. 


The ancient heavens turn; kings disappear, 

Now Ardavan is gone, now Ardeshir, 

And though their heads reach to the stars they must 
At last be humbled in the lowly dust. 


The humiliation of the family of Arash was increased by the capture of two of 
Ardavan’s sons. Their legs were bound, and the king gave orders that they be 
imprisoned. The two eldest sons fled from the battlefield and escaped capture; 
weeping they fled to India, and theirs is a story worth recounting. The whole 
battlefield was strewn with horse gear, baldrics, weapons, and gold and silver 
objects; the king had all this collected, and then distributed it to his soldiers. 
Sabak left the other chieftains and cleansed Ardavan’s body of blood. Weeping, 
he wiped away the grime of battle, and made him a tomb suitable for a king. He 
wrapped the wounded body in brocade and placed a pillow of camphor beneath 
his head. But when the soldiers went on to Rey they trampled the dust of 
Ardavan’s palace beneath their feet. 

Then Sabak came before Ardeshir and said, “Wise king, demand Ardavan’s 
daughter in marriage: she has splendor and beauty and the dignity of her station. 
The crown and wealth that Ardavan took such trouble to accumulate will be in 
your hands.” Ardeshir accepted this advice, and immediately demanded the girl 
in marriage. He stayed two months in her apartments; he was now a mighty 
commander, and a mighty king. Then he made his way from Rey to Pars, having 
rested from battle and the world’s strife. He built a town there filled with palaces 
and gardens, streams, open spaces, and mountain slopes: a wise old local 
dignitary still refers to that place as Khurreh-ye Ardeshir—“The Glory of 
Ardeshir.” From an inexhaustible spring of water within the town, he led off 
streams and irrigation channels. Near the spring he built a fire-temple, and there 
he celebrated the Zoroastrian festivals of Mehregan and Sadeh. Around the 
temple there were gardens, open spaces, and palaces; he made it into a splendid 
place. When later this wise and powerful king had died, the lord of the marches 
there called the place the city of Gur. Ardeshir built villages around it and settled 
the area. Although there was a deep lake nearby, it was separated from the town 


by a mountain. Ardeshir had laborers hack a hundred channels through the rock 
with picks, so that the water from the lake irrigated Gur, which became filled 
with buildings and livestock. 


Ardeshir’s War with the Kurds 

Ardeshir led a huge army out from Estakhr, to fight against the Kurds. He sought 
aid from God in his expedition to spill the blood of these thieves, but when he 
entered Kurdish territory, a numberless host welcomed him with war. An 
expedition that should have been a minor matter became difficult, because the 
whole countryside supported the Kurds, so that they outnumbered the king’s 
men thirty to one. They fought a whole day till nightfall, when the king’s army 
fled and the battlefield was crowded with so many corpses that one could hardly 
move. Only a few soldiers remained behind with their king, and they were 
tormented with thirst because of the dust and the heat of the sun. Then night 
spread its banner and put an end to the fighting and tumult. 

Ardeshir saw a fire on the mountainside; he and his companions made their 
way up to it, and as they drew nearer they saw a few shepherds there, watching 
their sheep and goats. He and his soldiers dismounted, and as their mouths were 
filled with the dust of battle, Ardeshir immediately asked for water, which the 
shepherds gave him, together with some yogurt. He rested and ate a little of what 
was before him: then he spread out his armor to sleep on, and his pillow was his 
royal helmet. 

Dawn broke over the lake, and the king of Persia lifted his head from sleep. 
The chief of the shepherds came to his pillow saying, “I wish you lucky days and 
nights. How is it that you’ve come here, as this is no place for someone like you 
to sleep?” The king questioned him about the way, and where he could find a 
place to rest. The shepherd answered, “You won’t find any houses unless you 
have a guide. But about four parasangs from here there is a place where you 
could rest, and from there you could go from village to village until you reach 
the one where the local headman lives.” Ardeshir took a few of the older men 
there as guides and made his way to the village where the headman was. From 
there he sent horsemen, young and old, to Khurreh-ye Ardeshir, and when the 
army heard of his escape, they were overjoyed and set out to come to his aid. 
Meanwhile Ardeshir posted spies, who quickly reported back that the Kurds 
were reveling in their success and giving no thought at all to the king. They 
thought that his luck had grown old and feeble, and that he had gone back to 
Estakhr. The king was happy to hear this, and soon forgot his recent reverses. He 


selected thirty thousand cavalry from the army that had joined him, as well as a 
thousand archers. 

As the sun grew yellow in the west he led his army out, leaving behind those 
unfit for the march. By the time half the night had passed, and it was pitch dark, 
Ardeshir was close to the Kurds. The whole plain was filled with sleeping men, 
lying here and there, careless of their safety. He drew his sword, slackened his 
grip on the reins, and charged the Kurds’ camp. The grass was crowned with 
their blood, the plain was filled with their severed heads and limbs, and the 
heaps of dead were dreadful to see. A huge number of them were taken prisoner: 
their violence and stupidity had been humbled. Ardeshir turned the country over 
to his soldiers for plunder, and distributed purses of gold and crowns to them. 
The countryside there became so secure because of Ardeshir’s rule that an old 
man could have walked across the plain with a salver of gold coins on his head, 
and no one would have so much as looked at him. Ardeshir did not stay to enjoy 
the fruits of war but hurried back to Estakhr, where he gave orders that the men’s 
horses were to be tended to and their armor was to be repaired. He told his 
soldiers to rest and enjoy themselves, since the time for warfare would come 
again quickly enough. His warriors feasted and rested, while Ardeshir’s thoughts 
were of war. 


The Story of the Worm of Haftvad 

Consider this strange story, revealed by a local dignitary, telling old obscure 
tales. There was a poor but populous town called Kajaran near the Persian Gulf, 
where all the inhabitants lived by their own efforts. A number of girls who had 
to work for their livelihood lived there. To one side of the town was a mountain, 
where the girls would go together, taking cotton and spindles made of poplar 
wood. Traveling in a group through the main town gate, they would make their 
way to the mountain slopes, taking just enough food with them. But there was 
very little talk of eating or resting, since their sole concern was the cotton they’d 
brought to spin. Then they would return to their homes at nightfall, bringing the 
yarn they had spun. In this needy but cheerful place there also lived a man called 
Haftvad, who had seven sons, as his name indicates. He had a fine daughter, too, 
but he took no notice of her. One day the group of girls was sitting on the 
mountainside with their spindles, which they had put aside for a moment while 
they were eating. 


Just at that moment Haftvad’s daughter found 


A windfall apple lying on the ground 

And picked it up—now listen carefully 
Because this story’s quite extraordinary: 
She bit the apple then, but as she tried it 

She saw a little worm there, coiled inside it; 
She scooped it out, and gently found a place 
For this small worm inside her spindlecase. 
And as she took her cotton up she said, 

“By God I swear, today I’Il spin such thread, 
Helped by this apple’s lucky worm, that you 
Will be amazed at all that I can do!” 

The girls began to laugh—in their delight, 
Their faces glowed, their teeth shone silver-white. 


But that day she spun twice as much as she normally did; she marked the amount 
on the ground and ran like wind-borne smoke to show her mother how much she 
had completed. He mother smiled and congratulated her and said, “You’ve done 
well by your mother, my pretty one.” The next morning the girl took twice as 
much cotton as usual, and when she had joined her friends she put her heart into 
her work and said, “I’m going to spin so much thread, by the grace of this worm, 
that I’ll never be poor again!” She spun what she had brought, and if she had had 
more with her, she could have spun that, too. She took the thread home, and her 
mother was so pleased with her daughter that she felt she was in heaven. Every 
morning the girl fed the worm a piece of apple, and however much cotton there 
was, the girl magically spun it into thread. 

This went on until one day her mother and father said to their clever daughter, 
“You spin so much that it seems as though you’ve taken a fairy as your sister!” 
But the lovely child quickly answered her mother, “It’s from the apple, and the 
little worm that was hidden in it.” Then she showed her parents the marvelous 
worm and explained everything to them. Haftvad took all this as a good omen, 
and as his prospects seemed to brighten every day, he stopped worrying about 
his own work. He talked only about the good fortune brought by the worm, and 
how the worm had renewed his luck. They didn’t neglect to look after the worm 
but gave it good, nourishing food. The worm grew plump and strong, its head 
and its back became splendid and formidable. The spindlecase was now too 
small for its body, and from one end to the other its skin was like black musk 
with a saffron-colored pattern on it. Haftvad made it a fine black chest to live in. 


Now no discussion about civic affairs could go forward in the town without 
Haftvad: he and his seven sons became powerful, respected citizens. But there 
was a nobleman in the town, a proud man who had his own followers, and he 
looked for some excuse to take this commoner’s wealth away from him. Haftvad 
was afraid and stole out of the town, leaving his seven sons there. Wherever he 
went he complained of their situation, and soon a group of men, young and old, 
had gathered around them. Haftvad was liberal with his gold, and soon he had an 
army, which made its way to his sons, determined to fight on their behalf. 

The noise of trumpets was heard throughout Kajaran, and the army attacked 
with lances, swords, and arrows. Haftvad fought bravely at the head of his men, 
took the town, and killed the nobleman who had been harassing him; a great deal 
of wealth and jewels came into his possession. Men flocked to him, and he left 
Kajaran and went into the mountains. There, on a summit, he built a fortress 
with an iron door for his followers: it was a place of pleasure and repose, but 
also a place that could withstand a siege. A stream there flowed into the fortress, 
and around the whole area he built a wall so high that its summit was invisible. 

Meanwhile the worm had grown too big for its chest, and so they made a 
stone cistern inside the fortress, and when the air had sufficiently warmed the 
stone and mortar, they very gently placed the worm inside it. Every morning the 
worm’s keeper ran from Haftvad and fed the worm with rice, which its swollen 
body soon disposed of. After five years of this the worm was as massive as an 
elephant. The fortunate girl still looked after the worm, while Haftvad 
commanded their armies. A vizier and a scribe waited on the worm, and now it 
was fed on milk and honey. Haftvad was in charge of the fortress and decided all 
matters that came before him. He now had an army, a counselor, a chancellor for 
his court, everything in fact that pertained to a king, and his armies controlled 
the land from Kerman to the sea of China. Haftvad’s seven sons each 
commanded ten thousand men, and they had wealth and arms at their disposal. If 
any king marched against them, as soon as his soldiers heard the tale of the 
worm they lost heart and the army broke up. Haftvad’s fortress became so 
renowned that even the winds of heaven did not dare blow about it. 


Ardeshir Fights Against Haftvad and Is Defeated 

Ardeshir was not pleased when he heard about Haftvad, and he sent a 
commander against him, with a fine body of men ready for battle. But Haftvad 
was not at all alarmed: he set up an ambush in a defile of the mountains and then 
went against the approaching army at the head of his troops. When the two 


armies had joined battle and were laying about one another with maces and 
battleaxes, the hidden soldiers burst out from the ambush, and the earth became 
a dark place for the invaders. They were so hemmed in that no one knew his 
hands from his feet, and so many were killed that the victors were stupefied by 
the number of dead. Anyone from Ardeshir’s forces who remained alive quickly 
fled back to the king. 

Ardeshir was angered when he heard about the way his troops had been killed 
and their baggage plundered. He quickly mustered an army, to whom he 
distributed arms and cash, and set out against Haftvad immediately, while this 
commoner was still exalting in his triumph. Haftvad brought treasure and 
weapons from his fortress and was not at all troubled by Ardeshir’s approach. 
His eldest son was living far away, but when he heard of his father’s battles, he 
gave up his life of lazing and feasting and took ship to return. This ambitious 
youth was called Shahuy, and he was an ill-made, ill-spoken man. When he 
disembarked, Haftvad’s heart rejoiced to see his son, and he put him in charge of 
the right wing of the army, while he himself remained the overall commander. 

Now face to face, the two armies were both well equipped, eager for war, and 
backed up by considerable wealth. King Ardeshir looked at them, and his young 
heart grew old with anxiety. The columns faced one another, and the sun glinted 
on their swords. Then the din of drums resounded from the elephants’ backs, and 
men two miles away quailed at the noise: the blaring of trumpets began, and the 
squeal of brazen bugles. The earth quaked beneath the horses’ hooves, the air 
was crimson with chieftains’ banners, and so great was the racket of maces 
against helmets that the sky seemed to bid the earth farewell. Galloping horses 
tore up the earth, the plain was filled with trunkless heads, and Haftvad’s army 
fought with such fury they seemed like a lake whipped up by the wind. So thick 
was the press of men on each side that not an ant or a mosquito could have found 
room there. So the battle went on until the day paled into evening, and then night 
spread its purple cloak. Ardeshir summoned his scattered soldiers and made 
camp beside a brackish lake. When the rust-colored waters turned black, each 
army sent out its scouts and guards. The king’s army was badly fed that night, 
because their malevolent enemy had cut off the road by which they’d been 
supplied. 


Mehrak, the Son of Nushzad, Sacks Ardeshir’s Palace 
In Jahrom there was a low-born man called Mehrak, the son of Nushzad. When 
he heard that Ardeshir had left the area and was camped by a lake after a hard- 


fought battle, and that the army’s supply route had been interrupted, he set off 
for the king’s palace with a large group of followers. He looted its treasures and 
distributed crowns and cash to his men. Ardeshir received news of this at the 
lakeside and grew pensive, saying to himself, “Why am I fighting against 
strangers when I haven’t secured my own palace?” 

He summoned his chieftains and told them at length about Mehrak, and then 
said, “You are my army commanders, what do you think we should do in this 
desperate situation? Fate has sent us sorrows enough, and we overlooked 
Mehrak and his potential for trouble.” They answered, “Your majesty, may your 
eyes never see ill fortune. Since Mehrak has revealed himself as your covert 
enemy, why should you endure these hardships to conquer the world? But you 
have greatness and the earth is yours; we are your slaves and you our master.” 

Ardeshir ordered that a meal be prepared, and asked for wine and 
entertainers. A few spitted lambs were placed before the men, and they began to 
eat. Ardeshir had a piece of bread in his hand when an arrow plunged right into 
the lamb carcass in front of him. Alarmed, the chieftains drew back from the 
food, while one of them took the arrow out of the meat. There was writing on it, 
and an officer who was also a scribe read it aloud. The inscription was in 
Pahlavi, and it said, “Listen, wise king: this arrow’s from the fort 

Where peace reigns, and the mighty worm holds court: 
If I had aimed the shaft at Ardeshir 

It would have passed right through you. It is clear 

No king like you can hope for victory 

Against the worm’s all-powerful sovereignty. ” 


It was two parasangs from the fortress to their camp, and when the inscription 
was read the chieftains’ hearts were horrified; all of them invoked God’s 
blessings on their king and his glory. 

Ardeshir brooded on these events all night, and when the sun rose the next 
morning he struck camp and led the army back from the lake, toward Pars. They 
marched quickly but the enemy forces harassed them from behind, raiding the 
columns constantly and killing many of their leaders. The cry pursued them: 
“The worm’s good fortune shines, and he alone 

Illuminates the splendor of the throne.” 


The soldiers said to one another, “This is a wonder, which everyone should 
marvel at.” They rode on across uneven ground, their hearts filled with anxiety, 


until they saw a large city, and they bore down on it with the speed of wolves. 
Nearby, they saw two young men standing in front of a house. The king and his 
men paused for a moment, and the strangers questioned them, asking how they 
came to be there so unexpectedly, and where they had arrived from, covered in 
the dust of the road. The king said, “Ardeshir fled this way, and we were left 
behind in his flight; he’s running from the worm, and from Haftvad, and from 
their rabble of an army.” The two young men started forward, filled with 
concern on the fugitives’ behalf. They had them dismount, welcoming them and 
making them a place to rest and sleep. The two sat with the king at his meal and 
entertained him well, saying, ’My lord, neither sorrow nor joy last for long. 
Look at the unjust Zahhak and all he took from the royal throne, and at the 
malevolent Afrasyab, who tormented the Persian kings, and at Sekandar, who in 
recent times killed the world’s kings; they have all departed. All that remains of 
them is an evil name, and they will not taste the joys of paradise. This Haftvad 
will end in the same way; he too will at last writhe in his death agony.” 

At their words, the king’s heart opened like a flower in springtime. He was so 
comforted by their remarks that he decided to tell them the truth, and said, “I am 
Ardeshir, the son of Sasan, and I need your advice. How can I fight against this 
accursed worm, and against Haftvad?” The two young men bowed before him, 
and both said, “May you always thrive, and may the reach of evil be far from 
you. Our bodies and souls are your slaves; may your spirit endure forever. As for 
the worm, some kind of stratagem must be employed against it. You won’t be 
able to defeat it unless you resort to underhand tactics. The worm and his 
treasure and followers are ensconced on that mountaintop, with a city on one 
side and the lake on the other, and the way up their fastness is a difficult one. In 
his essence that worm is Ahriman, the enemy of the Creator of the world. You 
say he’s a worm, but inside that leathery skin he’s a devil thirsty for blood.” 

Ardeshir felt reassured by their kind words and said, “All this is true, and I 
leave it to you to come up with something against him.” They answered, “We 
are your Slaves and will always recommend what is right to you.” Cheered by 
their talk the king went forward, once more assured of victory, taking the two 
young men with him. And so they proceeded, with clear consciences and 
confidence, to Khurreh-ye Ardeshir. 

There, with his courtiers assembled about him, he rested from war, re- 
provisioned his army, and then turned to the problem of Mehrak, the son of 
Nushzad. Mehrak was terrified to learn of his approach, and as Ardeshir drew 
near Jahrom, the traitor hid from him. But the king was determined to hunt him 


down, and when Mehrak was taken prisoner Ardeshir cut off his head with an 
Indian sword, and had his headless trunk burned. Then he stabbed to death every 
member of Mehrak’s family who fell into his hands, apart from one of the 
daughters, who managed to keep herself hidden, even though she was sought for 
throughout the whole town. 


Ardeshir Kills Haftvad’s Worm 

His next concern was to make war on the worm, and he mustered an army for 
this purpose. Assembling twelve thousand experienced cavalry, he reunited his 
scattered troops and brought his reconstituted forces to an area between two 
mountains. He appointed a shrewd man named Shahrgir as his commander and 
said to him, “Stay here, and be on your guard; send scouts out day and night, and 
let them be good, capable horsemen; likewise have sentries and watchmen 
posted to safeguard the army. Meanwhile I’m going to resort to a trick— 
Esfandyar’s an ancestor of mine, after all. If the watchman sees smoke rise up in 
the daytime, and then fire at night as bright as the sun, you’re to understand that 
the worm’s power is at an end; that I’ve turned his luck, and rid the world of 
him.” 

He chose seven of his best warriors, all brave as lions and men whom he 
could trust. Not a word was said to anyone else as to what was afoot. He picked 
out a large number of jewels from his treasury, as well as brocade, gold coins, 
and other kinds of wealth, his wise eyes carefully selecting the best items. Then 
he filled two chests with lead and included a brass cauldron, an item that would 
be crucial for the success of his venture. He wrapped everything in cloth, 
procured ten large donkeys from the head of his stables, loaded up his goods, 
and covered them over with coarse kilims. Impatient to put their plan into action, 
the little group set off for the worm’s fastness. The two young men who had 
entertained Ardeshir during his flight went with them: they had become friends 
with Ardeshir, and he valued their advice. The caravan was disguised to look 
like a merchant’s. 

When they could see the castle and its city in the distance, a lookout called to 
them, “What have you got in those chests?” The king shouted back, “All sorts of 
things for sale: cloth and clothes, gold and silver, gold coins, brocade, pearls and 
jewels. We’re merchants from Khorasan, always traveling, never resting. I’ve 
accumulated a fine amount of goods, thanks to the worm’s good fortune, so now 
I’ve come to pay my respects before his throne. It’s his luck that has helped me, 


and if it is allowable I will offer my homage to him.” The worm’s servant 
opened the gates to the castle, and the caravan went inside. 

Ardeshir quickly opened up his packages and handed over things worthy of 
the man’s station. He set out a stall before the servants, opened the chests, and 
filled a goblet with wine. Those whose turn it was to feed the worm with milk 
and rice turned away from the wine, not wanting to get drunk at this time. 
Realizing this, Ardeshir stood up and said, “I have a huge amount of rice and 
milk, and if his keeper will allow it I shall be pleased to feed the worm for three 
days. This will give me a name in the world, and the worm’s lucky star might 
look kindly on me. Drink wine with me for three days, and on the fourth, when 
the sun rises to illuminate the world, I’ll make a fine shop here, even higher than 
your palace, and I’ll ply my trade of buying and selling. In this way Ill increase 
my honor in the worm’s eyes.” With these words he got his wish; the keepers 
responded, “You can serve the wine.” The donkey driver placed everything at 
their service, and began to serve the wine. Gradually they became drunk; those 
whom the worm had commanded were now commanded by wine. As soon as 
their tongues were fuddled, the king and the two young men brought out the 
cauldron and lead and made a fire. When it was time for the worm to be fed, its 
food was boiling lead. They saw its vermilion tongue, waiting to lap up the rice 
as it usually did. The young men poured the lead down its throat, and when its 
bowels split, its strength oozed away. A loud crack came from its throat, and the 
cistern where it lived and the whole town round about shook with the force of it. 
Ardeshir and the two young men attacked like the wind; they snatched up their 
maces, swords, and bows, and not one of the drunken servitors escaped from 
them alive. From the roof of the castle they sent up a column of smoke, as a 
signal to the army commander. Seeing it, a watchman ran to Shahrgir saying, 
“King Ardeshir is victorious.” Immediately he led the army forward to join their 
king. 


Ardeshir Kills Haftvad 

When Haftvad heard what had happened he was frightened and confused. He 
hurried to the castle to retake it, but the king was already on its ramparts. All his 
efforts were useless: a lion stood on his city’s walls. Shahrgir brought up the 
army like a mighty mountain, but his men hesitated and hung back. Ardeshir 
shouted down to them, “Come forward and fight, Shahrgir. If Haftvad escapes 
us, for all your efforts you’ll have nothing in your fist but air. I fed the worm hot 
lead; his power is gone, his anger has melted away.” When they heard the king’s 
voice the Persian troops took heart, put on their metal helmets, and prepared for 
battle. The wind of war turned against the worm’s forces: Haftvad was captured, 
and so was Shahuy, his eldest son and the commander of his troops. King 
Ardeshir came down from the battlements, and Shahrgir came forward to greet 
him on foot. He brought a horse caparisoned in gold, on which the triumphant 
king sat. He gave orders that two gibbets were to be set up on the lake shore, 
where the two malefactors were strung up alive; the sight of them broke the 
hearts of Ardeshir’s enemies. Then Shahrgir stepped forward from the ranks of 
soldiers, and Haftvad and his son were killed in a rain of arrows. Ardeshir gave 
the town over to plunder, and the troops enriched themselves. Servants brought 
out whatever was valuable in the fortress and took everything to Khurreh-ye 
Ardeshir. A fire-temple was built in the province, and the festivals of Mehregan 
and Sadeh were celebrated there; the land was handed over to the two young 
men who had been Ardeshir’s hosts when he fled from the area. 

Ardeshir returned in triumph to Pars, and when the populace and flocks were 
settled again, he led his army to Khurreh-ye Ardeshir. He sent an army to 
Kerman to keep order in the area, under a man who was worthy to rule. And now 
that his enemies had been defeated, he took up residence in Ctesiphon. 


THE REIGN OF ARDESHIR 


Ardeshir assumed the ivory throne in Baghdad and crowned himself there; with 
his sword belt, royal mace, and splendid palace, he was indistinguishable from 
Goshtasp, and from that time on people called him the King of Kings. After he 
had placed the crown on his head, he gave an address from the throne: “In this 
world my treasure is justice, and the world prospers through my efforts and good 
fortune. No one can take this treasure from me, since evil comes to those who do 
evil; if the world’s God approves of my actions, he will not begrudge me 
mastery of this dark earth. From end to end the world is in my keeping, and my 
way is the path of justice. No one, whether he be a slave or a free man, must 
sleep uneasily because of my subordinates, or captains, or cavalry: my court is 
open to everyone, whether they wish me good or ill.” The court called down 
blessings on him, saying, “May the earth prosper beneath your righteousness!” 
Then he sent armies in each direction, to persuade whatever chieftains who 
might oppose him to submit, or face conquest by the sword. 


Ardeshir and the Daughter of Ardavan 
When Ardeshir killed Ardavan and grasped the world in his fist, everyone, 
young and old, rejoiced, since Ardavan had acted tyrannically, and Ardeshir’s 
justice would make the world flourish once again. Ardeshir married the dead 
king’s daughter, hoping that she would reveal to him where her father’s treasure 
was hidden. Two of Ardavan’s sons were in India, enduring both good and bad 
fortune together. Two more were in Ardeshir’s prisons, their hearts filled with 
grief, their eyes with tears. The oldest, who was in India, was called Bahman. 
When he saw that he had lost the whole kingdom, he found a young persuasive 
messenger, and gave him a package filled with poison. He said, “Go to my sister 
and say, ‘Don’t look for kindness from an enemy; 

You have two brothers suffering grievously 

In India, and two more brothers here 

Chained in the dungeons of King Ardeshir— 


And can you think that heaven will approve 
Of how you’re now denying them your love? 
But if you would be Persia’s queen, and live 
Admired by all brave men, contrive to give 
—In one dose—this fell poison that I bring 
From India, to your husband and your king.’” 


5; TAA 
ses OA y A 


BOR 








The envoy arrived at nightfall and gave his message to the princess. She felt pity 
for her brothers, and her face glowed with sympathy for their plight. Anxiously 
she took the precious poison, planning to do what her brother desired. 

And so it happened that, when Ardeshir had spent half of one day hunting 
wild asses with his arrows, he returned to the palace and Ardavan’s daughter ran 
to his side. She brought him a goblet encrusted with topazes in which she had 
mixed cold water with sugar and wheatmeal and the poison, hoping to bring 
about the end her brother Bahman desired. But as Ardeshir took the cup from 
her, it fell from his hand and smashed on the ground. The princess trembled 
apprehensively and felt her heart fail within her. Her agitation aroused the king’s 
suspicions, and he wondered what fate the turning heavens had in store for him. 
He had a servant bring four domestic hens and watched them carefully as they 
pecked up the wheatmeal. When he saw that as soon as they ate the food they 
fell down dead his suspicions were confirmed. He summoned his chief priest and 
asked him, “If you were to assign a throne to your enemy, and he became so 
intoxicated by your kindness that he gratuitously made an attempt on your life, 
what punishment would you impose on him? What would be the medicine to 
cure such folly?” The man’s answer was, “If a subject stretches out his hand 
against the king, his head must be severed for this sin; and anyone who advises 
otherwise should be ignored.” The king said, “Take Ardavan’s daughter and 
divide her body from her soul.” 

Trembling and with guilt in her heart, Ardavan’s daughter left the audience 
chamber with the priest. She said to him, “You are a wise man and know that 
your days and mine will both come to an end. If you must kill me, know that I 
am carrying Ardeshir’s child. If indeed I’m worthy of the gallows and deserve to 
have my blood spilled, wait until this child is born, and then do as the king has 
ordered.” The shrewd priest retraced his steps and told Ardeshir what she had 
said. But the king’s answer was, “Don’t listen to anything she has to say; take a 
rope and hang her for her crime.” 


The Birth of Ardeshir’s Son, Shapur 

The priest said in his heart, “It’s an evil day when the king gives such an order: 
young and old, we are all destined for death, and Ardeshir has no son to his 
name. So that even if he lives for many years, when he dies his throne will be 
inherited by his enemies. It would be best if I were to act chivalrously and make 
something good come from this sad state of affairs. I will deliver this woman 
from death, and it may be that I can make the king regret his order. And if not, 


when her child is born will be the time to attend to his commands. This is not a 
matter to take lightly, and it is better that I act prudently rather than rashly.” 

He had a place set aside for the princess in his palace and looked after her as 
if she were his own flesh and blood. He told his wife, “I shall not be content if 
even so much as a breath of wind touches her.” Then he reflected that there are 
enemies everywhere, and that all men are thought well of by some and badly by 
others. He said to himself, “I must arrange matters so that those who’d like to 
slander me won’t be able to pour filthy water into my stream.” He went into his 
house and there cut off his testicles; he then cauterized the wound, applied a 
salve to it, and bound it up. Pallid and groaning with pain, he quickly put the 
testicles in salt and placed them in a round jeweler’s box, which he immediately 
sealed. He came into the throne room, carrying the sealed box, and said, “I ask 
that the king entrust this to his treasurer.” The date was written on the box, so 
that there could be no argument about when this had occurred. 

When the time for the princess’s confinement came, the priest kept 
everything secret, so that even the winds of heaven knew nothing of what was 
happening. Ardavan’s daughter gave birth to a splendid son who seemed every 
inch a royal child. The priest kept visitors away from his house and had the boy 
named Shapur. He hid him away for seven years, and the boy grew into a fine 
young prince, endowed with farr and a noble stature. 

Then one day the priest, who was also Ardeshir’s vizier, saw tears in his 
sovereign’s eyes, and said to him, “May the king prosper, and his thoughts 
nourish his soul! You have achieved your heart’s desire in this world and driven 
your enemies back from the throne: now is a time for rejoicing and to drink 
wine, not for troublesome thoughts. The seven climes of the earth are yours, and 
the world flourishes because of your justice.” The king answered, “My priest, 
your heart is sincere and you are privy to all my secrets. My sword has civilized 
the world; sorrow, pain, and evil have been driven away: But I am now fifty-one 
years old, my musky hair has turned white as camphor, and the roses of my 
cheeks are faded. I need a son, standing here in front of me, someone who 
charms the world, who is strong and a leader of men. A father without a son is 
like a son without a father: no stranger will embrace him as his own. After I am 
gone, my crown and treasure will belong to my enemies; my life’s profit will be 
only dust and sorrow.” 

The old priest said in his heart, “The day to speak has come,” and he 
addressed the king, “Your majesty, protector of the weak, chivalrous, 
enlightened, and mighty, if you will now guarantee that my life is safe, I will 


take this sorrow away from you.” The king replied, “You are a wise man; why 
should you fear for your life? Tell me what you know, speak as much as you 
wish, what is finer than a wise man’s words?” The vizier answered, “You have a 
jeweler’s box in your treasurer’s keeping; have it brought to us.” The king 
ordered his treasurer to bring the box and said, “Give it back to him so that we 
can see what is in it, and whether it will enable me to live freed from anxiety.” 

The treasurer brought the box and handed it over. The king asked what was 
hidden under its seal, and the vizier answered, “My own warm blood is there, 
and my shameful parts, cut cleanly from my body. You gave Ardavan’s daughter 
into my keeping, saying that you wanted her to be a lifeless corpse. I didn’t kill 
her, because she was pregnant, and I feared God’s judgment on me if I did. I 
disobeyed your orders, but at the same time I castrated myself so that no one 
could speak evilly of me and soak me in a sea of infamy. Now your son Shapur 
is seven years old: no other king has had such a son, he resembles the moon in 
the heavens. I named him Shapur, and may the heavens smile on your good 
fortune. His mother is with him and has brought the young prince up.” 

The king was astonished and brooded on this child. Finally, he said to his 
vizier, “You have a good heart and pure thoughts; you have suffered much over 
this, and I would not have your suffering continue. Find a hundred boys of his 
age, and of the same stature, bearing, and appearance. Dress them all alike, and 
see there’s no difference between them; then send them to the playing fields and 
have them play polo there. When the plain is filled with these handsome 
children, we’ll see if my soul responds at the sight of my own boy: my heart will 
bear witness to the truth of what you’ve said, and acquaint me with my son.” 


Shapur Plays Polo and His Father Recognizes Him 

At dawn the following day the vizier had a bevy of boys assembled on the 
playing fields, all dressed in the same way, and so similar in face and stature that 
one could not be told from another. The field was like a festival, and somewhere 
among the participants was the prince, Shapur. The ball was thrown down, and 
each of the children strove to outdo the others. As dawn broke Ardeshir arrived 
at the field, accompanied by his favorite courtiers. He stared at the scene before 
him and sighed, then pointed to the boys and said, “Is there an Ardeshir among 
them?” His vizier answered, “Your heart will tell you which is your son.” The 
king said to one of his servants, “Go and get possession of the ball with your 
polo stick; stay with the children and hit the ball toward me. Then we’Il see 
which of them is no respecter of persons, which one is brave enough to come 


forward and strike the ball before my eyes, outrunning the others like a lion 
surrounded by horsemen. That one will certainly be my son, born of my line and 
loins.” 

The servant did as he was told and hit the ball so that it flew in front of the 
mounted children. They galloped after it as swiftly as arrows, but when it came 
close to Ardeshir, they hung back, hesitating; all except Shapur, who swept 
forward and struck the ball away from his father toward the waiting boys. 
Ardeshir felt his heart fill with happiness, like that of an old man who has 
regained his youth. The participants lifted Shapur up and passed him from hand 
to hand till he reached the king, who folded him in his embrace and called down 
blessings on him, kissing his head and eyes and face and saying, “A marvel such 
as you are cannot stay 

Concealed: I’d never hoped to see this day, 
Since in my heart I thought Shapur was dead 
But even if a man should lift his head 

Above the sun, he cannot turn aside 

The will of God, who humbles all our pride: 
And God has added to my sovereignty 

By giving my young son, Shapur, to me.” 


He called for jewels, coins, and rubies, and scattered gold, gems, musk, and 
ambergris over the boy till gold covered the crown of his head and his face was 
hidden by jewels. Ardeshir also scattered jewels over his vizier, seated him on a 
golden throne, and gave him beautiful artifacts to adorn his castle. He had 
Ardavan’s daughter come before him, happily and serenely; he pardoned all her 
past sins and cleansed the stain of guilt from her lovely face. He summoned 
teachers skilled in the various branches of knowledge to his city, where they 
taught Shapur how to write in Pahlavi, how to hold a royal audience, how to ride 
into battle and confront his enemies, the protocols of wine drinking, banquets, 
and kingly generosity, and how to draw up his army and conduct himself on the 
day of battle. Ardeshir then had the design of his coins changed, both the gold 
coins and those of lesser value: on one side was inscribed King Ardeshir, and on 
the other the name of his vizier, who was honored in this way. The king’s letters 
were signed in the same manner, and the vizier was given the king’s seal and 
authority. Ardeshir distributed wealth to the poor who lived by the labor of their 
hands, and in a waste place he built the city of Jondeshapur, by which name he 
always referred to the area. 


Ardeshir Asks the Indian Kayd to Predict His Future 

When Shapur had grown into a youth as elegant as a tall cypress tree, Ardeshir 
feared that someone might cast the evil eye on him; the two were never 
separated, and Shapur was like another advisor and vizier to his father. But 
Ardeshir was constantly harassed by wars; he could not spend his time in 
pleasure because as soon as he had dealt with one enemy another would raise his 
head elsewhere. He said, “I ask God to tell me what is hidden and what is plain, 
and whether I can rid the world of my enemies.” His wise vizier said to him, “I 
will send someone to Kayd, who is a seeker after knowledge and a help in such 
matters. He knows the stars in the high heavens, the way to sovereignty, and the 
path to ruin. If you are to rule the seven climes with no rival, he will be able to 
foresee this. He can explain things to you one by one, without any difficulty, and 
he will not ask you for payment for his answers.” 

Ardeshir chose a fine, intelligent young man as a messenger. He prepared a 
gift of horses, cash, and silk for the Indian sage, and said to the young envoy, 
“Go to this knowledgeable man and say to him, ‘Fortunate and inquiring as you 
are, look at the stars and tell me when I can rest from war and bring these 
provinces under my control. If this is to happen, show me how to plan for such a 
day, and if it is not to be, I’ll give up the struggle and stop spending my wealth 
needlessly.’” The envoy took the gifts to Kayd and told him the secrets of 
Ardeshir’s heart. Kayd questioned him and grew pensive; then he applied 
himself to his science, consulting the stars, his astronomical tables, and his 
astrolabe, to see what the heavens held of comfort and profit, and of pain and 
loss. He said to the envoy, “I have consulted the stars, as they affect Iran and the 
king. If he will join his line to that of Mehrak-e Nushzad, he will rule in peace 
and there will be no need for him to send out armies everywhere. His wealth will 
increase and his troubles will decrease. Go now, and ignore the enmity between 
these families. If he does as I have suggested, Iran will flourish and he will 
achieve all that he desires.” Then Kayd gave the envoy a gift and added, “Don’t 
keep back anything I’ve said. If he follows what I’ve said the high heavens will 
smile on him.” 

The envoy returned to Ardeshir and reported what he had been told. But 
Ardeshir heard his words with pain in his heart and his face turned sallow with 
grief. He said to the envoy, “May I never set eyes on any of Mehrak’s family. It 
would be bringing an enemy off the street into my house, someone intent on 
destroying me and my people. And then what would my profit be from all the 
wealth I have spent, all the armies I have dispatched, all the trials I have 


undergone? Mehrak has one daughter, no more, though no one has ever seen her. 
I’ll have her sought for in Rome, China, India, and Taraz, and when I find her 
I'll have her burned alive; I’1l make the dust itself weep for her sorrows.” 

He sent horsemen, under the command of an ambitious warrior, to Jahrom, 
where Mehrak’s daughter was living, but when she heard of their approach she 
escaped from her father’s house and hid herself away in a village. There the 
local headman treated her with respect. 


Now like a lovely cypress tree she grew; 
Wisdom was hers, and royal glory too— 
Her wondrous beauty was beyond compare, 
Unrivaled in that land, or anywhere. 


Shapur Marries Mehrak’s Daughter 

Listen now to what happened between Mehrak’s daughter and the valiant 
warrior Shapur. The king’s prosperity flourished, and one day as dawn broke he 
set out to hunt, taking his son Shapur with him. The horsemen rode forward, 
clearing the plain of game, and then there came into view a distant village filled 
with gardens, open spaces, villas, and fine buildings. Shapur rode to the village 
and dismounted before the headman’s house. There was a lovely garden there, 
and a young woman, splendid as the moon, came into that green courtyard. She 
let a bucket down into the well and then caught sight of Shapur. She greeted him 
respectfully, saying, “May the prince live happily for many years, with laughter 
on his lips, and safe from the world’s harm. Your mount must be thirsty, and 
generally the water in this village is brackish, but the water from this well is cold 
and sweet; let me draw some for you.” 

Shapur replied, “Your face is so radiant, why should you be put to such 
trouble? I have servants enough with me to draw the water.” The young woman 
turned away and sat at a distance, beside the garden’s watercourse. Shapur 
ordered one of his attendants to draw the bucket up from the well; the man ran 
forward and strained at the rope, but the full bucket was too heavy to raise, and 
the man’s face frowned with the effort. Shapur came forward and muttered 
impatiently at him, “You haven’t half the strength of a woman! Wasn’t a woman 
letting this bucket down into the well and drawing it up, and you’re struggling 
and straining and begging for help?” He snatched the rope from the man’s hand 
and started to raise the bucket himself, but when he saw what an effort it 
required he congratulated the girl, and said, “Anyone who can lift a bucket this 


heavy must come from a noble background!” When he had raised the bucket, she 
came forward and said, “May you live forever, prosperous and guided by 
wisdom. By the grace of Ardeshir’s son, Shapur, the water in this well will 
surely turn to milk.” 

Shapur said to this courteous girl, “And how do you know that I’m Shapur?” 
She replied, “I have heard righteous men say often enough, 


‘Prince Shapur is a noble cypress tree, 

A River Nile of generosity, 

A mammoth in his strength—in everything 
The image of his father and his king.’” 


Shapur said to her, “You are a beautiful young woman, now answer my 
questions truthfully. Tell me what your lineage is, because there are signs of 
royalty in your face.” She replied, “I’m the headman’s child, that’s why I’m so 
pretty and so strong.” He answered, “A lie to a prince never prospers. No 
peasant ever had a daughter as lovely and as bewitching as you are.” She said, 
“O prince, when I have a guarantee that my life is not in danger from the anger 
of the King of Kings, I shall tell you about my lineage.” The prince replied, “In a 
garden like this, anger between friends doesn’t spring up from the grass. Tell me 
what you have to say, and have no fear of me in your heart, nor of our king, who 
is a just man.” She answered, “In all honesty then, I am the daughter of Mehrak- 
e Nushzad. A wise courtier of his brought me here and gave me to the headman 
for safekeeping. He is a good man, and out of fear of the king I became his 
servant and draw water for him.” 

Shapur scoured the village until the headman stood before him, and said: 
“Give this beautiful young woman to me in marriage, and may you be our 
witness.” The man did as he was ordered and married them according to the fire 
worshippers’ rites. 


Mehrak’s Daughter Gives Birth to Hormozd, the Son of Shapur 
After nine months this beautiful woman gave birth to a fine son. From his 
appearance you would have said that he was Esfandyar, or Ardeshir. Shapur 
named him Hormozd, and the boy stood out like a cypress emerging from a 
swamp. After seven years Hormozd had no equal, but he was kept hidden from 
everyone and was not allowed out to play. 


King Ardeshir went for a week’s hunting, and Shapur accompanied him. 
Hormozd was tired of his lessons, and he rode out onto the king’s main square, a 
bow in one hand and two arrows in the other, and met up with a group of 
children who were playing polo there. Just at that moment Ardeshir and his 
entourage returned from the hunt, and a child struck the ball so hard that it came 
to rest close to the king; the children hung back, and none of them ran forward to 
retrieve it. But Hormozd dashed out of the group and snatched up the ball from 
in front of his grandfather, so that all the soldiers and courtiers began gossiping 
about him. Then the boy let out a great shout of triumph, which astonished the 
king, who turned to his chief priest and said, “Find out which family that boy 
belongs to.” 

The priest made inquiries, but no one knew anything, or if they did they 
preferred to remain silent. So the king said, “Pick him up out of the dirt and 
bring him to me.” The priest went and lifted the boy up and brought him to the 
king, who said, “You’re a fine little man, and who are we to say your family is?” 
The boy felt no fear and said loudly, “My name and family should not be hidden. 
I’m Shapur’s son, as he is your son, and my mother is from Mehrak’s family.” 

The king was astonished at the workings of the world; he laughed and then 
grew pensive. He gave orders that Shapur appear before him, and he questioned 
him thoroughly. Shapur was afraid; his heart quaked and his face turned pale. 
But Ardeshir smiled at his fear and said, “Don’t hide your boy away; see that he 
has everything he’s entitled to, so that men say ‘He is the prince’s son.’” Shapur 
replied, “May your reign be long and prosperous. He is my child, his name is 
Hormozd, and he is like a tulip among weeds. I was hiding him from your 
majesty only until he could show his mettle. He is Mehrak’s daughter’s boy, and 
I’m quite certain that he is my son.” Then he described the meeting at the well 
and what had happened there, and during his account the king asked him various 
questions. The king was happy to hear the tale and went off contentedly to his 
palace, accompanied by his vizier. He took Hormozd along with him, carrying 
him in his arms, and in the throne room he had a place prepared for the boy, and 
gave him a royal torque and a golden crown. They poured gold coins and jewels 
over the little boy until the pile mounted over his head, and then his grandfather 
plucked him from the heap, which was distributed to the poor. Ardeshir gave his 
grandson other valuables, and the fire temple and the rooms in the palace where 
the New Year’s and Sadeh celebrations were held were hung with brocade. 

A hall was prepared for festivities; the country’s nobility gathered there, and 
they were entertained by musicians. Then Ardeshir addressed them: “The words 


of a wise astrologer cannot be gainsaid. The Indian Kayd told me that neither I, 
nor this country, nor my crown, throne, or army would enjoy good fortune unless 
my lineage were joined to that of Mehrak-e Nushzad. Now eight years have 
passed and the heavens have turned as we would wish: that is, since Shapur 
sought his happiness with Mehrak’s daughter, he has seen nothing but what he 
desires from the world. The world’s seven climes are under my command, and 
my heart has received from the heavens all it has desired.” From this time on the 
king’s functionaries referred to him as the King of Kings. 


Ardeshir’s Reforms 

Listen now to Ardeshir’s wisdom, and learn of all his reforms one by one. His 
efforts resulted in new laws, and he made everyone the beneficiary of his 
benevolence and justice. To assure that the court had sufficient warriors, he sent 
messengers everywhere to proclaim that whoever had a son should not allow 
him to grow up without military training: young men should learn how to ride in 
battle, and how to use the mace and bow. When a young man acquired manliness 
by such exercises and was skillful in all areas of warfare, he was to come to the 
king’s court, where his name would be inscribed in a muster roll, and he would 
be assigned quarters. When war was declared the young warriors would ride out 
with a seasoned champion, and each thousand of them would be accompanied by 
someone who would report back to the king on who fought weakly and 
unsatisfactorily, as well as on who distinguished himself in battle. Then their 
sovereign would prepare robes of honor and presents for those who had fought 
well, while those who had been unskillful in battle were dismissed from his 
service. These reforms increased the size of his army until it was greater than 
any the stars had ever looked down on. He raised above the mass of men those 
who were skilled in strategy, and proclaimed, “Let anyone who seeks to satisfy 
the king, who has soaked the ground in his enemies’ blood, come forward and 
receive a royal robe from me, and his name will be remembered in the world.” 
So his armies subdued the earth; he was the shepherd, and his warriors were his 
flock. 

For the functioning of his government he chose able men and did not entrust 
work to the ignorant. He chose scribes who paid attention to words and writing 
and who were skillful in the smallest details of their profession, and when one of 
them distinguished himself, the king increased his salary. Anyone who was not 
such a good scribe, or who was lacking in intelligence, could not become a 
member of Ardeshir’s administration. Such men were employed by underlings, 


while the best scribes were reserved for the king’s divan. Ardeshir knew the 
value of his civil servants, and when he saw a scribe at the court he would say, 
“A scribe who gathers revenue and diminishes trouble by his efforts is the means 
by which the country, its needy subjects, and its army prosper; scribes are like 
the sinews of my soul, they are the unseen rulers of the kingdom.” 

When an administrator set out for a province, the king advised him, “Despise 
wealth, and see that you do not sell men for its sake; remember that this fleeting 
world passes for all men. Seek justice and honor always, and may greed and 
folly stay far away from you. Take none of your family and dependents with 
you: the entourage I provide you with will be sufficient. Give money to the poor 
every month, but give nothing to those who harbor malevolent thoughts. If your 
justice makes the province flourish, you can remain there and rejoice in your just 
rule. But if a single poor man sleeps in fear, this means that you have sold a soul 
for the sake of gold and silver.” 

Whoever came to the king’s court, either on official business or to demand 
justice, was questioned by the king’s officers about the governor of his province. 
He was asked whether the man administered the province justly or whether he 
was greedy for wealth, and who lay down in fear because of him. He was also 
asked about who the wise men of his district were, and whether there were men 
there who were kept in obscurity by their poverty. He was questioned too as to 
who was worthy of the king’s notice, whether they were old, experienced men, 
or men distinguished by their honorable behavior. The king would say, “No one 
should profit from my labors and wealth unless they are knowledgeable men 
who are willing to learn; what is finer than an old man filled with wisdom?” 

When his army set out for war, Ardeshir made wisdom his companion and 
acted with caution and foresight. He selected a wise and knowledgeable scribe as 
an envoy and entrusted him with a letter that was polite and conciliatory, so that 
war would not be declared unjustly. The messenger would go to the enemy to 
find out his secret intentions, and if the opposing leader seemed to be a wise man 
who was contemptuous of evil’s efforts, he would be rewarded with a royal robe 
of honor, as well as with a charter and earrings as a sign of his authority. But if 
his head was filled with rebellion, his heart with hatred, and his entrails with 
bloodlust, Ardeshir would distribute money to the army, so that there were no 
malcontents in the ranks. Then he chose a renowned warrior, someone 
sagacious, alert, and calm, as their commander. He also sent a scribe with his 
own entourage to accompany the army, to keep an eye on any injustices the 
soldiers might commit. He had someone whose voice could carry for two miles 


mounted on an elephant, and this herald would proclaim, “Warriors ready for 
war, all of you who have any heart, or reputation, or sense of shame: know that 
neither the poor nor the rich must suffer because of you. At every stage of your 
journey you must pay for what you eat and show respect to those who serve you; 
anyone who fears God will not steal others’ property. Any man who turns his 
back on the enemy will suffer a harsh fate: either he will dig his own grave with 
his nails or chains will wear away his body. His name will be stricken from the 
muster roll; his food will be dirt and he will crawl in the dust.” 

To the commander he said, “Do not act feebly, but don’t be precipitate and 
rash either. Keep your elephants in the army’s vanguard, and send out scouts to a 
distance of four miles. When the day for battle comes you must go around the 
whole army explaining to your soldiers why they are fighting, and tell them that 
if they can bring down a hundred of the enemy’s horses for every one of ours 
(and even a hundred for one is too few), then they will all, young and old, 
receive robes of honor from Ardeshir for their service. When the battle begins in 
earnest and the cavalry charges from both sides, no matter how many men you 
have, see that the center of the army is not abandoned. Try to manage things so 
that your left and right flanks attack together, but the center is to remain firm and 
no one there is to leave his post. After you are victorious, shed no one’s blood, 
because if men have to flee from you, they will hate you the more. If anyone 
from the enemy’s ranks asks for quarter, grant it to him, and put aside any 
desires for vengeance. 

“Tf you see the enemies’ backs, don’t dash after them but stay where you are; 
you shouldn’t disregard the possibility of ambush, and your army should remain 
on the battlefield. When you are safe from the enemy, don’t listen to anyone’s 
advice, but distribute booty to those who fought well and who bravely risked 
their sweet lives. Immediately bring any prisoners you take to my court, and I 
shall build a town for them in the provinces, on what was formerly thorny 
wasteland. If you wish to live without pain and trouble, do not deviate from this 
advice, and in victory see that you turn to God, for he is your only true guide.” 

If an envoy came from another land, whether from the Turks, the Romans, or 
other peoples, the lord of the marches there was informed of his approach and he 
did not treat this as an unimportant matter. He had places prepared along the 
envoy’s route, and these were stocked with provisions, clothes, and carpets. 
Once the local governor was apprised of why the envoy was coming to see the 
king, he dispatched a scribe on a noble mount to Ardeshir, so that an escort 
could be sent to welcome the envoy. The king prepared a throne for his arrival, 


and servants stood on either side of the approachway, with their garments 
embroidered in gold. The king summoned the envoy into his presence and seated 
him on a throne close by, then he questioned him about himself, the good and 
bad of his life, and his name and title. He asked him also about the justice and 
injustice he had witnessed, and about his country, its customs, king, and army. 
He had the envoy conducted to his quarters with due ceremony, and everything 
he could need was provided for. The visitor feasted and drank wine with the 
king, and he was seated on a golden throne, and the king took him hunting, 
together with an innumerable entourage. At his departure he was given a fitting 
farewell, and was presented with a royal robe of honor. 

Ardeshir sent wise and benevolent priests about his kingdom, so that they 
could establish cities and distribute wealth by providing food and shelter for 
those who had no houses, or were destitute and had fallen on hard times; and in 
this way the number of his subjects increased. 


In public and in private his good name 
Filled all the world with its illustrious fame; 
No king like him had ever ruled, and when 
He died his like was never seen again. 

I seek to make his name live on—may he 
Know happiness for all eternity. 


He talked in secret with many men, and men reported back to him from 
everywhere. When he heard of someone worthy who had lost his wealth, he 
helped him as was appropriate, so that the man’s days did not remain dark for 
long: he gave him land and a place to live, servants and subjects, and everything 
that was fitting. All this was done in secret, without anyone else being aware of 
it. He gave goods to those who were indigent, and placed children with teachers, 
caring for them as if they were from his own family; in every street there was a 
school and a fire-temple. He let no one remain in want, and he kept all this 
generosity carefully hidden. At dawn he walked in the open spaces of the town, 
and people came to him asking for justice; in his judgments he tried to harm no 
one and made no distinction between the least of his subjects and the children of 
his allies. His justice made the world flourish and rejoiced his subjects’ hearts. 
Where there were ruins, or where drought had dried up the watercourses, he 
remitted the taxes of that area; where the peasants were impoverished and faced 


death, his treasury provided them with animals and tools; he would not allow 
them to be swept away by disaster. 


Ardeshir Bestows the Kingdom on Shapur 

When Ardeshir had lived for seventy-eight years he grew sick. He summoned 
Shapur and gave him extensive advice on how to rule. He knew that he was 
close to death, and that the green leaves of his life would soon turn yellow. He 
said to his son, “Pay close attention to what I have to say, and as for those who 
would oppose you consider their words as so much wind. Act according to my 
words, since I assume you can distinguish what is valuable from what is 
worthless. I have ordered the world with the sword of justice, and respected the 
rank of those who are wellborn. When I had put the world on a sound footing, 
my territories increased, but my life drew toward its close. And as I have 
endured countless sorrows, and in the midst of them accumulated my wealth, so 
there is sorrow and happiness facing you, times of retrenchment and times of 
triumph. This is the way of the turning world, bringing you sometimes pain and 
sometimes pleasure. Fortune is sometimes like an unbroken horse, suddenly 
giving you a harsh ride when you are enjoying yourself; and sometimes she is a 
well-trained mount, lifting her head proudly, trotting forward as she should. But 
you should know, my son, that this deceitful world will not give you pleasure 
without pain, and if you wish your days not to end badly look after both your 
body and your spirit. 

“When a king respects religion, religion and royalty become as brothers: 
religion has no stability without the royal throne, royalty cannot survive without 
religion. They are two brocades interwoven with one another by wisdom. 
Religion cannot do without the king, and the king will not be respected without 
religion; they are guardians of one another, and you could say that they live 
together beneath one tent. The former cannot function without the latter, nor the 
latter without the former; we see them as two companions united in doing good. 
A religious man is lord of wisdom and sense, and he inherits this world and the 
world to come; when a king is religion’s guardian, you can only call these two 
brothers. But if a religious man is resentful of the king, you should beware of 
calling him righteous: any man who speaks against a just king should not be 
considered as truly religious. As a praiseworthy sage once said, ‘When we look 
closely we see that religion is the pith of justice.’ 

“The throne is threatened by three things. First if the king is unjust; next, if he 
promotes worthless men over those who are accomplished; third, if he uses his 


wealth for his own glory and is always trying to increase his income. Turn 
toward generosity, and follow religion and wisdom so that no lie can make any 
headway with you. A lie blackens a king’s face, so that his sovereignty lacks all 
luster. See that you don’t hoard your wealth, because this only brings trouble: if 
a king is greedy for gold, he harms his subjects, since no matter how hard the 
peasant works, his wealth becomes the king’s, whereas a good king is the 
guardian of his subjects’ wealth, so that their efforts bear fruit. Try to control 
your anger, and when men transgress, be generous and close your eyes. If you 
are angry, you will regret it; if men repent, have the balm of mercy ready. 
Whenever a king is quick tempered wise men think of him as a lightweight. It is 
ugly for a king to have malevolent desires, and you should fill your heart with 
kindness; and if you ever let fear into your heart, those who wish you ill will 
confuse all your intentions. 

“Don’t hold back from being generous, and as far as you can, my son, know 
what things are worth. You should realize that sovereignty belongs to the king 
whose generosity encompasses the cosmos. Sometimes the royal office brings 
sorrow, and then the king should turn to his counselors and priests, asking them 
what is just and what is unjust, and preserving their answers in his heart. On the 
days when you go out with your hunting cheetahs, see that you don’t play two 
games at once: riding out and hunting don’t mix with wine drinking and 
banquets, since the body becomes heavy when you drink wine. The nobility 
know this nostrum. And if an enemy should appear, then both drinking and 
hunting must be set aside in favor of distributing money, preparing arms, and 
summoning troops from the provinces. Don’t put off until tomorrow what must 
be done today, and don’t promote bad advisors to high office. 

“Don’t look for righteousness in the hearts of vulgar folk, your search will be 
a waste of time; and if they speak ill of someone, ignore their calumnies. There’s 
no making head nor tail of someone who loves neither his God nor his king. This 
is how the common people are, but may you be endowed with wisdom. Beware 
of those who have an evil nature, and pass your secrets on to no one, for your 
confidant will have his own friends and confidants, and your words will soon be 
everywhere. When your secrets are known to the nation, wise men’s hearts will 
lose all respect for you. You’ll be angry then, and even if they thought you wise 
before, people will say you have a trivial nature. 

“Don’t pay attention to reports of faults in other people, since the person who 
finds fault in this way will find fault with you too, and if passion overcomes 
reason, the wise will not think of you as human. A king should be wise and 


benevolent toward everyone, and God forbid that a quarrelsome man who 
delights in arguments and confrontation should have any place near you or be 
your guide. If you wish those who have noble minds to praise you, you must put 
aside all anger and thoughts of vengeance when you become king. You should 
not talk too much, and you should not make a show of your goodness. Listen to 
others’ words, consider which you find pleasing, and remember the best of them. 
Weigh your words well when you speak to educated men, and welcome them 
politely and with smiles. Don’t despise the petitions of the poor, and don’t 
promote to high rank people who have an evil nature. If a man repents of his 
sins, forgive him and put aside your anger against him. Always be someone who 
dispenses justice, and who looks after his subjects, since a man who is generous 
and patient is blessed. 

“When your enemies are afraid of you they will flatter you, but you should 
prepare your army and have the kettle drums made ready. Attack when your 
enemy is trying to avoid a fight and comes weak to the battlefield. But when he 
sues for peace and you can see no deceit in his heart, then demand tribute from 
him and give up your desire for vengeance: act toward him in such a way that he 
saves face and honor is satisfied. Adorn your heart with knowledge and act on it 
as far as you are able to, since a man’s value is measured by his knowledge. If 
you are generous, you will be loved, and your knowledge and justice will make 
your name illustrious. 

“Keep your father’s advice in mind, and pass it on to your own son. When I 
hand over power to my son I do so having injured no one in the world; see that 
you do not ignore my words or dismiss what I have to say to you. Follow your 
father’s advice, act well, and then you can think of evil as so much wind. Do not 
make my soul distraught, or plunge my lifeless body into the fire, and do not 
harm others, my son; do not seek out ways to torment people. 


“The realm that your descendants build will last 
Unharmed until five centuries have passed; 

But then the members of your clan will spurn 
My testament to you; proudly they’ll turn 

Their heads away from knowledge, and despise 
The teachings of the just, preferring lies, 
Injustice, exploitation, cruelty 

To wise benevolence and loyalty. 

They will oppress their subjects and condemn 


As foolish simpletons God-fearing men: 
They’ll wear the shirt of evil, and exult 

As worshippers of Ahriman’s foul cult. 
Whatever I have bound they will release, 
The faith that I have purified will cease. 
My testament will be as naught, and all 
Our sovereignty will crumble then, and fall. 


“T pray to God who knows all things visible and invisible that he protect you 
from all evil, and that all men of good repute be your allies. God and I both bless 
that man whose warp is justice and whose weft is wisdom, who will not break 
the testament I give, or try to convert my honey to bitter colocynth. Now forty 
years and two months have passed since I placed the royal crown on my head. I 
have founded six cities, which have pleasant air and are well-watered. One I call 
Khurreh-ye Ardeshir, and its winds would make an old man young again: 
Khuzestan was revived by founding this city. Now it is a well-watered province, 
filled with men and business. The name of the next town is Jondeshapur, a place 
that delights my chief priest. The next is Maysan by the Euphrates, a town filled 
with streams, livestock, and vegetation. Another is Barkeh-ye Ardeshir, a place 
of orchards, flower gardens and pools. Another is Ram-e Ardeshir, which I have 
joined by road to the province of Pars. The last is Hormozd-e Ardeshir, whose 
air is like musk and whose streams run with milk. 

“Keep my soul happy by acting justly, and may your reign be a victorious 
one. I have borne many sorrows in this world, some known to others some 
unknown. Now I am ready for the tomb, and you must order my coffin and 
prepare my bier.” 

When he finished speaking, his good fortune darkened: alas now for his 
mind, his crown, and his throne. Happy is he who has not known greatness, and 
who does not have to leave a throne. You struggle and accumulate all kinds of 
goods, but neither men nor goods remain. Finally, we are partners with the dust, 
and our cheeks are covered by a shroud. 

Come, let us do good with our hands, and not give this unstable world over to 
evil. 


That man who lifts a wine glass in his hand 
In memory of the kings who ruled this land 
Knows happiness: the toasts come thick and fast 


Until, content and tired, he sleeps at last. 
Tell us of Shapur’s banquets now, explain 
The story of this noble prince’s reign. 


THE REIGN OF SHAPUR, SON OF ARDESHIR 


When Shapur sat on the throne of justice and placed the royal crown on his head, 
the priests and nobles of the country gathered before him, and he addressed 
them: “My wise counselors, I am the son of the illustrious King Ardeshir, hear 
my commands and do not swerve aside from loyalty to me. Live content with 
your good name and have nothing to do with malevolent troublemakers. Only 
those who are lacking in sense will covet others’ wealth. My benevolence 
toward you exceeds that radiated by the stars. I shall keep Ardeshir’s ordinances 
in effect with you, asking for no more than a thirtieth of landowners’ incomes, 
and that only so that I can provide in some small way for my army. Goodness is 
my eternal treasure, bravery and chivalry are the foundations of my kingdom; I 
have no need of others’ possessions, since this desire is what turns men into 
enemies. All of you are free to visit me at any time, and I shall treat all who wish 
me well with affection.” 

His nobles and subjects stood and acclaimed Shapur as king: they poured 
emeralds over his crown and called down blessings on his head. 


Shapur’s War Against Rome 
News spread that the throne was left idle, that the wise King Ardeshir had died, 
leaving his wealth and crown to Shapur. Lamentation arose from every quarter, 
and Qaydafeh, in the Roman provinces, ceased to send tribute. When Shapur 
heard of this he readied his army, with its drums and banners, for war. Under the 
leadership of a brave and capable commander they made a quick march, with 
virtually no baggage, as far as Altouyaneh. The dust of the army that marched 
out to oppose them from Qaydafeh obscured the sun, and it was joined by a force 
from Altouyaneh under the leadership of Baranush, a fine horseman who was 
highly regarded by the Romans. 

When the din of drums arose from the opposing camps, Baranush advanced 
to lead the Roman forces, and from the Persian side a brave warrior called 
Gorzasp took the offensive. Drums and trumpets were sounded on each side, and 


the new Persian king, stationed in the center of his troops, felt the thrill of battle. 
There was such a wailing of trumpets and clashing of Indian bells that the moon 
and the vault of the heavens shook; there were war drums strapped to the 
elephants, and their thundering noise carried for two miles. The earth trembled, 
dust swirled, lances glittered like fire, and the sky seemed to rain down stars. 
Sick at heart and sorely wounded, Baranush was captured in the midst of his 
men; three thousand Romans were killed at the Battle of Altouyaneh, and one 
thousand six hundred were taken prisoner. Their warriors’ hearts were filled with 
despair. 

The Roman emperor sent an envoy to Shapur, saying “How much blood will 
you shed before God, for the sake of money? What excuse can you bring for 
such behavior on the Day of Judgment? We will send the tribute as before, so 
that no further ills befall us, and along with the tribute I will also send you a 
number of hostages, people of my own family. But you should then evacuate 
Altouyaneh, and if you do I will send whatever further gifts you desire.” 

Shapur waited until the tribute had been delivered in ten ox skins, together 
with a thousand Roman young men and women as slaves and innumerable 
valuable brocades. He stayed for seven days in Altouyaneh, then left Roman 
territory and returned to Ahvaz. He built a city, with a great deal of effort and at 
great expense, completing it on the auspicious twenty-fifth of the month. The 
city was named Shapurgerd; it was a fine flourishing place, and the Roman 
captives were settled there. It formed the entryway to Khuzestan, and everyone 
entering the province from that direction had to pass through it. In addition, he 
built a splendid city in Pars, and another in Sistan, where there are abundant 
groves of date palms. This latter city had been begun by Ardeshir, and Shapur 
completed it. He also made the area around Kohandezh into a city, and to this 
day men say the town was built by Shapur’s justice. 

Wherever he went he took Baranush with him and paid attention to what he 
said. There was a river near Shushtar that was so wide no fish could swim across 
it. Shapur said to Baranush, “If you’re an engineer, build a bridge here, so strong 
that when we pass away it will remain, as a sign to the wise. Make it a thousand 
cubits long. When you have done this, ask me for whatever treasure you desire. 
Use the knowledge of Roman savants to build monuments in this country; when 
you have made the bridge, which will lead to my palace, you can live as my 
guest, in happiness and safety, secure from evil and the wiles of Ahriman.” 
Baranush set to work and completed the bridge, which was a thousand paces 


long, and Shapur hastened to cross it in state, passing from Shushtar to his 
palace. 


Shapur’s Advice to His Son, Hormozd 

After thirty years and two months, the king’s splendor and farr began to fade. He 
summoned Hormozd, and said to him, “Now you will blossom like an opening 
flower; Be wary as you wield imperial power, 

And pay attention to the words of those Who know how worldly fortune 
comes and goes. 

Don’t hope for much from sovereignty; take heed Of all the ancient 
precepts of Jamshid: Be just in all your deeds—to nobles be Their 
splendor, to the poor their sanctuary. 

Be kind and openhanded, do not make 

A great noise for a minor setback’s sake. 

These are the words I learned from Ardeshir, Remember all that I have 
told you here.” 

When he had finished speaking his face turned pale in death, and the young 
man grieved in his heart. 


F erdowsi gives brief accounts, omitted here, of the relatively uneventful 
reigns of Hormozd, Bahram Hormozd, Bahram Bahram, Bahram 
Bahramian, Nersi Bahram, Hormozd Nersi. 


THE REIGN OF SHAPUR ZU’L AKTAF 


After Hormozd the son of Nersi had reigned for nine years, the pomegranate 
color of his cheeks became like a yellow flower. His kingly mind felt the 
sorrows of death, and he died, leaving behind no son. This exalted and eloquent 
man passed from the fleeting world with a cry of anguish on his lips. 

He was mourned for forty days; during this time the throne remained empty 
and lost its power and prestige, and the country’s nobility were filled with 
anxiety. Then a priest discovered a beautiful young woman in the king’s private 
quarters: her face was as splendid as the new moon, her cheeks glowed like 
tulips, her eyelashes were like daggers from Kabol, and her braided hair, 
gathered in a knot on the top of her head, was as curled and wavy as the script 
the Mongols use. This lovely young woman was pregnant, and the world 
rejoiced as soon as this became known. The celebrations, with feasting and 
music, lasted for forty days, and a royal couch was prepared for her. The crown 
was suspended above her belly, and gold coins were poured over it. Forty days 
passed, and a baby as splendid as the sun was born to her. The chief priest 
named him Shapur, and held festivities in his honor. The boy seemed blessed 
with wisdom and the royal farr. The gold-belted nobility poured gold over the 
boy’s crown; he was suckled till he was satisfied and then wrapped in silk 
swaddling clothes. For forty days the baby lay on his father’s royal throne, 
beneath the suspended crown. 

A learned priest acted as regent; he was humble in his manner and ruled 
wisely and well. He managed the army and the king’s wealth, and was an 
adornment to the throne and palace. This continued until the little prince was 
five years old. One evening the boy was sitting in Ctesiphon, and his wise regent 
was with him. As the sun set and night began to spread its purple cloak, a 
confused noise rose up from the direction of the river, and the prince asked his 
regent, “What’s that shouting?” The man answered, “Blessed and fortunate king, 
this is the time when men who have shops or go out to work return home. The 
bridge over the Tigris is narrow, and the men crossing over it are so cramped for 
space that they’re afraid of being jostled and squeezed, and that’s why they shout 


out as loudly as a drum being beaten.” Shapur said to his advisors, “My wise 
counselors, now you must build another bridge, so that there will be one for 
coming and one for going, and my subjects and soldiers will be able to pass back 
and forth without trouble. We must spend a lot of money from the treasury on 
this.” The king’s advisors were pleased that the young sapling had so soon 
produced green leaves. The regent had another bridge built, as the young prince 
had ordered, and his mother was overjoyed and arranged for tutors to begin 
teaching him. He learned so quickly that he soon surpassed his teachers in 
knowledge. When he was seven he learned to ride, both as a warrior and a polo 
player: at eight he learned the ceremonies of kingship, and he was careful to 
make his body and appearance worthy of his rank. He fixed his capital at 
Estakhr, following the example of his illustrious ancestors. 


The Arab Tayer Captures Nersi’s Daughter and Shapur Attacks 
When Shapur had been king for some time, the lionhearted warrior Tayer, a 
chieftain of the Ghassanid tribe, gathered a huge army together from Roman 
territories, Qadesiya, Bahrain, Kurdistan, and Pars, and attacked the outskirts of 
Ctesiphon. No one could resist his forces, and they plundered the whole area. A 
daughter of King Nersi, named Nobahar, was living there, and Tayer attacked 
her palace, while the whole of Ctesiphon waited apprehensively. His ignorant, 
barbarous troops took her from the palace as a captive. For a year Nobahar lived, 
wretched and heartsick, with Tayer and then gave birth to his daughter, a lovely 
child who was the image of her grandfather, King Nersi, and indeed she seemed 
so worthy to rule that her father named her Malekeh [Queen]. 


RRA G EQ 


MEM, Xe 


EY: 


Soret 


eS. 


G 


Ns 
Zt 


[it 
PUTNG) 
faa) 





Years passed and Shapur reached the age of twenty-six; he was a noble king, 
as splendid as the sun. He came out onto the plain, inspected his army, and chose 
twelve thousand warriors mounted on swift camels. The group set off, led by a 
hundred guides, with each man riding on a camel and leading a horse, in search 
of that ravening lion, the Ghassanid chief. When they found the enemy, they 
killed many of them, and seeing this, Tayer himself turned tail and fled. The din 
of blows and counterblows rose up; the Persians captured innumerable prisoners, 
and the remnant of Tayer’s people made their way to the Yemen. There they 
took refuge in a fortress, which soon filled with the wailing of men, women, and 
children. Shapur besieged them with such a mass of men that not an ant or a 
mosquito could have passed between them. The siege lasted for a month, and 
provisions began to run low in the fortress. 


Tayer’s Daughter, Malekeh, Falls in Love with Shapur 
At dawn Shapur mounted his horse, wearing his black royal armor, and a shining 
black sash was tied about his helmet; he grasped his bow and rode forward 
impetuously. Malekeh looked down from the fortress walls and saw the 
watrior’s sash and helmet: his cheeks were as pink as rose petals, his hair as 
black as musk, his face as ruddy as the sweet smelling blossoms of the 
Hyrcanian willow tree. All rest and sleep deserted that lovely young woman, and 
with her heart overflowing with love, she came to her nurse and said: “This king 
who’s come against us here to fight 

Shines like the sun itself; how could his might, 

His power, be something that I’d fail to see? 

I name him World, since he’s the world to me. 

Take him a message now, and tell Shapur 

I welcome him, although he comes for war, 

And tell him that through Nersi we are kin, 

Descended from a common origin. 

Say that my promise to him is, ‘If you 

Desire me you will have this fortress too.’” 


The nurse said, “I shall do as you have ordered, and bring you news of him.” 
When night took possession of the world, and its army spread from sea to sea, 

when the plains darkened and the mountains seemed like indigo, and in the 

empyrean the stars flickered like thirty thousand suspended candles, the nurse set 


out, trembling with apprehension, her heart filled with anxiety lest Tayer learn of 
her movements. When she reached the entrance to Shapur’s royal pavilion she 
said to one of the guards, “If you take me to the king I’ll reward you with a 
diadem and a ring.” The chamberlain ushered her into the king’s presence. She 
prostrated herself, touching the ground with her eyelashes, and told him the 
words Malekeh had said to her. The king laughed in response, and in his joy 
gave the nurse a thousand gold coins, two armbands, a torque, a ring, and 
brocades from China and Barbary. Then he said, “Speak gently and at length to 
your lovely mistress. Tell her that I swear by the sun and moon, by the belt our 
priests wear, by Zoroaster himself, and by the royal crown, that she can have 
whatever she desires from me, even if to give it will harm my kingdom. Her ears 
will never hear harsh words from me, and I shall never try to escape her 
embraces. I swear by God that I will bestow treasures and troops and a crown 
and throne on her.” 

As soon as she had heard him out the nurse ran back to the fortress. There she 
told her mistress, who was as lovely as a silver cypress tree and whose face was 
as splendid as the shining moon, all she had heard. She said that now Venus 
would mate with the sun itself, and she described Shapur’s stature and 
appearance, and how the meeting had gone. 


Malekeh Delivers Tayer’s Fortress to Shapur; Tayer Is Killed 

When the sun showed its crown in the east and turned the ground that had been 
as dark as teak the color of yellow roses, Malekeh took from the castle’s 
treasurer the keys to where the victuals and amphorae of wine were kept. She 
sent food and wine, together with scents made from narcissi and fenugreek, to 
the nobles and warriors in the fortress. Then she called the wine steward to her 
and spoke to him kindly and carefully: “Tonight see that you serve Tayer 
unmixed wine: keep him and his men plied with wine till they are drunk and fall 
asleep.” The steward replied: “I am your slave; it is by your commands that I 
live in this world.” 

When the sun turned yellow in the west, and night was hard on its heels 
urging it onward, Tayer asked for a bowl of royal wine. First he toasted his 
Ghassanid kinsfolk and, by the time the first watch of the night was over Tayer 
was oblivious to the tumult around him. Then the castle’s inhabitants made their 
way to their sleeping quarters, and Malekeh ordered her servants not to speak 
above a whisper. Secretly they opened the great door to the fortress. 


King Shapur was watching, filled with impatience at the sounds of 
drunkenness that he could hear. Then seeing a candle glimmer through the open 
door, he said, “Good fortune is with us!” The beautiful Malekeh was spirited 
away to his tents, where he’d had a fine space prepared for her. A force of 
picked warriors was ready, together with a few horsemen. They entered the 
fortress and set about killing the defenders and looting its ancient treasures. 
More than a thousand sleeping, drunken soldiers were with Tayer in that fortress. 
Some woke in bewilderment, and in every part of the building they fought back; 
none turned tail out of fear, and the Persian king killed a number of them. Tayer 
was caught and pushed before the king, running and naked, as a captive. The 
whole fortress and all its goods were now in Shapur’s hands, and his enemies 
were his prisoners. 

Night passed, and when the sun raised its golden crown above the horizon, a 
turquoise studded throne was ceremonially installed in the fortress, and Shapur 
held court there. Once the formal audience was over, Malekeh, as lovely as a 
flower that blossoms in the spring, came before him. She wore a crown of red 
rubies, and her glittering robes were made from Chinese cloth of gold. Then 
Tayer understood that the trick that had been played on him was her doing, and 
that his evil fortune was because of her. He said, “You are a noble king, your 
majesty, 

Consider what my child has done to me! 
Be careful of her kindness—you should fear her, 
And watch for any strangers who come near her.” 


But Shapur said to this contemptible man, “When you stole the king’s daughter 
from her apartments, and shamed and humiliated her people, you rekindled old 
enmities that had died down.” He gave orders that the executioner cut off 
Tayer’s head, and that his body be burned. He forbade the Arab prisoners to 
speak to anyone; he removed their shoulder blades from their bodies, an act 
which astonished the world. From this time on the Arabs called him Shapur Zu’! 
Aktaf, which means Shapur, Lord of the Shoulders. 

Then he returned to Pars, and all the world bowed down before him. So the 
heavens smiled on Shapur for a while, but then they showed him a quite 
different face. 


Shapur Travels to Rome and the Emperor of Rome Has Him Sewn 
in an Ass’s Skin 


One day, despite his crown and wealth, Shapur felt oppressed by his existence. 
When three watches of the night had passed, he called for his astrologer, and 
asked him what would become of the royal throne, and to describe the good and 
evil days that lay ahead. The man shook off his sleep and brought an astrolabe; 
he looked in the house of Leo, the harbinger of victory and glory, to see whether 
misfortune threatened the king, or whether his favor with God would increase. 
When he had examined the signs he said, “O noble king, who rules the world 
and is pure of heart, a difficult and painful business lies ahead, and no one has 
dared warn you of this.” 

Shapur replied, “You are a knowledgeable man, and able to search out 
secrets. What can I do so that this will pass from me, and evil stars will not bring 
me to my knees?” The astrologer answered, “My lord, bravery and knowledge 
will not enable a man to evade the revolution of the heavens, no matter how wise 
or warlike he is. What is fated will surely happen, and we cannot fight against 
the turning of the sky.” The king said, “May God be our refuge from all evil, for 
it is he who created the turning heavens, and all that is powerful or weak.” 

For a while Shapur ruled justly, and he remained prosperous and without 
troubles. Under his care all the provinces flourished, and seeing this he 
conceived a wish to travel to the west, to see whether the Roman emperor was 
worthy of the position he occupied, and to find out about his armies and wealth. 
He disclosed this secret plan to his vizier, who was a fine, sensible warrior, but 
told no one else, and added, “Rule this realm justly in my absence; your justice 
will bring you happiness.” 

Then he asked for ten camel caravans, each with its own leader, and loaded 
up thirty camels with jewels and gold coins. Carefully, he made his way toward 
Roman territory. Near Rome there was a small town, and he stopped there, at the 
house of a landowner, and asked for shelter. The owner warmly welcomed him, 
saying he had never had such a distinguished guest. The king ate and slept there 
for one night, and when he gave the owner a present, he again received the 
man’s blessings. At dawn he loaded up his camels and set out quickly for the 
emperor’s palace. There he greeted the chamberlain respectfully and gave him a 
present of cash. The man said, “Tell me who you are. You have the stature and 
air of a king.” Shapur replied, “I’m a free Persian, my lord, and I’ve come from 
Jez as a merchant, bringing a caravan of silks and fine textiles. I’ve come to see 
if I can gain entrance to the emperor, so that I can present him with something 
valuable from my merchandise—jewels, or weapons for his army. If he’ll accept 
some token from me, I’ll be very happy and hand it over willingly. Then I can 


sell the rest of my goods for gold and silver, and I’ll be under the emperor’s 
protection, so I’ll have nothing to fear. And I can buy what I need in Rome and 
then make my way back to Persia.” 

The old man got up from his seat by the palace doorway and went and told 
the emperor what he had heard. The emperor had the curtains drawn aside, and 
Shapur was brought into his presence. He made a fitting obeisance, and the 
emperor scrutinized him carefully, taking in his fine appearance and manner. He 
had wine and food brought, and the court was cleared of all but his counselors. 
But there was an Iranian there, a cruel, unjust man, who said to the emperor, 
“My lord, I’ve some news to tell you, in confidence. Listen: this fine merchant 
who’s here selling silks for cash, I tell you he’s none other than Shapur, the 
Persian King of Kings: he has the king’s way of talking, he looks like him, and 
he has that aura of glory the Persian kings have.” 

When the emperor heard this, his mind darkened and his eyes clouded over: 
he signed to a guard to watch Shapur, but told no one else. Shapur became 
drunk; he stood up, and the emperor continued to stare at him. Then the guard 
strode forward and seized hold of him, saying, “You are Shapur, Nersi’s son; it’s 
a wonder you show yourself here.” They took him to the women’s quarters, and 
bound his arms. They lit a candle in front of the drunk king, and by its light they 
sewed him into an ass’s skin, saying as they did so, “This luckless fool gave up 
his throne for an ass’s skin.” 

There was a small dark room nearby, and they threw the unfortunate man into 
that tiny space and locked the door. The emperor gave the key to the mistress of 
the palace and said to her, “Give him a little bread and water, and that should 
cool his greed. If he lives for a while, he’!] realize what my throne and crown are 
worth, and he’ ll see that the Roman emperor’s throne is no concern of anyone 
who is not of the imperial family.” The emperor’s wife locked the doors and 
retired to her own part of the palace. There was a beautiful serving woman 
whom she had chosen as her subordinate and treasurer, who was Persian by 
descent and who remembered her family’s former generations, from father to 
father. To this woman the empress gave the key to the chamber where Shapur 
was kept. That same day the emperor led his troops across the border with 
Persia, while Shapur languished in the ass’s skin. 

As the Roman troops approached the frontier with Iran, they drew their 
swords for battle. The Persians had no one to lead them, and the Romans carried 
off numerous captives. Iran became depopulated and bereft of wealth: neither 
men, women nor children remained, and the Persian army had no news of 


whether Shapur was dead or alive. The population fled before the Roman armies, 
and the land emptied of its inhabitants. Innumerable Persians became Christians, 
and the land surrendered itself to their bishops. 


The Empress’s Servant Frees Shapur from the Ass’s Skin 

So conditions continued for a while, with Persia’s army in disarray, and Shapur 
imprisoned and watched constantly. Because she was of Persian descent, the 
empress’s servant was not happy to see Shapur still sewed in the ass’s skin, and 
day and night she wept for him. 


One day she said to him, “O handsome youth, 
Who are you? Have no fear now, tell the truth. 
Sewn in that skin your slender form can find 
No bodily content or peace of mind: 

You were a cypress in your elegance, 

Your face the full moon in its radiance, 

Your hair a musky crown—and now you’ve grown 
So bent and thin you seem mere skin and bone. 
My heart’s tormented for you, day and night 
My eyes weep tears for your horrific plight. 
What can you hope for now? Why keep from me 
The secret hiding your identity?” 


Shapur said to her, “If you feel any love for me, I ask that you will remember my 
sufferings and hardships, and that you swear that never will the least of what I 
say to you reach my enemies; then I will tell you truthfully what you have 
asked.” The maidservant swore by the seventy twists in a priest’s belt, by the 
soul of Jesus and his sufferings on the cross, and by the lord of Iran that she 
would neither tell anyone his secret, nor seek to worsen his situation in any way. 
Then Shapur told her all that he’d kept from her and added, “If you do what I say 
and keep my secret in your heart, your head will be lifted above that of all other 
women, and the world will be at your feet. When it’s time to bring me bread, 
stealthily bring warm milk, and with it macerate this ass’s hide, which is going 
to be notorious throughout the world and will be remembered by the wise long 
after I’m dead.” 

Quietly, undetected, the serving girl procured milk and heated it over a fire in 
a large dish shaped like a ship. Telling no one of what she was up to, she took 


the milk to Shapur. Two weeks passed, and finally the ass’s skin became pliable 
enough for Shapur to emerge from it, his body covered in blood, his heart filled 
with pain. He said to the serving girl, “You are a pure-hearted and resourceful 
woman; now we must think hard and find some way to get away from this 
accursed city of Rome.” She answered, “Tomorrow at dawn all the nobles here 
are going to gather together for a festival; there’s a celebration going on, and 
everyone will be there—men, women, and children. When the empress leaves 
the city for the festivities, the palace will be empty and I’ll find a way to save us; 
I’m not afraid of ramormongers. I’1l gladly bring you two horses, two maces, a 
bow, and arrows.” 

The maid put her mind to the task and chose two fine horses from the stables; 
then she provided herself with a sword, maces, barding for the horses, armor, 
and an Indian helmet. She’d thought long and hard and prepared her heart for 
what had to be done, taking wisdom as her guide. When the sun set in the west, 
and night drew its dark veil over its head, King Shapur’s soul was filled with 
anxiety, wondering what the maidservant would do the next morning. 


Shapur Flees from Rome to Iran 
The sun rose in the house of Leo, day dawned, and sleep fled. As the people of 
the city went to enjoy their festival, the resourceful maidservant put her plan into 
action. The palace was now empty and in her hands, and she felt her heart was 
like a lion’s, her grip like a leopard’s. She brought two noble horses from the 
stables, fine armor for a knight, as well as a number of gold coins, pearls, rubies, 
and other valuables. By the time she had everything ready for their flight, night 
had fallen again. Then the two of them set out joyfully for Iran, riding day and 
night without pausing either to eat or sleep. When they reached Khuzestan their 
bodies and horses were weak with exhaustion, and they looked for somewhere 
they could dismount and rest. They saw a beautiful village before them; it was 
filled with gardens and open spaces for the inhabitants to gather and enjoy 
themselves. Tired out by their flight, they knocked at the door of an orchard. The 
owner, a kindhearted and hospitable man, came running, and as soon as he 
caught sight of the two, dressed in armor, helmeted, and holding lances, he said, 
“What kind of a greeting is this? Where have you sprung from at such an hour, 
and why are you all dressed up for a military expedition?” 

Shapur replied, “You seem a good man, but how many questions are you 
going to ask someone who’s lost his way? I’m a Persian, and I’ve come here 
fleeing from the Roman emperor and his army, and may I never see his head or 


crown again! If you can give me shelter tonight and treat me well, as a lord of 
the marches would, I think this will stand you in good stead one day; the tree 
you plant will bear you fine fruit.” The man answered, “My house is yours and I 
am at your service; I’|l try to provide whatever I can for you, and I’!l mention 
your presence here to no one.” King Shapur dismounted from his horse, and the 
maidservant followed suit. The orchard owner’s wife made them a little meal 
from whatever was available to her, and when they had eaten, they were shown 
to a place where they could relax and drink wine. Their host passed the wine to 
Shapur and said, “Drink to whoever is in your mind now!” Shapur replied, “My 
fine and eloquent host, the man who brings the wine should drink first, 
especially if he is older and wiser. You seem a little older than I am, and as you 
brought the wine, you should drink first.” The owner replied, “A sober answer! 
The man who is more cultivated should drink first, which means you should, as 
you are old in the grace of your manner, even though you are still a young man. 
The scent of the crown comes from your hair, and your face glows like ivory.” 

Shapur laughed and took the wine, and a cold sigh rose from his vitals. He 
said to his host, “You’re a man of the pure faith: what news have you of the 
fortunes of Iran?” His host answered, “My lord, may evil never touch you, and 
may our enemies suffer as the Roman emperor has made Iran suffer. Persia’s 
population has scattered, and agriculture here has gone to rack and ruin. There 
has been so much looting, and so many men and women have been killed, that 
this great people has hidden itself away. And many have turned Christian and 
gone over to their bishops.” Shapur said, “And where is King Shapur, whose 
splendor was like that of the full moon, that the Roman emperor has grown so 
powerful, darkening the bright fortune of Iran?” 

The orchard owner said, “My lord, may you be always mighty and 
prosperous: Iran’s nobles have no notion where he is, or whether he’s alive or 
dead; everyone who was of any consequence here is now a prisoner in Rome.” 
And the man began to weep bitterly. He said, “Stay here for three days, and 
make my house shine like the sun with your presence, for a sage has said that 
whoever acts inhospitably has no wisdom and will suffer a harsh fate. Stay, rest, 
drink wine to your heart’s content, and then, when it seems appropriate to you, 
tell me your name.” Shapur replied, “I accept, and for now my host is as my 
king.” 


The Persians Recognize Shapur and Come to Welcome Him 


That night passed in drinking and the back and forth of conversation. When the 
first light of dawn touched the mountain peaks and spread its golden banner over 
the foothills, the owner of the orchard came to his guest and said, “May your day 
be happy, and your head reach higher than the rainy clouds. My house is 
unworthy of you, it’s not a fit place for you to stay. You have to eat like a poor 
man here, and I have neither clothes to offer you, nor the means to make you 
comfortable.” Shapur said, “You are a lucky man, and I would rather be in your 
house than crowned and seated on a throne. Bring me the Zend-Avesta, and the 
barsom, and as we pray I wish to ask you something.” 

The man brought all the king commanded, and when everything was ready 
the king asked him in the murmur of prayer, “Tell me truly, where is the chief 
priest now?” And the answer came, “From where I am sitting now I can see the 
house of the chief priest.” Then quietly the king said to him, “Ask the headman 
of this village for clay to make a seal.” No sooner had he heard these words than 
the man ran to bring clay, musk, and wine. The king set his seal ring in the clay, 
handed the impression over to his host, and said, “Give this clay seal to the chief 
priest, and pay attention to what he says.” 

At first light, the man took the impression made by the king’s seal to the chief 
priest. The door to the audience hall was closed and guarded by a number of 
men, and he shouted out asking to be admitted. When they let him in, the 
orchard owner went straight to the chief priest, showed him the clay, and made 
his obeisance. When he looked at the seal’s impression, the priest’s heart leaped 
for joy; he wept over the name he saw, and said, “Whose seal is this?” The 
orchard owner said, “The knight who owns it is sitting in my house; there is a 
lovely young woman with him, as slender as a cypress tree; she is beautiful, 
wise, and has a royal dignity about her.” The priest said, “Describe this man’s 
face and stature to me.” 


The man replied, “In springtime, when you see, 
Beside a stream, a single cypress tree— 

That’s how this knight is: he has arms the size 
Of some great horse’s noble thighs, 

His chest is like a lion’s, and his face 

Is ruddy: there you see such kindly grace 

It makes you blush bright red: it is as though 
His face gave off a crown’s imperial glow.” 


As the orchard owner spoke the priest realized that this lionhearted man could be 
none other than the king, and that such a face belonged only in the royal court. 
He sent an envoy to the army’s commander saying that the glory of Shapur had 
been found, and that he should gather forces from every quarter. The priest’s 
messenger hurried to his destination and said, “In the garden of happiness and 
good fortune, the royal tree has blossomed!” The commander was overjoyed at 
these words: his lips were filled with sighs, his heart with the longing for 
warfare. He prayed to God, saying, “O you who holds the world, only you are 
worthy of praise! Who could have known that Shapur would see the army again, 
or that the army would see him?” 

When night displayed its black flag and the stars appeared around the moon, 
from every quarter an army of men gathered in the place where the lord of the 
world was living. Joyfully they crowded about the house belonging to the 
orchard owner, who came to Shapur and said, “An army has collected outside 
our door, what do you think we should do?” Although the place was small and 
humble, Shapur ordered that they be admitted; as they entered one by one, they 
bowed their faces down to the dust. Shapur embraced each of the nobles and 
wept to tell them of the evils he had endured. He told them of what he had 
suffered in the ass’s skin, and of the words he had heard from the emperor; he 
described the beautiful serving girl’s nobility of spirit, and all she had done for 
him, and added, “To her and God I owe my life: may she 

Be blessed with happiness eternally! 

A mighty king’s the slave of those slaves who Show magnanimity in all 
they do: 

Tam the slave of this true-hearted slave 

Who’s been so selfless, generous, and brave. 


“Now that I resume my kingship and the command of my armies, send 
messengers and set advance guards on the roads; in particular close the roads to 
Ctesiphon, as I want no news of this to reach the Roman emperor. If he realizes 
the glory of Persian sovereignty has awoken again, he will lead an army against 
us and break the backs of our forces. At the moment we can’t equal him in 
military might, and we shouldn’t engage in a struggle with his flourishing good 
fortune. When our priests have gathered an army so dense that not a mosquito 
can pass through the ranks, then we shall revise our plans and secretly rid our 
garden of these noxious weeds. For now we need guards everywhere, watching 


day and night: no one should take off his armor and lie down to sleep while the 
Roman threat hangs over us.” 


Shapur Attacks by Night and Takes the Roman Emperor Prisoner 
Not many days passed before the Persian army had grown to six thousand men. 
Shapur sent spies to Ctesiphon, which had been occupied by the Romans, to 
report on the emperor and his court there. Stealthily and secretly the spies 
collected information; they reported to the king and said, “The emperor spends 
all his time drinking and hunting, and gives no thought to warfare. His army is 
scattered about the countryside plundering what they can find. They send out no 
scouts by day, they set no guards at night, they’re like a flock without a 
shepherd. The emperor has no thought of any enemy attacking from anywhere, 
and is content to live following his fancies.” 

Shapur was overjoyed to hear this, and his past sorrows dispersed like the 
wind. He chose three thousand Persian warriors, well equipped and with barding 
for their horses. They put on their armor in the night’s darkness and set off 
toward Ctesiphon, riding quickly by night and hiding during the day. The king 
and his men rode through deserts and mountains, by trackless ways, with scouts 
sent two parasangs ahead of the main body of men. So they went forward, until 
the scouts came within sight of Ctesiphon. At this time two watches of the night 
had passed, and the emperor had no suspicion that anything was amiss, until he 
heard the din of drums and the cries of sentries ringing out like a cockcrow. The 
whole plain was filled with the Roman tents, but who in all that encampment 
was aware of the impending attack? The emperor was drunk in his pavilion, and 
his soldiers were crowded around in disorder. When Shapur saw how things 
stood, he gave his horse its head, and his men charged the Roman camp, with the 
king laying about him with a huge mace. The blare of trumpets, the clash of 
maces, the clanging of Indian bells rose up to the clouds. Cries of combat and 
the noise of arms crashing against armor came from every side: you’d have said 
the sky had split open, and that the sun dripped blood down through the air. In 
the darkness the Kaviani banner glittered and swords flashed, and it seemed that 
the earth was covered with clouds that rained down weapons. The dust of battle 
hid the mountains, and the stars veiled their light. Shapur flattened the evil 
emperor’s pavilion; his men set fires on all sides throughout the Roman camp, 
and the skies seem to come down to the earth. Finally, the emperor was taken 
prisoner, and his fortunate star deserted him. Many of his brave nobles and 
commanders were hauled from their tents and put in chains. 


At dawn, when night drew in her skirts and the sun’s banner appeared on the 
mountain tops, Shapur asked for a scribe to come, bringing a pen, inks, musk, 
and silk. A letter was written to every chieftain, every king, and every country. 
The letter began with praise of God, whose slaves we are, since it is he who aids 
the virtuous and has no need of human aid, who created the world and guides us 
to righteousness. It continued, “Since the Roman emperor did not take wisdom 
as his soul’s guide, but instead ignored God’s commands and sowed nothing but 
seeds of evil in Iran, he now languishes weeping in chains. God entrusted him 
with the crown of Iran, but he will take nothing from this world but an evil 
name. By the power of God who guided us, his court and army have been 
broken, and any Romans found in the city will be put to the sword. Pursue 
justice, obey my commands, and willingly renew your oaths of loyalty to me.” 
Swift messengers took the king’s letter to every quarter. 

Shapur moved his court from the camp to Ctesiphon, and when he placed his 
ancestors’ crown upon his head again, he gave thanks to God. He sent a scribe to 
the prisons, to write down the names of their captives; the number of Roman 
nobles held there came to one thousand one hundred and ten, all of whom were 
relatives or allies of the emperor, and among the first men of their country. The 
king had the hands and feet of those who had been involved in oppression cut 
off, then he ordered that the Roman emperor be brought before him. The 
executioner dragged him by the arm from the prison, and he was like a man who 
has lost consciousness. When this tyrannical man saw Shapur’s face, he wept 
and prostrated himself, rubbing his face in the dust, and calling down blessings 
on the throne and crown. His tears soaked the ground, and his face and hair were 
coated with dust. 

The king said to him, “You are entirely evil, a Christian, and an enemy of 
God. You say that he who has no partner, whose realm has no beginning or end, 
has a son. You don’t know how to speak except in lies, and lies are an evil fire 
that gives no light. If you are an emperor, where are your shame and good sense, 
where is your conscience to guide you? Why did you imprison me in an ass’s 
skin and bring my greatness down into the dust? I came as a merchant looking 
for a fair, I didn’t come with drums and an army looking for war. But you shut 
your guest up in an ass’s skin and led your army against Iran. Now you know 
what war with brave men means, and you won’t be looking to fight with Iran 
again.” 

The emperor replied, “Who can evade God’s will? My royal fortune made 
wisdom a stranger to me, and my soul became a devil’s mercenary. But if you 


return good for evil, you will be a legend in the world, your name will never 
grow old, and your chivalry will bring you all that you desire. If I receive my life 
at your hands, all wealth and gold will be contemptible to me, I shall be a slave 
at your court, seeking nothing but how to augment its splendor.” Shapur 
answered, “You are an evil, ignorant man. Why did you plunder this country? I 
want back immediately all the prisoners you took from here to Rome; then you 
must return all the wealth you took to Rome too, and may you never see that 
shameful city again! You must provide money to rebuild the parts of Persia you 
have ruined, where lions and leopards now build their lairs. Further, you must 
have ten noble Romans handed over for every Persian you killed; I want only 
members of the imperial family, and they will live here with me as hostages in 
this happy land. For every tree you cut down in Persia—and a good man does 
not cut down trees—you must plant another and build walls to protect it, and in 
this way you may lessen the rage that people feel against you. I have you in 
chains now, but how can I ever forgive you that ass’s skin? If you do not do as I 
have ordered, your own skin will be cut open from head to foot.” They split his 
ears with a knife, and bored a hole through his nose, in which they put a piece of 
wood of the kind by which a camel is led; this was done because Shapur 
remembered the ass’s skin. Two heavy shackles were placed on his feet, and the 
executioner returned him to prison. 


Shapur Leads His Army into Roman Territory: His Battle with the 
Emperor’s Brother 

Shapur drew up his troops for review, and as the treasuries were opened and he 
provided his men with provisions and payment, his head filled with thoughts of 
revenge, his heart with ambition. He led his army into Roman territory; they 
killed whomever they found there and burned all the buildings, making the 
world glow with fire. 

When news reached Rome from Persia that their land had been devastated 
and the emperor taken prisoner while fighting at night, all Rome wept and 
trembled at the name of Shapur. They said, “Who but our emperor, that 
unchivalrous man, brought this evil on us?” The emperor had a younger brother; 
their father was dead, but their mother was still alive. This brother’s name was 
Yanus, and he was an ambitious, generous, open-hearted man. The army 
gathered at the imperial court, and Yanus’s mother, who was a bellicose woman, 
distributed cash to them and said to Yanus, “You must avenge your brother, 
since you can see an army is attacking us from Iran.” Yanus was swept away by 


anger when he heard this and said, “Revenge for a brother is not something to 
push aside and forget!” He had the drums sounded and brought a large cross out 
before his formidable army. 

When the armies came face to face, the men on each side were eager for 
battle. Their ranks were drawn up, the din of battle began, and Yanus led his 
troops in an attack. But such clouds of dust sprang up that his men lost their way. 
On one side they were hemmed in by mountains, and on the other by a wide 
river, and the dust continued until the sun turned yellow in the sunset. So many 
men were killed that the ground seemed paved with the iron armor of the dead. 
Shapur was in the center of his forces, calling out to his officers on the right and 
left; he and his nobles urged their horses forward, the ground shook, and their 
troops engaged the enemy. They launched an all-out attack against the Romans 
in which officers and foot soldiers became indistinguishable. Yanus saw that his 
forces couldn’t withstand the king’s, and he and his army fled. Shapur pursued 
them, and the dust dimmed the shining air. Heaps of corpses lay everywhere, and 
the plants that grew there were smeared with men’s brains. The whole plain was 
filled with trunkless, limbless heads of slaughtered Romans. No army or cross 
remained on that plain, and no bishops or crosses remained in the castles. The 
army was astonished at the amount of booty that was gathered on all sides. The 
king distributed everything to his troops, reserving only the emperor’s personal 
treasure for himself, a treasure that had caused him such pain in the past and that 
was not enough to cancel that pain. The Roman soldiers gathered round and 
spoke against their emperor, saying, “May we never have another ruler like him, 
may the name of emperor disappear from Rome! Away with altars and crosses 
and vestments; now our priests’ belts and crosses have been burned, Rome is 
like pagan Qanuj for us, and the fame of the Messiah’s faith grows weaker.” 


Baranush Is Crowned Emperor of Rome: His Letter to Shapur 
There was a noble Roman, of the emperors’ line, called Baranush: he was a wise 
man, knowledgeable and able to give good advice. The army said to him, “You 
should be emperor, and the leader of this country and people.” They prepared an 
ivory throne for him, and Baranush placed the crown on his own head. The 
Romans sat him in the center of power and all of them called down blessings on 
him. 

Baranush sat on his throne and thought of Rome and her battles. He knew 
that she would be harmed by further confrontations with the great king, and he 
selected a messenger, a man who was sensible and humble, who could speak 


wisely and eloquently, and was both a great scribe and someone experienced in 
the ways of the world. He summoned this man and conferred with him, then 
dictated a letter to Shapur, beginning with praise of God, who rules the world. It 
continued: “May all the chieftains of the world bow down 

As slaves before your everlasting crown: 

You know that our nobility condemn 

Oppression visited on guiltless men. 

Whether performed in Rome’s or Persia’s name, 

Rapine and murder are a source of shame. 

If we may trace this warfare to the time 

Traj died, Manuchehr avenged that crime— 

Both Tur and Salm are dust now. And if you’re 

Remembering Dara’s and Sekandar’s war, 

Dara was murdered by his ministers 

And plucked from power by his opposing stars. 

And if you hate our emperor, he remains 

A captive in your dungeons, bound in chains. 

But Rome, which has no equal anywhere, 

Should not be prey to ruin and despair. 

If you attack us we cannot withstand 

The force of your assault against our land, 

Our wives and children are already yours, 

Made captive, or left wounded by your wars. 

It’s time to close your eyes to what is past, 

To lay aside your warlike plans at last. 

Day follows day, and every day in turn 

Sees yet another of our cities burn! 

Let joy into your heart—it cannot be 

That God looks kindly on such tyranny. 

God keep Your Highness—may your star arise, 

And crown the moon, and dominate the skies.” 


The letter was sealed with the emperor’s seal, and the messenger set off for 
Shapur’s court. When the letter with its fine sentiments was read to Shapur, he 
frowned, his eyes filled with tears, and he forgave the Romans. He immediately 
wrote an answer, going over the good and bad of the past, and adding, “Who was 
it who sewed his guest in an ass’s skin and rekindled ancient enmities? But if 


you are wise come before me, bringing philosophers from your country. Since I 
have decided on peace, I shall not prepare for war. I shall let you go free from 
this narrow pass in which you find yourself.” The messenger returned and took 
the king’s answer; word by word he reported everything that had been said. 


Baranush Visits Shapur and They Conclude a Treaty Baranush was 
overjoyed when he saw the answer to his letter. He ordered that a 
hundred Roman nobles travel with him to Shapur’s court, and took 
sixty donkey loads of silver, together with jewels and textiles, and 
thirty thousand gold coins as a present. The nobles entered Shapur’s 
presence bareheaded and scattered the gold before him. Shapur 
welcomed them warmly, then turned to Baranush and said, “Many 
shameless, unjust men came here from Rome and turned our cities 
into waste reed beds. I want compensation for these ruined places 
that are now the haunts of lions and leopards.” Baranush replied, 
“Tell us what must be done; do not turn your face from us now that 
you have granted us peace.” The great king answered, “If you wish 
me to cancel your sins against us, three times a year Rome must 
send us a million gold coins; and if you wish to curtail my anger you 
will grant me the town of Nasibin, in Mesopotamia.” Baranush 
replied, “Iran is yours, and Nasibin and its plains and warriors are 
yours; we accept your terms and the tribute we must pay, since we 
have not the power to oppose your anger.” In the treaty between 
them, Shapur promised never to lead an army into Roman territory, 
unless it was done in a fitting, ceremonial manner that did nothing 
to diminish Rome’s dignity. Then Shapur made much of his guests, 
treating them more kindly than his own nobles. 

When the embassy had gone, Shapur gave many thanks to the world’s 
Creator and set off joyfully for Estakhr, the most splendid site in Pars. But when 
news of the treaty reached Nasibin, its inhabitants prepared for war, saying, 
“Shapur should not own Nasibin or bring an army here, since he has no respect 
for Christianity; all his concern is for the Zend-Avesta and the faith of Zoroaster. 
He won’t listen to us when he comes, and we have no interest in his scriptures or 
his faith.” The common people took over the city, and its citizens sat in the 


saddle ready for war. When news arrived that the way to Nasibin had been 
blocked, Shapur burst out in rage against the Christian faith and sent a huge 
army against the town. He said, “It’s ridiculous to respect a religion whose 
prophet was killed by the Jews.” The army traveled as quickly as wind-borne 
dust; for a week its cavalry and lionhearted warriors fought, and the city’s 
inhabitants were hard pressed. The Persians killed many of their leaders and put 
those who remained alive in chains. Then the citizens sued for quarter, sending a 
letter to Shapur, who granted their request and ordered his army home. 

Shapur was now famous throughout the world, and his power was 
acknowledged everywhere; he was referred to as “the victorious king.” As for 
the young serving girl who had released him from captivity, and helped him to 
this power, he named her Delafruz-e Farrokhpay—the heart’s delight who brings 
good luck—and she was his favorite among his womenfolk. He gave the orchard 
owner considerable wealth and sent him happy on his way. The Roman emperor 
remained in his prison, wretched and in chains, with his flesh eaten away by 
shackles. His wealth in Rome was gathered together and sent to Persia, and he 
lived a little longer, with sighs always on his lips. Finally, he died while still 
chained and imprisoned, and his crown passed to another man. Shapur sent his 
corpse to Rome, in a coffin, with his head crowned with musk, and said, “This is 
the end of all of us, and I do not know where our peace is to be found. One man 
acts with cruelty and stupidity, another with wisdom and glory; but for each of 
them his time here passes in the same way. Blessed is the man who commits no 
evil in the world!” 

Then Shapur built a city for the prisoners he’d taken, in Khuzestan, which he 
called Khorramabad—The City of Joy—and he settled there the men whose 
hands he’d cut off; the whole area was given over to them and each New Year 
they received a robe of honor from the king. He built another city in Syria, 
which he named Piruz-e Shapur—Shapur’s Victory—and he built a third city, 
which had a castle and a hospital in it, near Ahvaz. He called this city Kenam-e 
Asiran—The Captives’ Dwelling—and his prisoners found peace and 
contentment there. 


The Coming of Mani: His Claim to Be a Prophet 

Shapur had reigned for fifty years, and there was no one to equal him at that 
time. An eloquent man arrived from China, and the world will never see his like 
again. His abilities had stood him in good stead, and he had become a powerful 
man: his name was Mani. He said, “I am a prophet and a painter, and I am the 


first of those who introduce new religions into the world.” He asked for an 
audience with Shapur, hoping to persuade the king to support his claim to be a 
prophet. He spoke fluently, but the king remained unconvinced by his talk. 
Shapur’s mind was troubled by his words, and he summoned his priests and 
spoke to them at length about Mani. He said, “This man from China talks very 
well, but I have doubts about the religion he proposes. Talk to him and listen to 
what he has to say; it may be you’|l be won over by him.” They answered, “This 
painter will be no match for the chief priest. Listen to Mani by all means, but 
summon our chief priest, and when Mani sees him he won’t be in such a hurry to 
talk.” 

Shapur sent for the chief priest, who spoke for a long time with Mani, and 
Mani was left speechless in the middle of his discourse, unable to answer the 
chief priest’s remarks about the ancient faith of Zoroaster. The chief priest said 
to him, “You love images; why do you foolishly strive with God in this way, 
God who created the high heavens and made time and space in which darkness 
and light are manifest, whose essence is beyond all other essences, and who 
fashioned the heavens to turn by night and day? Your refuge is with him, all you 
suffer is from him. Why do you put such trust in images, ignoring the advice of 
the prophets? Images are multiple, but God is one, and you have no choice but to 
submit to him. If you could make your images move, then you could say that this 
is a demonstration of the truth of what you say. But don’t you see that such a 
demonstration would fail? No one is going to believe your claims. If Ahriman 
were God’s equal, dark night would be like smiling daylight; in all the years that 
have gone by, night and day have kept their places, and the heavens’ turning has 
neither increased nor diminished. God cannot be contained by our thoughts, for 
he is beyond all time and place. You talk as madmen do, and that is all there is to 
it: no one should support you.” He said much more beside this, and Mani was 
unable to answer his words. Mani’s credibility, which had seemed so flourishing, 
withered away. The turning of the heavens was against Mani. The king was 
enraged by him and had him ignominiously dragged from the court. He said, 
“The world is no place for this image maker; he has disturbed the peace long 
enough. Let him be flayed and his skin stuffed with straw so that no one will be 
tempted to follow his example.” They hung his body from the city gates, and 
then later from the wall in front of the hospital. The world praised Shapur, and 
men flung dirt on Mani’s corpse. 


Shapur Makes His Brother, Ardeshir, His Regent Shapur’s life 
became a garden within which grew roses without thorns. His 
justice and good sense, his actions, his wars and his policies were 
such that he had no enemies anywhere, and evil had no refuge in all 
the world. When he was more than seventy years old and had little 
hope of living longer, he summoned a scribe, together with the chief 
priest, Ardeshir, a wise and just man who was Shapur’s own 
younger brother. Shapur had a son who was still very young and 
had little experience of the world. 

The king said to Ardeshir, “You are a champion among men, and a fine, 
brave horseman. If you will swear truthfully to me, giving your word, that when 
my son reaches his majority and has grown into a brave youth, you will hand 
over to him the throne, the royal treasuries, and command of the army, and that 
you will be his benevolent guide until then, I shall hand over this royal crown to 
you, together with our treasuries and the army.” Before the scribe and the nobles 
who were there, Ardeshir accepted Shapur’s words, promising that when the boy 
reached manhood and was worthy of the royal crown, he would hand over the 
authority of kingship to him and would strive only to advance his interests. 

Then Shapur handed him the crown and royal seal, in front of the nobles, and 
gave him lengthy advice on the duties of a just king. When he had heard Shapur 
out, his brother wept. The king lived for one more year after he made Ardeshir 
his regent. 


F erdowsi’s accounts of the brief reigns of Ardeshir Niku Kar, Shapur IIT and 
Bahram Shapur are omitted. 


THE REIGN OF YAZDEGERD THE UNJUST 


Yazdegerd rejoiced at his brother’s unhappy death, taking his crown and placing 
it on his own head. All those who had lived by the sword and mace trembled like 
willow trees; Yazdegerd’s rule over the world became more secure, and his 
benevolence faded away as his authority increased. Wise men meant nothing to 
him, and his royal obligations were forgotten; lords of the marches, champions, 
scholars, and learned priests—all were like so much wind to him, and his dark 
soul gave itself over to tyranny. Justice and kindness were cancelled from his 
heart, and he granted no man his requests. He respected no one’s rank, and faults 
were elaborately punished. His ministers, whose task was to increase his power 
and glory, agreed among themselves never to tell the king of the country’s true 
condition; they all shrank from him in terror and lived in fear for their lives. As 
soon as the chamberlain heard that envoys had come to see the king, or that 
subordinates had arrived at court seeking help, he hurried to reassure them with 
kind and gentle words. Later he said, “The king is not in the mood for work, and 
you cannot have an audience with him. I have told him of your requests, and he 
will act appropriately.” 


The Birth of Yazdegerd’s Son, Bahram 

Seven years went by, during which time the country’s priests lived in fear and 
torment because of Yazdegerd’s cruelty. Then, at the beginning of the eighth 
year of his reign, at the spring equinox, a son was born to him under an 
auspicious star. Delighted with his little son, Yazdegerd named him Bahram. 
Two renowned astrologers were summoned before the king: Sorush was the best 
of Indian astrologers, a man of great glory and intelligence; Hoshyar was a 
Persian, and his knowledge was such that he could put a bridle on the heavens. 
They used their astrolabes and Greek astrological tables to uncover the happy 
fortune that Bahram would be a great prince in the world, and that he would rule 
over the seven climes. Still grasping their instruments and tables, they ran into 
the king’s presence and said, “We have brought together all we know, and it is 


clear from the stars that the heavens look kindly on this baby: he will rule the 
seven climes, and be a great and glorious king.” Yazdegerd was overjoyed to 
hear this and rewarded them with royal jewels. 

Once the astrologers had left the court, the priests and ministers sat together 
and discussed what should be done. They believed that if the new prince did not 
take after his father he could be a great and just king, but if his character turned 
out like his father’s, he would ruin the whole country, and neither the priests, nor 
the country’s warriors, nor the young prince himself would have an auspicious 
future. With good intentions in their hearts, they went to the king and said, “This 
splendid child is beyond any reproach or blame; all the world is his to rule, every 
country will pay him tribute. Look for a place where wisdom has ensured the 
country’s peace and prosperity, and choose someone noble from there to bring 
him up. Then this fine prince will learn the skills he needs, and the world will 
rejoice in his rule.” 

Accordingly, the king summoned envoys from every country, and at the same 
time he sent his own men to Rome, India, China, and other civilized regions. 
One man went among the Arabs to study the nature of their life, and he searched 
for someone eloquent and wise who could bring Bahram up. Experienced sages 
came from every country and gathered at the Persian court. The king questioned 
them at length, made much of them, and assigned them living quarters. One 
night two Arab princes, No’man and his father Monzer, arrived with their 
entourage. When all these visitors had assembled in Pars, they presented 
themselves before Yazdegerd and said, “We are your slaves and will the obey 
the words we hear from you. Who among us will be fortunate enough to take the 
king’s son in his arms, to teach him the ways of knowledge and to cleanse his 
heart of darkness?” Then each of these eloquent, experienced men, whether he 
was from Rome or India or Persia, whether an astrologer, a mathematician, or a 
philosopher, said humbly, “O just, wise, and honorable king, we are all as the 
dust beneath your feet, and stand ready to act as your guide to knowledge. Look 
at us, and decide which of us pleases you, which of us will be useful to you.” But 
Monzer said, “We are your slaves, and our lives in this world are the king’s. The 
king knows of our qualities, since he is as a shepherd to us and we are his flock. 
We are riders, warriors, tamers of horses, and we have no tolerance of so-called 
wise men. We are not astrologers or mathematicians: our souls are filled with 
love of the king, and we trust in the quick Arab horses we ride. We are all your 
son’s slaves, and we laud his glory.” 


Yazdegerd Entrusts His Son Bahram to Monzer and No’man 

When Yazdegerd heard these words, he gathered his thoughts together, came to 
a decision, and handed over Bahram into Monzer’s keeping. He had a robe of 
honor made for Monzer and exalted his head to the skies; the king of the 
Yemen’s horse was called for at the door to the court, and all the plain in front of 
the palace was filled with camels, horses, litters, servants, and nurses for the 
baby. The whole area from the city gates to the court was decorated in royal 
fashion for the prince’s departure. 

When Monzer arrived back in the Yemen, all the men and women of the 
country came out to greet him, and as soon as he reached his home he began to 
search for worthy, wellborn women to suckle the child. From among the noble 
Persians and Arabs there he chose four accomplished women: two were Arabs, 
and two were Persians of royal descent, and these four prepared themselves to 
act as the baby’s wet nurses. 

They suckled him for four years, and he grew satisfied and stout on their 
milk; they weaned him with difficulty, but still they continued to cuddle and 
caress him. When he was seven the wise child said to Monzer, “My lord, don’t 
treat me like a baby at the breast! Send me to teachers; there’s work to be done, 
don’t leave me idle and useless like this!” Monzer replied, “You don’t need 
teachers yet, my lord. When it’s time for you to be taught your lessons, I won’t 
leave you to play in the palace and boast about your games.” But Bahram 
answered him, “Stop thinking of me as an idle good-for-nothing. It’s true I’m 
young in years, and my chest and shoulders aren’t like a hero’s, but I have some 
knowledge. You’re old in years, but you don’t have much wisdom, and my 
nature isn’t what you think it is. Don’t you know that when someone is ready to 
seek things out, he chooses what he has to do first and concentrates on that? If 
you’re going to be always waiting for the right time, your heart will lose 
everything good, everything will be out of place, and nothing will come out 
right. It’s the head that matters for a human being! Teach me everything that a 
king should know: the beginning of righteousness is a knowledge of God, and 
blessed is the man who is wise and has knowledge!” 

Monzer stared at him in astonishment and murmured the name of God to 
himself. He immediately sent a messenger to Shurestan, who sought out three 
teachers who were highly respected there. One was to teach the boy how to 
write, and so to cleanse his heart of darkness. Another was to instruct him in the 
management of hawks and hunting cheetahs, which delights the heart. Another 
would teach him how to play polo, shoot with a bow, fight in combat against 


enemies, and tug his reins to right and left and so control his horse on the 
battlefield. These learned men presented themselves to Monzer and described to 
him the things they could teach. Monzer handed the young prince over to them 
for instruction, and he learned so quickly that his abilities were soon those of a 
grown man. His intellect grasped whatever they said to him, and by the time he 
was eighteen he had grown into a brave youth as splendid as the sun. He no 
longer needed his instructors to tell him anything about hunting with hawks and 
cheetahs, or about how to ride and attack on the battlefield. He said to Monzer, 
“My pure-hearted protector, you can send these teachers back to where they 
came from.” Each of the men was given a number of presents, and they left 
Monzer’s court in good spirits. 

Later Bahram said to Monzer, “Have the Arabs bring their horses before me, 
and make them tug on the reins and flourish their lances. Then they can put a 
price on whichever horse pleases me, and I’ll pay more for it than they ask.” 
Monzer replied, “You’re an ambitious young prince, and the herder of my horses 
is at your service, as his lord is too. I have no objection if you want to buy an 
Arab horse.” Bahram said, “You have a noble reputation, and may you live 
prosperously for many years. I’ll choose a horse I don’t have to rein in when 
going down a slope, one I can make sure-footed at a gallop, and then I’ have 
him outstrip the winds of spring. But before he’s properly trained, it’s not right 
to force a horse to gallop too fast.” 

Monzer said to No’man, “Choose a number of horses, and as they’re driven 
across the plain, watch out for a good mount for a warrior.” No’man quickly 
brought a hundred horses, of which he chose a number suitable to be ridden in 
battle. Bahram wandered among them, but whenever he mounted one that had 
the speed of the wind, it could not bear his weight. This continued until finally 
he settled on a chestnut horse that was both swift and broad chested. He also 
chose a bay horse with a black mane and tail that was as big as a sea monster, 
and Monzer paid a just price for the two of them. They were both from the 
woods near Kufah. Bahram accepted the horses as a gift from him, and they 
glowed like the fires of Azar-Goshasp. Monzer looked after the young prince as 
if he were the apple of his eye, and did not let even the wind disturb him. 

One day Bahram said to Monzer, “You are a noble, well-intentioned man, but 
you hem me in with your excessive care and constant worry. Everyone we see 
has some secret sorrow that turns his face yellow with grief, and a free man’s 
health is revived by pleasure, so allow me this one further pleasure then, the 
pleasure that cures all pains. Whether he’s a prince or a warrior, a young man 


finds comfort and happiness with women. They are the foundation of our faith, 
and they guide young men toward goodness. Have five or six beautiful slave 
girls, as splendid as the sun, brought here, so that I can pick one or two of them. 
I’ve been thinking too that I should have children: if I had a child that would 
bring me some comfort. The king would be pleased, and men would praise me 
for it.” 

The old man congratulated the young prince on his words and had a broker 
hurry to the slave-seller’s depot. 


He brought back forty western slaves, each one 

A heart-delighting girl, a radiant sun. 

Bahram chose two of them, who seemed to be 
Fashioned from roses and pale ivory; 

Tall in their elegance, and cypress slim, 

Their grace and loveliness delighted him. 

One played the harp, one seemed to Bahram’s eyes 
Bright as Canopus in the Yemen’s skies. 


Monzer bought both of them and Bahram laughed, then blushed like a ruby from 
Badakhshan. 


The Story of Bahram and the Harp-Player 

For a while Bahram occupied himself solely with playing polo and hunting. And 
so it was that one day he went out hunting without any of his companions, taking 
with him only his harp-playing slave girl. Her name was Azadeh, and her cheeks 
were as red as wine: she sat with him on his mount, her harp in her hand. She 
was his heart’s delight and desire, and his name was always on her lips. That 
day, Bahram had asked for a brocade cloth to be draped across his camel’s back, 
and that it be provided with four gem-studded stirrups, two of which were silver 
and two of gold. Beneath his quiver he had a slingshot, as he was adept at all 
forms of hunting. Two pairs of deer appeared in front of them and the young 
prince turned smiling to Azadeh and said, “When I draw back the bowstring, 
which of these two do you want my arrow to strike? There is a young female, 
and she has an old male companion.” Azadeh replied, “You are a lion of a man, 
and a warrior doesn’t fight against deer! But turn that doe to a buck with an 
arrow, and with another arrow make the buck into a doe. Then urge your camel 
forward, and as they flee from you, use your slingshot, and strike one of the deer 


on the ear, so that she will rub it against her shoulder and lift up her foot to 
scratch the spot, and when she does that—if you want me to call you the light of 
the world—pin her foot, ear and head together with one shaft.” 

Bahram readied his bow and broke the silence of the plain with his cry. He 
had a double-headed arrow in his quiver, and as the buck fled before him, he 
shot this arrow so that it severed the buck’s antlers; instantly, now that its antlers 
were gone, the buck looked like a doe, and Azadeh stared at Bahram in 
astonishment. Then he shot two arrows into the doe’s head, so that they 
protruded like antlers, while the blood ran down over her muzzle. Next he urged 
his camel toward the other pair; he fitted a pellet in the fold of his slingshot and 
loosed it at the ear of one of them. He was rightly pleased with his skill, because 
the deer immediately scratched at its ear, and Bahram notched an arrow to his 
bow. The shaft pinned foot, ear, and head together, and Azadeh’s heart was 
wrung for the animal. Bahram pushed her from the saddle and she fell headlong 
to the ground. He said, “You’re nothing but a stupid harp-player. What do you 
mean by setting me such a task? If I had missed, I’d have brought shame on my 
lineage.” He trampled her beneath his camel’s hooves, and blood spurted from 
her breast and arms. After this, he never took a slave girl hunting with him again. 


Bahram Shows His Prowess as a Hunter 

Another time, Bahram went out to the hunting grounds with a large group of 
companions, taking his hawks and hunting cheetahs with him. On a 
mountainside he saw a lion clawing apart the back of a wild ass. He notched an 
arrow with three raven plumes to his bow string and pinned the wild ass’s heart 
and the lion’s back to one another. The lion lay drenched in blood atop the ass, 
and their hunter returned in triumph to the palace, his sword in his fist. Another 
time he went hunting with No’man and Monzer, together with a number of noble 
Arabs who had been his advisors for good and ill, and Monzer was eager for 
Bahram Gur to display his horsemanship and hunting skills to them. They saw a 
flock of ostriches running about like a herd of camels, and Bahram Gur sped 
forward like the wind. He laughed as he took his bow in hand and thrust four 
poplar wood arrows into his belt. One by one he notched them to the bowstring, 
and as each found its mark each one split the feathers of the former arrow; there 
was not a needle’s width between where they struck. The nobles went forward 
and examined the prey and found not a hair’s breadth of space from arrow to 
arrow. Monzer cried out his congratulations to him, as did their companions. 
Monzer continued, 


“You fill my heart with such intense delight, 
You’re like a rosebush blossoming in my sight— 
And may your moonlike glory never wane, 

Your back remain unbent and free from pain!” 


And as soon as they reached the palace Monzer, whose thoughts elevated 
Bahram to Saturn’s sphere, sought out painters from the Yemen. A number of 
them gathered at the court, and Monzer gave orders that they were to represent 
Bahram mounted on a camel, together with the ostrich wounded by his arrows. 
His slingshot was also to be there, as well as the lions, deer, and wild asses he’d 
brought down by his massive strength and skill. The ostrich’s wound, Bahram’s 
arrows, and the surrounding plain all lived again in black ink brushed on silk. 
The picture was sent by a mounted messenger to King Yazdegerd, and there the 
whole court crowded around to see his missive. They were astonished at what 
they saw and called down blessings on Bahram and his skill. 


Bahram Returns with No’man to His Father, Yazdegerd 

His father longed to see Bahram again, who seemed less a man than the glorious 
sun itself. The lion prince said to Monzer, “The longer I stay with you the more I 
wish to see my father. My heart tells me that I’ll be safe with him.” Monzer 
collected together appropriate royal presents from his country: Arab horses with 
gold-worked bridles, valuable objects, Yemeni textiles and swords, as well as 
whatever precious stones the mines of Aden could provide. Bahram traveled 
with No’man, who was highly regarded by the king, until they reached the city 
of Estakhr. As soon as the king learned that his son and No’man were 
approaching, he and his courtiers went out to meet them, and when he saw his 
son’s glory, his fine body and shoulders, his stature and noble bearing, he was 
sunk in amazement. He questioned him closely and made much of him, and kept 
him nearby. He chose lodgings for No’man and an appropriate palace for 
Bahram. Day and night Bahram was with his father, and he was treated with 
such attentive kindness that he scarcely had to lift a finger. 

After No’man had been with the king for a month, he was ready to return 
home. Yazdegerd summoned him one night, sat him down beside him on the 
royal dais, and said, “Monzer took great pains to bring Bahram up, and I shall 
reward him well: he has been like an angel of good fortune to me. I delight in his 
intelligence and opinions, and I see his aim has always been wisdom. You have 
been with us for some time now, and your father must be watching the roads for 


your return.” From the treasury he was given fifty thousand gold dinars, together 
with royal clothes; from the stables ten fine horses with gold and silver 
trappings. To these were added beautiful carpets, as well as other splendid gifts 
that were brought one by one and handed over to No’man. Yazdegerd was happy 
to open the doors of generosity and to reward No’man’s entourage with gifts too, 
according to their rank. He then wrote a letter worthy of his royal state to 
Monzer, thanking him for the guidance and friendship he had shown to Bahram, 
and saying that he now lifted up his head in pride because of his son and would 
attempt to repay the debt he owed. 

Bahram Gur also wrote a letter to Monzer, saying, “My life here is hard and 
bitter: I didn’t expect my father to treat his inferiors in the way he does. I’m not 
like a son here or a servant, and I’m not like one of his subjects who’s happy 
simply to be at the court.” He told No’man what he had seen in private of the 
king’s evil ways. No’man returned to Monzer and gave him the king’s letter. 
Monzer kissed it and touched it to his forehead: he was overjoyed to see the gifts 
that had been sent and repeatedly expressed his wonder and gratitude. 

Then in private No’man told Monzer of Bahram’s complaints, and when a 
scribe read out his letter, Monzer’s face turned pale. He immediately wrote 
Bahram a careful answer, saying, “My noble lord, see that you don’t oppose 
your father. Be content with what he does, whether for good or ill; obey him and 
be prudent. Noble men escape evils through patience, and a man must be wise in 
such cases. To some the heavens send a heart filled with kindness, to others a 
vengeful heart and a frowning face: this is how God has made the world, and we 
must walk as he directs us to walk. I’m sending you whatever you might need by 
way of gold and royal jewels; my wealth is not worth your suffering. See that 
you keep your heart free from pain. I’m sending ten thousand dinars as a gift, 
and also the slave girl who delighted you so much and who was like a guide to 
you, so that she may lighten your soul’s darkness. Whenever you need money, 
don’t burden the king with your requests; I can send you much more than I have 
done, and other kinds of wealth from our kingdom too. Strive to be ever more 
obedient and humble: you can’t privately separate the king from his evil ways.” 
Monzer sent ten eloquent and loyal Arab horsemen, and they reached Bahram 
with the money and Bahram’s favorite slave. Bahram was pleased at this, and his 
sorrows disappeared; wisely he followed the Arab king’s advice and served his 
father obediently by night and day. 


Yazdegerd Has Bahram Confined in His Palace; Bahram Returns to 
Monzer 

One day, when Bahram had been standing before the king at a banquet, for a 
long time, he was overcome by the need for sleep. When his father saw 
Bahram’s eyes closing, he shouted in his fury, 


“Take him away! He can’t act as he ought, 
Never again will he appear at court. 

Lock him in his palace. He’s unfit for 

The royal throne and leadership in war.” 


For a year Bahram stayed in his palace sick at heart, and never saw his father’s 
face, except during the festivals of No-Ruz and Sadeh, when he was simply one 
of the crush of people who appeared before the throne. This was the situation 
when the Roman envoy Taynush arrived at court with the cash and slaves that 
had been sent as tribute. The King of Kings welcomed him and assigned him 
suitable living quarters. Bahram sent him a message: “You are a noble and 
successful man; something has made the king angry with me, and I’ve been 
excluded from his presence, even though I’ve done nothing wrong. If you 
intercede on my behalf, the king might look kindly on me, so that my fortunes 
will flourish again. He might send me to the people who brought me up, because 
Monzer means much more to me than my own mother and father do.” 

Taynush agreed to help him, and Bahram, whose heart had been so troubled, 
was overjoyed. He was freed from his miserable confinement and, after 
distributing many goods to the poor, made preparations to leave. He gathered his 
people together and in the darkness of the night they set off like the wind. He 
said to his friends, “Thanks be to God that we’ve managed to get away, and are 
safe from fear.” When he arrived in the Yemen, men, women, and children came 
to greet him. No’man and Monzer and an escort of riders bearing lances set out, 
and the crush of people around Bahram was so great that the world grew dark 
with the dust they sent up. The two of them dismounted, and Bahram told them 
of his sorrows and hardships. Monzer wept to hear his words, and then asked 
after the fortunes of the king. Bahram replied, “May he never realize how evil 
his star is!” They took him to his former quarters and added new kindnesses to 
the old. Bahram spent his time in festivities and on the playing field, in largess 
and training for combat. 


Yazdegerd Travels to Tus and Is Killed by a White Horse 

And so for a time the father was in Iran while his splendid son lived in the 
desert. Yazdegerd grew concerned for his sovereignty and summoned advisors 
from every province. He told his astrologers to look at the stars and tell him 
when his death would come, and where his head and helmet would be darkened, 
how and when the flower of his life would wither. The astrologers said, “It is 
wrong for the king to think on the day of his death. When the fortune of the King 
of Kings declines, he will travel from here to the fountain of Su; he will gather 
his men together and go accompanied by the noise of drums and trumpets to 
Tus, and it is there that death will come to him.” The king swore an oath by the 
fire-temple of Khorad-Borzin and by the golden sun, saying, “My eyes will 
never see the fountain of Su, neither in times of joy nor in distress.” 

So three months passed, and then the world was thrown into turmoil by a 
rumor about the king’s blood, causing men to say that he had been an unjust 
shepherd to his flock, and now all his sins were returning to him. Blood began to 
flow from Yazdegerd’s nose one day, and doctors came to him from every 
quarter. They stopped the flow for a week with their medicines, but then it began 
again, coursing down like tears. His priest said to him, “Your majesty, you 
strayed from God’s path when you said you would escape the clutch of death, 
which is like the autumn wind that tears the leaves from the tree. You must go in 
a litter, by way of Shahd, to the fountain of Su. Pray to God and make your way, 
weeping and penitent, to that scorching land. Say ‘I am a helpless slave who 
trapped his own soul by an oath, and now I come before you, O just and 
righteous Lord, to know when my time will be fulfilled.’” 

The king accepted his advice, and with a caravan of three hundred litters he 
set off for Shahd. He stayed in his litter day and night, and still from time to time 
blood flowed from his nose. When he reached the fountain of Su, he came out of 
his litter and saw the lake there. He dabbed a little of its water on his head and 
prayed for God’s benevolence. In a short time the flow of blood from his nose 
stopped, and he and his advisors rested in relief. But then his pride and 
complacence took over and he said, “I’ve done what I was supposed to, so why 
should we sit here any longer?” Because of the king’s arrogance in ascribing 
everything good to himself, a white horse emerged from the lake. He had a 
round rump, like a wild ass, and short pasterns. He was tall and had black 
testicles and eyes like a crow’s; his tail reached to his black hooves, and he had a 
full mane. He galloped forward, raging like an angry lion, with foam flying from 
his mouth. Yazdegerd told his courtiers to have the horse brought to him. A 


herdsman and ten men experienced at breaking horses set off with a saddle and a 
long looped lariat. But what did Yazdegerd know of the secrets of God, who had 
set this monster in his path? The herdsman and his assistants were helpless to 
control the animal, and in his fury the king snatched the lariat and saddle from 
them and confidently approached the horse, who then stopped stock still, and 
stirred neither his forelegs nor his hind legs. He let the king fasten the bridle on 
him and stayed quiet as the saddle was put in place. The king pulled the saddle 
straps tight, and still the horse did not stir. Then the king went behind him to 
loop the crupper under his tail, and the stony-hoofed horse neighed loudly and 
kicked him so hard in the chest that his head and crown struck the dust. 
Yazdegerd had come from dust, and now he returned to the dust. When the king 
was dead, the horse galloped to the lake, which was the color of lapis lazuli, and 
he disappeared beneath its surface; in all the world no one had ever seen such a 
marvel. 

A cry like a roll of drums went up from the army: “O king, it was your fate 
that brought you to Tus.” Everyone present ripped their clothes and heaped dust 
on their bodies. Then a priest removed the dead king’s brain and the vital organs 
from the body cavity; filling the space with camphor and musk, he wrapped the 
body in brocade to keep it dry. The king’s corpse was conveyed to Pars ina 
golden coffin within a litter made of teak. So turns this world, and it is when you 
feel secure that you should fear its evil. Though you might rest, the world will 
not, and when you eat your bread, wine is the best comfort. While a man lives in 
this world, it is better to follow the faith than to act sinfully. 


The Nobles Set Khosrow on the Throne 

After the king of the world had been placed in his tomb, the Persian nobles 
gathered together and wept. The lords of the marches, the priests and great 
warriors, the wise counselors, all came to Pars and gathered at Yazdegerd’s 
tomb. Gostahm who had killed an elephant while he was mounted on a horse; 
Qaren, who was Goshasp’s son; Milad, the lord of Pars and a breaker of horses; 
Piruz, famous for his exploits with his mace; and all the other great lords whom 
Yazdegerd had treated with such contempt came together in Pars. Goshasp, an 
eloquent and literate man, addressed them: 


“My noble lords, no man has ever seen 
A king as wicked as this king has been: 
He hoarded all he’d stolen from the poor, 


His reign was murder, rapine, grief, and war. 
No one has heard of any former reign 

That was so evil, or that caused such pain. 

We do not want his seed here on the throne 

And from his dust we turn to God alone. 

Proud Bahram is his son, and we’ll soon find 
He has his father’s heart, and will, and mind; 
Besides, he talks of Monzer all the time. 

We can’t accept a king who’s steeped in crime!” 


All the Persian lords swore a solemn oath that they did not want anyone of the 
seed of Yazdegerd to assume the crown and throne. Then they rose, determined 
to find some other king. 

When news of Yazdegerd’s death spread among the nobility, various 
chieftains, such as Alan Shah, Bivard, and Shegnan with his golden diadem, 
each thought, “Sovereignty is now mine, from the earth to the moon’s sphere.” 
And since there was no king occupying the throne, the world was filled with 
discord. The priests and champions of Iran gathered in Pars and discussed the 
situation, wondering who was worthy of the throne and of such a task. They 
wanted a just and generous man to quell the disorder in the land, since without a 
king the world was like an uncultivated meadow. There was an old, chivalrous 
man from a wealthy and noble family, who lived in the borderlands. His name 
was Khosrow; he was benevolent and had been successful in his life. Iran’s 
chieftains bestowed the crown and throne on him, and an army of men from 
every quarter came to him. 


Bahram Gur Learns of His Father’s Death 

They told Bahram Gur of the bitter fortune that had come to the throne, saying, 
“Your father, illustrious among kings, has died, and in dying he took the good 
name of the kings with him. An assembly of nobles has sworn that they want no 
seed of his to be king, that Bahram, his son, is as he was, and that in both 
appearance and substance he takes after his father. They have placed a man 
named Khosrow on the throne.” 

Bahram scored his cheeks with his nails; he seemed desperate with sorrow at 
his father’s death, and for two weeks the wailing of men, women, and children 
could be heard throughout the Yemen. At the new moon, after he had mourned 
for his father for a month, he gave audience again. Monzer and No’man and a 


crowd of Arabs came weeping into his presence, burned by their sorrow. Monzer 
spoke: “Great prince, all of us arrive in this world destined for dust, and we 
come with no hope of a remedy for this. Whoever is born from his mother dies; I 
see man’s life as injustice, and it is death that is justice.” 

Bahram Gur said, “If the name of king passes from my family, a great glory 
will depart. These usurpers will attack your plains, and the land of the Arabs will 
become like a pit of death. Mourn for my father, then think how you can help 
me.” Monzer chivalrously replied, “This land is mine, and I pass my days 
hunting in these plains. You should mount the throne and govern the land, and 
may your reign last forever!” All the nobles supported what he had said and rose 
up before the young ambitious prince, ready for war. Monzer said to No’man, 
“Bring together an army of ten thousand young lions from the Shayban and 
Qaysian tribes, then I will show these Persians who is king!” 

No’man gathered together a mighty army of warriors armed with swords and 
lances and ordered them to begin their attacks and to subdue the land. They 
trampled all the marshy country beneath their horses’ hooves, as far as 
Ctesiphon; the people had no protector, and men, women, and children were 
taken captive. The throne was powerless and the world became a place of 
plunder and burning; news reached Rome, China, India, Makran, and the land of 
the Turks that there was no worthy candidate to be king. All these peoples 
prepared to attack, stretching out their hands toward Iran, and each thinking to 
make their own lord the King of Kings. 


The Persians Write to Monzer: His Response 
When the Persians became aware of this, they scrambled to find some remedy 
for their plight. They chose an eloquent and perceptive priest named Javanui as 
their messenger; he was to go to Monzer and say to him, “Protector of Iran and 
support of the valiant; when our throne became vacant our country turned as red 
with blood as a francolin’s wing, and we asked you to be our lord, since we 
thought our land worthy of you. But now you are plundering us, shedding our 
blood, and spreading rapine and warfare through our land, although previously 
you were not an evil ruler. Fear men’s curses and reproaches. You are an old 
man—take heed of what we say, and may it please and benefit you. There is 
another judge besides you, one who is above the understanding of the highest of 
men.” 

Javanui traveled to the land of the Arabs, where he spoke to Monzer and gave 
him the letter with which he had been entrusted, repeating all the Persians had 


said to him. The Arab king heard him out but did not reply to the charges. 
Instead he said, “You are a wise man, seeking a way out of misfortune; tell the 
King of Kings what you have said. If you want a response, tell King Bahram 
what you have told me; he will show you what must be done.” He sent a courtier 
to take Javanui to the prince. When he saw him, Javanui was astonished at the 
might of Bahram’s chest and shoulders, at his strength and stature, and called 
down God’s blessings on his head. The prince’s cheeks were the color of red 
wine, and his hair exhaled the scent of musk. The learned messenger lost all his 
dignity of rank; he became confused, and his message went completely out of his 
head. Bahram saw that the man was bewildered, and questioned him at length, 
gently and kindly, and sat him on a throne. When Javanui had come back to 
himself, Bahram asked him why he had made the arduous journey from Persia. 

He sent Javanui back to Monzer, with a courtier, saying that Monzer was to 
write a suitable answer to the letter. Monzer smiled, his face opening like a 
blossoming flower when he heard this reply. He set about writing his answer, 
and said to Javanui, “You’re a wise man, and you know that whoever does evil 
will suffer punishment. I heard your message and the greetings you brought from 
Iran’s chieftains. Say to them, ‘Who began this? Who was senseless enough to 
start this war? Bahram Gur, the King of Kings, is here, splendid, powerful, and 
possessed of an army, and if you drag a serpent from its hole, you’re likely to see 
your skirts dragged through blood. If I had been the Persians’ advisor, they 
wouldn’t have been overrun in this way.’” Javanui had seen Bahram’s face and 
talked with him, and he pondered whether Bahram was worthy of the throne. As 
he listened to Monzer, he had an idea and said: “You are a noble lord who needs 
no one else’s advice. Since the Persians lost their wisdom, many of their leaders 
have been killed. I’m an old man looking to save my reputation, and if you will 
hear me out, I will put a plan to you. You and Bahram Gur, as King of Kings, 
must come to Iran without warfare or strife. Come with your hawks and hunting 
cheetahs, as befits a splendid king. You have heard what the Persians said, and 
no harm will come to you there. You are a sensible man, far from all foolishness, 
and you will know what must be said in such circumstances.” Monzer gave him 
gifts and sent him happily on his way back to Iran. 


Bahram Gur Travels to Jahrom, and the Persians Come to Meet 
Him 

Monzer, Bahram, and an advisor discussed the situation in private. They agreed 
that, together with a group of warriors, they would travel to Iran. Monzer chose 


thirty thousand Arabs armed with lances and daggers, paid them in gold, and 
filled their leaders’ heads with ambitious hopes for the expedition. News of this 
reached the Persians as Javanui arrived at the assembly of their chieftains. The 
leaders were apprehensive as to what would happen, and they gathered in the 
fire-temple of Borzin to pray, asking God to convert their state of warfare to one 
of peace and happiness. 

Monzer approached Jahrom, traveling across the waterless plain. King 
Bahram pitched his pavilion and the army gathered about him. He said to 
Monzer, “You’ve traveled from the Yemen to Jahrom, and now their armies and 
ours are face to face. What should we do now? Fight, or negotiate?” Monzer 
replied, “Call their chieftains here and prepare a table for them. Talk with them 
and listen to what they have to say, and if anyone gets angry, you must stay 
calm. We shall see what they are hiding and who they want to nominate as the 
world’s king. When we know what they intend, we can take appropriate 
measures. If things go easily, we can put aside thoughts of war, and if they want 
to fight, if they won’t fall in with our plans and show themselves like leopards 
eager for prey, then I'll convert this plain of Jahrom into a sea of blood. But I 
think that when they see your face and stature and goodness, and how wise, 
cultivated, patient, knowledgeable and dignified you are, they won’t want 
anyone else for their crown and throne but you. And if they make a mistake and 
think they can deprive you of your position, then I and these cavalry will use our 
swords to bring the Day of Judgment down on their heads. When they see our 
innumerable army and our dignity and discipline, and when they reflect that 
kingship is your inheritance, passed down from father to son as is right, and 
when they consider that bloodshed is our trade and that God is our support, then 
they are not going to want anyone but you as their king.” Bahram’s heart was 
filled with joy at these words, and he laughed aloud. 

As the sun rose above the mountain peaks the Persian nobles prepared to 
welcome Bahram. Meanwhile, Bahram was seated on an ivory throne, and he 
wore a crown of great value. He held court according to the protocol of a King 
of Kings: on one side of him Monzer sat, and on the other No’man, his sword in 
his hand. Around his pavilion, circle upon circle, stood Arab chieftains. A 
number of the noblest of the Iranians approached the pavilion threshold; Bahram 
gave orders that the flap be drawn back, and their arrival was announced in a 
loud voice. They called down blessings on the king’s head and wept as they did 
so. When they came into King Bahram’s presence and saw the splendor of his 
crown and throne, they said with one voice, “May you prosper, and may evil be 


far from you!” The king of kings questioned them kindly, then motioned them to 
places according to their rank. 

He said, “My noble lords, you have seen the world and are experienced in its 
ways; from father to son, sovereignty has passed to me; why then is the choice 
now up to you?” The Persians answered, “Do not prolong our sufferings. None 
of us want you as king; even if you have an army to back up your claim, this 
land is ours. The seed you’re from has brought us grief and sorrow, filling our 
days and nights with sighs and torment.” Bahram answered, “It is true that 
everyone will wish to be a king. But even if you did not want me, why did you 
put someone in my place without consulting me?” A priest replied, “If you will 
join us in choosing a king, everyone will praise the process.” 

Three days passed while they searched for a king among the Persians. Then 
they wrote down the names of a hundred nobles worthy of the crown, throne, 
and royal belt. One of these hundred was Bahram, whose royal charm won many 
hearts. The hundred were reduced to fifty, and the debate grew long and earnest. 
Bahram was the first contender among the fifty, and this was so irrespective of 
the fact that it was his father’s place he was seeking. From fifty they came to 
thirty, and from this thirty the wise priest reduced the number to four, of whom 
Bahram was still the first. But when the discussion seemed close to a conclusion, 
all the older Persians said, “We don’t want Bahram; he is brave, foolhardy, and 
arrogant.” Shouting broke out among the chieftains, and men’s hearts seethed 
with anger. 

Monzer said to the Iranians, “I want to know for good or ill why you are so 
troubled about this young prince.” In answer the nobles summoned many 
Persians who had suffered under Yazdegerd. One by one they presented 
themselves: one had had both his hands and feet cut off; another’s body was in 
one place but his mind in another; one had lost both hands, both ears, and his 
tongue, and he was like a body that had no soul; another had had his shoulder 
blades removed; another his eyes gouged out. Monzer stared at these men in 
bewilderment, and rage swept through him. Bahram was deeply affected by what 
he saw, and he cried out to his father’s dust, “If you shut your eyes to human 
happiness, did you have to steep your soul in the fires of hell as well?” Monzer 
said to Bahram, “This evil is not something that can be pushed aside for them. 
You heard what they had to say, now you must give your answer. Anger does 
not become a prince.” 


Bahram Speaks to the Persians About His Qualifications to Be King 


Bahram said, “My noble lords, you know the world’s ways, and you have 
spoken truly. There are even worse things still unsaid, and it is right that I 
reproach my father. All this is bitter in my mouth and has darkened my soul. His 
palace was my prison, and it was God who saved me; Taynush freed me from his 
snare. I fled to Monzer for refuge because the king had never shown me any 
kindness. May men never have his nature; if that were to happen, all trace of 
humanity would disappear. I thank God that I have wisdom, and that my soul is 
nourished on wisdom. I have prayed to God that he guide me, so that I can 
cleanse men’s souls and hearts of all the evil this king did. I am a God-fearing 
man, and I live for my subjects’ well-being: I shall be a shepherd and my 
subjects my flock. I will seek only peace and justice. I am magnanimous, 
cultivated, and careful in my judgments. An unjust king has no sound judgment: 
his wretchedness makes him vile and perverse, and one should weep for such a 
tyrant. Sovereignty passes to me from father to son, and I am wise and 
benevolent. On my mother’s side I am descended from King Shemiran, and my 
wisdom equals that of my ancestors. I have wisdom, good judgment and 
greatness; I ride well, I am humane, and I am strong. I consider no one my equal 
in manliness, not in fighting or feasting or any other matter. I have a hidden 
treasure, which is those illustrious men who are loyal to their sovereign. I will 
make the world flourish from end to end with justice, and may all of you flourish 
and live happily! I will rebuild those lands the king’s injustice destroyed, and 
make them prosperous again. 

“Now I will make a pact with you, which I will swear before God to keep. 
Let us bring the ivory throne of the King of Kings and set the crown upon it. 
And then bring two savage lions from the wilderness and set them on either side 
of the crown. We’|I tie them one on each side, and whoever desires to be king 
will go between them, take the crown, and place it on his own head. Then he will 
sit as king between the two lions: the king in the middle, the crown above him, 
the throne beneath him. We’|I have no one but that man as our king, even if 
other candidates are just and nobly born. And if you reject my plan and choose 
some ambitious contender in place of me as your king, you will have horsemen’s 
spears to prick and goad you. I and Monzer and our maces and swords will be 
there; Arab warriors have never learned how to flee from the battlefield, and 
we'll raise the dust of warfare over your kingdom and its provinces. Now, reply 
to what I have said, and use your best judgment as you decide.” Then he 
retreated into his tent, and the world was astonished by his words. 


The Persian priests and nobles who heard his speech said, “He possesses the 
divine farr; this is not said out of perversity or folly. He speaks about nothing 
but justice and we should rejoice in this. And as for his talk of wild lions and 
placing the crown and throne between them, God will not question us if the lions 
tear him in pieces, because it was his idea. Not that we would be pleased if he 
were to die; and if he does gain the crown, his glory will surpass Feraydun’s. We 
want only him as our king and agree to what he has proposed.” 


Bahram Takes the Crown from Between the Lions 
The next day at dawn Bahram sat on his throne and summoned the Persians to 
him. They talked about the previous day’s discussions and then the priests said: 


“We see you are the wisest of the wise: 

Tf, by your skill and bravery, you rise 

To be the King of Kings, what will you do 
To further justice? How will you renew 
The ways of righteousness, and set us free 
From fears of theft and royal tyranny?” 


Bahram replied, “My actions will be greater than my words. I shall avoid 
injustice and ambition, and I shall distribute territories to those who are fit to 
rule. I will hold the world by justice, and this will be my happiness and security. 
I will relieve the sufferings of the poor. If a man sins I shall admonish him, and 
if he sins again, I shall imprison him. I shall pay the army at the appointed times 
and make the wise rejoice. My heart is as I speak, and I will turn my soul aside 
from all perversity and darkness. If a man dies without heirs, I shall distribute his 
goods to the poor, keeping nothing for my own treasury, since my heart is not set 
on the pleasures of this fleeting world. I will consult with the wise, and by their 
advice break the back of foolish desires. If I want to embark on any new venture 
Ill consult the priests first. If a man comes to me seeking justice, I shall not 
dismiss the assembly, but dispense justice to whoever desires it, saying nothing 
but what is right, and punishing evil, as a king must. All this I swear by God, as 
wisdom guides my tongue.” 

When the assembled nobles and priests heard his answer, they regretted what 
they had said before. Those who had sinned sought to remedy their wrongdoing 
and said, “Who is more worthy to rule than he is? In chivalry, eloquence, 
wisdom, and lineage, no one has ever been born who equals him. God has 


created him from justice, and may evil never touch him!” They addressed 
Bahram, “You possess the divine farr, and our souls accept you as our king. 
None of us knew of your abilities and knowledge, or of your soul’s purity. But 
Persia has sworn allegiance to Khosrow, who is descended from Pashin; we are 
bound by our oath to him, and you could say we are at his mercy. If he were to 
remain as Persia’s king, all our country will be rent apart by lions’ claws, with 
one side supporting Bahram and the other rallying to Khosrow. But it would be 
just for you to be king and for the world from now on to be beneath your 
command. We could use your proposed combat with lions as a pretext, and then 
no one would put himself forward as a candidate.” Bahram agreed to this, as it 
was he who had originally suggested it. 

The custom of that time was that when a new king was to be crowned the 
chief priest and three wise advisors went before him and placed him on the 
throne. They called down blessings on the crown, which was placed on his head 
in the name of the Kayanid kings; then the chief priest placed his cheeks in joy 
against the king’s chest. Lastly the king distributed largess to the needy, using 
the goods that had been brought to him in homage, and a throne and crown were 
presented to the chief priest, who returned to his home in the plains. 

The warrior Gostahm kept two savage lions in chains, and handed these over 
to a priest. They dragged the animals to the foot of the ivory throne and secured 
them there: the men who handled the chains almost fainted from fear. Placed on 
the throne, in one comer, was the royal crown. The world watched, wondering 
what would happen to the prince, who seemed so blessed by fortune. 

Bahram and Khosrow, their hearts filled with apprehension confronted the 
lions. When Khosrow saw the two savage beasts and the crown placed between 
them, he turned to the priests and said, 


“Only a prince ambitious for renown 

Deserves to reign and to possess the crown; 

And then I’m old, while he is young and strong— 
I can’t fight lions’ claws, I’ve lived too long. 

Let him display his prowess, let us see 

His youth and health enjoy their victory.” 


Bahram said, “What you say is true, and there is no reason to hide the truth.” At 
that, he seized his ox-headed mace while the world looked on in wonder. A 
priest said to him, “My lord, you are wise, knowledgeable, and nobly born; who 


has ordered you into this combat against lions? What more can you desire than 
the crown? Don’t lose your life seeking sovereignty and pointlessly feed your 
body to the fishes. We are innocent of this, it is your doing; there’s no need for 
it, all the world is with you.” Bahram replied, “You’re a seeker of religious truth, 
and you and everyone else are innocent in this affair. I will face these lions in 
combat, and it is I who desire to fight against them!” The priest said, “Before 
you go further in this, cleanse your soul of sin, before God.” Bahram did as he 
advised, repenting of his sins and purifying his heart. 


wey, 


sg 
F ie Ae la PU AL ASIUE, salts 
WP Cc Ope RCEIm le 
Cz e Nt } th 


f 
i 





Then he strode forward with his mace. As soon as they saw him the lions 
were eager to attack, and one of them broke free of his chains and bounded 
toward the prince, who struck him on the head with his mace, so that the light 
faded from the animal’s eyes. Then he turned to the other one and struck him too 
a mighty blow on the head, so that the blood flowed down from his eyes onto his 
chest. 

The world conqueror sat on the ivory throne, placed the splendid crown on 
his head, and prayed to God, who shows the right way to the lost, as his refuge. 
Khosrow came before him and paid homage to him, saying, “Great king, may 





your reign be glorious, and may the world’s heroes stand before you as your 
slaves. You are our king, and we are your slaves who wish you well.” The 
nobles poured jewels over him and called down blessings on the new wearer of 
the crown. The world rang with acclamations, and all this happened in the month 
of Azar, on the day called Sorush. 


hen Bahram became king he rewarded Monzer and No’man with splendid 

gifts, and at Monzer’s intercession forgave those who had opposed his 
becoming king. He also treated the interim king Khosrow well and compensated 
everyone who had suffered under Yazdegerd. He made his own younger brother, 
Nersi, the commander of his armies. Then he declared a tax amnesty and burned 
the tax records, an act which caused rejoicing throughout the country. 


THE REIGN OF BAHRAM GUR 


Once Bahram was established in his reign 
Grief fled, and pleasure flourished once again; 
Horses were his delight, and he would play 

At polo or go hunting every day. 


The Story of Bahram Gur and Mehrbandad 
Bahram enjoyed hunting with cheetahs, and one day when he was occupied in 
this manner, with a swift horse under him and with his hawk on his wrist, he 
came on a well-wooded place that looked like the home of people who’d been 
blessed by good fortune. The green pastures and foliage were like a paradise, but 
Bahram could see neither men nor flocks there. He said, “There must be lions 
around: this is somewhere for brave men to show their mettle.” He readied his 
bow, and as he did so a male lion appeared and gave a mighty roar. The king’s 
arrow pierced its side and entered its heart. Seeing this, the female lion’s heart 
was wrung, and she roared and sprang at Bahram, so that her claws scored his 
body. He struck at her with his sword, and the valiant beast sank back defeated. 
An old man emerged from the trees and spoke sweetly to Bahram. His name 
was Mehrbandad, and he was overjoyed at the king’s sword-stroke. He was a 
farmer, a God-fearing man, and the wooded area was his home. He came 
forward and congratulated the king and bowed before him. 


He said, “My lord, may heaven favor you 

And make you prosperous in all you do! 

My noble lord, I farm these fields—I own 

The land here, both the waste tracts and the sown, 
As well as donkeys, cows, and flocks of sheep. 
These lions’ attacks have made me curse and weep, 
But now through you I’m free of them—God sent 
Your strength and prowess as their punishment! 


Stay with me for a while, and when you dine 

I'll set before you honey, milk, and wine: 

I’ve plenty of good lamb, and there’s a glade 
Whose trees will give us fruit and ample shade.” 


Bahram dismounted and saw that the green landscape filled with streams was a 
delightful place for a young man to spend time. Mehrbandad went to the nearby 
village and returned with the village elders and a group of musicians. He 
slaughtered a number of plump sheep and came to Bahram with a golden goblet 
in his hand. After their meal, cups were placed before them, surrounded by roses 
and wild saffron flowers. When Mehrbandad had grown tipsy with the wine, he 
said to Bahram, “You’re a fine, fortunate fighter, and you should know that you 
look just like a king and deserve a golden throne and all its pomp and 
ceremony!” Bahram replied, “You’re right, and he who limns our faces has 
created them as he wishes them to be, and chooses whomever he wishes to 
choose. If I look just like a king, I bestow on you as a gift all the area here, the 
forest and the surrounding land.” 

Then he mounted his horse, rode back to his beautiful palace quite drunk, and 
slept that night in his orchard. 


The Story of Kebrui; Bahram Forbids the Drinking of Wine 
At dawn the next morning Bahram called for wine, and his courtiers began 
another round of merry-making. At that moment the headman of a village 
entered with a present of fruit: he brought camel-loads of pomegranates, apples 
and quinces, and also bouquets of flowers fit for the royal presence. The king 
welcomed this man, who had the ancient, noble name of Kebrui, and motioned 
him to a place among the young men there. He handed him a large goblet of 
wine, that held two maund. The visitor was pleased at the king’s and his 
courtiers’ attention, and when he had drained the cup, he caught sight of another 
and felt a craving for it in his heart. In front of all the nobles there he reached out 
and seized it. He stood and toasted the king, and said, “I’m a wine-drinker, and 
Kebrui is my name. This goblet holds five maund of wine, and I’m going to 
drain it seven times in front of this assembly. Then I’ll go back to my village, 
and no one will hear any drunken shouts from me.” And to the astonishment of 
the other drinkers there he drained the huge cup seven times. 

With the king’s permission he left the court, to see how the wine would work 
in him. As he started back on his journey across the plain, the wine began to take 


effect. He urged his horse forward, leaving the crowd who were accompanying 
him behind, and rode to the foothills of a mountain. He dismounted in a 
sheltered place and went to sleep in the mountain’s shadow. A black raven flew 
down from the mountain and pecked out his eyes as he slept. The group that had 
been following along behind found him lying dead at the foot of the mountain, 
with his eyes pecked away and his horse standing nearby at the roadside. His 
servants, who were part of the group, began wailing and cursed the assembly and 
the wine. 

When Bahram awoke from sleep, one of his companions came to him and 
said, “Kebrui’s bright eyes were pecked out by a raven while he was drunk at the 
foot of a mountain.” The king’s face turned pale, and he grieved for Kebrui’s 
fate. Immediately he sent a herald to the palace door to announce: “My lords, all 
who have glory and intelligence! Wine is forbidden to everyone throughout the 
world, both noblemen and commoners alike.” 


The Story of the Cobbler’s Son and the Lion: Wine Is Declared 
Permissible 
A year passed, and wine remained forbidden. No wine was drunk when Bahram 
assembled his court, or when he asked for readings from the books that told of 
ancient times. And so it was, until a shoemaker’s son married a rich, wellborn, 
and respectable woman. But the shoemaker’s boy’s awl was not hard enough for 
its task, and his mother wept bitterly. She had a little wine hidden away; she 
brought her son back to her house and said to him, “Drink seven glasses of this 
wine, and when 

You feel you’re ready, go to her again: 

You’ll break her seal once you two are alone— 

A pickax made of felt can’t split a stone.” 


The boy drank seven glasses down, and then an eighth, and the fire of passion 
flared up in him immediately. The glasses made him bold, and he went home 
and was able to open the recalcitrant door; then he went back to his parents’ 
house well pleased with himself. It happened that a lion had escaped from the 
king’s lion-house and was wandering in the roads. The cobbler’s son was so 
drunk that he couldn’t distinguish one thing properly from another; he ran out 
and sat himself on the roaring lion’s back, and hung on by grasping hold of the 
animal’s ears. The lion keeper came running with a chain in one hand and a 
lariat in the other and saw the cobbler’s son sitting on the lion as unconceredly 


as if he were astride a donkey. He ran to the court and told the king what he had 
seen, which was a sight no one had ever heard of before. The king was 
astonished and summoned his advisors. He said to them, “Inquire as to what 
kind of a man this cobbler is.” While they were talking, the boy’s mother ran in 
and told the king what had happened. 


She said to him, “May you live happily 

As long as time endures, your majesty! 

This boy of mine’s just starting out on life— 

He’d found himself a satisfactory wife. 

But when the time came. . . well, his implement 
Was just too soft, and he was impotent. 

So then I gave the boy (but privately, 

To make him father of a family) 

Three glasses of good wine; at once his face 

Shone with a splendid ruby’s radiant grace, 

The floppy felt stirred, lifted up its head, 

And turned into a strong, hard bone instead. 

Three drafts of wine gave him his strength and glory 
Who would have thought the king would hear the story?” 


The king laughed at the old woman’s words and said, “This story is not one to 
hide!” He turned to his chief priest and said, “From now on wine is allowed 
again. When a man drinks he must choose to drink enough so that he can sit 
astride a lion without the lion trampling him, but not so much that when he 
leaves the king’s presence a raven will peck his eyes out.” Immediately a herald 
announced at the palace door, “My lords who wear belts made of gold! A man 
may drink wine as long as he looks to how the matter will end and is aware of 
his own capacity. When wine leads you to pleasure, see that it does not leave 
your body weak and incapable.” 


Bahram Gur’s Priest Ruins and Revives a Village 

Another day Bahram went out hunting at dawn with a group of companions. His 
vizier Hormozd rode on his left, and a priest on his right, and the two told him 
tales of Jamshid and Feraydun. They took dogs, cheetahs, and hawks with them 
and searched through the morning, but by noon they’d found no trace of either 
onager or deer, and when the sun shone in the heavens like a bright coin, 


Bahram irritatedly made his way back from his expedition. A green area, filled 
with men and flocks, appeared, and many people gathered round to stare at the 
hunters. Bahram was weary and feeling short-tempered; he’d hoped to dismount 
and rest in the village, but no one came forward to greet him, and the place 
seemed inhabited by donkeys. He grew angry with the people there and looked 
askance at them, saying to his priest, “May this green, prosperous village be a 
den 

Of beasts—a wild, uncultivated fen— 

And may the water dry in every ditch 

And turn to stagnant mud as black as pitch!” 


The priest knew how to fulfill Bahram’s command and he turned aside from the 
road and entered the village. He said, “This green area, filled with houses, 
people, and flocks, has pleased King Bahram and he has a new plan for you. 
Rejoice in your hearts, you are all masters now and can make this a splendid 
place. Here women and children are masters too, and no one has to obey anyone 
else. Laborer and headman are equal: men, women, and children, you are all 
headmen of the village!” A cry of joy went up from the inhabitants; in their 
minds men and women were the same, and laborers and servants were equal to 
the village headman. Since the young men now felt no fear of authority, they cut 
off the heads of the village elders: everyone became muddled up with everyone 
else, and bloodshed became commonplace. The area became as confused and 
horrifying as the Day of Judgment, and the inhabitants fled. A few weak, old 
men stayed there, but every sign of activity or prosperity had gone. The whole 
village took on a rundown look: trees withered, irrigation ditches dried up, 
houses were in ruins, fields were uncultivated, men and their flocks were 
nowhere to be seen. 

A year passed, and the following spring Bahram again went hunting in that 
area. He reached the place that had seemed so pleasant and prosperous, but the 
village he remembered was not there. All the trees were dead, the houses in 
ruins, the fields empty of flocks and people. Bahram’s heart was wrung to see 
this; he feared God and wished to act justly. He said to his priest, “Ruzbeh, it 
hurts me to see this lovely place in ruins: go quickly and provide them with 
money from my treasury, so that they won’t suffer any more.” 

The priest left his king’s side and rode into the ruins. He went from house to 
house and finally found an old man who had no work. He dismounted, greeted 


him politely, and invited the man to sit with him. He said, “Old man, who ruined 
this prosperous place?” 


The old man answered him, “By chance one day 
The king and his companions came this way. 

A foolish priest with no sense in his head, 

One of those noble idiots, born and bred, 
Declared to us, ‘You’re all the masters here, 
Social distinctions are to disappear. 

The ranks of those who rule and those who serve 
Are niceties that no one need observe.’ 

As soon as he’d said that our little village 

Was filled with fights and plundering and pillage: 
May God reward that man’s stupidity 

And fill his days with grief and misery!” 


Grieved to hear this, Ruzbeh asked, “Who is your village headman?” The man 
replied, 


“A headman’s for a place where grain is grown, 
And men can reap the harvest they have sown.” 


Ruzbeh said, “You are to be the headman here, you’re to rule over these ruins. 
Ask the king for cash, seed, cows, and donkeys, and bring back to your village 
whomever you can find who is destitute. You are to be the headman and they’re 
to do as you tell them. And don’t curse that priest who came here before, as he 
didn’t want to say what he did. If you need help from the king’s court, I’ll send 
you whatever you need. All you have to do is ask.” 

The old man was pleased to hear this and forgot his former sorrows. He 
immediately went from house to house to find men to work on the irrigation 
channels and to start cultivating the land again. They asked neighboring villages 
for donkeys and cows and set to work making the plain productive. The 
headman and his villagers worked hard at planting trees everywhere, and their 
hearts were filled with happiness each time they saw a house had been rebuilt. 
All those who had fled from the place weeping and wailing came back one by 
one when they heard of the success of the old headman’s efforts. The 
watercourses in the streets were rebuilt, the stocks of hens, cows, donkeys, and 


sheep multiplied in the pastures, and the trees that people planted everywhere 
made the former ruins look like a paradise. 

By the following year the village had responded to the old man’s efforts and 
was as he wished. Once again, at spring time, the king went hunting with his 
priest, Ruzbeh, and for a third time they came to the village. Bahram Gur saw 
the land under cultivation, the herds of animals, the fine buildings, the plains and 
mountain slopes covered with sheep and lambs, the water courses coming down 
from the foothills, and the village filled with handsome men. He turned to his 
priest and said, “Ruzbeh, what have you done? This fine village was in ruins, its 
people and animals had fled. What did you give them so that they were able to 
make it flourish again?” 

Ruzbeh answered, “One speech was enough to bring this ancient village to its 
knees, and one idea was enough to make it prosperous again, and so rejoice the 
heart of Persia’s king. You had ordered me to destroy the village using money 
from your treasury, but I was afraid of God’s judgment and the reproaches of 
noblemen and commoners. I saw the strife that results when one heart has two 
thoughts, and knew that when a town has two masters it cannot survive. I told 
the village elders that there was no master over them, that women were masters 
now, and children too, as were servants and laborers. When the commoners 
became masters, the masters’ heads were brought down to the dust. This lovely 
place was destroyed by a speech, and I escaped reproach and did not fear God’s 
judgment. But then the king forgave them, so I went to them and suggested 
another course of action. I set a wise old man over them as their headman, 
someone who was eloquent and knowledgeable. Through his efforts he restored 
the village’s prosperity and made his inferiors’ hearts happy. Once one man was 
put in charge of the rest, things went well again: goodness increased and evil 
decreased. I showed them the way of evil and then I opened the door to God for 
them. If a man uses speech in the right place, it is worth more than fine jewels. If 
you want your soul to have no troubles, wisdom must be your king, and 
language your champion. May the king’s heart be eternally happy, triumphing 
over all evil and ruin.” 

The king responded, “Ruzbeh, you are worthy of a crown!” He gave this 
clever and perspicacious man a purse of gold coins and a royal robe of honor, 
raising his head to the clouds in glory. 


The Story of Bahram Gur and the Four Sisters 


One week the king went out hunting with his priests and advisors, and they 
stayed for a month drinking wine and hunting game in the mountains and plains. 
When they had had their fill of this, the king set off in good spirits to the city 
again, but night overtook them on the way and the world turned black before 
them. The group pushed on through the darkness, telling stories of the ancient 
kings. Then Bahram saw a fire in the distance, like those the king lights during 
the winter festival. He stared at the fire and made out a pleasant village to one 
side of it. In front of the village there was a mill, where the village elders were 
sitting, scattered in little groups. On the other side of the fire were some young 
women wearing chaplets of flowers in their hair, and musicians were sitting all 
round them. They were singing songs about the king’s exploits, and as one song 
ended they started another. Their faces shone like the moon, their musky hair 
was arranged in ringlets, and there were jewels sewn onto their clothes. They 
were lined up on the grass in front of the mill door: each of them held a bouquet 
of flowers, and they were half-drunk with wine and happiness. Loudly their song 
rang out: “Long live King Bahram, glorious and brave, 

To whom the turning heavens are a slave, 

Whose hair is musky, and whose handsome face 

Is red as wine and filled with kindly grace— 

They call him Bahram Gur, and every day 

Wild onagers and lions are his prey!” 


Hearing their song, the king tugged on his rein and went over toward them. As 
he approached he saw that the plain was filled from end to end with young 
women, each of whom was as lovely as the full moon, and he realized that he 
was in no hurry to reach the city. He ordered the wine servers to bring him some 
wine and invite a few of the women who were drinking there to come to him. A 
servant put a crystal goblet in Bahram’s hand, and the four leaders of the young 
women stepped forward. There names were Moshk, Sisanak, Naz, and Susanak. 
Tall, and as lovely as the spring, they held hands as they approached the king. 
They sang a song to Bahram, the wise and famous King of Kings, and his heart 
was charmed by them. He said to the four of them, “Your faces are like roses; 
whose daughters are you, and why have you lit this fire?” One answered him, 
“And you, a horseman tall as a cypress tree, the image of a king in every way, 
know that our father is an old miller who is out hunting in these mountains with 
his bow. He should return soon, now the night has grown dark and he finds it 
hard to see in the darkness.” 


And at that moment the miller returned from the mountain, bringing the game 
he had killed. When he saw Bahram, the good old man bowed his face down to 
the dust, and Bahram ordered that a golden goblet be handed to him. He said, 
“Why do you keep these four, whose faces are as lovely as the sun? It’s time 
they were married.” The old man called down blessings on him and said, “There 
are no husbands for these four girls of mine. They’ve reached the right age, and 
they have lived modestly, but they have no wealth; I don’t want to say any more 
than this now.” Bahram said to him, “Give these four to me, and see you don’t 
have any more daughters!” The old man replied, “My lord, don’t say such 
things. We’ve no land or income, no gold, no house, no cows or donkeys.” 
Bahram replied, “Then they will suit me; I must have them just as they are, with 
no dowry.” The old man said, “All four are your wives then, to serve you in the 
privacy of your home: you’ve seen their good and bad qualities, and you liked 
what you saw.” Bahram answered him, “I accept all four, from the hand of the 
good man who raised them.” 

Having said this he jumped up, and the sound of his escort’s galloping horses 
was heard on the plain. He had his eunuchs take the four young women to the 
king’s harem. One by one his escort came forward, and it took the whole night 
for them all to pass by. The miller was astonished at this and spent the night 
brooding on what it could mean. He said to his wife, “How did this nobleman, a 
man as radiant as the moon, and with such an entourage, come to our mill in the 
darkness of the night?” His wife replied, “He saw the fire from far away and 
heard the girls singing.” Then the miller said, “Tell me wife, is this going to end 
well or badly?” She answered, “It’s God’s doing; when he saw them he didn’t 
ask about their family, and he wasn’t concerned about their wealth. He was 
searching the world for a woman as lovely as the moon, and he didn’t care about 
money or royal rank. If idol worshippers in China saw girls as lovely as ours, 
they’d forget about their idols!” And so the two talked all night about evil men 
and good, until the sun shone on the mountain slopes and the world glowed like 
a lamp. 

When night had turned to day, a local landowner came to the old miller and 
said, “Luck came to your pillow in the dark night, and the green branch of your 
tree has borne fruit. In last night’s darkness King Bahram was returning from a 
hunting trip. He saw your celebration and the fire, tugged at his reins, and came 
to this spot. Now your daughters are his wives and live in comfort and security 
in his harem. Their faces, hair, and elegance made them fit for a king; Bahram, 
the King of Kings, is your son-in-law, and in every country from now on men 


will remember you. He has given you this entire province; grieve no more, you 
can live free from sorrow and fear. Give us your orders, we are all yours to 
command. We are your subjects; no, more, we are your slaves!” 

The miller and his wife stared at him in wonder, repeating the name of God 
over and over again. The landowner said, “Those faces and that hair brought a 
husband down from the sun’s sphere.” 


Bahram Gur Finds Jamshid’s Treasure 
Bahram Gur was out hunting with his priests and companions another time when 
one of his devoted subjects approached the group, running like the wind and 
carrying a spade. He asked where he could find King Bahram. Everyone said to 
him, “What do you want the king for? Can’t you tell us?” He answered, “I’m 
saying nothing until I see the king’s face.” A priest said, “What do you know 
about the king’s face? Tell me what you have to say.” When finally they took 
him to the king, the man said, “I have something to tell you in private.” Bahram 
gave a tug to his reins and rode apart from his companions, and then the man 
told him, “You’re a king who’s seen the world, but listen to what I have to say. 
I’m the landowner here; the crops this area produces and its buildings are all 
mine. I was channeling water to irrigate the land so that I could get the best yield 
from it, and at one point the force of the water undermined the earth and a hole 
appeared. Then I heard a terrifying cry, followed by the clash of cymbals; that 
noise indicates there’s a treasure there.” Bahram rode over to the area the man 
indicated and saw a green landscape with irrigation channels in it. He summoned 
a number of workmen with spades who had to be brought from far away; then he 
dismounted, and a tent was pitched for him in the pastures. Night fell, the 
soldiers in his entourage lit candles, and fires burned throughout the camp. 
When the sun rose above the sea and its blue surface glittered with light, 
workmen gathered from every quarter. They started to dig, and soon the whole 
plain was covered with ditches. Just as they were getting tired a structure like a 
mountain appeared in the ground. It was a building made of baked brick and 
covered with splendid plaster work. The workmen excavated all round it, until a 
door appeared. A priest and a companion entered and saw a long, wide room 
several cubits high. Two bulls made of gold were standing in front of a feeding 
trough, also made of gold, in which there were emeralds mixed with rubies. The 
bulls were like two signs of Taurus; their bellies were hollowed out and filled 
with artificial pomegranates, apples, and quinces. In the midst of the quinces 
were splendid pearls, each as clear as a drop of water. The bulls were 


represented as old, with wrinkled foreheads, and their eyes were made of rubies. 
All around them were lions and wild asses with eyes made of rubies or crystal, 
and there were golden pheasants and peacocks whose breasts and eyes were 
made of jewels. 

The priest returned to the king, and said to him politely, “Come, your 
majesty; we have found a treasure to eclipse all others. There is a room full of 
jewels, to which the heavens hid the key.” Bahram replied, “See if anyone has 
written his name on this treasure, saying it is his. See whose it is, or in whose 
reign it was collected here.” The priest went back and saw the seal of Jamshid on 
the bulls. He reported to the king, “I looked, and on the bulls there is written 
‘King Jamshid.’” 


“O wisest of the wise,” King Bahram said, 
“Why should I claim the treasures of the dead? 
As Jamshid put together this rich hoard, 

Pll win my wealth with justice and my sword. 
God keep me from defeat and poverty! 
Distribute all you’ve found in charity, 

Don’t give it to my soldiers, I have land 

And gold enough for those whom I command. 
Sell all the jewels for cash, and so relieve 

Our widows and our orphans, those who grieve 
Because they’re poor despite a noble name, 
Living their lives in indigence and shame. 
Bring them from every ruin, every town, 

And one by one write all their details down; 
Give them this wealth, and may your actions bring 
Peace to the soul of Persia’s ancient king. 

That man the soldiers tried to keep from me, 
Who showed us where the treasure ought to be, 
Should get a tenth of everything we found. 

But I’m still young, my body’s strong and sound, 
So why should I have Jamshid’s gold? I’Il fight 
With China and with Rome—my army’s might, 
My horse Shabdiz, my sword will win me fame, 
And royal treasure, and a glorious name.” 


Then he went to his own treasury, whose contents he had accumulated by the 
sweat of his brow, and summoned all the country’s warriors and gave them a 
year’s pay. He decreed festivities, like those held at spring, and his audience 
hall, encrusted with gems, was prepared for this. Bahram Gur held a crystal 
goblet filled with ruby wine, and in his happiness he said to his companions, 
“My noble lords, who have heard tell of the great men who have reigned here, 
from Hushang to the famous Nozar, who was a descendant of Feraydun, and so 
to Kay Qobad who placed the crown of Feraydun on his head; you see what has 
remained of these great men, who speaks anything but good of them? When their 
days were cut short, speech remained to remind us of them, saying that this one 
had magnanimity and that one did not, that one was reproached and another 
praised. One by one we too shall depart, and it would be well for us not to act 
evilly in the world. Why should we covet the wealth of the dead, or give our 
hearts to the greed for gold? I shall not tie my heart to this fleeting world, or 
glory in the crown, or seek for treasure. If our days can pass in happiness, why 
should a wise man grieve? I want neither the crown nor my wealth if any of my 
subjects, any farmer or courtier, complains of being harmed by me.” 


Bahram Gur and the Jeweler’s Daughter 

Bahram, Ruzbeh, and a thousand horsemen went hunting and came on a plain 
filled with wild asses. It was spring and the males were searching for females 
and fighting with one another; they bit one another’s hides so viciously that the 
ground was stained ruby red with their blood. Bahram watched one such combat, 
until the animals separated in their fury, and the victorious male mounted a 
female. Bahram smiled to see the animal’s pleasure and drew back his bow. The 
arrow entered the male’s back and the whole shaft sank in, up to the feathers, 
pinning the male and female together. Those in his entourage who had seen the 
shot congratulated the king and said, “May the evil eye be far from you, and all 
your days be like a festival: you have no equal in the world, you are a king, an 
emperor, and a hero!” 

Bahram was riding Shabrang and urged him forward to a thicket, where he 
saw a pair of lions. He drew back his bow, and the arrow entered the male lion’s 
chest, which it passed right through, and then plunged into the ground. He then 
loosed an arrow at the female, which pinned her thigh to the earth. He said, 
“That last arrow had no feathers, and its point was blunt.” His soldiers all 
congratulated him and said, “No one has ever seen a king like you; if you can 
subdue a lion with a flightless arrow, you can overturn a granite mountain.” 


Bahram and his companions rode in the meadows. They saw a grove of trees 
where there were many sheep, but the shepherds were fleeing as if in fear of 
some danger. The head shepherd ran toward Bahram, who asked, “Who has 
brought these sheep to such a dangerous place?” The man replied, “In all the 
world I’m the only man brave enough to come here. These sheep belong to a 
jeweler, and I brought them down from the mountain yesterday. The owner of 
the flock is rich, and he’s always worried about danger. He has donkey loads of 
fine jewels, as well as gold and silver. He has just one daughter, who plays the 
harp and whose hair is a mass of ringlets. He’ ll only take his wine from her 
hand: no one’s ever seen an old man like him. And if it weren’t for King 
Bahram’s just rule, how would he be able to keep his wealth? The King of Kings 
isn’t greedy for gold, and his chief priest isn’t an unjust man either. Won’t you 
tell me who killed these two savage beasts, may God preserve him?” 

Bahram replied, “These two lions were killed by a brave warrior, and then he 
left; he rode away with seven companions. But where’s this jeweler’s house? 
Tell me how to get there, don’t hide anything.” The head shepherd answered 
him, “Go straight ahead and you’|l come to a recently built village. The fame of 
this place has reached the town and even King Bahram’s palace. When the 
heavens spread their black silk over the world, the jeweler starts his merry- 
making. If you wait there a while, you’! hear toasts and the sound of a harp.” 
Bahram asked for a pack horse and royal clothes: then he left his vizier and the 
soldiers and went off with his head full of high hopes. 

Ruzbeh said to the priests and courtiers, “Now the king is going to that 
village. He’ll sit down in the jeweler’s house, and you mark my words, he’! ask 
her father for that young woman’s hand. There’s no doubt he’ II put a golden 
crown on her head. He can never get enough of sleeping with women, and in the 
darkness of the night his sleeping partners run away from him. He keeps more 
than a hundred at a time there; whoever heard of such a king? The chief eunuch 
has counted nine hundred and thirty nobly born women in his harem, and all of 
them have their diadems and jewels and crowns and bracelets and golden thrones 
and bejeweled Byzantine brocade. None of them are left without their own 
wealth. He keeps demanding tribute from every country and province, and every 
year the tribute from Rome is spent on them. I grieve for our king’s strength and 
stature, for that face of his with which he commands the court: no one’s ever 
seen a man who could pin two wild asses together with one arrow. All this 
sleeping with women will destroy him; he’!l soon be as soft as silk. His eyes will 
darken, his cheeks turn yellow, his body will become weak, his lips will turn 


blue; his hair will turn white from the scent of women, and white hair means you 
must despair of the world. His back will become bent while he’s still young. So 
many evils come from associating with women! Once a month is sufficient for 
sex; if it’s more often than that a man is just pouring his blood away. A wise 
young man should stick to once a month, and that’s for the sake of having 
children. If you do it more often it weakens you, and when a man gets soft like 
that his body becomes bloodless.” And so the conversation went on as they made 
their way back to the palace till one man said, “The sun has lost its way.” 

Meanwhile Bahram rode through the darkness, accompanied only by a 
groom. Hearing the sound of a harp, he directed his horse toward it and quickly 
reached the jeweler’s house. He lifted the knocker on the door and asked for 
hospitality. One of the jeweler’s maids, a kind woman, said, “Who’s knocking at 
our door in the darkness of the night, and why?” Bahram answered, “This 
morning the king went hunting, and my horse was lamed under me and I had no 
choice but to turn back. With a horse like this, and with its gold-worked bridle, 
I’m afraid I’ll be set on by thieves, so I’m looking for shelter.” The maid told her 
master, “There’s a man who wants to stay with us. He says that people will steal 
his fine horse and its golden trappings, and that if he goes any further he’II be in 
difficulties.” Her master said, “Open the door,” and to Bahram he called out, 
“Come on in, boy!” 

When Bahram entered he saw a fine hallway with servants standing ready. He 
said to himself, “O God of justice, guide me now. May all my acts be just, and 
may I not follow the ways of pride and greed. Make me just, so that my subjects 
rejoice in my existence. If my justice and knowledge increase, my memory will 
remain bright after my death. May all my subjects live as this jeweler does, with 
wine and the sound of the harp.” As he went further he saw his host’s daughter 
through a doorway. When the jeweler saw Bahram he stood, came forward, and 
bowed his tall, straight body before him. He said, “May this night bring you 
good fortune and make those who wish you ill your slaves.” He spread a carpet 
and placed a cushion on it, and then quickly had a table laden with various kinds 
of food brought in. He told a servant to see to Bahram’s horse, and Bahram’s 
groom was given a separate table and a place to sleep. They brought a seat for 
the host and he sat himself down next to the king. Then he made excuses for his 
hospitality and said, “You seem to be a lord of the marches; while you are a 
guest in my house, my body and soul are at your service.” 

Bahram replied, “Who can find such a welcoming host in the darkness of the 
night? When we’ ve eaten, we must drink wine and refresh ourselves with sleep. 


And we must not be ungrateful to God, because a man who forgets God lives in 
fear.” A maid brought water in a bowl for them to wash their hands, and she 
stared at their guest in astonishment. The host called for the comforts of wine 
and music, and the maid brought red wine, roses, and wild saffron flowers. The 
host drank first, then he washed the cup, which was very beautiful, in musk and 
rosewater, passed it to Bahram, and said, “And what’s our wine-drinker’s name? 
I want to make a pact of friendship with you now, and seal it in the name of 
King Bahram.” The king laughed long and loud and said, “My name is Goshasp, 
and I’m a knight; I came here because I heard the sounds of a harp, not for 
somewhere to rest.” 

His host replied, “This daughter of mine makes me so proud I feel my head’s 
in the heavens! She serves wine, plays the harp, and sings better than anyone. 
Her name is Arezu.” Then he called to Arezu, who was as elegant as a cypress 
tree, “Bring your harp and show Goshasp what you can do.” The harp-player 
came before Bahram, moving as beautifully as if she were a Hindu idol, and said 
to him, “You are a fine knight, and in everything you are like a prince. You 
should understand that this house is here for your pleasure, and that my father is 
both your host and your treasurer. May the dark nights bring you good fortune 
and lift your head above the clouds!” Bahram replied, “Sit down, and take your 
harp: I want a song now.” 

Arezu lifted her harp and sang first a song in praise of the Zoroastrian priests. 
Then she sang in praise of her father; the harp itself seemed to weep in her 
hands, and as the silken strings began to speak, all her house was filled with the 
scent of jasmine. This was the song she sang for her father: “Mahyar, a noble 
cypress tree that grows 

Beside a bank where limpid water flows, 

Your musky hair’s grown camphor-white, your mind 
Is gentle and your voice is warm and kind— 

May wisdom nourish your good soul, and may 
Confusion sweep your enemies away! 

You are like Feraydun, that noble king 

Who valued freedom above everything, 


And your obedient daughter Arezu 

Lives only to devote her life to you. 

Now you’ve a guest, I’m like a king who sees 
His armies conquer all his enemies.” 


When she had finished her song she turned toward their guest; again she took up 
her harp and sang to him: 


“And you are like a prince, whose heart’s sincere, 
Who’s fortunate in war, who knows no fear, 

And any man who hasn’t seen our king, 

Great Bahram of whom all musicians sing, 
Should look upon your face without delay, 

Since you resemble him in every way. 

You’re cypress-tall, reed-slim, your walk’s a stride 
That’s like a strutting pheasant’s in its pride; 
Your heart is like a lion’s, and your face 

Shines with a pomegranate blossom’s grace, 

As though a rose were washed in wine. You stand, 
And like a mountain dominate the land: 

No one has seen, no one will ever see, 

A man like you for war and victory. 

May Arezu live all her years for you, 

The dust beneath your feet in all you do!” 


The king was so overcome by her song and her playing, by her beauty, her 
bearing, and her voice that his heart was thrown into a tumult. When the wine 
had begun to affect Mahyar, Bahram said to him, “If you want to be well thought 
of, give me your daughter in marriage.” Mahyar tured to Arezu and said, “Do 
you want this lionhearted guest to pay court to you? Look at him well and see if 
he pleases you, and if you think you would like to live with him.” Arezu said, 
“My kind and noble father, if you wish to give me to anyone, let if be to none 
but this knight Goshasp, who so resembles Bahram: simply to sit with him for a 
while is like life itself.” But Mahyar did not accept his daughter’s words, and he 
said to Bahram, “Look at her carefully, from head to foot; consider her 
knowledge, diligence, and intelligence. See if she pleases you, and if she 
measures up to her reputation. She is a fine woman, and she is not poor. I’m not 


one to compare my wealth with others’, but if you count up Mahyar’s jewels, 
they come to more than you’d find in a king’s purse. Even if you still want her, 
drink another cup of wine; there’s no hurry, you should rest tonight. Men of 
standing don’t enter into agreements when they’re drunk, especially if they have 
any sense. Stay here till sunrise and our elders have woken up, and then we can 
call together those who have patient hearts and are literate. It’s against our 
customs to do these things in the darkness of the night; King Feraydun would not 
have done it like this. And it’s not auspicious to ask for a woman’s hand, or to 
start on any new undertaking, when one is drunk.” 

Bahram replied, “There’s no point in saying this, and it’s a bad idea to start 
predicting what might happen. This harp-player pleases me tonight, so you 
should stop all this talk about the future.” Mahyar turned to his daughter Arezu 
and said, “Does his character please you, and what he says?” She answered, 
“Yes, they please me; my heart and soul have been his since I set eyes on him. 
Do it, and leave the rest to God; the heavens are not at war with Mahyar.” Her 
father replied, “Then you are now his wife, and you should understand that you 
now live for him.” And he gave her to Bahram, who took her as his wife. 

As night began to turn to day all had happened as it should, and Arezu went 
through the sleeping household to her own room. In another part of the house 
Mahyar was preparing everything for his guest, the knight Goshasp. He said to a 
servant, “Lock the doors, and send someone quickly to the shepherds: we can’t 
have a meal without lamb, and it must be the best lamb too. When he wakes up 
take him some beer and some ice, and see that someone is there to serve him. 
And set a bowl of camphor mixed with rosewater in his bedchamber, so that it 
smells sweet. Despite the wine I drank, I feel as fresh as I did yesterday: wine’s 
not going to overcome this old jeweler!” Having said this he pulled the coverlet 
over his head and sank into an untroubled sleep. 

When the sun lifted its glowing crown into the sky and the world glowed like 
a sea of ivory, Bahram’s servant hung his master’s whip on the door at the front 
of Mahyar’s house. The king’s men were looking for some sign of their master, 
and as soon as they saw the whip they began to gather in front of the house, as 
they would in front of the king’s court, and everyone who recognized the whip 
went forward and greeted it respectfully. When Mahyar’s doorman saw this huge 
crowd, with so many of them wearing nobles’ belts and boots, he ran to his 
sleeping master and woke the old man. He said, “Get up and quickly, this is no 
time for sleep or rest. Your guest is the king of the world, and he’s staying in this 
humble little house of yours!” Bit by bit the old jeweler took in what his 


doorman was saying, and then his heart was in a turmoil. He said to him, “What 
are you telling me? What’s this about the king?” He was still drunk, but when at 
last he realized what he was being told, he leaped up and shouted, “A wise old 
man like you doesn’t say things like this.” To which his doorman responded, 
“Since you’re so experienced, tell me who has made you the king of Iran? At 
dawn, before the sun came up, your guest’s groom hung a golden whip covered 
in jewels on our door, right where people pass by our house.” 

When he had heard his doorman out, the old man woke up completely and 
said, “And I got drunk last night in front of the King of Kings, and had my 
daughter serve him wine?” He went to Arezu’s room and said to her, “My dear, 
you’ve always loved your freedom: well, that was Bahram, the King of Kings, 
who came to our house last night. He had been hunting and turned aside from the 
road to Kohandezh. Now get up and put on your Chinese silk gown, and put on 
that diadem you were wearing last night. Make him a present of some of our best 
jewels, give him three red rubies worthy of a king. When you see his sun-like 
face, bow before him and cross your hands over your breast, and don’t look him 
in the eye. You’re to think of him as your own body and soul. If he questions 
you, speak gently, humbly, and respectfully. I won’t put in an appearance unless 
he calls me and places me among his servants. To think that I sat at the table 
with him last night as an equal, it makes me want to smash every bone in my 
body! How could I be so forward with the king? Wine leads young and old alike 
astray!” At that moment a slave ran in and said, “His serene highness the king 
has woken up.” 

Bahram woke feeling healthy and happy and went into the garden where he 
washed his head and body. He prayed before the sun, and his heart was filled 
with hopes of God’s favor. Then he went and sat down and called for someone 
to serve him wine. When he heard about his subjects gathered at the door 
waiting for him, he ordered them to go back to the court. He asked that Arezu be 
sent to him, as he had a strong desire to see her. Arezu went to him with wine 
and her gifts, wearing her diadem and earrings. She bowed low and kissed the 
ground before him: the king smiled at her and said, “You made me drunk and 
then disappeared. Where have you been keeping these? But taking gifts from a 
woman is for others; all I want from you is your songs. Sing me those songs you 
told me about, the ones about hunting and battles and lances and the king’s 
blows.” Then he added, “Where’s the jeweler I got drunk with last night?” The 
young woman called her father; she was astonished at the king’s kindly manner. 
The jeweler came in, his arms crossed over his chest, and stood before his sun- 


like king. He said, “Your majesty, how wise, how noble, how great, how brave, 
how heroic, and how learned you are. Before you, a person with any sense can 
only choose to be silent. My sin came from ignorance: you must think I am 
crazy. It would be fitting for you to forgive my sin, because I am a foolish slave 
at your door, and the King of Kings cannot consider me as someone possessed of 
intelligence.” 

The king replied, “Wise men don’t take offense at anything done by someone 
who is drunk. If a man is made surly by drinking wine, then he should leave it 
alone, but I saw nothing bad in you when you were drunk. But now we’II listen 
to Arezu, and you can consider her song about tulips and jasmine as your excuse. 
As she sings we’|l have some wine and give no thought to the days that are to 
come.” Mahyar kissed the ground, brought in a table, and made everything 
ready, and then invited in the nobles who were standing outside the door. Arezu 
went to her own room, frowning at the appearance of these strangers, and stayed 
there until the heavens put on their black veil and stars came out around the 
moon. 

When they had eaten, Arezu was summoned and seated on a throne worked 
in gold. Mahyar told her to take up her harp and sing the song that the king had 
mentioned. Arezu sang: 


“Brave king, at whose name lions disappear, 
Leaving their dens to slink away in fear; 
Destroyer of your foes, victorious king, 

Whose face is like a tulip in the spring: 

No king is tall like you, the moon at night 

Does not possess your beauty or your light, 

When your victorious armies take the field 

Your enemies disperse, their forces yield, 

Their hearts break with despair, in headlong flight 
Their ranks are broken and they cannot fight.” 


As they grew happy and tipsy with the wine, they progressed from small cups to 
large. Ruzbeh joined them and lodgings were found for him in the village. 
Bahram summoned forty charming servants; their Byzantine faces were as 
beautiful as Byzantine brocade and they escorted Arezu to the king’s harem, 
where they placed a jeweled crown on her head. The King of Kings and Ruzbeh 


returned cheerfully to the palace, and Bahram made his way to his jasmine- 
scented beloved. 


Bahram Gur, the Landowner Farshidvard, and the Gatherer of 
Thorns 

The next morning Bahram returned to his hunting grounds, and for a month he 
and his entourage stayed on the plain, both following the paths and going by 
unfamiliar ways. They camped in tents and pavilions and emptied the area of 
game. There was no sleeping on that plain while they were there, only hunting, 
wine, and the sounds of music, and fires burning both dry and green wood lit up 
the landscape. People looking for a profit came out of the city to trade with the 
hunters; a lively market was set up and the waste places bustled with activity. 
Anyone could find game and ducks to buy, to take home to their children and 
guests by the donkey-load. 

After a month Bahram was overcome with a desire to sleep in his harem 
again; he and his men began their return, and the dust they sent up obscured the 
roads. They rode quickly until the day turned purple with dusk, when they saw a 
little town filled with houses, streets, and shops ahead of them. Bahram ordered 
his men to continue on their way with the baggage, while he would stay there 
alone that night. He asked who the local landowner was and made straight for 
his house. He saw a wide, deep, broken-down doorway; the owner appeared and 
bowed before him. Bahram said, “Whose is this ruin, and what is a ruin doing in 
the middle of the village?” The owner replied, “This house is mine, and you can 
see what a pass bad luck has brought me to. I’ve no cows, no clothes, no 
donkeys, no knowledge, no courage, and no strength. You’ve seen me, now 
come and see my house, which is more deserving of curses than praise.” 

Bahram’s limbs were weak with fatigue; he dismounted and looked about the 
house. The floors were covered in sheep droppings, but it was a fine building, 
large and spacious. Bahram said, “You seem a hospitable man; bring me 
something to rest on.” 


The man replied, “Why are you mocking me? 
There are no carpets here, as you can see, 
And there’s no food here either—you had best 
Look for another place to eat and rest.” 


Bahram said, “At least bring me a cushion, so that I can sit for a while.” 


The man replied, “A cushion! That’s absurd, 
You might as well expect milk from a bird!” 


“Well,” Bahram said, “just bring me some warm milk then; and, if you can find 
it, some bread that’s not stale.” 


“Pretend I gave it you,” the man replied, 

“And that you ate it and felt satisfied: 

If there was bread to eat, then I assure you 
You’d see a much more healthy host before you.” 


Bahram asked, “If you have no sheep, how is it your house is full of their 
droppings?” 


“Tt’s dark already, look!” the owner said, 

“This talk of yours has muddled up my head. 

Go choose a house where they can entertain you 
And where the owner will be happy to detain you: 
Why stay with some unhappy wretch who grieves 
For his bad luck, and has to sleep on leaves? 
You have a gold sword, and gold stirrups too, 
You don’t want thieves to come and frighten you. 
A house like this attracts such dangerous men, 
And lions might well choose it as their den.” 


Bahram said, “If thieves take my sword, I won’t hold you responsible.” 


The man replied, “Enough of all this chatter; 
No one stays in this house; that ends the matter!” 


But Bahram persisted, “Why should a wise old man like you be so troubled by 
my presence? But I think you will have the magnanimity at least to give mea 
drink of cold water.” 


He said, “Go back two bow shots and you’ Il see 
A pond—drink all you want. Stop bothering me, 
It’s obvious I’m old, worn out, and poor, 


Too weak to earn my living anymore.” 


Bahram replied, “If you’ve no nobility about you, at least don’t quarrel with 
people. What’s your name?” 


He said, “My name is Farshidvard, and I’ve 
No clothes or food to keep myself alive.” 


Bahram asked, “Why don’t you make some effort to earn your daily bread?” 


He said, “I pray for my release; I pray 

You’ll leave my ruin and be on your way. 

What’s brought you to this empty house? It’s clear 
There’s never any wealth or welcome here!” 


And as soon as he’d finished talking he began to weep and wail so loudly that 
the king fled from the noise. Laughing at the old man, he left the town, and his 
entourage rejoined him. They came to a waste area covered with thorn bushes, 
which a man was chopping down with an ax. Bahram left his men and said to 
him, “You’re a real enemy to those thorns! Who would you say is the most 
powerful man in these parts?” He answered, “That’s Farshidvard, a man who for 
years has hardly let himself eat or sleep, even though he owns a hundred 
thousand sheep and about as many horses and camels. The ground is full of the 
gold he’s hidden there, and may he have neither marrow in his bones nor skin on 
his body! His belly’s hungry, his body’s naked, he’s no children, relatives, or 
friends. If he sold the farmland he owns, he could fill his house with jewels. His 
shepherds boil their meat in milk, while he eats a measly bit of bread and cheese. 
He’s never owned two sets of clothes at the same time; he’s his body’s own 
worst enemy.” 

Bahram said to the thorn cutter, “If you don’t know how many sheep he has, 
is there someone who does know?” The man replied, “My lord, no one knows 
how rich he is.” Bahram gave the man some gold coins and said to him, “Now 
you’ve become someone to reckon with.” He ordered one of his entourage to 
come forward, a man also named Bahram: he was a brave knight who charmed 
those who met him. The king also chose thirty horsemen, selected for their 
suitability for the work he planned for them, together with a scribe who was a 
good accountant. Then he said to the thorn cutter, “Off you go now; you’ve cut 


thorns and now you’re going to harvest gold. Show these men the way to 
Farshidvard’s wealth, and you will get to keep a tenth of it.” 

The thorn cutter’s name was Delafruz; he was strong, and a fine figure of a 
man. Giving him a splendid horse, Bahram said, “You must make the wind your 
partner.” Delafruz took the group to the mountains and plains, and there they 
found innumerable sheep. In the mountains were ten caravans of camels, each 
one with its own camel driver. There were draft oxen and milk cows, as well as 
wool, oil, buttermilk, and cheese; the whole plain was churned up with hoof 
prints. They found jars of butter kept in caves, and three hundred thousand 
cheeses stored in camel-loads next to a stream. Bahram the knight wrote to 
Bahram the king, beginning his letter with praise of God, who rules and 
nourishes all things, and invoking blessings on the king, who makes evil customs 
wither away. Then he continued, “King of the world, nobles and commoners 
rejoice in your reign. This Farshidvard, whom no one’s ever seen at either a 
banquet or a battle, whose name is unknown to both nobles and commoners, 
who is loyal neither to his king nor his God, and who does not know what 
gratitude is, has untold wealth scattered throughout the world, while he sits 
hidden away, empty-handed and bent with grief. His injustice is—and do not 
take what I am saying as a sin—as extensive as the king’s justice. You can make 
a great treasury of his wealth, and three years will not be enough to reckon it all 
up. I’ve summoned scribes and installed them in the mountains here; their backs 
are bent with the work, but I’ve been told that he has hidden under the earth 
more gold and jewels than we have already found, and the extent of his riches is 
not apparent yet. I wait in the mountains for your orders. Greetings from me to 
the king of Iran, and may his fame live forever!” He sent a swift messenger to 
the king with his letter. 

When Bahram Gur read this missive through, he was saddened; his eyes were 
wet with tears and his warlike eyebrows frowned. He summoned a scribe, who 
brought a Byzantine pen and Chinese silk, and began his letter with praise of 
God, who confers victory and well-being, who is the Lord of knowledge and 
glory and of the imperial crown. Then he wrote: “If I am to be just, I should not 
harass this man. He didn’t amass his wealth by theft and bloodshed, nor did he 
lead anyone else into evil ways. His sin is his ingratitude, the lack of any fear of 
God in his heart. He has been a guardian of this wealth, and the more he 
accumulated, the more his heart and soul withered away. What’s the difference 
between having wolves or sheep on the plain if his sheep are not to be used for 
anything? What does it matter if one has jewels or gravel hidden underground if 


the jewels are not to procure anyone food and clothing? I won’t make a treasury 
of my own out of his wealth, because I won’t tie my heart to this fleeting world. 
Feraydun has disappeared from the world, and Iraj, Salm, and Tur have gone 
from our nobility, as have Jamshid, Kavus, Kay Qobad, and the other great men 
whom we remember. My father too, who grieved so many hearts and who was 
neither just nor chivalrous, has gone from this earth. None of these great men are 
here now, and we cannot quarrel with God because of this. Gather Farshidvard’s 
wealth together, distribute it, and don’t keep back one item from it. Give it to 
those who have concealed their needs and who are unable to escape their 
poverty, to those who are old and unable to work and are despised by the 
powerful, to those who have consumed their wealth and who are now left only 
with sorrow and heavy sighs, to those who still have a reputation but no money 
and who have no one to help them among the merchants, to orphans whose 
fathers have died and left them without money, to women who have no husbands 
or no clothes and who have no skill or energy to earn their living. Give these 
people all this wealth, and rejoice the hearts and souls of those who have 
suffered. Although you have gone in search of Farshidvard’s riches, be just and 
temperate. Leave him the money and jewels he has hidden away, so that he 
won’t live in want, even though they are like so much dirt to him that he has 
buried them in the earth. May the turning heavens be favorable to you, and may 
you act with justice and sobriety.” They placed the king’s seal on the letter, and 
the messenger returned with it. 


The Emperor of China Invades Persia 

Word reached India, the western kingdoms, the Turks, and China that Bahram 
was a pleasure-loving king who gave no thought to anyone or anything, who sent 
out no lookouts or spies, and who did not trouble to place good warriors at his 
frontiers. It was said that he passed his time in entertainments and had no notion 
of what was going on, either openly or covertly. 

When the emperor of China heard this, he gathered an army from China and 
Khotan, distributed gold, and set off for Iran, believing that no one paid any 
attention to Bahram. And on the western frontier the Byzantine emperor also 
raised an army to threaten the country. Hearing that the Byzantine and Chinese 
emperors had mobilized armies against their country, the Persian nobles, both 
old and young, came before Bahram Gur. They were angry and filled with 
bitterness and spoke harshly to him, saying, “Your splendid good fortune has 
abandoned you. A military leader spends his time fighting with his army, but 


your heart is taken up with pleasure and banquets. In your eyes the army and 
treasury are of no account, and neither are the crown and throne of Iran.” The 
king replied to them, “The just God of this world, who is beyond the knowledge 
of the greatest of men, is my support, and I shall preserve Iran from the wolf’s 
claws. With my fortune, army, sword, and wealth I shall drive this threat back 
from Iran.” 

He went on with the pleasures of his life as before, and the country’s leaders 
wept bitter tears. Each of them said, “The hearts of honorable men are 
abandoning this king.” Bahram was aware of this, and troubled by it. In secret he 
built up his army, and no one knew of his preparations. The whole country was 
afraid because of the way he was living, and men’s hearts were riven with 
anxiety. Everyone despaired of the king, despising both him and his rule. When 
news reached the king that the emperor of China’s forces were menacing the 
frontier, he summoned Gostahm, who was a wise counselor and a fine warrior, 
and discussed the situation with him. He also summoned Behzad’s son Mehr- 
Piruz, and Khorad’s son Mehr-Borzin, as well as Bahram Piruz, Khazravan, 
Andian, the king of Gilan, the king of Rey, Dad-Borzin who governed 
Zavolestan, and Borzmehr’s son Qaren. He gathered a force of thirty thousand 
Persian warriors, men who were prudent and ready for combat. Next he handed 
over the crown and throne to his brother Nersi, a wise man, just, God-fearing, 
and possessed of the divine farr, enjoining him to watch over the country’s 
wealth and army. Then he led the forces he had gathered to Azerbaijan. Because 
he was taking so many troops from Pars, everyone, nobles and commoners alike, 
believed that he was fleeing from the war. 

While Bahram was on the march, a messenger arrived from the emperor of 
Rome, and Nersi assigned him suitable quarters in the palace. Advisors sat with 
Nersi and their talk was all concerning the king. They said, “He has given all he 
has achieved to the wind.” Meanwhile representatives of the army came to the 
chief priest and said, “He has scattered gold everywhere and doesn’t know what 
behavior is appropriate for a youth. The country and the army are in turmoil, and 
everyone is trying to push his way to the top. Now we have no news of him, and 
we don’t know whether to expect good or evil.” After a long discussion, they 
agreed to send someone to the emperor of China to try to prevent an attack, so 
that the land of Iran would survive, even though its leader had fled. But Nersi 
said, “This is not what we should do, there’s no channel in all the world for such 
waters to flow in! We have arms, wealth, and fine warriors who are able to fight 
with fire and sword. Bahram has left with a few soldiers; is that any reason for 


despair? If you think evil, evil will come to you; why have your thoughts 
become so gloomy?” 

The Persians heard him out but disagreed: “Bahram has taken his army, and it 
is right that our hearts are filled with melancholy. If the emperor of China makes 
war on Iran, this country will forfeit all its splendor and glory; neither the army 
nor Nersi will survive, and the invaders will trample us beneath their feet.” The 
Persians chose a wise and knowledgeable priest called Homay as the man best 
suited to represent them. Then they wrote a letter from Iran to the emperor. 
Saying that they were his slaves, and that their heads were bowed awaiting his 
commands, they wrote, “We will send what we can in the way of gifts and 
tribute from Iran to the emperor of China, since we do not have the strength to 
resist the armies of central Asia.” Homay and a group of noble companions took 
the Persian nobles’ letter and presented it to the emperor, whose heart rejoiced to 
see it. Homay also told him of Bahram’s hasty flight with his army, and the 
emperor’s heart and soul opened like a blossoming flower. He said to his 
Turkish companions, “What sovereign has subdued Iran before, 

By policy and plans, without a war?” 


He showered gifts on the Persian envoy and gave him Chinese gold and silver 
coins. He composed his answer: “May wisdom be the companion of well- 
meaning men. I agree with all the messenger has said. I shall travel with my 
army as far as Marv and make the countryside there as resplendent as a 
pheasant’s feathers. We shall wait for the Persian tribute, and the gifts from her 
warriors. I shall halt at Marv and go no further, since I do not wish to inflict 
suffering on you with my armies.” The messenger hurried back to Iran and 
reported all he had seen and heard. 

The emperor came to Marv, and the world turned black with the dust sent up 
by his cavalry. When he had rested he occupied himself with feasting, and no 
one there gave any thought to Bahram. So loud were the sounds of harps and 
lutes in Marv that no one could sleep, and the army wandered across the plain in 
no order, without posting sentries or sending out bands of scouts. The emperor’s 
time, day and night, was taken up with hunting, drinking wine, feasting, and the 
music of harps, and he gave no thought to war. He was watching for the tribute 
from Iran to arrive, and his heart grew angry that it was taking so long. 


Bahram Gur Attacks the Emperor of China 


But for his part Bahram stayed alert and preserved his army from the enemy. 
Day and night he sent out spies, and his own troops’ whereabouts remained 
unknown. When he learned that the emperor and his forces were in Marv, he 
brought his men from the environs of Azar-Goshasp; each soldier traveled with 
two horses, his armor, and a Byzantine helmet. Like a flood rushing down a 
mountain, they marched from Ardebil to Amol and thence to Gorgan, and as 
their leader, Bahram bore all the expedition’s anxieties. They pushed on to Nisa, 
following a skillful guide through trackless mountains and deserts, traveling by 
both day and night. In the daytime they sent out scouts, and at night posted 
sentries. And so they came to Marv more swiftly than a pheasant can fly. His 
spies informed Bahram that the emperor spent his days and nights carelessly 
hunting at Keshmihan, or closeted with his advisor, who was of the spawn of 
Ahriman. Bahram rejoiced to hear this, and the pain of all his efforts dispersed 
like the wind. 

He rested for a day, and when both he and his army were refreshed, Bahram 
made his way to Keshmihan as the sun rose above the mountains. Suddenly all 
ears were filled with the blare of trumpets, all eyes with the colors of banners. 
The sounds of men’s cries and the clash of arms rose up from the hunting 
grounds, splitting the ears of the king and his men. The emperor had been asleep, 
worn out by the hunt, and he woke to find that he had been captured by 
Khazravan. The earth of the battlefield was so soaked in blood that it seemed to 
have rained down from the moon. Three hundred Chinese noblemen were 
captured and slung across saddles, and the captured emperor’s dream was 
shattered. Bahram marched from Keshmihan to Marv; he had ridden so long and 
so hard that he was as thin as a reed. Few of the Chinese troops had remained in 
the city; those who were still there were killed, and Bahram went in pursuit of 
those who had fled. He followed them for thirty leagues, with Qaren bringing up 
the rear. When he returned, he went to the hunting grounds and distributed 
plunder to his men. He lifted up his head in pride at his victory over China and 
acknowledged that all power comes from God, who gives strength to both the 
good and the evil, and who is Lord of the Sun and Moon. 


Bahram Gur Erects a Column to Mark the Border Between Iran 

and Turan 

Bahram Gur rested for a week, and when he and his horses were refreshed he 
decided to make war on Bokhara. Princely ambition, rather than hunting and 
pleasure, preoccupied him, and in a day and a night he reached Amui. From 


there, in one watch of the night, he reached the sands of the River Oxus and 
crossed at the town of Farab. When the sun turned the air yellow and cast aside 
night’s black cloak, the dust of his armies made the world as dark as a black 
hawk’s feathers. He pressed on through Mai and Margh, overwhelming the 
Turkish forces and setting fire to the countryside as he went. The stars clung to 
the moon’s skirts for comfort, and fathers fled to their children for safety. The 
leaders of the Turks, both the elders and young warriors, came to Bahram on 
foot, as abject suppliants, saying, “Great king, whose star has brought you 
victory, 

Lord of the earth and its nobility, 

If China’s mighty emperor betrayed you 

And went back on the promises he’d made you, 

You conquered him in war; the renegade 

Is now your prisoner and his debt is paid. 

Do not then shed the blood of innocents, 

Such cruelty mars a king’s magnificence; 

If you want tribute, this is just—but why 

Should guiltless people be condemned to die? 

Our men and women are your slaves, we bow— 

Defeated by your strength—before you now.” 


Bahram’s heart was wrung for them, and with the hand of wisdom he sewed shut 
the eyes of anger. The God-fearing king became thoughtful and forbade his 
wairiors to shed any more blood. When it was clear that mercy had prevailed 
with the king, the suppliants’ hearts grew calm again. Their leader agreed to 
send a large tribute, to be paid annually, and Bahram also imposed a fine on 
them. Smiling and content, he then made his way back to Farab, where he rested 
for a week. He summoned the Chinese nobles and erected a column of stones 
and mortar. He said that no one from the land of the Turks was to pass this 
column into Persia except with the king’s permission, and that the River Oxus 
was to be the frontier between the two peoples. 

There was a man in the army named Shemr, who was wise, powerful, and 
from a fine family. Bahram made him king over Turan. A gold crown was 
placed on his head, and all the land of Turan rejoiced in his reign. 


B ahram Gur wrote to his brother Nersi describing his victory over the 
emperor. The nobles who had been in touch with the emperor asked Nersi to 
write to Bahram and intercede for them. Nersi did this, and Bahram forgave 
them. Before returning to his capital Ctesiphon, he went to Azerbaijan, where he 
prayed in the great fire-temple there and refurbished it, and distributed wealth 
to the poor. In Ctesiphon he made a proclamation to his people remitting taxes 
for seven years and promising to relieve the sufferings of the poor. He sent his 
brother Nersi to rule Khorasan. 


The Ambassador from Byzantium 
One day Bahram said to his chief priest, “That messenger the emperor of 
Byzantium sent has been here a long time now; what kind of a man is he, and 
how wise is he?” The chief priest answered, “May the king of the world flourish, 
blessed by divine glory. He is an old man, intelligent, and humble; he’s a 
persuasive speaker and has a soft voice. He was a student of Plato; he’s wise, 
knowledgeable, and from a good family. When he came he was very confident, 
but now he seems lost in our country, withered away like a tulip in winter; his 
body has grown emaciated and his face has turned the color of dry reeds. His 
entourage are like sheep when a hunting dog confronts them. He regards us with 
neither anger nor lethargy; he takes no account of anyone in this country.” 
Bahram said, “God has made me victorious and turned night to day for me, 
and I should remember that Feraydun placed a crown on the head of Salm, from 
whom the present Byzantine emperor is descended. He has acted with nobility 
and chivalry and has not taken leave of his senses like the emperor of China. I 
will summon his ambassador when I give audience, and see if he has anything 
useful to say. Then I will send him back in a friendly manner, since I’m not 
someone who doesn’t care what others in the world think of him. Some seek for 
war and muster armies, others bring a golden crown and look for peace; I must 
distinguish the one from the other. It takes greatness to deal with these leaders.” 
The priest blessed him and said, “May you enjoy happiness for as long as the 
heavens continue to turn.” 


The Ambassador’s Questions 
Bahram summoned the messenger to his court, and the old man, who had seen 
the world and was eloquent and wise, entered the audience hall. His arms were 
crossed over his chest, and his head bowed: he knelt before the throne. Bahram 
questioned him kindly and motioned him to a turquoise-studded seat.“You have 
been here a long time,” he said, “and must be tired of this country. My war with 
China was like a constant companion and kept me away from you. Seeing you 
now has refreshed my life, but your stay here has gone on for too long. Whatever 
you say we will respond to, and your voice will distinguish this day for us.” 
The old man praised the king, saying, “May time and place never be without 
you. You are the most magnificent of the world’s kings, because you have 
greatness as well as sovereignty; you have knowledge, good sense, justice, and 
glory, and you act as a victorious king should act. You have wisdom and 


morality, and you are the lord of the learned. I wish long life to your body and 
noble soul; may the heavens never see you grow weak. Your speech is as 
balanced as a scale, and your words are like jewels, jewels that can never be 
weighed in gold. Although I am the Byzantine emperor’s messenger, I am also 
the servant of your majesty’s servants. I bring greetings from the emperor to the 
king, who wishes long life to you, your crown, and your authority. He has also 
commanded me to ask your wise men seven things.” 

The king said, “Say what these seven things are: a fine speaker is highly 
honored.” He called the chief priest forward, together with other distinguished 
advisors, and the messenger revealed what the emperor had told him to say. 
Addressing the chief priest, he said, “Guide us then: what is that thing which you 
call ‘within,’ and then what is that thing which you call ‘outside,’ because you 
know no other name for it? What is ‘above’ and what is ‘below,’ what is 
‘limitless,’ and what is ‘contemptible’? What is that thing which has many 
names and which rules everywhere?” The chief priest answered him, “Be in no 
hurry, and do not turn aside from the path of knowledge. There is one answer to 
each of your questions; that concerning ‘within’ and ‘outside’ is a small matter. 
‘Outside’ is the sky, and ‘within’ is the air, by the glory of God who orders all 
things. That which is ‘limitless’ in the world is God, and it is evil to turn from 
him. ‘Above’ is paradise, and hell is ‘below’; and anyone who opposes God, he 
too is evil. That which has many names and rules everywhere is wisdom that, old 
man, has many names; it is wisdom that enables a king to fulfill his desires. 
Some call it ‘kindness,’ others ‘fidelity’; when wisdom leaves, pain remains, and 
oppression. The eloquent call it ‘righteousness,’ the fortunate call it ‘cleverness.’ 
Sometimes it is called ‘the patient one,’ sometimes ‘the keeper of secrets,’ since 
speech is safe with it. Wisdom has innumerable names; you know nothing that is 
higher than wisdom, since it is the best of everything that is good. Wisdom seeks 
out the secrets that the world contains, those hidden things our eyes cannot see. 
As for what is ‘contemptible,’ this refers to a branch of knowledge of the works 
of God. The man who sees the shining stars in the high heavens and claims to 
know their number, who says he can distinguish the rays of Mercury, when the 
heavens cannot be measured in leagues and no one has access to their depths— 
such a man will astonish those with understanding. What is more contemptible 
than someone who numbers the stars in the heavens?” 

When the emperor’s representative heard these answers, he kissed the ground 
and acknowledged defeat. He turned to Bahram and said, “You rule the earth, 
your majesty; ask for no more than you already have from God, since all the 


world is under your command and the heads of the haughty obey your orders. 
The world cannot recall another king like you, and your priestly advisor is more 
knowledgeable than other wise men. Philosophers are his slaves and bow their 
heads before his knowledge.” Bahram’s heart lit up at these words, and he 
showed his pleasure. He rewarded his chief priest with gold, fine clothes, a 
horse, and other goods. Having demonstrated his wisdom, the chief priest left the 
court in state, and the ambassador returned to his quarters. 


Bahram Gur Bids Farewell to the Byzantine Ambassador 

When the sun touched the heavens the king sat on his golden throne, and the 
ambassador and chief priest presented themselves at court again. They talked 
happily about various matters, and then the priest said to the ambassador, “You 
are unique in your intelligence; tell me, what is the most harmful thing in the 
world, whose actions make one weep; and what is the most profitable, whose 
actions raise a man up to glory?” The ambassador said, “A man who is 
knowledgeable will always be great and powerful, while the body of an ignorant 
man is more contemptible than mud and suitable for nothing good. Your 
question refers to ignorance and knowledge, and you have received, I think, a 
just answer. It is good to talk about knowledge. If you would put the matter 
differently, tell me, since knowledge increases honor.” The priest answered, 
“Think, then, for speech grows beautiful from thought. The less a man hurts 
others, the greater an evil you should consider his death to be; but it’s right to 
rejoice in the death of evil men, since both the good and evil are born for death. 
One is profitable, the other harmful, and you must make your wisdom 
distinguish between them.” 

The ambassador approved of this answer; he smiled and congratulated the 
king, saying, “Happy the land of Iran, that has such a king and such a chief 
priest! It is right that you demand tribute from the emperor of Byzantium, since 
your advisor is a king of the world.” Bahram was pleased by his words, and his 
heart opened like a rose in springtime. The ambassador left the court. Night 
came with its black banner and its musky cloak, darkening the face of the sun. 
But the turning heavens did not pause and soon roused the sleepers again. The 
sun raised its banner, and the world’s king woke lightly from sleep. His 
chamberlain opened the door to the audience hall, and Bahram seated himself on 
his throne. He ordered that a robe of honor be prepared and delivered to the 
ambassador, and to this he added unimaginable quantities of silver, gold, horses 


and their trappings, gold coins stamped with kings’ names, jewels, musk, and 
ambergris. 


Bahram Addresses His Court 

After Bahram had dealt with Byzantium, he became concerned for his armies. 
Calling his chief priest and the leaders of the country before him, he gave his 
warriors grants of land, together with cash, horses, seal rings, and diadems; to 
the greatest of them he gave provinces and crowns. He filled the world with 
justice, and both nobles and commoners rejoiced in his reign. He sent away the 
unjust, without gifts and with cold words, and then he addressed his priestly 
advisors: “You are wise, capable, and pure of heart; you know all the ways of 
the world, and the acts of just and unjust kings. How many kings were left 
empty-handed and worn out for lack of rest, because of greed and injustice! The 
world lived in fear because of their malevolence, and good men’s hearts were 
broken; everyone strove to do evil and no one battled for God. Women and 
children had no king as their protector, and the hearts of the righteous were filled 
with grief. Demons stretched out their hands everywhere, and men’s hearts 
forgot the fear of God. The source of good, the hand of evil, the door to 
knowledge, the struggle for wisdom—all these come from the king, from whom 
all things come, whether righteous or perverse. If my father stretched out his 
hand toward injustice, if he was neither pure, knowledgeable, nor God-fearing, if 
the colors of fire overcame his bright heart, this should not surprise you. Look at 
what Jamshid and King Kavus did when they followed demons’ ways. My father 
sought the same ways they had sought and did not wash his dark soul in the 
waters of wisdom. All his subjects trembled for their lives, and many lost their 
lives because of his anger. Now he has gone and left an evil name behind him, 
and there is no more to say: no one blesses his memory. But I bless his memory, 
for I would not have his soul be tormented by our rancor. Now that I am seated 
on his throne, surely he travels toward the celestial regions. 

“T ask the Creator to give me strength to act with probity toward my subjects, 
in private and in public, and to turn the common earth into pure musk for them, 
so that when I become one with the dust again, the oppressed will not grasp at 
my skirts in reproach. May you veil yourselves in righteousness, and wash all 
evil from your hearts; for all men—Persian, Arab and Roman alike—are born 
from their mothers marked for death, whose attack is like a lion’s, and from 
whose claws no man can turn aside his neck. The ravening lion himself is 
death’s prey, and death humbles the dragon in the dust. Where are the heads and 
crowns of our kings, the nobles and splendid courtiers? Where are the proud 
knights, of whom we see no trace in the world? Where are the women, whose 


beautiful faces delighted the hearts of our nobles? Know that all those who once 
veiled their faces are now partnered with the dust.” 


Bahram Gur Writes a Letter to Shangal, the King of India 
One day the king’s vizier rose and said, “King of justice and righteousness, the 
world has no fear of malevolence now, and within our borders suffering and 
hardship have disappeared; but the soul of Shangal, the lord of India, turns away 
from justice. From India to the border with China the land is overrun with 
bandits. He has designs on Iran, and it would be appropriate to do something 
about this. You are the king, and Shangal is only the guardian of India, so why 
does he demand tribute from China and Sind? Consider this, and look for a way 
to remedy the situation; evil should not be allowed to flourish.” 

The king became thoughtful, and the world appeared as a thicket before his 
eyes. He said, 


“T’ll act in secret; I shall go alone 

To see this Indian Shangal on his throne. 
I’Il see the customs of his court, his land, 
And all the forces under his command. 
I’Il be my own ambassador—no one 

In Persia is to know where I have gone.” 


His vizier, a scribe, and other indispensable courtiers discussed the matter, then 
wrote a letter to Shangal. Beginning with praise of God, of wisdom, and of those 
who act wisely, it continued, “But you do not know your own limits, and your 
soul wallows in blood. Since I, Bahram, am now king, and good and evil 
emanate from me, how is it right for you to act as a king? Discord springs up on 
all sides, and it is not a kingly custom to attack others, or to consort with 
troublemakers. Your grandfather was our subject, your father stood as a slave 
before our kings, and none of us ever allowed the tribute from India to come 
late. Look at what happened to the emperor of China when he marched on Iran: 
all he had brought was looted, and he regretted the evil he had done. I see your 
preparations, your distribution of largess, and your glory. But I am ready for 
war; I have wealth and a united and determined army. You don’t have the 
strength to resist my warriors, and there is no one in India who knows how to 
lead an army. You’re mistaken in your assessment of your power; you’re 
opposing your little stream against an ocean. I am sending you an eloquent, 


knowledgeable, and noble envoy; remit to us the tribute you owe, or if you 
ignorantly decide on war, see that you are well prepared for our response. I give 
my greetings to any man whose warp and weft are justice and wisdom.” When 
the ink had dried, they scattered musk on the letter, which was addressed, “In the 
name of Bahram, whose justice resolves all evils, who received the Kayanid 
crown from Yazdegerd on the day of Ard in the month of Khordad, lord of the 
marches and protector of his country, to whom the Romans and Slavs pay 
tribute, to Shangal, guardian of India from the Lake of Qanuj to the frontier with 
Sind.” 


Bahram Gur Travels to India with His Own Letter 

When the royal seal had been placed on the letter, Bahram made preparations as 
if for a hunting expedition. None of his courtiers knew where he was going, 
except the nobles who accompanied him as an escort. He traveled to India, 
crossed the magicians’ river, and saw before him Shangal’s palace. Its roof 
reached into the sky, and in front of it there were armed men, cavalry, and 
elephants, and the air rang with the din of bells and trumpets. Bahram was 
astonished at the sight and grew thoughtful. He said to the doorkeepers and other 
servants there, “A messenger has come to this court from the victorious king 
Bahram.” Immediately the chamberlain went behind the curtain to the king, 
ordered that the curtain be drawn back and that Bahram be conducted to the 
audience hall with appropriate ceremony. 

The ceiling of the room Bahram entered was made of crystal, and there he 
saw Shangal seated on a throne of crystal and gold, wearing his crown, and 
dressed in cloth of silver embroidered with gold and sewn with jewels. His 
advisor stood behind him, and his brother was seated on another throne and wore 
a crown studded with precious stones. Bahram approached Shangal’s throne and 
made his obeisance; he waited for a long time, and then said, “I bring a letter, 
written in Pahlavi on silk, to the king of India, from the great King Bahram, lord 
of the world and servant of God.” When the king heard Bahram speak, he had a 
golden seat brought for him, and his companions were invited forward from the 
doorway. As soon as he was seated, Bahram began his speech: “Great king, as 
you command me, I shall speak, and may virtue and power never forsake you.” 
King Shangal said, “Well, speak then; the heavens look well on a good speaker.” 

Bahram said, “I bring a letter to the king of India, written in Pahlavi on silk, 
from my king, born of kings, the like of whom no mother ever bore, who lifts up 
his head in glory, whose justice turns poison to its antidote; to whom the great of 


the world pay tribute, whose prey is lions, whose sword in battle turns the desert 
to a sea of blood, whose generosity is like a cloud that rains down pearls, and 
who has contempt for gold treasures.” 


Shangal’s Answer to Bahram’s Letter 

Shangal asked for the letter and looked at the envoy in astonishment. When his 
scribe read the letter aloud, Shangal’s face turned as yellow as bile. He said to 
Bahram, “You speak well, but don’t be in a hurry to talk now, and control your 
emotions. Your king has shown us his greatness, and so have you by coming 
here. But I cannot agree with anyone who asks for tribute from India. This letter 
talks about armies and treasure and trampling countries underfoot, but you must 
understand that kings are like herons, and I am an eagle compared to them; or 
they are like dust, and I am the ocean. A man does not attack the stars, or vie 
with the heavens in glory. Virtue is a finer thing than vain talk, which will only 
make knowledgeable men contemptuous of you. You have no courage, no 
knowledge, no country, no city; your sovereignty is all in your tongue. My land 
is filled with hidden treasures untouched by my ancestors, and there is so much 
barding and armor hidden away that if my treasurer wanted to access it all, he 
would need elephants simply to bring the keys to the places where it’s stored. If 
you reckoned up my swords and breastplates, they would outnumber the stars. 
The earth cannot support my armies and war elephants. Multiply thousands upon 
thousands, and that is the number of people in India who call me their king. 
Mountains and seas of jewels are mine, and it is I who sustain the world. I own 
the sources of amber, aloes wood, and musk, unexhausted stores of camphor, 
medicines enough for everyone in the world who falls sick; my country is filled 
with all these things, as well as with gold, silver, and jewels. Eighty crowned 
kings stand ready to serve me, seas and rivers enclose my country, and no devil 
can conquer our land. From Qanuj to the sea of China, from the land of the Slavs 
to Iran, all the chieftains are under my control and have no choice but to serve 
me, and only my name is on the lips of those who guard the borders of India, 
China, and Khotan. The daughter of the emperor of China lives in my harem and 
calls down blessings on my head; I have a son by her, a lionhearted boy whose 
sword can cleave mountains. From the time of Kay Qobad and Kavus, no one 
has ever thought to demand tribute from this country. Three hundred thousand 
warriors call me their king; one thousand two hundred allies, each of them 
related to me by blood, protect me and give no one access to me, and lions bite 
their nails in terror when they attack. If it were permissible for a nobleman to kill 


an envoy in anger, I would have severed your head from your body.” Bahram 
replied, “Great king, if you are a nobleman, don’t stir up unjust desires. My king 
told me to say, ‘If you are wise, don’t follow unjust ways. Produce two 
knowledgeable and eloquent men from your court and if either of them shows 
himself superior in wisdom to one of my men I have no claims on your country, 
because a wise man does not despise language. Or, if you would rather, choose a 
hundred of your mace-wielding cavalry and let them fight against one of our 
men. If they can show their worth and courage, I shall not ask for tribute.’” 


Bahram Wrestles Before Shangal and Shows His Prowess 

Shangal heard him out and said, “You don’t think in a chivalrous way. Come 
down from your arrogance for a while, and be more at ease; there is no point in 
saying such foolish things.” Bahram rested in his quarters until midday, while a 
splendid banquet was prepared. When the food was set before Shangal, he said 
to one of his servants, “Bring that envoy of the Persian king. He talks well and 
he’s a novelty for us. Bring his companions too, and sit them with the other 
envoys.” Bahram came quickly; he sat down, reached for the food, and said 
nothing. Once the main course was over, musicians were called in while the 
guests reclined on gold-worked embroideries, and the scent of musk rose up 
from the wine. The courtiers became cheerful from the wine and forgot their 
anxieties over all that was yet to come. 

Shangal summoned two wrestlers, men who could stand against a devil. They 
put on their wrestling breeches and began their bout, straining and struggling 
against one another. The wine had taken effect in Bahram’s brain; he picked up a 
crystal goblet, and said to Shangal, “Let me put on those breeches! When I fight 

Against a man of comparable might, 
The wine I’ve drunk has no effect on me— 
I’m not unmanned by feasts and luxury!” 


Shangal laughed and said, “Go on then, and if you bring one of them down, shed 
his blood!” Bahram stood and bent his tall body, crouching in the wrestler’s 
stance. He grasped one of the two around the waist, like a lion leaping on a wild 
ass, and threw him against the ground with such force that the man’s bones were 
broken, and his face turned pale. Shangal gazed in astonishment at Bahram’s 
stature, his broad shoulders, and his strong body. In his own language he said the 
name of God to himself and reflected that Bahram had the strength of more than 
forty men. When the assembly was drunk, the party broke up and left the jewel- 


encrusted hall. The sky put on its cloak of Chinese silk, and everyone, young and 
old, rested from drinking. 

When night’s musky tent turned gold again, and the sun showed its face in 
the heavens, the Indian king rode out with a polo stick in his hand. His men had 
brought his bow and some arrows, and he amused himself with these for a while. 
Then he ordered Bahram to mount and to take the royal bow in his hand. Bahram 
said, “Your majesty, I have a number of horsemen with me who would dearly 
like to play at polo, or to shoot at the target. What are your orders for them?” 
Shangal replied, “Skill with the bow is certainly praiseworthy in a knight. You, 
with your strength and stature, draw this bow back and show us your skill.” 
Bahram gave his horse its head, and as it galloped forward he shot an arrow that 
shattered the target. All the knights and warriors who were there cried out their 
congratulations together. 


Shangal Is Suspicious of Bahram and Prevents Him from 
Returning to Persia 

Shangal became suspicious of Bahram and thought, “No envoy—neither Indian, 
Turkish nor Persian—has his strength and glory, or his skill with a bow. If he is 
himself the king, or a great nobleman, it would be best for me to refer to him as 
the king’s brother.” He smiled, and said to Bahram, “You are skilled and have 
the qualities of a man of authority. With such strength and abilities you must be 
your king’s brother. You have the royal farr, and a lion’s might, you must be 
more than just a brave warrior.” Bahram replied, “Your majesty, do not mock a 
simple messenger. I am not of Yazdegerd’s family, nor am I the king, and it 
would be a sin for me to refer to the king as my brother. I am just a stranger from 
Iran, neither a scholar nor a nobleman. Allow me to return now, since the road is 
long, and I do not want to incur my king’s wrath.” Shangal said, “Not so fast; 
you and I still have things to discuss. You should not be in any hurry to leave; a 
quick departure would not be appropriate. Stay with us, and put your heart at 
rest, and if you don’t want our strong wines, drink new wine.” 

Then he called his vizier and talked with him about Bahram for a while. He 
said, “This is either Bahram, or at least someone more important than a simple 
warrior. Tell him kindly that he should stay here and not try to leave Qanuj. If I 
tell him, he will be afraid; you can say whatever’s appropriate. Tell him that the 
best thing he can do is ingratiate himself with the king of India. Say, ‘If you stay 
near the king and follow his advice, he’!l give you the choicest province, you’ |l 
be the army commander there and recipient of the taxes in a place where it’s 


always spring and the streams give off the scent of spring, where there are jewels 
and cash enough to keep a man’s heart from sorrow. You have won favor with 
the king and he smiles whenever he sees your face. A man who is fortune’s 
favorite will not leave Qanuj, where the trees bear fruit twice a year.” When 
you’ve talked to him in this way, ask him his name, because I’d dearly like to 
know it. If he is happy to stay here in our country, our glory will be increased by 
his. ll quickly make him the leader of our armies and equal to myself in this 
land.” 

The vizier said all this to Bahram, and then asked him his name, indicating 
that his answer would not be complete if he didn’t give it. The color in Bahram’s 
face changed, and he wondered how he should respond. Then he said, 


“Don’t shame me in two countries in this way! 
For treasure, or from need, I won’t betray 

My country’s king—our faith says that to rise 
Against our kings is neither good nor wise: 
Since good and evil, all we meet with here, 
Will pass away from us and disappear, 

A wise man does not let ambition lead 

His soul astray, or give his heart to greed. 
Great Feraydun, and Kay Khosrow, and all 
The mighty kings who held the world in thrall, 
Where are they now? And Bahram is a king 
Who won’t be disobeyed in anything. 

If I should go against his orders he 

Won’t be content when once he’s punished me; 
He’ll conquer India, and bring this land 

Of ancient magic under his command. 

It’s better I return to see once more 

My valiant king, victorious in war. 

As for my name, they call me Borzui, 

This is the name my parents gave to me. 

Tell Shangal all I’ve said, so that he’ll know 
That I’ve been here too long now and must go.” 


The vizier went over all he had been told with his king, who frowned and said, 
“This is pointless chatter; I’m going to arrange something that will bring this 


splendid warrior’s life to its close.” 


Bahram Fights Against a Rhinoceros and Kills It 

Roaming in Shangal’s territories was a rhinoceros so huge that even lions and 
vultures fled from it, and the whole country was in a deafening uproar. Shangal 
said to Bahram, “All men respect you, and this is a task for you: you must 
approach this rhinoceros and pierce his hide with your arrows. If your glory can 
rid our land of this danger, I shall seat you next to myself, and your name will 
live forever in India!” Bahram said, “I shall need a guide, and when I catch sight 
of this animal, by the strength that God has given me, you’|l see his hide soaked 
in blood.” 

Shangal gave him a guide who knew the area where the rhinoceros was 
lurking. As they approached the place the guide described the animal’s lair, and 
the great size of its body. He pointed out the thicket where the rhinoceros was 
and withdrew, while Bahram strode forward. A few Persians were following 
him, thinking they too would fight against the rhinoceros. But when they saw its 
huge snout in the distance, and all the vegetation there flattened by its weight, 
they said as one man to Bahram, “Your majesty, this is beyond any man’s 
courage; no matter how valiant a prince you are, people don’t fight with 
mountains and rocks. Tell Shangal that this can’t be done, and that you don’t 
have your king’s permission for such a battle.” But Bahram replied, “If God has 
given me a grave in India, how can my death occur somewhere else? It is 
impossible even to think such a thing!” The young man grasped his bow, as if 
careless of his life. He ran forward until he was close to the rhinoceros, his brain 
full of fury, his heart ready for death, and snatched a poplar wood arrow from his 
quiver. He rained down arrows like a hail storm, until the rhinoceros started to 
weaken, and when he saw that the animal’s time had come, he exchanged his 
bow for a dagger. He severed the rhinoceros’s head and cried, “I do this in the 
name of the one God, who has given me this strength and glory, and at whose 
command the sun shines in the heavens!” 

He ordered that an oxcart be brought, to take the rhinoceros’s head out of the 
thicket. When Shangal saw them in the distance, bringing the head, he had his 
audience hall hung with brocade, and as the great king sat on his throne, Bahram 
was ushered into his presence. All the nobles of India and the Chinese knights 
who were there called down blessings on him, and chieftains went forward with 
gifts, exclaiming, “No one’s feats of bravery can compare with yours.” Shangal 


showed joy outwardly, but his heart was troubled; at times his face was full of 
smiles, and then a frown would cross his features. 


Bahram Gur Kills a Dragon 

Also in that country was a dragon that lived both in the water and on dry land, 
sometimes wallowing in a lake, sometimes sunning itself on land. Its long tail 
could encompass an elephant, and it made great waves in the lake’s waters. 
Shangal said to his intimate advisors, “This lion-like envoy sometimes delights 
me and sometimes fills me with anxiety. If he stays here, he’ll be a great support 
to me, and he can lead the armies of Qanuj; but if he goes back to Iran, I fear that 
Bahram will destroy Qanuj. With a subject like this envoy and a king like 
Bahram, nothing of value will be safe here. I’ve pondered this all night, and I’ve 
thought of another stratagem: tomorrow I’1] send him against that dragon, from 
which he certainly won’t escape unharmed. I won’t be blamed for this because 
he’ll be only too eager to fight it.” 

He summoned Bahram and talked with him at length about the deeds of brave 
warriors. Then he said, “God brought you from Persia to India so that you could 
cleanse our country of evil, as is the custom of great men. There’s something 
that has to be done, and it is a difficult and dangerous task, but it could end with 
your becoming wealthy. When you have completed this task you are free to go 
with my blessings.” Bahram replied, “The heavens will change their courses 
before I disobey your orders.” Shangal continued, “The disaster we’re faced with 
is a dragon; he lives both on dry land and in the water, and he can kill a gaping 
crocodile. If you can rid India of this monster, then you can take India’s tribute 
back to Iran, and everyone in our country will agree to this. You will also take 
presents from India, like aloes wood and ambergris and all sorts of other things.” 
Bahram said, “Your majesty, great lord of India, as God is my witness I will 
eradicate all trace of this dragon. But I don’t know where he lives, someone must 
show me the way to him.” 

Shangal sent a guide with him to point out the dragon. Thirty Persian knights 
rode with him too, as far as the lake. They saw the dragon looming in the 
darkness, and the Persian nobles were so alarmed at the sight that they cried to 
Bahram, “My lord, you shouldn’t think of this monster as being like the 
rhinoceros.” Bahram replied, “We must leave the outcome to God. If I am to die 
fighting this dragon that will neither increase nor decrease my courage.” He 
readied his bow and selected arrows whose tips had been dipped in poison and 
milk; then he showered the dragon with arrows, shooting on horseback, striking 
it right and left. The steel arrowheads pinned its mouth shut, and the surrounding 
thorns were burned by the poison it shed. Then Bahram struck its head, and 


mingled blood and poison coursed down its chest. The dragon’s body was 
weakening, and the ground was awash with blood and poison; Bahram drew his 
glittering sword and split open the monster’s heart. With his sword and an ax he 
hacked off the head and flung the lifeless body to the ground. 

He had the head dragged to Shangal on a cart, and when Shangal saw it all 
India called down God’s blessings on Persia that had produced such a strong and 
splendid knight who was worthy of combat with a dragon, and whose only equal 
was his own king. 


Bahram Marries the Daughter of the King of India 

But Shangal’s heart was heavy with worry, and his face turned yellow at the 
thought of Bahram’s feats. When night fell he called his advisors to him, men of 
his own family and others to whom he was not related, and said to them, “This 
man of King Bahram’s, with that strength and power and authority he has, says 
that nothing will keep him here, although I have offered him all kinds of glory 
and splendor. But if he returns to Iran and goes to his courageous king, he’ || say 
our army is weak and that there are no knights in India. My enemy will be 
contemptuous of me. To prevent this I shall cut off his envoy’s head. I want to 
do away with him in secret; what do you say to my plan, and how should I 
proceed?” 

His advisors said, “Your majesty, do not torment yourself in this fashion. To 
kill a king’s messenger would be a foolish act; no one has ever thought like this 
or followed such a path. Your name would be despised, and a king should be 
dear to his people. And then an army would come from Iran, and a king like 
Bahram wouldn’t leave a single one of us alive; you must not wash your hands 
of righteousness in this way. He delivered us from the dragon, and his reward for 
his troubles should not be that he is killed. In our land he killed both the dragon 
and the rhinoceros, and he deserves a long life, not death.” Shangal’s soul was 
darkened, and he was unsure what to do. 

At dawn the following morning he sent for Bahram and talked with him 
alone, with neither his vizier nor his advisors present. He said, “You charm 
everyone, and you’ve become very powerful, but don’t be too ambitious. I’m 
going to give you my daughter in marriage, and I shall do more than I have 
promised. But when I have done this, you must forget about leaving here. I shall 
make you commander of the army, and you will rule over India.” Bahram was 
silent, and he thought of his throne, his lineage, and his battles. To himself he 
said, “There’s no arguing with him. It would not be shameful to be related to 


Shangal, and besides I shall save my life in this way, and perhaps one day see 
Persia again. I have been here a long time now: the lion has fallen into the fox’s 
trap.” He answered, “I shall do as you say, and your words will be my soul’s 
guide. Choose one of your three daughters, and when I see her I shall call God’s 
blessings down on her.” 

The king was delighted at his response and had his audience hall decorated in 
Chinese silk. His three daughters came forward in their gorgeous clothes, their 
scent, and their beauty. Shangal said to Bahram, “Go, and delight your heart 
with something you’ve never seen before.” Bahram hurried to them, and chose 
one, as lovely as the spring. Her name was Sepinoud, and she seemed 
compounded of modesty and grace, good sense and desire. Shangal gave him 
Sepinoud, who was as elegant as a cypress, and as pure as a candle that burns 
without smoke. He then selected a rich treasury and gave his daughter the key to 
it. Next he gave gold and silver coins and other goods such as aloes wood, 
ambergris, and camphor to the splendid knights in Bahram’s entourage. His 
jewel-studded chamber was decorated for a feast, and all the nobility of Qanuj 
came to the festivities, which were presided over by the king. For a week they 
sat there, carousing happily with wine, and Sepinoud, as lovely as wine ina 
crystal goblet, was seated at Bahram’s side. 


Bahram Gur Flees from India with Shangal’s Daughter 

When Bahram had lived with Shangal’s daughter for a while, she realized that he 
was the king of the world. Day and night she wept with love for him, and her 
eyes were always fixed on his face. And when Shangal learned of their mutual 
love, he ceased to be suspicious of Bahram. 

Bahram and Sepinoud were seated together one day happily talking of this 
and that, when he said to her, “I know that you want what is best for me. I want 
to tell you a secret, but you must see that it remains unknown to anyone else. I 
want to leave India: can you agree to this? I’m telling only you about it, and 
nobody else must know. My situation in Persia, where I am under God’s 
protection, is much better than here. If you wish to go too, your good sense will 
guide us and you will be recognized as a queen everywhere; your father will 
kneel before your throne.” 

Sepinoud said, “You are a proud man; see that you don’t wander from 
wisdom’s path. But the best of all women in the world is the one who makes her 
husband smile continually; my soul will deserve your contempt if it deviates 
from your intentions.” Bahram said to her, “Then find some way to carry out this 


plan, and speak not a word to anyone.” Sepinoud replied, “Truly you are worthy 
of the throne: I will find a way, if luck helps me. There is a place in the forest 
not far from here, where my father holds religious festivals. It’s about twenty 
leagues away, and is believed to be sacred; it’s customary to weep in front of the 
idols there. Good hunting for wild asses can be found there, and aloes wood for 
burning in Qanuj grows in that area. The king and his entourage are going, and 
there will be such a crush the roads will be blocked. If you want to leave for 
Iran, wait for five days, and be ready to set off when the king leaves the city.” 

Bahram was overjoyed to hear her suggestion, and that night he did not sleep 
till dawn for thinking about it. The next day, when the sun touched the moming 
sky, and like a stranger night prepared to depart, Bahram went out hunting for 
wild asses. As he left he said to his wife, “Make everything ready for our 
departure, but tell no one.” All the Persians in his escort went with him, and they 
reached the shores of a river, where they saw merchants’ baggage piled up. They 
were Persian merchants, men who braved the seas and the deserts, and when 
they saw Bahram’s face the king bit his lip and ordered them not to bow down 
before him. Wanting to keep his identity hidden, he said to the merchants, “Keep 
your mouths shut; this situation can be profitable but also dangerous. If the 
secret of who I am is known in India, Persia’s soil will be drenched in blood. A 
man who can keep his mouth shut can help me; he needs his lips closed and his 
hands ready for action. Swear silence, till Fortune favors us. Swear that if you 
ever betray King Bahram, you have broken with God and made a pact with the 
devil!” When they had sworn to this, Bahram’s heart ceased to worry about their 
loyalty. He said, “If you would turn my words to diadems, guard my secret as 
you guard your souls. If the throne loses me, armies will attack Iran from all 
sides, and there will be no merchants or king there, no landowners, no army, no 
throne, and no crown.” 

They wept at his words and said, “May our merchants’ souls be sacrificed for 
you, and youth and sovereignty be yours!” The king called down blessings on 
them, and then, entrusting his soul to God, he returned anxiously to his quarters. 
There he said to his wife, “When King Shangal goes to the sacred grove, a 
messenger is sure to come from him asking for me. Arrange things with your 
mother, but in such a way that she doesn’t realize your secret. Tell her that 
Borzui is sick, and may the king excuse his absence.” Sepinoud told her mother 
this, and when Shangal was ready to set out for the grove his wife said to him, 
“Borzui is ill; he asks to be excused, your majesty, and says that you are not to 
worry about him. A sick man will only be depressed by such observances, as the 


king knows.” Shangal agreed: “A sick man should not be thinking of 
ceremonies.” 

At dawn the following day Shangal set off from Qanuj with his entourage. 
When night came Bahram said to his wife, “My dearest partner, it’s time for us 
to leave.” Invoking God’s name, he placed Sepinoud in the saddle; then he put 
on his armor and mounted his horse. His lariat was tied to the saddle, and he 
grasped his mace in his fist. They rode until they came to the river, where they 
saw the group of Persians asleep. Bahram commandeered a boat for his 
companions and placed Sepinoud in a little skiff; they reached the far shore just 
as dawn was breaking. 


\ 


\ ' RX 


\\ 
SP e " 





Shangal Pursues Bahram and Learns Who He Is 

A horseman rode out from Qanuj with the news that Borzui and his Persian 
entourage had left, taking the king’s daughter with them. When Shangal heard 
this, he came from the hunting grounds like a raging fire. With a group of 
soldiers he pursued Bahram until he reached the banks of the river and saw 
Bahram and Sepinoud on the other shore. In his fury, he crossed the river in the 





twinkling of an eye. He said to his daughter, “May no king ever have a child like 
you! 

This man deceived you, and away you flew 

To cross this river without telling me— 

You’re leaving our celestial sanctuary 

For what? A ruined and impoverished land! 

You’ll know the force of this spear in my hand 

If you think you can simply leave my side 

And, without warning, run away and hide!” 


Bahram said to him, “You wretch, why have you ridden here like a fool? You’ve 
put me to the test and you know that I’m as much of a man on the battlefield as I 
am at banquets and wine drinking. You know that a hundred thousand Indians 
against me count for less than one knight. If I and my thirty companions are 
armored and have our Persian swords, we can fill the land of India with blood, 
and leave not one person alive.” 

Shangal knew that he spoke the truth, because there was no denying his 
courage and fighting ability. Shangal said to him, “You were dearer to me than 
my own eyes, I preferred you to my children and to all my family. I put a crown 
on your head and gave you the bride you wanted. I acted justly toward you, and 
you acted deceitfully. You chose treachery instead of loyalty, and when has it 
ever been right to return loyalty with treachery? What can I say of a man whom I 
treated as my own son, whom I believed to be wise, and who now acts like a 
belligerent knight, or as though he were the king himself? When was a Persian 
ever loyal? When a Persian says ‘yes’ he’s thinking ‘no.’ This is just how a lion 
cub acts; its keeper cares for it and soaks it in tears, but when it cuts its teeth and 
its claws become sharp, all it wants is to fight with whoever brought it up.” 

Bahram replied, 


“When you know who I am, you will not blame 
Me for my acts, or slander my good name. 

I am the King of Kings, and my commands 
Are absolute throughout the warlike lands 

Of Persia and Turan. From now on you 

Will reap the benefits of all I do. 

You’ll be my father here, and I won’t say 
‘Where is the tax your country has to pay?’ 


Your daughter is the eastern candle flame 
Who crowns all other women with her fame.” 


Shangal was astonished at his words. He tore his Indian turban from his head 
and urged his horse forward, so that he left his troops and stood before the king. 
In his happiness he embraced Bahram, asked pardon for what he had said, and 
commanded that a meal and wine be prepared. Bahram explained everything that 
had been hidden from him, telling him all the details of what had happened. 
They drank a quantity of wine and then rose; each asked pardon of the other, and 
the two brave, God-fearing kings clasped hands in promises of mutual devotion, 
saying, “Our hearts will never break this loyalty, 

And we’ll uproot the tree of treachery; 

The friendship that we swear to will abide 

Forever now, with wisdom as our guide.” 


Shangal bade farewell to Sepinoud, embracing her as though his own chest were 
the warp and hers the weft of one cloth. Then the two kings quickly turned from 
one another, having abandoned all the rancor that was in their hearts. Happily 
and in haste they set out, one over dry land and the other over water. 


The Persians Come to Welcome Bahram Gur 

When news reached Iran that the king and his entourage had returned from 
Qanuj, all the streets and towns along the way were decorated to welcome him, 
and everyone took part in this, scattering gold and silver coins, musk and 
saffron. Bahram’s son Yazdegerd called the scattered troops together to form a 
welcoming party, and Nersi and the chief priest accompanied him. When 
Bahram’s son saw his father, he went forward and pressed his face against the 
dust, as did Bahram’s brother Nersi and the chief priest, and though their faces 
were dusty, their hearts were filled with happiness. And so the king progressed 
toward his palace, entrusting his body and soul to God. The world turned dark, 
and he rested; the moon was like a silver shield in the sky. 

When day tore night’s dark shirt, and the candle that lights the world 
appeared in the sky, the King of Kings sat on his golden throne. The doors to his 
audience hall were opened, and his lips were closed. The nobles, wise men, and 
client rulers of his realm came before him. Bahram rose and addressed them with 
words of advice and wisdom: his nobles responded with congratulations, and by 
calling down blessings on his head. 


Then the king mounted his horse, and he and his courtiers rode to the fire- 
temple of Azar-Goshasp. There he distributed a great quantity of gold and silver 
to the poor, giving more to those who tried to conceal their need from him. The 
keepers of the flame of Zarathustra came to him with gifts and the sacred 
barsom, and Bahram presented Sepinoud to them. They taught her the principles 
of the faith and bathed her in pure water, so that she was cleansed of all 
corruption, dust, and dirt. Bahram opened the prison gates, freeing the prisoners, 
and gave money liberally to the needy. 


Shangal and Seven Kings Visit Bahram 

After Sepinoud had been Bahram’s wife for some time and had told her father of 
Bahram’s exploits, Shangal desired to go to Iran. He sent an eloquent and noble 
Indian messenger to request that a new treaty be drawn up between him and 
Bahram, one that he could keep in his palace as evidence of their friendship. 
Bahram responded with a new treaty that was as fair as the sun shining over a 
celestial garden. He also wrote a letter in Pahlavi script that the messenger took 
to Shangal. The king of India then made preparations to travel to Iran, but hid all 
this from his Chinese father-in-law. 

Seven kings came to Shangal’s court to accompany him on his journey, 
including the king of Kabol; Sandal who came with his entourage; the noble 
Mandal; and the powerful Jandal. All were great kings, eager for fame; they 
wore torques and earrings and were resplendent in jewels, gold, and silver. 
Parasols of peacocks’ feathers were held over their heads, and their elephants 
were draped in brocade. The caravan’s splendor could be seen for miles as they 
traveled taking gifts for Bahram, even though he despised such wealth. They 
went forward, stage by stage, and when Bahram heard of their approach, nobles 
from every town went out to welcome them. The King of Kings traveled as far 
as Nahravan, and there the two great monarchs met and dismounted, each 
offering greetings and apologies for the trouble the other had taken. These two 
crowned, glorious kings embraced one another, while their escorts dismounted 
and the world was filled with the hubbub of greetings. The two kings traveled on 
horseback, side by side, gossiping of this and that, until they reached Bahram’s 
palace, where a golden throne was placed ready for Shangal, and imperial robes 
were given to him. The tables spread for the feast stretched for a bowshot and 
were piled with lamb and spit-roasted chicken. Musicians sang and wine was 
brought, so that from one end of the feast to the other all the glasses were full. A 
splendid space for talk and relaxation, with attentive servants, had been prepared 


for after the meal, and the whole palace and its grounds seemed like a paradise. 
The wine flasks were all of crystal and set out on golden trays, and other trays 
were piled with musk, while the stewards wore golden diadems and jewel- 
encrusted slippers. 

Shangal was astonished by the palace, and as he drank his wine he thought to 
himself, “Is this paradise, or a garden where all one’s companions exhale the 
scent of musk?” In private he said to Bahram that he would like to see his 
daughter, and the king gave orders that eunuchs from his entourage escort him to 
her. As Shangal went with them he saw other parts of the palace that were as 
beautiful as the spring. And then He saw his daughter, gloriously gowned, 

Calm on her ivory throne, and nobly crowned; 
He kissed her forehead then, and bent to place 
His face against her radiant, moonlike face: 
They wept in one another’s arms, and he 
Caressed her hands with his continually. 

He said, “You live in paradise, my dear; 

The palace that you left, compared to here, 

Is ugliness itself—a noisome lair, 
Impoverished, idolatrous, and bare!” 


He gave her the presents he had brought—purses of gold, crowns, and slaves— 
and they made her apartments look like a garden in springtime. Then he returned 
to Bahram but saw that the festivities were breaking up; the nobles were tipsy 
with wine and calling for all kinds of bedding, ready to go to their sleeping 
quarters. Shangal too decided to sleep. The musky cloak of night, spotted with 
stars like a leopard’s hide, was spread, and all the wine drinkers slept until that 
golden goblet that we call the sun appeared. Night’s cloak was pushed aside, and 
the plains glistened like yellow topaz. Bahram took the king of India hunting, 
and when they returned they sat to feasting again. Whether they were engaged in 
conversation, hunting, or feasting, Shangal was almost never absent from 
Bahram’s side. 


Shangal Returns to India 

Shangal went to his daughter and there asked for a pen, paper, and ink made 
from black musk. He wrote a proclamation, beginning with blessings on him 
who had cleansed the world of sorrow, spreading righteousness and justice so 
that evil and vice had become only the devil’s portion. Then, “I gave Sepinoud 
to the famous King Bahram as his bride; may the King of Kings live forever, 
with all other nobles as his slaves. When I leave this fleeting world I entrust 
Qanuj to King Bahram. Commit my dead body to the flames, and do not disobey 
Bahram. Hand my treasures over to him, and hand over to him too our country, 
its crown, its throne, and its armies.” He gave this proclamation, written in 
Devanagari script on silk, to Sepinoud. 

Shangal stayed for two months in Persia; then he sent a messenger to 
Bahram, asking that he and his entourage be allowed to return home. Bahram 
agreed to his return to India and ordered his chief priest to select some Persian 
goods as presents: there were gold coins and royal jewels, innumerable swords, 
helmets and belts, and more brocades and uncut cloth than one could reckon. 
According to their rank, the men of his entourage were given horses caparisoned 
in Chinese brocades. Then the king cheerfully bade them farewell and went with 
them for three stages of the journey. Not content with what he had already 
bestowed on them, he gave them enough fodder for their animals to last until 
they reached the border with India. 


Bahram Remits the Taxes Paid by Landowners 

When Bahram returned, he sat quietly on his throne and thought of the evil day 
of death; his heart was filled with pain, and his face turned pale. He summoned 
his vizier and commanded him to inspect his treasuries and count the gold, 
jewels, and cloth he possessed. He did this because the words of his astrologer 
were troubling him. He had said, “You will live for three score years, and during 
the fourth must weep for death.” Bahram had replied, “I shall enjoy myself for 
twenty years, with partners for my journey through the world; during the next 
twenty I shall act righteously and justly in private and in public; and during the 
third twenty I shall stand before God asking for his guidance.” The astrologer 
had said sixty-three years, but the number three was obscure. It was his words 
that had made him think of his treasury, even though he usually paid little 
attention to wealth. Blessed is the man who lives without trouble or self- 
indulgence, especially if he is a king. 


His vizier spent many difficult days reckoning up his wealth, and when he 
arrived at a figure he returned thoughtfully to the king. He said, “You have 
sufficient wealth to last for twenty-three years. I have taken into account 
provisions, the pay for your splendid army, and the expenses of messengers who 
come to your court from client kings and the provinces. Your treasury is full of 
gold and silver and other wealth, and will last for twenty-three years.” When 
Bahram heard this and reflected on it, he stopped worrying about those things 
that were to come. 


He said, “My reign is coming to a close. 
Consider: we’ve three days here, and of those 
Tomorrow has not come, while yesterday 
Has gone forever now, and passed away: 

I won’t be bent down by anxiety 

During the one day that is left to me.” 


He gave orders that taxes, on both the nobility and the commoners, were to be 
remitted throughout the world. Then he established a priest in each town to wake 
up those who were asleep and act as a mediator in all disputes. He gave these 
men a stipend for food, clothes, and furnishings and said to them, “Neither good 
nor evil must be hidden from me; arbitrate among men and tell me of both the 
good and the bad so that I can lay my fears of evil to rest.” 

The priests went out into the world, and nothing, whether good or evil, 
remained hidden from them. They did as they were ordered, but letters came in 
from every province saying that wisdom was deserting men’s minds, that the 
world was full of battles and bloodshed. The young did not respect their elders; 
their hearts were puffed up with wealth and they had no regard for the king or 
his priests. As the letters arrived, one after another, the king’s heart became tired 
of bloodshed. He chose an administrator for each province, a man who was just, 
knowledgeable, and well qualified. These functionaries were given a stipend 
from the treasury and told to collect silver in the form of taxes from the area’s 
subjects for six months. They sat in state and were crowned; for six months they 
collected taxes, and for six months distributed revenue, but they themselves were 
not to profit from the silver they collected. The intention was to stop the 
bloodshed caused by men being led astray, but the king’s agents wrote to him 
that justice and security were disappearing from the world: the rich paid no 
taxes, but in their arrogance thought only of squabbles and arguments. 


When Bahram read these letters, his heart became bitter. He chose lords of 
the marches, righteous men such as the situation required, gave them financial 
support for a year, and ordered them to apply God’s law against those who were 
shedding blood, so that men should be at peace again. When some days had 
passed he wrote to his agents, who were scattered throughout the country, asking 
them to identify those things that were harmful to his kingdom. They answered, 
“The king’s liberality has meant that no one cares for the old and true ways. 
Agriculture is neglected, we see draft oxen wandering at will, and plants are 
growing indiscriminately in the fields and plains.” He answered, “Men are not to 
rest from agricultural labor till midday, when the sun is high in the sky. But 
don’t expect to get anything out of men who have nothing. When men don’t 
work, it’s from ignorance, and ignorance is something we should weep over. A 
man in that condition should be given a few coins to stave off hunger. If a man 
has neither seed nor livestock, don’t act harshly with him; help him with money, 
to relieve his sufferings. Do likewise when disaster strikes from the sky, since no 
man can rule the sky; if the ground is covered with locusts that eat all the crops, 
give the farmers a grant from the treasury, and have this proclaimed throughout 
the province. And if there is an uncultivable or sterile area, as there is in all 
provinces, on the lands of both nobles and commoners, if any man tries to collect 
taxes on such an area, even if he were my own guardian, I’!l bury him alive and 
curse his house!” They set the king’s seal on this letter, and a messenger took it 
to all quarters of the land. 


Bahram Gur Brings the Luris from India 
Where there were poor men he clothed them, and he wrote a letter to the 
provinces asking who lived well, and who were destitute. “Tell me,” he wrote, 
“what is happening in the world, and lead my heart toward the light.” Answers 
came from the nobles in all provinces saying, “We see that the land is 
flourishing, and everywhere blessings are called down upon you, but the poor 
complain about the king and about their bad luck. They say, ‘When the rich 
drink their wine they have chaplets of flowers on their heads, and they drink to 
the accompaniment of musicians’ songs. They don’t consider us as people at all, 
which is unwise of them: we have to drink our wine without music and without 
any flowers.” 

The king laughed aloud at this letter, and he sent a hard-riding messenger to 
Shangal saying, “You must help me out now: choose ten thousand of those 
Luris, men and women both, who know how to play the lute. Send them to 


Persia so that they can entertain the poor here.” Shangal read the letter, chose the 
Luris, and sent them to the king, just as he had asked. When the Luris arrived at 
court, the king admitted them and gave an ox and a donkey to each of them, 
hoping to make farmers of them. He also donated a thousand ass-loads of wheat, 
so that they could use the animals to plough the land, sow the wheat, and so 
bring it to harvest. They were also to be musicians for the poor, so that 
commoners would be like the nobility. Off the Luris went, but they ate the oxen 
and the wheat, and by the end of the year their faces were pale with hunger. The 
king said to them, “You weren’t supposed to waste the seed like this, and forget 
about seed time and harvest! Well, you still have the donkeys; load up your 
goods and put silk strings on your lutes!” And now, because of his words, the 
Luris wander the world trying to make a living, traveling and stealing by day and 
night. 


Bahram Gur’s Life Comes to an End 

And so sixty-three years passed, and the king was unequaled in the world. At the 
new year, the wise priest who was his vizier came to him and said, “The great 
king’s treasury is empty, and I have come to hear your commands.” The king 
replied, “Do not trouble yourself, we no longer need such things. Abandon the 
world to its Creator, who established the turning heavens. The heavens turn and 
God remains, guiding both you and me toward the good.” He slept that night and 
at dawn the following morning a large crowd came to the court. All who should 
be there had come, among them the king’s son Yazdegerd. In front of the 
assembled nobles Bahram gave him the crown, the royal torque, the diadem, and 
the ivory throne. He wished to devote his thoughts to God, and so gave away the 
crown and throne. He was tired of the world’s affairs, and when the dark night 
came he tried to sleep. 

When the sun raised its hand in the sky, the king’s vizier became anxious 
because the king had not risen, and he was afraid that Bahram had fled from the 
world. Yazdegerd went to his father’s side, and when he saw him the saliva froze 
in his mouth. The king’s cheeks had the withered color of death; wrapped in 
golden brocade, he had given up his soul. So this world is, and always has been. 
Do not torment your soul with greed and ambition: even a heart of stone or iron 
fears death, and there is nothing you can do against it. You must act with 
humanity, troubling no one, if you want your past not to harm you. Here I 
remind men of Bahram’s justice and generosity, and may no one think ill of his 
memory! 


They made him a royal tomb, and his people mourned his death. 


B ahram Gur was succeeded by his son Yazdegerd, who ruled for eighteen 

years. He was succeeded by two of his sons—Hormozd, who reigned for 
only a year, and Piruz, who ruled for eleven years. Piruz was succeeded by his 
sons Balash, who ruled for five years, and Qobad. During Qobad’s reign a man 
called Mazdak, who claimed to be a prophet, appeared. 


THE STORY OF MAZDAK 


A man named Mazdak, who was eloquent and knowledgeable and possessed of 
great abilities, came to the court. Qobad listened to his wise words and made him 
the king’s chief minister and treasurer. 

There was a drought, and food became scarce throughout the world, for both 
the common people and the nobility. No clouds appeared in the sky, and 
throughout Iran no one saw either rain or snow. The great men of the land 
appeared at Qobad’s door, demanding bread and water, and Mazdak said to 
them, “The king will be able to give you hope.” Then he ran to the king and said, 
“Your majesty, there is one question I wish to ask you, in hopes that you will 
give me an answer.” Qobad replied, “Speak, refresh my mind with your words.” 
Mazdak said, 


“Suppose there’s someone who’s been bitten by 
A poisonous snake, and he’s about to die: 

What do you say, my lord, should happen to 

A man who has the antidote but who 

Insists on hoarding it, and will not give 

The bitten man the means to help him live?” 


The king replied, “The man who has the antidote is a murderer. He should be 
hanged at the gates as punishment for the dead man’s blood, as one hangs an 
enemy one has captured.” Mazdak left the king’s presence and returned to the 
crowd that was seeking relief. He said to them, “I have talked with the king 
about your demands. Wait until dawn tomorrow, and then I shall show you the 
path of justice.” 

The crowd came back the next morning, weeping and with their faces gaunt 
with sorrow. When Mazdak saw them from the doorway, he hurried to the king 
and said, “You majesty, victorious, eloquent, and wise, I asked you a question 
and you answered, opening a door that had been closed to me. If you will allow 


it, your councilor wishes to ask you one more thing.” The king said, “Speak, 
don’t hesitate; let me profit from your conversation.” Mazdak said, 


“Picture a man in chains; for want of bread 
He wastes away and soon he will be dead: 
Now he’s denied bread by a passerby 

Who lets the miserable captive die. 

Should this man suffer punishment? Or would 
You say that what he did was just and good?” 


The king replied, “Destroy the wretch; by not acting he has another man’s blood 
on his hands.” 

Mazdak kissed the ground before the king and left his presence. At the court 
gates he addressed the crowd, “Take the grain that has been hoarded and hidden 
away; put it at men’s disposal in the streets and throughout the town; let each 
man take his share!” The hungry mob ran to loot the granaries, and soon there 
wasn’t a single grain left in either the city’s or the king’s warehouses. When they 
saw this the overseers went to the king and said, “The king’s granaries have been 
plundered, and Mazdak is responsible for this!” 

Qobad summoned Mazdak and demanded that he account for the looting of 
the warehouses. Mazdak replied, “I told the suffering citizens what I’d heard 
from the king. I talked to the king of the world about the poisonous snake, and 
about the man who had the antidote. The king told me that the man who had the 
antidote had committed a sin, and that if someone shed his blood there would be 
nothing wrong in this. For a hungry man bread is the antidote to his sufferings, 
one that he won’t need when he’s well fed again. If you are a just ruler, your 
majesty, you won’t hoard grain in your granaries. How many hungry men have 
died with empty bellies because of those granaries!” 

The king’s heart was hurt by his words, and they stayed in his mind. He 
questioned Mazdak and listened to the answers, and saw that Mazdak’s heart and 
soul were full of such ideas. Mazdak talked of what the prophets and just 
religious leaders had said, but his arguments went beyond all boundaries. 
Crowds collected about him and were led astray by his talk. He said that those 
who had nothing were equal with the powerful, and that one man should not own 
more than another, since the rich were the weft and the poor the warp. Men 
should be equal in the world, and why should one man seek to have more than 
another? Women, houses, and possessions were to be distributed, so that the 


poor would have as much as the rich. “By the power of the pure faith I proclaim 
equality,” Mazdak said, “and what is noble will be distinguished from what is 
base; any man who follows any faith but this will be cursed by God.” 

Young and old, the poor flocked to him; he confiscated wealth from this man 
and gave it to that, and the wise were deeply troubled by his talk. But Qobad 
rejoiced in his words and followed his teachings. Mazdak sat at his right hand, 
and the court had no notion of where the chief priest was. The poor and anyone 
who lived by the sweat of his brow were with him; his faith spread throughout 
the world, and no one dared to stand against him. The nobility faced ruin and 
gave what they had to the poor. 


Kesra Opposes Mazdak and Kills Him 

One morning Mazdak came from his house to the king and said, “A great 
number of my disciples and the leaders of my faith have gathered at your door; 
will you see them, or should they be sent away?” Qobad told his chamberlain to 
grant them audience, but Mazdak said, “This hall is too small to accommodate 
such a large number, it would be better if the king went out onto the plain.” The 
king gave orders that his throne be taken from the palace to the plain. A hundred 
thousand of Mazdak’s followers were gathered there, and they came confidently 
before the king. 

Mazdak said to the king, “Your majesty, you are above all wisdom, but you 
should know that your son Kesra is not of our faith, and who has the right to 
oppose us? He must promise in writing to abandon his evil ways. There are five 
things that lead us away from justice, and the wise cannot add another to them. 
These five are envy, the longing for vengeance, anger, desire, and the fifth, 
which becomes a man’s master, greed. If you can conquer these five demons, the 
way to God lies open to you. It is these five that make women and wealth the 
ruin of the true faith throughout the world. If women and wealth are not to harm 
the true faith, they must be held in common. It is these two that generate envy, 
greed, and desire, and secretly they link up with anger and a longing for 
vengeance. Then demons corrupt the wise, and to prevent this these two must be 
held in common.” As he finished speaking he seized Kesra’s arm, and the king 
of Iran stared at him in astonishment. Angrily Kesra pulled his arm away and 
indignantly tured his eyes from Mazdak. 

Qobad laughed and said, “Why are you so concerned about what Kesra 
believes?” Mazdak said, “He secretly denies the true faith; he’s not of our 
religion.” Qobad said to Kesra, “This is not the right way, to deny the true faith.” 


Kesra replied, “If you give me time, I can show you how false and dangerous all 
this is, and then the truth will be plain to you.” Mazdak said to him, “How many 
days are you asking the king, whose splendor fills the world, to grant you?” 
Kesra replied, “Give me five months, and in the sixth I will answer the king.” 
This was agreed to, and the king returned to his palace. 

Kesra sent messengers to find knowledgeable men to help him in his cause. 
One went to Khurreh-ye Ardeshir where the wise sage Hormozd lived, and 
another to Estakhr to summon Mehr-Azad, who came with thirty of his 
companions. These venerable seekers after wisdom sat together and discussed all 
manner of things, then they made their report to Kesra. When he had heard them 
out, Kesra went to Qobad and talked with him about Mazdak. “The time has 
come for me to learn which is the true religion,” Kesra said. “If Mazdak is right, 
then Zoroaster’s faith will disappear. I will accept his faith as true and choose in 
my soul as he has chosen. If the way of Feraydun, of Esdras and Jesus and the 
Zend-Avesta, is mistaken, then Mazdak’s words are to be believed and no one in 
the world should be our guide but him. But if all he says is perverse, and he does 
not follow the way of God, hand him over to me, together with his followers, 
and I shall separate their skins and the marrow in their bones from their bodies.” 
He swore this before Zarmehr, Khordad, Farayin, Banduy, and Behzad, and then 
returned to his palace determined to keep his oath. 

When the sun displayed its crown on the following morning, and the ground 
became like a sea of ivory, the king’s son and the priests and sages he had 
summoned arrived at the king’s palace, talking matters over as they came. 
Mazdak delighted Qobad’s heart with his words, and then a Zoroastrian priest 
addressed Mazdak in front of the assembly and said, “You are a seeker after 
knowledge, but the new religion you have made is a pernicious one. If women 
and wealth are to be held in common, how will a son know his father, or a father 
his son? If men are to be equal in the world, social distinctions will be unclear; 
who will want to be a commoner, and how will nobility be recognized? If a 
laboring slave and the king are the same, when a man dies, who is to inherit his 
goods? This talk of yours will ruin the world, and such an evil doctrine should 
not flourish in Iran. If everyone is a master, who is he to command? Everyone 
will have a treasure, and who is to be its treasurer? None of those who 
established religions have talked in this way. You have secretly put together a 
demonic faith; you are leading everyone to hell, and you don’t see your evil acts 
for what they are.” 


When Qobad heard the priest’s words, he sprang up and shouted his approval. 
Kesra added his support, and Mazdak’s impious heart was filled with 
apprehension. The assembly rang with voices saying, “Mazdak should not sit 
next to the king, he is destroying our religion, he has no place in this court!” The 
king turned away from Mazdak’s teachings in disgust, and his mind was filled 
with regret for what he had done. He handed Mazdak and his followers, who 
included a hundred thousand men of good standing, over to Kesra, and said, “Do 
with these men as you will, and never mention Mazdak to me again.” 

In Kesra’s palace there was a garden with a high wall around it. It was dug up 
from end to end, and Mazdak’s followers were planted there head down, with 
their feet in the air, like trees. Kesra said to Mazdak, “Go to my garden and see 
there trees of a kind no one has ever seen or heard tell of before.” Mazdak went 
to the garden expecting to see fruit trees, but when he saw what was there, he 
gave a cry of despair and fainted. Kesra had a tall gallows built, and the impious 
Mazdak was strung up alive and head down. He was killed with a shower of 
arrows. If you have any sense, you will not follow Mazdak’s way. 

The nobility were once more assured of their wealth, their women folk, 
children, and splendid gardens. For a while Qobad was ashamed of what he had 
done and cursed Mazdak’s memory. He distributed large amounts of wealth to 
the poor, and gave gifts to the country’s fire-temples. 


Kesra Is Made Qobad’s Heir and Is Named Nushin-Ravan 
The king was so pleased with Kesra for showing such wisdom that from then on 
he always consulted with him and listened to his advice. When he had ruled for 
forty years, the fear of death entered his heart, and he wrote a document on silk, 
acting as his own scribe. He began with praise of God from whom faith and 
ability come, whose commands are always fulfilled secretly or openly, whose 
sovereignty no one has fathomed, and whose followers are never cast down. He 
continued, “Whoever sees Qobad’s handwriting here should listen only to 
Kesra’s advice. I have bestowed the glorious throne on Kesra, and may he 
flourish after my death. May God be pleased with my son, and may the hearts of 
his enemies be confounded. Never swerve from his commands; rejoice and grow 
wealthy beneath his rule.” He placed his golden seal on the letter, and entrusted 
it to Ram-Borzin. 

Qobad was in his eightieth year, but he was not content to die. The splendor 
faded from his face and eyes; death came to him, and the world felt his absence. 
His body was wrapped in brocade and prepared with roses, musk, camphor, and 


wine. They built an imperial tomb for him and placed a royal couch and crown 
there. They laid the king on the golden couch and closed the tomb forever. 

When the chief priest had ended the period of mourning, he made the king’s 
letter public. It was read before the court, and the crown prince was seated on the 
throne amid the court’s acclamations. Taking his place there, Kesra was hailed 
as the new king; jewels were poured over his head, and he was given the name 
Nushin-Ravan. So ends the reign of Qobad; now I shall set before you the reign 
of Kesra, who ruled with justice and glory, and who became renowned for his 
righteousness and generosity. 


K esra Nushin-Ravan promised a just administration and set about making 
the tax system more equitable. He toured his country’s provinces, and 
secured the border areas against invasion. In particular, he built a wall between 
Tran and central Asia, to keep out attacks from that direction. Skirmishes across 

the western frontier with the Roman empire, in which Kesra was mostly the 
victor, led to a treaty, which included the provision that Kesra marry the Roman 
emperor’s daughter. 


THE REIGN OF KESRA NUSHIN-RAVAN 


The Story of Nushzad 

You should understand that both king and subject need a partner, clothes, food, 
and somewhere to sleep. If this partner is a noble and sensible woman, she will 
be a treasure to her husband, especially if she is tall and has musky hair that 
reaches to her feet, and if she is wise and modest, with a soft and eloquent voice. 
Such was the king’s wife: as tall as a cypress tree and as lovely as the moon. She 
was a Christian, and the whole town was filled with talk of her beauty. 

She gave birth to a boy, with a face as radiant as the sun, more splendid than 
Venus shining in the night sky. Kesra called him Nushzad, and the child was 
protected from the strong winds of heaven. He grew to be like an elegant 
cypress, an accomplished young man, and an ornament to the kingdom. When he 
learned about hell and the way to heaven, Esdras, Jesus, and the path of 
Zoroaster, he rejected the Zend-Avesta and washed his face with the waters of 
Christianity. He chose his mother’s beliefs over his father’s faith, and the world 
was astonished at this. The king grieved that this rose had produced only thorns; 
the doors to the young man’s palace were closed, and it became his prison. He 
was confined to Jondeshapur, far from both the Persian capital and the west, and 
his companions were criminals in chains. 

It happened that when the king was returning from an expedition to the west 
he complained of fatigue and the pains of travel, and he became so weak that he 
halted at the River Jordan. Someone took the news to Nushzad that the imperial 
splendor was shrouded in darkness, that the great king Kesra was dead and had 
entrusted the world to another. Nushzad rejoiced to hear of his father’s death, 
and may his name be cursed for this. As a wise man once said, “If you rejoice at 
someone’s death, make sure that you never die!” 


Kesra Nushin-Ravan’s Illness and Nushzad’s Rebellion 

When Kesra’s son heard that the throne was vacant, he threw open the doors of 
his palace, and a crowd of senseless criminals who had been imprisoned by 
Kesra flocked to him. Nushzad freed them all, and the town was in an uproar. 
All the Christians there, priests and bishops alike, joined him, and soon he had a 
force of thirty thousand men, armed and ready for war. The Roman emperor 
wrote him a letter, as murky as his behavior, recognizing him as the lord of 
Jondeshapur and as the emperor’s ally and co-religionist. Nushzad’s fortunes 
had been at a low ebb, but now they revived and he filled the town with evil 
men. 


News of what Kesra’s son was up to reached Ctesiphon. The commander in 
charge of the city’s defenses sent a horseman to Kesra, passing on all the secret 
reports he had heard. Kesra was saddened by the news and his mind grew dark 
with apprehension. Talking privately with his chief priest about the matter, he 
finally came to a decision. He summoned a scribe, and with a frown on his face 
and cold sighs on his lips, he dictated a letter filled with anger and sorrow to 
Ram-Borzin. 

He began with praise of God who created the world and time, who maintains 
the sun and Saturn and the moon in their places, who bestows glory and 
sovereignty on men, whose rule is limitless and cannot be diminished, beneath 
whose rule everything exists from the least straw to elephants and lions, from the 
dust beneath an ant’s feet to the River Nile. He continued, “I knew of the 
emperor’s letter, of the evils my son has instigated, and of the criminals who 
have broken out from the prisons and rallied to his cause. It would be better for a 
man to leave the world than to see such a day. And we are all of us born for 
death, including Kesra and Nushzad. No one, neither the ant and the mosquito 
nor the lion and the hippopotamus, escapes Death’s beak and talons. If the earth 
were to open and reveal what is hidden within her, we’d see her lap filled with 
past kings and with the blood of warriors, and the pockets of her skirts stuffed 
with wise men and beautiful women. Whether you wear a crown or a helmet, the 
point of Death’s lance will pierce it. If those men who have gathered around 
Nushzad at the rumor of my death can escape death themselves, then there is 
sense in what they do, but it is only evil men who rejoice at a just king’s death. 

“Nushzad has taken leave of his senses and is in league with some devil: he 
flared up when he thought his desires had come to fruition, but he cannot destroy 
my power on the strength of a rumor. If the throne were vacant, he would be its 
new occupant; his conduct is worthy of his faith and his malignant soul. But if 
my son’s faith is impure, this is no cause for fear, and I care nothing for the 
wealth he has squandered, or for those who have rallied to his cause. They are an 
idle, low-born, malignant rabble, unworthy to be my subjects. Talk of what 
they’ve done doesn’t interest me, and you should not be concerned by it. I fear 
only God, who is beyond all knowledge, and to whom we must not be 
ungrateful: it is he who has given me victory and glory, power and the imperial 
crown, and if my praises had been equal to his gifts my power would have been 
even greater. Would that the seed of my body had found another womb in which 
to sleep; when it woke my enemy appeared, and I fear that I have brought these 
sorrows on myself. But if God is not angry with me, I am not concerned about 


the outcome of all this. As for the men who have flocked to his cause, I despise 
them. It is the emperor’s letter that has muddied the waters in this way; they 
think that because he is a co-religionist and an ally, he will support them. A man 
loses his senses and pays no attention to the faith of his ancestors; but when this 
fool turns his head away from justice I shouldn’t curse him since he is from my 
blood and body, and to curse him is to curse myself. 

“You are to equip an army to fight them, but proceed cautiously and slowly, 
and if matters deteriorate and you have to fight, do so without rashness. It would 
be better to capture him than to kill him; it may be that he will repent of his sins. 
But if he is intractable and stoops to low tricks, don’t hesitate to use your sword 
and mace against him. When someone we love is drawn to contemptible things, 
it is useless to try to separate him from his desires, and a noble man who rebels 
against the world’s king deserves a wretched death. Don’t be afraid to kill him; 
he has rebelled against our crown and embraced the Roman emperor’s religion. 

“As for the rebels who make up Nushzad’s army, think of them as so much 
wind; they’re malcontents, like gossiping women. The Christians among them 
will give up if you shout at them loudly enough, that’s their way, and in the end 
they’ll renounce that cross of theirs. The rest are slaves and malignant fools with 
not a noble thought in their heads, blown hither and thither by every wind. But if 
you capture Nushzad in battle, don’t say these things to him. His womenfolk 
support him, so make his palace his prison and let him live with those who are 
happy to obey him. Give him free access to his wealth, women, food, and palace 
furnishings; he mustn’t be in need of anything. But when you’re victorious, 
don’t hesitate to put to the sword any of the lords of the marches who have 
supported him: it’s right that the king’s enemies be fed to the crocodiles. And 
there are others, the seed of Ahriman, who oppose my rule in their hearts, who 
ignore the righteous things I have done, and whom Nushzad’s rebellion has 
brought to light. But even if he has turned to evil ways, he is still my son, and 
my heart reminds me of this. Publicly brand the tongues of those who led 
Nushzad astray with their evil councils; my curses on their mouths and tongues! 
They are men who looked for me to weaken, who followed Ahriman and went 
by devious paths; they do not deserve to live in my kingdom, whose glory and 
crown belong to me.” 


Ram-Borzin Prepares for Battle Against Nushzad; Piruz’s Words to 
Nushzad 


The king’s seal was set on the letter and a messenger quickly set off with it. He 
told Ram-Borzin all he had heard from King Kesra and handed over the letter 
with its orders to prepare for war. At cockcrow, the morning after the old man 
had read the letter and heard what the messenger had to say, the din of drums 
was heard before his palace and Ram-Borzin led the army out from Ctesiphon. 

The news reached Nushzad, who mustered his troops and gave them pay and 
provisions. The Roman priests and patriarchs, with Shemas at their head, took 
their places in his army, whose hands were soaked in blood. A cry sounded from 
the gateway of Nushzad’s palace, and his men surged forward, like a wave of the 
sea before the wind. They marched out of the city to the plain, their heads filled 
with warfare, their hearts with poisonous hatred. When they caught sight of the 
dust raised by Borzin’s forces, they drew up their ranks in battle formation, and 
the brass trumpets were blown. The dust sent up by the cavalry obscured the sun, 
and the blows of heavy maces split the granite rocks. Nushzad, a Roman helmet 
on his head, was in the center of his forces, surrounded by so many Roman 
priests that their horses’ hooves hid the ground. The earth seemed to seethe, and 
the air above their heads to groan in anguish. 

A brave warrior, whose name was Piruz-Shir, came forward and cried out, 
“Nushzad, who turned your head away from justice? You have deserted the faith 
of Kayumars, Hushang, and Tahmures, and Christ the Deceiver himself was 
killed when he abandoned God’s faith! Don’t follow the faith of someone who 
didn’t know what he was doing. If God’s farr was with him, how were the Jews 
able to overcome him? Have you heard what your noble father did to the 
Romans and their emperor? And now you’re fighting against him and lifting 
your head up to the skies! For all your handsome face and farr and strength, for 
all your massive shoulders and great mace, I see no wisdom in you: your soul is 
dark and bewildered. I pity that head and crown of yours, and your fame and 
lineage, which you are flinging to the winds. You are no mammoth or ravening 
lion, and you cannot withstand the might of Kesra’s forces. O prince, I have 
never seen a picture in a king’s palace that portrayed a horseman like you, with 
your reins and stirrups, your mighty arm and thigh, your ardor, and strength, and 
mace. No Chinese painter ever saw such a painting, and the earth has never seen 
a prince like you. Young man, don’t burn Kesra’s heart like this, don’t muddy 
the splendor that illuminates the world. Dismount from your horse, ask for 
quarter, throw your mace and Roman helmet to the ground! If far away from 
here a cold wind blew black dust in your face, the king’s heart would ache for 
you, the sun would weep for you. Don’t sow the seeds of rebellion in this world, 


such quarrels don’t become a king; but if you ignore my advice and choose the 
way of pride and confrontation, I hope my words come back to you often 
enough, and that your evil advisors’ talk turns to wind.” 

Nushzad answered him, “Feeble old man, your head’s filled with wind, you 
can expect no surrender from my army of heroes, nor from me, a king’s son. I 
reject Kesra’s faith and cleave to my mother’s way. Her faith is that of Christ, 
and I shall not swerve aside from his glorious path. If Christ who brought our 
faith was killed, this does not mean that God’s glory had abandoned him; his 
pure soul went to God because he saw no nobility in this dark world. If I am to 
be killed, I am not afraid, since death is a poison against which there is no 
antidote.” 

This was Nushzad’s answer to the old warrior Piruz, and the air became thick 
with arrows. The drums and trumpets sounded and the two armies closed with 
one another. Nushzad urged his horse forward like fire and pushed back the left 
flank of the king’s army; he killed many of their warriors and no one dared to 
oppose him. Ram-Borzin was roused to action and gave orders for arrows to rain 
down like springtime hail. Nushzad was wounded in the attack and recalled the 
words of Piruz; he retreated to the center of his army, his body pierced by arrows 
and his face sallow with pain. He said to his Roman warriors, “It is a sad and 
shameful thing to fight against one’s father.” He groaned and wept, and asked 
for a bishop, to whom he told everything that was in his heart. 


“It’s I who brought this sorrow on my head: 
Send tidings to my mother when I’m dead, 
And say that Nushzad’s earthly course is run, 
The good and evil of his life are done. 

Tell her she should not grieve for me, and say 
That in this world all things must pass away. 
This was my lot, and how could I have known 
Delight here, or the glory of a throne? 

All life is born to die, and when you see 

The truth of death you will not mourn for me. 
It’s not my death I grieve for now, but rather 
That I’ve provoked the anger of my father. 
Build no great tomb for me, and do not bring 
The musk and camphor that preserve a king: 
Grant me a Christian grave.” He spoke and sighed, 


And so the lionhearted Nushzad died. 


The Story of Bozorjmehr 

It’s unwise to think of dreams as meaningless. You should consider them as a 
kind of revelation of hidden things, and this is especially so when the king of the 
world sees them. The stars, the moon, and the heavens gather their scattered 
languages together into one path, so that bright souls can see in dreams all that 
exists, like fire reflected in water. One night, as King Nushin-Ravan slept, he 
Saw a Majestic tree growing before the throne, and his heart was so delighted by 
it that he called for wine and music. All was peace and pleasure, but then a boar 
with sharp tusks sat down beside him and wanted to drink from Nushin-Ravan’s 
goblet. 

When the sun rose in Taurus, and the lark’s song was heard on every side, 
Kesra sat on his throne, and his heart was filled with melancholy because of his 
dream. A dream interpreter was summoned, and the high priests took their places 
in the court. The king explained to them what he had seen in his dream, but the 
dream interpreter gave no answer, because he had no knowledge of such a 
dream. A person who confesses his ignorance avoids having to make a 
judgment. When the king received no answer from this expert, his heavy heart 
looked for another solution. He sent distinguished men to every quarter, each 
with a chest of gold containing ten thousand coins to help them search 
throughout the world for a knowledgeable dream interpreter who could say what 
the king’s dream meant, and he eagerly awaited their return. 

One of these envoys was Azad-Sarv, and he traveled from Kesra’s palace to 
Marv. He scoured the city and came across a priest with the Zend-Avesta before 
him; he was teaching little children the scriptures, and shouting at them in his 
anger and irritation. One older boy, whose name was Bozorjmehr, was studying 
the Zend-Avesta, poring over it with love. The envoy drew rein, and asked the 
teacher about the king’s dream. The man replied, “This is not my business; the 
Zend-Avesta’s the only branch of knowledge I care about.” But when 
Bozorjmehr heard the envoy’s question, he pricked up his ears and smiled. He 
said to his teacher, “This is sport for me: interpreting dreams is what I’m good 
at.” The teacher yelled at him, “Have you done your exercise properly?” But the 
envoy said, “Perhaps he knows something; don’t discourage him.” The teacher 
was irritated with Bozorjmehr and said, “Say what you know then.” But the boy 
answered, “I won’t say anything except in front of the king, in his court.” 

The envoy gave him a horse and money and everything he needed for the 
journey. The two traveled together from Marv, as splendidly as pheasants 


strutting beneath the flowers. And so they went forward, chatting about the king, 
his commands, his farr, the crown and court, until they reached a place where 
there was water. They dismounted under the trees, and ate and rested. 
Bozorjmehr slept in the trees’ shade, with a sheet pulled over his face. The 
envoy was still awake, and as he watched his companion, he saw a snake slither 
beneath the sheet and seem to sniff eagerly at the sleeping youth, from head to 
foot: then it gently glided away toward the trees. As the black snake eased its 
way to the top of a tree trunk, the boy lifted his head from sleep, and when the 
snake heard him moving it disappeared among the branches. The envoy was 
astonished and repeatedly murmured the name of God over the boy. To himself 
he said, “This clever child will reach an exalted position in the world.” Then 
they galloped on, until they reached the king’s court. 


Bozorjmehr Interprets the King’s Dream 

The envoy preceded the youth to Kesra’s throne and said, “I traveled from the 
king’s court to Marv, searching like a pheasant through a rose garden, and I 
found a child at school, whom I have brought here as quickly as I could.” Then 
he told the king what the youth had said, and he also described the strange 
incident involving the snake. Kesra called the boy forward and talked to him 
about his dream. The boy’s head seemed so filled with words that they tumbled 
from his mouth: “In your palace, among the women of your harem, there is a 
young man who has dressed himself as a woman. Clear the court so that no one 
will realize what we’re going to do. Then have your women walk before you, 
and as they set one foot before another we’ |I ask that foolhardy intruder how it is 
that he’s found his way to the lion’s couch.” 

The court was cleared of strangers, and the palace door locked. The king’s 
women, in all their tints and scents, smelling of jasmine, filled with grace and 
modesty, walked slowly before Kesra. But no man was seen among them, and 
Kesra was as enraged as a lion. Bozorjmehr said, “This is not right; there is a 
young man somewhere among these women. Have them walk before you again, 
but with their faces unveiled.” Once more the women paraded before the king, 
and this time a young man was discovered among them, tall as a cypress and 
with a face like a Kayanid. His body trembled like a willow, since his heart had 
despaired of life’s sweetness. 

There were seventy women in the harem, each as elegant as a cypress tree. 
One, who was cypress-tall and whose body was like ivory, was the daughter of 
the lord of Chaj. When she was living in her father’s house, a young man, whose 


face was like jasmine and who was as enticing as musk, had fallen in love with 
her. He had paid court to her like a slave, following her wherever she went. The 
king asked her, “Who is this young man foolhardy enough to live in Nushin- 
Ravan’s harem? And who has been looking after him?” She replied, “He is my 
younger brother, and we’re both from the same mother. He dressed like this 
because he was ashamed before the king; he didn’t dare look you in the face. If 
my brother veiled his face from you, it was out of respect for you, and you 
shouldn’t think it was for any other reason.” Nushin-Ravan was astonished at her 
explanation and at their behavior. He turned angrily to his executioner and said, 
“These two deserve to be in their graves.” The man hurried them away and they 
were hanged in the king’s harem, with their bodies upside down and covered in 
blood. 

The dream interpreter was given a purse of coins, horses, and clothes; the 
king was amazed at his knowledge, turning his words over in his mind. They 
wrote his name down as one of the king’s advisors, among the priests who give 
counsel; the heavens looked kindly on Bozorjmehr. Day by day his good fortune 
increased, and the king delighted in his presence. 

Kesra’s heart was just, and his heart and mind were ennobled by knowledge; 
he kept priests at his court, and experts in all branches of knowledge. There were 
always seventy savants who slept and ate in his palace, and whenever he rested 
from the labors of administering justice and from his banquets, he asked for 
some new discourse from one of them, and in this way his heart gained in 
knowledge. At this time Bozorjmehr was still a young man, eloquent, ingenious, 
and handsome. He learned from these priests, astrologers and wise men, and 
soon he surpassed them all. 


B ozorjmehr became Kesra Nushin-Ravan’s vizier, and much of Ferdowsi’s 

account of Kesra’s reign consists of Bozorjmehr’s advice on how to rule. 
This advice, combined with Kesra’s own naturally just and careful character, 
ensured Persian prosperity during his reign. The emperor of China went to war 
with Iran’s neighbors in Soghdia, and he and Kesra, although mutually 
suspicious of one another, concluded a treaty of friendship. The emperor sent an 
envoy to Kesra, with a letter suggesting that the Persian king marry his 
daughter. 


Nushin-Ravan Sends Mehran-Setad to See the Emperor of China’s 
Daughter 

King Kesra Nushin-Ravan summoned a scribe, talked at length about the 
emperor of China, and then dictated an answer to the emperor’s letter. He began 
with praise of God, who is victorious and who maintains the world, who is our 
guide to good and evil, who raises whomever he wishes from misery to the high 
heavens, while another man lives in wretchedness because God does not desire 
his prosperity. The letter continued: “I am grateful to him for all benefits, and if I 
do evil, it is his wrath that I fear: may my soul be divided from my body if my 
hope and fear turn away from him. The envoy bearing the emperor of China’s 
kind message arrived here, and I heard all he had to say concerning a marriage 
and the emperor’s daughters who live secluded in his palace. I will be happy to 
become allied to you, especially if it is by marrying your veiled daughter. To this 
end I am sending you a wise ambassador, and when he arrives he can tell you of 
my secret thoughts about this alliance. May your soul and body always be filled 
with sobriety, may your heart be happy, and your friendship toward us 
continue.” When the scribe’s pen ceased to move and the ink was dried, he 
folded the letter and sealed it with musk. Kesra gave the emperor’s envoy a robe 
of honor, and his escort was astonished by its quality. 

Then he chose a wise high priest whose name was Mehran-Setad, and as his 
companions a hundred eloquent and noble Persian horsemen. To Mehran-Setad 
he said, “Travel with joy and victory, kindness and justice; your thoughts and 
speech must be astute and eloquent, with wisdom to guide you. First examine his 
harem, and see that you can accurately distinguish the women there. Don’t let a 
well made-up face or splendid clothes, or fine jewelry deceive you; there are 
many young women in his private apartments, all of them tall and splendid and 
crowned. Someone born from a serving girl is no good to me, even if her father 
is the king. Look to see which of them is modest and acts appropriately, 
someone whose mother is from the emperor’s family, who is of true royal 
lineage. If she is as lovely in her body as in her descent, she will make the world 
happy and be happy herself.” 

Mehran-Setad listened to the king and called down blessings on the throne 
and crown. He set out on an auspicious day in the month of Khordad, and when 
he arrived at the Chinese court he kissed the ground and paid homage to the 
emperor, who welcomed him and assigned him splendid living quarters. But the 
emperor was troubled, and he went to the apartments of his wife, the empress. 
He told her of what Nushin-Ravan had said and talked to her at length about his 


wealth and army. He said, “This King Nushin-Ravan is young and intelligent, 
and fortune smiles on him. It would be a good idea to give him a daughter as a 
bride; it would increase my standing with him. You and I have a daughter in 
purdah here who is the crown of all princesses, but I love to see her face and 
could not bear to be parted from her. I’ve four other daughters born from servant 
girls. I’ll give him one of them, and that’ll save me both from war with him and 
from gossip.” The empress said, “No one in the world’s as cunning as you are!” 

Having made this decision, the emperor slept until the sun rose above the 
mountains. Then Mehran-Setad appeared before his throne and handed over 
Kesra’s letter. When the emperor read the letter he laughed with pleasure, both 
because of the alliance, and because a bride was to be chosen. He gave the 
Persian envoy the key to his harem and said, “Go and see who is hidden there.” 
Four servants who were in the emperor’s confidence accompanied him. The 
envoy took the key and entered the private apartments, while the servants told 
him tales of what to expect. They said, “Neither the sun nor the moon nor any 
wind have ever set eyes on those you will see.” The apartments were arranged 
like a paradise, one that contained the sun and the moon and was filled with 
luxury. Five young women sat there with crowns on their heads and treasure at 
their feet, 


All but the great queen’s child, whose elegance 
Did not require such gaudy ornaments: 

Her dress was old and plain, her head was bare, 
Crowned only with her coiled and musky hair, 
While her unpowdered and bewitching face 
Shone with a lovely God-created grace: 

She seemed a cypress with the moon above, 
Filling the women’s rooms with light and love. 


Mehran-Setad knew he had never seen anyone as lovely as she was, and his 
quick mind saw that the emperor and empress were being far from honest. The 
young woman covered her eyes with her hands and veil, and this increased 
Mehran-Setad’s anger at their duplicity. He said to the servants, “The king has 
plenty of crowns, thrones, and bracelets; I choose this one, who has no crown or 
fine adornments, since she is worthy to be elevated in such a fashion. I 
undertook the pains of this journey to make a good choice; I didn’t come here 
for Chinese brocade.” 


The empress said to him, “Old man, you have not said one pleasing word. 
There are women here who have splendor, beauty, and good sense, who delight 
the heart and are of marriageable age, tall like cypresses, with faces as lovely as 
springtime and who know how to serve a king, and you have chosen an 
immature child—this is not sensible of you!” Mehran-Setad replied, “If the 
emperor had deceived me, then my king would also say I wasn’t sensible. I 
choose this young woman, who has no ivory throne, no crown or torque or 
jewelry. If your majesties do not approve, I shall return home as soon as I am 
permitted to do so.” 

The emperor considered his words, astonished by his understanding and by 
his decision. He saw that this old man’s mind was clear, and that he was a great 
personage who was fit to carry out such delicate tasks. The wise ruler sat with 
his advisors and emptied the court of strangers. He ordered astrologers with 
Western charts in their hands, together with the great men of the country and all 
who felt benevolent toward the throne, to search for the will of the heavens. A 
priest studied the stars as they affected the emperor’s alliance with the king and 
said at last, “Do not trouble your heart about this matter, it can only end 
auspiciously and will not deliver the world into your enemies’ hands. This is the 
secret of the high heavens and of the favorable stars that turn there; a king who 
will be an ornament to the throne will be born from this daughter of the emperor 
and from the king’s loins. Princes will pay homage to him, as will the noblemen 
of China.” 


The Emperor Sends His Daughter with Mehran-Setad to Nushin- 
Ravan 

When they heard this, the emperor’s heart rejoiced and the splendid empress 
smiled with pleasure. Once their hearts were set at rest, they sat the envoy down 
before them and told him whatever he needed to know about the empress’s 
daughter. Mehran-Setad accepted her from her father, in the king’s name. 
Servants came joyfully before the king bringing her splendid dowry, which 
included gold coins, jewels, torques, crowns, turquoise seals, an ivory throne, 
another throne of Indian aloes wood encrusted with gold and gems, a hundred 
finely saddled horses, a hundred camels laden with Chinese brocade, forty pieces 
of golden brocade woven with emeralds, a hundred camels laden with carpets, 
and three hundred serving girls. The emperor waited until the company had 
mounted in the Chinese fashion, with banners in their hands, and then he ordered 
that a throne covered in gold and silver cloth encrusted with gems be placed on 


an elephant’s back. A hundred men lifted it into place, and beside it there was a 
banner of Chinese brocade so huge that it hid the ground. A golden litter was 
draped in brocade, and within it was the uncut jewel, the emperor’s daughter, 
while the three hundred beautiful serving girls accompanied her with happiness 
in their hearts. Fifty servants and forty eunuchs formed an escort, and this was 
the manner in which the emperor sent his daughter to the Persian king. 

When this had been accomplished, a scribe came forward bearing musk, 
rosewater, and silk, and the emperor dictated a letter of great splendor. He began 
with praise of the Creator, who maintains the world, who is vigilant and all- 
seeing, and whose creatures fulfill the destinies he appoints for them. He 
continued, “The Persian king is like a crown to me, and my alliance with him is 
not simply for my daughter’s sake. I have always heard from those who are wise 
and noble, and from priests who have insight into such matters, about his glory 
and greatness, and this is why I have sought to be allied with him. No ruler in all 
the world is as just as he is; none has his magnanimity, or is as victorious and 
powerful as he is, none has his glory and might, and his faith in God nourishes 
his knowledge and understanding. I have sent my child to King Kesra, according 
to our custom, and have told her to act as his slave, as is fitting when she is in his 
women’s quarters, to imbibe wisdom from his glory, and to learn his court’s 
ceremonies and manners. May good fortune and wisdom guide you, and may 
greatness and knowledge be your support.” 

They set a seal of Chinese musk on the letter, which the emperor gave to the 
envoy and called down blessings on him. Then he gave Mehran-Setad a robe of 
honor more splendid than any given before by a king to a messenger. He also 
delighted Mehran-Setad’s companions with presents of gold coins and musk. He 
traveled with his daughter and her wealth, the cavalry and richly caparisoned 
elephants, as far as the shore of the River Oxus, and there heartfelt tears fell 
from his eyes. He waited until they had crossed over the river and gained the 
further shore. Then, with his heart filled with sorrow at being parted from his 
daughter, he turned back from the Oxus. 

When the good news came from Mehran-Setad, people happily gathered at 
the court with presents, calling down blessings on the king of Persia and the 
emperor of China. They decorated the towns and roads of the route, and the road 
to Amui and Marv was as resplendent as a pheasant’s feathers. By the time the 
travelers reached Gorgan and Bestam, the ground had become invisible beneath 
the finery and press of people; all the men, women and children of Persia 
crowded the road where the Chinese idol was to pass. They rained down jewels 


on her from the houses’ upper storeys, and silver coins and saffron were 
scattered in her way. Bowls of sweet-smelling scents were set out, and the world 
re-echoed with the sound of drums and trumpets. The horses’ manes were 
soaked in musk and wine, they trod on sugar and silver, and such was the din of 
flutes and harps and lutes that there was no place where a man could be quiet 
and sleep. 

The princess was brought into the women’s apartments, and Kesra looked 
into the litter. He saw a cypress tree with the full moon above it, crowned by her 
sweet-smelling hair that fell in cunningly woven braids; its musky ringlets 
framed the roses of her face, which shone as brightly as the planet Jupiter. King 
Kesra stared at her and repeatedly said the name of God in his wonder at her 
beauty. He selected apartments that were worthy of her, and a throne was 
prepared in her honor. 


An Indian Rajah Sends the Game of Chess to Nushin-Ravan 

One day, when the king’s audience hall was hung with Byzantine brocade, the 
royal crown suspended above his throne, and the room was thronged with priests 
and lords of the marches from Balkh, Bamyan, and Karzeban crowned and 
seated on ivory thrones, the court learned that an envoy from an Indian king was 
approaching with a caravan of horsemen from Sind, elephants shaded by 
parasols, and a thousand laden camels. As soon as the king heard this, he sent an 
escort to welcome the caravan. The envoy entered the court and made his 
obeisance and called down God’s blessings, as is the custom of noble men, and 
spread many jewels before the king as an offering, as well as ten elephants, 
earrings, and a parasol decorated in gold, with gems woven into its fabric. Then 
he unpacked the goods in his train and brought them all before the king. There 
were great quantities of gold and silver, musk, ambergris, fresh-cut aloes wood, 
rubies, diamonds, and glittering Indian swords; everything that Qanuj produced 
was there, and the servants hurried to lay his wealth before the throne. Kesra 
examined the presents that the Indian rajah had labored to collect, and had them 
taken to his treasury. 

Then the envoy presented a letter written on silk to Nushin-Ravan, from the 
Indian king, together with a chessboard and its pieces, made with such skill that 
they were worth a treasury in themselves. The rajah had written: “May you reign 
for as long as the heavens turn. Set this chessboard and its pieces before your 
most learned men, to see if they can understand this subtle game, the names of 
its pieces, and where each one’s home is on the board. See whether they can 


comprehend what the pawns and elephants do, and what the moves of the rook, 
the knight, the king, and his advisor are. If their intellects can fathom this subtle 
game, we shall gladly send the tribute and taxes that the king has demanded. But 
if the famous sages of Iran are all deficient in such knowledge, if their 
knowledge is not equal to ours, then Iran should no longer demand tribute from 
us. It is we who should accept tribute from you, since knowledge is the best of 
all things that confer glory.” 

Kesra listened carefully to what was said; then they set the board before him, 
and he looked at the pieces. On one side they were of painted ivory, and on the 
other of teak. The great king asked about the game, the pieces, and the board. 
The envoy answered, “Your majesty, the rules are those of war: see if you can 
work out the moves of the rook and the elephant, and how the pieces are drawn 
up for battle.” The king said, “Give us a week, and on the eighth day we’ll be 
happy to play this game with you.” Fine apartments were set aside for the envoy, 
and all his needs were taken care of. 

Priests and learned men came and they pored over the chessboard and its 
pieces. They tried various solutions and discussed the possibilities with one 
another, but none of them could work out the game’s rules, and, frowning, they 
gave up the attempt. Bozorjmehr came to the king and saw that he was very 
disappointed by their remarks. But the vizier knew how to resolve the matter, 
and he said to Kesra, “Your majesty, I shall take wisdom as my guide and solve 
the riddle of this subtle game.” The king said, “You are the man for this 
problem: may your soul see its way to a solution. Otherwise the rajah of Qanuj is 
going to say, “The king has no one who can fathom such secrets,’ and this will 
be a defeat for our priests, our wise men, and the court.” 

Bozorjmehr took the chessboard and pieces, and for a day and a night he 
studied them carefully, moving the pieces to left and right and taking note of 
their positions. Then he hurried from his apartments to the king and said, 
“Victorious king, I have studied this board and its pieces, and by the good 
fortune of your majesty, I now understand the game. Summon the rajah’s 
messenger, and whoever else wishes to see this; but first you must witness it, 
because the game is exactly like a battle.” 

Overjoyed by his words, the king said that Bozorjmehr was a man able to 
solve all difficulties and favored by fortune. He summoned the rajah’s envoy and 
seated him appropriately. Bozorjmehr addressed him, “You are the envoy of a 
rajah whose face is as splendid as the sun, and may wisdom be your soul’s 
companion. What did your master say about these chess pieces to you?” The 


envoy replied, “When I left, the rajah said to me, ‘Take these pieces of ivory and 
teak before the throne of the crowned king and tell him to have his priests and 
wise men examine them; if they can understand this subtle game, and play it 
correctly and elegantly, then, as far as we’re able to, we shall send the purses of 
gold, the slaves, and the tribute they demand. But if the king and his advisors 
cannot understand the game, if their souls are not equal to it, then the king has no 
right to demand tribute from us. If he despairs of understanding the game, he 
will realize how fine our hearts and souls are, and he will send us his surplus 
wealth.’” 

Bozorjmehr brought out the chessboard and said to the assembled priests and 
advisors, “You are wise, and your hearts are pure; take note of what he has said 
and of his master’s views.” Then the knowledgeable vizier set out a battlefield: 
the king’s place was in the heart of his forces, his horsemen were to his right and 
left, and his infantry, armed with lances, stood before him. The clever vizier was 
next to the king, to show the way when battle was joined. As the horsemen 
attacked from both sides, the warlike elephants were there on the left; infantry 
went ahead of the horsemen, to watch for ways forward. When Bozorjmehr set 
out the army’s ranks, the whole assembly was astonished. The Indian envoy was 
dumbfounded and dispirited. This man of magic was bewildered, and he brooded 
in his heart on what he had seen: 


“This man has never been in India, nor 
Has he so much as seen the game before— 
How did he understand its rules? The earth 
Can’t show another man of equal worth.” 


Kesra was so pleased with Bozorjmehr that it was as if the heavens themselves 
were smiling on him. He praised his vizier at length and ordered that he be given 
a goblet filled with splendid jewels, a saddled horse, and a purse of gold coins. 


Bozorjmehr Invents the Game of Nard, Which Nushin-Ravan Sends 
to India 

Bozorjmehr went to his own home, where he shut himself away with a board and 
a pair of compasses. Carefully considering the game of chess, which the Indians 
had sent, he cudgeled his brains until he conceived of the game of nard. He had 
two dice made of ivory, with designs on them the color of teak. He made a board 
similar to a chessboard and set the combatants out on either side. The two armies 


were distributed in eight stations, where the pieces were drawn up ready to take 
the opposing city. The battlefield was divided into four sections, and there were 
two noble and magnanimous kings, equal in their forces and obliged not to harm 
one another. At their command the armies set off from each side, ready for war. 
If two pieces came on a Solitary piece, that piece would be lost and its side 
would suffer a setback. The two kings were in the thick of the fighting, each 
overtaking the other in turn, and sometimes the battle was in the mountains, 
sometimes in the plains, and so the two kings and armies advanced until one was 
defeated. When he took his game to the king and explained it to him in detail, 
Kesra was astonished. He thought long and hard about the game and then said, 
“Your soul is clear and bright; may your good fortune remain young and 
vigorous!” 

He ordered that two thousand camel drivers bring their animals to the court 
gates, and there they were loaded with goods from Byzantium, China, Central 
Asia, Makran, and Persia. When they were ready to set off, the king summoned 
the rajah’s envoy, and talked with him at length about the nature of knowledge. 
He wrote a letter filled with wisdom and splendor, which began with praise of 
God, his refuge from evil. It went on, “To the king of India, from the Lake of 
Qanuj to Sind: your wise envoy, with his elephants and parasols, arrived at our 
court and delivered your message and the game of chess to us. We asked for 
time, and one of our learned men considered the matter deeply, until he 
discovered the game’s rules. This wise man has now come to Qanuj, and to your 
majesty, bringing with him two thousand camels laden with royal gifts. We send 
the game of nard as an exchange for chess, and now we shall see which is the 
finer game. You have many pure-souled Brahmins with you; let us see if they 
can understand this game. Send the goods that my messenger has taken such 
pains to bring to you to your treasury. If the rajah of Qanuj and his advisors 
cannot fathom our game, he must send us an equivalent number of camel-loads 
of goods: this is the agreement between us.” 

The shining sun rose in the sky, and Bozorjmehr set off from the court. As he 
approached the rajah’s kingdom with his gifts, the letter, and the game of nard, 
Brahmins gladly came to guide him. His head was filled with thoughts of the 
coming contest. When he was admitted into the rajah’s presence, and saw his 
crown and the splendor of his court, he praised him at length in Pahlavi, then 
handed over the king’s letter. He talked in detail about his journey, the game of 
chess, and the trouble he had taken to understand it; then he conveyed the 
greetings of the King of Kings, and the rajah’s face opened like a blossoming 


flower. Next he produced the game of nard, pointing out the dice and its pieces, 
and put forward his king’s proposal; lastly he said that when the king’s letter had 
been read, he was sure that the rajah would not act unjustly. The rajah’s face 
turned pale at this talk of chess and nard. 


The Indian Sages Are Unable to Understand the Game of Nard 

A nobleman conducted Bozorjmehr to suitable quarters, a hall was prepared for 
feasting, and wine and musicians were called for. The rajah asked for seven 
days’ grace, and the country’s sages gathered together to examine the game of 
nard. For a week the most intelligent of their men, young and old, competed 
against one another in trying to work out how the game of nard was played. On 
the eighth day their chief priest said to the rajah, “No one can make head or tail 
of this game; wisdom will have to help our souls if we’re to construct a game 
from these pieces.” 

On the ninth day Bozorjmehr came forward with a frown on his face and 
hope in his heart. He said, “Kesra did not tell me to stay here for a long time; I 
must not disappoint my king.” The Indian priests were discouraged by this; 
frowning in sorrow, they confessed their inability to fathom the game. 
Bozorjmehr sat himself down and the sages watched him intently as he set out 
the game and taught them how the pieces moved, which was the commander, 
how the war was fought, how the troops were drawn up, and how the king gave 
his orders. The rajah and his country’s sages were astounded. All of them 
acclaimed Bozorjmehr, and called him a priest of the pure faith. The rajah 
questioned him about every branch of knowledge, and he answered each 
question appropriately. The raja’s sages and advisors cried out, “This is truly an 
eloquent and wise man, quite apart from the business of chess and nard!” 

They brought two thousand camels and loaded them with Qanuj’s treasures; 
there were aloes wood and ambergris, camphor and gold, robes and cloth woven 
with jewels. All this was sent, together with a year’s tribute, from the rajah’s 
court to the Persian king’s. Then the rajah asked for a crown to be brought from 
his treasury, together with a robe made of cloth of gold from head to foot, and 
these he presented to Bozorjmehr, praising him as he did so. He also gave many 
gifts to Bozorjmehr’s companions. The two thousand camels laden with tribute 
and presents made a caravan the like of which no man had ever led before, and 
as Bozorjmehr traveled home from Qanuj he lifted his head up to the heavens 
with pride. He was happy to be carrying the rajah’s letter, written on silk in 
Devanagari script, which said, “The rajah and his nobles bear witness—and not 


out of fear, but as their true opinion—that no one has ever seen a king like 
Nushin-Ravan, or heard from learned priests of one like him; and there is no one 
more knowledgeable than his vizier, whose wisdom is guarded by the heavens. 
We have sent a year’s tribute in advance, and if more is required we shall send 
that too; we have sent all that was agreed according to our wager.” 

When the king learned that his wise advisor had been successful and was on 
his way home, he was overjoyed and gave orders that the noblemen in the city 
and army be informed, so that they could go together to welcome him. 
Bozorjmehr made a triumphal entry into the city, like a victorious prince, and 
when he approached the throne, the king heartily congratulated him, embracing 
him and questioning him about the rajah and the difficulties he’d encountered 
along the way. Bozorjmehr told the king about his journey and his good fortune, 
and then laid the rajah’s letter before the throne. The scribe Yazdegerd was 
summoned, and when he read the rajah’s letter the whole company was 
astonished at Bozorjmehr’s knowledge and good fortune. Kesra said, “Thanks be 
to God for my wisdom, and for my knowledge of what is good; kings bow as 
slaves before my crown and throne, and their hearts and souls are filled with 
love for me.” 


Borzui Brings the Book of Kalileh and Demneh from India 
The King of Kings, Nushin-Ravan—may his name live forever—always kept 
learned men and priests at his court, and they were an adornment to his reign. 
There were eloquent doctors, scholars, nobles, and men skilled in various 
professions. One such was the doctor Borzui, who was advanced in his skill and 
an eloquent speaker. He had some expertise in every branch of knowledge and 
was famous throughout the world for this. One day, during a royal audience, he 
came before the king and said, “Your majesty, you love knowledge, and your 
inquiring mind delights in learning things. Today my spirit was alert and at ease, 
and I read in an Indian book that a plant grows in the mountains there that looks 
like silk from Byzantium. If someone gathers this plant and prepares it in the 
correct way and then sprinkles it on the dead, they will begin to talk. Now with 
the king’s permission, I shall make this difficult journey; I shall employ all my 
knowledge to see if I can find this wonder. If a corpse can live again, this is only 
to be expected now that Nushin-Ravan rules the world.” 

The king responded, “This is not possible, but we should inquire into it 
nevertheless. Take a letter from me to the ruler of India, and study the nature of 
these Indian idol-worshippers. Find a companion for this search, and ask good 


fortune to help you too; these mysterious words you’ve read perhaps point to 
some new wonder in the world. Take all your requests to the Indian king; you 
will certainly need him to provide you with a guide.” Then Nushin-Ravan threw 
open the gates to his treasury and provided Borzui with three hundred camels 
laden with royal goods—gold coins, brocades, silks, seals, crowns, musk, and 
ambergris. Borzui set off and arrived at the Indian court, where he handed over 
his king’s letter and spread the goods he had brought before the rajah. After 
reading the king’s letter, the rajah said, “Kesra has no need to send me presents 
in this way; my people and my realm are themselves presents he has bestowed 
on me. Given his just rule and farr, his glory and good fortune, it would be no 
surprise if the world-ruler could resurrect the dead. The Brahmins who live in 
the mountains will help you carry out your plan. My vizier, my wealth, my 
treasurer, and all that’s good and evil in India, are at your disposal; I measure my 
greatness by how I am able to aid you.” 

They provided him with suitable apartments close to the rajah, as well as with 
a cook, food, fine clothes, and carpets. He spent that night with the wise men of 
Qanuj, discussing his plans. When day broke over the mountains and the world- 
illuminating torch appeared, the rajah summoned his learned doctors, and those 
who could offer advice. Borzui set off for the mountains on foot, with a 
knowledgeable guide, and the doctors accompanied him. He gathered plants that 
were dry, fresh, withered, or flourishing, and he made various concoctions from 
them; but when he sprinkled these on the dead not a single corpse came to life, 
and it was clear that the mixtures were powerless. Though he walked over the 
whole mountain, his efforts were fruitless, and he knew that the dead could be 
revived only by that king who is eternal and rules all things. He was tormented 
by the pains of his journey, by the shame he would feel before his king and the 
courtiers, by thoughts of the wealth that had been given to the rajah, and by the 
foolish things he had said. He was sick at heart when he remembered the book 
he had read and said to himself, “Why did that foolish, senseless man write such 
ridiculous things, which could only lead to trouble and reproaches?” 

He turned to the learned men who had accompanied him and said, “You are 
experienced, well-regarded men: do you know of anyone more knowledgeable 
than yourselves, who might outdo you in wisdom?” They all agreed on their 
answer: “There is an old sage, who surpasses us in both years and wisdom, and 
who is more knowledgeable than every master.” Borzui replied, “You are noble 
and magnanimous men, and I ask you to take yet more trouble and to guide me 


to this sage. It may be that this eloquent and wise old man can help me in my 
search.” 

As they led him to this man Borzui’s heart was preoccupied with worries, his 
mind with what he would say. When he met him, he eloquently described his 
troubles that had begun with the book he had read and with the words he had 
heard from various savants. The old man spoke to him about the different kinds 
of knowledge, and then said, 


“When I was young I also read the book 
You mention, and like you began to look 
For this same plant; my time was vainly spent, 
Until I saw that something else was meant. 
Let me explain: the plant that you have tried 
So hard to find is speech, the mountainside 
Is knowledge, and the corpse is any man 
Who’s ignorant, since only knowledge can 
Give life to us; if there’s no knowledge there 
You won’t find life within us anywhere. 

The plant you seek’s a book called Kalileh, 
Its language is the guide to wisdom’s way— 
You’ll find this book, if you search carefully, 
Locked away in the rajah’s treasury.” 


Borzui was overjoyed when he heard these words, and it seemed to him that all 
his troubles disappeared like the wind that blows and is gone. He called down 
blessings on the sage and hurried to the court, traveling as fast as fire. When he 
reached the rajah he bowed down before him and said, “May you live for as long 
as the world remains. Great king, there is a book called in the Indian tongue 
Kalileh; it’s kept under seal, in your treasury, in the archives there, and it is a 
guide to wisdom. If it will cause you no distress, I ask that you order your 
treasurer to give this book to me.” 

The king’s soul was upset at this request, and for a while he pondered what to 
do. Then he said to Borzui, “No one has ever asked me for this, but if King 
Nushin-Ravan wanted my body or my soul, or one of my nobles or subjects, I 
could not withhold any of them from him. But read the book here, from 
beginning to end, so that those who hate me cannot say that I allowed it to be 
copied.” Borzui replied, “I want no more than you wish to grant me, your 


majesty.” The king’s treasurer brought the book of Kalileh and Demneh, and 
guided Borzui through it. Throughout the day he committed to memory whatever 
he read, and went over it again at night until the dawn broke. He was delighted 
by the book, and he washed his soul in its wisdom. He secretly wrote the book 
out in Persian, and this is how it was sent to Nushin-Ravan. As soon as Nushin- 
Ravan’s reply came saying, “The ocean of knowledge has reached us,” Borzui 
went to the rajah and asked for permission to return home. 

The rajah made much of him and gave him an Indian robe of honor, two 
costly bracelets and two sets of earrings, a torque set with royal gems, an Indian 
turban, and an Indian sword made of iron that glittered like silk. Borzui left 
Qanuj having learned a great deal and in high spirits; when he arrived home he 
made his obeisance before the king, told him what he had seen and heard at the 
rajah’s court, and explained that the plant he had sought had been knowledge. 
The king said to him, “You have done well, and the book called Kalileh has 
given my soul new life. Take the keys from my treasurer, and choose whatever 
you wish.” Wise Borzui went to the treasury, but he gave the treasurer little 
enough to do. There were gold and jewels to right and left, but he wanted no 
more than a suit of royal clothes. He clothed himself in fine fabrics and quickly 
made his way back to Kesra’s court. As he bowed before the throne the king said 
to him, “You have been through so much, so why did you leave my treasury 
without taking either money or jewels? A man who has endured a great deal 
deserves a great deal.” Borzui replied, “A man who wears his king’s clothes has 
found the way to good fortune and the throne of greatness. And then unworthy 
men will see these clothes, and their evil hearts will be darkened, while our 
friends’ faces will rejoice in our good fortune. I have one request of the king, 
and this is so that I shall be remembered in the world: when Bozorjmehr writes 
out this book, may he recall the trouble that Borzui took to obtain it. If the 
victorious king so commands, may he start the book with a mention of me, so 
that after I die learned men will not forget the difficulties I went through.” The 
king said, “This is a noble desire, one that is fitting for a man with a free spirit. 
Your words exceed your station, but they are justified by the pains you have 
taken.” Then he said to Bozorjmehr, “This request should not be denied,” and 
when the scribe had cut his pen and was ready to write, he began his account 
with mention of Borzui. 

This copy was a royal one, and the book existed only in Pahlavi script at that 
time. It was kept with care in the king’s treasury, so that no one unworthy could 
look at it. It was read in Pahlavi until men spoke Arabic, then the caliph Mamun 


renewed the book, so that its sun could shine on other men. He had the heart of a 
learned priest and the mind of the Kayanid kings, and he was skilled in all kinds 
of knowledge. Kalileh was translated into Arabic, in the form in which you now 
hear it recited. It remained in Arabic until the time of King Nasr; his vizier and 
librarian was Abul Fazl, and he gave orders that the book be translated into 
Persian and Dari, and so the matter was settled. Then Nasr was guided by 
wisdom and desired that there might remain some memorial to himself in the 
world. He had a man recite the whole book to Rudaki, who strung its rich pearls, 
turning prose into verse. For a man who is literate, this is an added adornment to 
the tales, and for the ignorant it is a blessing: verse satisfies both the soul and the 
mind. 


Nushin-Ravan Is Angry with Bozorjmehr and Has Him Imprisoned 
Now hear what happened to Bozorjmehr, who was raised from the earth to the 
heavens, and brought down to base earth again by the same man who had raised 
him up. 

One day Kesra rode out from Ctesiphon to hunt horned sheep and deer on the 
plain. The flock of sheep dispersed, leaving Kesra behind, and he came on a 
grassy spot shaded by trees. Bozorjmehr was with him, keeping him company 
out of affection and in order to serve him. The king dismounted, intending to 
rest; none of his servants were nearby, but the one kind face that was there was 
enough. He stretched out and turned from side to side on the grass; then he laid 
his head down, with Bozorjmehr watching from a little way off. The king always 
wore an armband encrusted with jewels, and as he lay sleeping his arm was 
uncovered. A black bird swooped down from the clouds, perched beside the 
sleeping king, and saw the jewels on his naked arm. The bird saw no one else 
there; the men in the king’s entourage were off hunting by themselves, and the 
sleeping king seemed to be alone with no one nearby to advise him. Seeing the 
armband, the bird pecked open the jewels’ settings, and as the precious pearls 
and topazes fell out, he ate them one by one. Then he flew up and disappeared 
from sight. 

Bozorjmehr’s heart was filled with foreboding at what the heavens had 
brought. He knew that fate brings prosperity and hardship, and that now a time 
of hardship had come. When the king woke and saw Bozorjmehr biting his lip, 
he thought that this man whom he had treated so well had acted disrespectfully 
toward him, and said, “You dog, who told you a man’s nature could be hidden? 
I’m not some celestial being like Hormozd or Bahman; my body is made of 


earth, air, and fire.” But although the king tired out his tongue reproaching 
Bozorjmehr, he received no answer from him but sighs. Bozorjmehr seemed to 
shrivel away before his king and the turning heavens, because he had seen the 
signs of his downfall, and in his fear the wise counselor remained silent. The 
soldiers in the king’s entourage were now all around the meadow where their 
master had rested. The king mounted his horse and looked at no one on the way 
back to his palace; he bit his lip as he rode, and when he dismounted he muttered 
to himself in anger. He ordered his men to harden their hearts against the vizier 
and to confine him to his palace. 

Bozorjmehr sat in his palace, deprived of the king’s favor. One of his 
relatives, a young, energetic man who waited on King Nushin-Ravan, lived there 
with him. This man followed Nushin-Ravan about his palace, and was quite 
forward in his conversations with the king. One day Bozorjmehr asked him how 
he served the king, and told him he should look for ways to improve his skills. 
The servant replied, “You are our chief priest, so let me tell you what happened 
today. After he finished eating I went forward and poured water on his hands, 
and he found the floor was wet from my ewer. He looked at me with such fury 
that I said to myself, ‘I’ll never eat or sleep again!’ When the king of the world 
became angry with me like that, my hand holding the ewer went weak and I 
dropped it.” Bozorjmehr said to him, “Go and get some water, and pour it as you 
did over the king’s hands.” The young man brought warm water and bit by bit 
poured it over the hands of the vizier, who said, “Next time, when you pour the 
water for him to wash his hands, try to do it smoothly, with no violent 
movements, and when the king raises his hands to touch his lips with perfume, 
stop pouring.” 

The next day, when King Nushin-Ravan was eating, the young man stood 
there filled with apprehension until he once again had to bring the ewer and 
basin for the king to wash his hands. He performed his task just as the 
knowledgeable vizier had told him, pouring the water not too slowly and not too 
quickly. The king said to him, “Your service has improved: who taught you how 
to do this?” He answered, “Bozorjmehr taught me how to do this properly, in the 
way the king has just seen.” The king said, “Go to that clever man and ask him, 
‘What evil nature was it, what despicable ambition, made you choose to sink 
down from the splendid and honorable rank you held?’” Hearing the king’s 
words, the young steward ran to his uncle with grief in his heart. He told him 
what the king had said, and Bozorjmehr quietly answered him: “In ways that can 
be seen, and in ways that cannot be seen, my state is finer than the king’s.” The 


servant went back to the king and told him what Bozorjmehr had said. Nushin- 
Ravan started up in fury and ordered that Bozorjmehr be kept chained in a dark 
pit, and then told the servant to ask this foolish man how his days passed when 
he was imprisoned in this way. With his face covered in tears the young man 
asked Bozorjmehr the king’s question, and the good man’s answer was, “My 
days pass by more easily than the king’s do.” The messenger ran to the king like 
the wind and told him what Bozorjmehr’s answer was. The king raged like a 
leopard. He drove all love for Bozorjmehr from his heart and ordered that he be 
imprisoned in a metal chest with spikes on the inside and with his head held by 
iron bands. He could not rest by day or stretch out to sleep at night; his body was 
in constant pain and his heart was in torment. 

After four days the king of the world said to his servant, “Go to that wise man 
once more; be quick taking my message and bringing his answer. Ask him how 
he finds his body, now that its shirt is made of sharp spikes.” But when the 
servant gave him the obstinate king’s message, Bozorjmehr said to the young 
man, “My days are better than Nushin-Ravan’s days.” Nushin-Ravans’ face 
turned pale when he heard this reply; he chose a man in the palace who was 
honest and would understand what Bozorjmehr meant by his words. With him he 
sent an executioner, and said, “Go, and say to this malignant man that either he 
returns me a proper answer, not some foolishness about the spike-lined chest 
where he’s chained being better than the king’s throne, or this executioner will 
use his sword to show him how the Day of Judgment will arrive.” 

The man came to Bozorjmehr, and his heart was moved to pity by the sage’s 
plight; he repeated the king’s words for Bozorjmehr who said, 


“Whether our lot is vile or glorious 

Fortune has never shown her face to us. 

But, king or commoner, we know that we 

Must leave this earth soon for eternity. 

No man has an abiding foothold here 

And, good or bad, our lives will disappear: 

Then kings know fear, and cling to life, and grieve— 
But wretchedness is never hard to leave.” 


The messenger and the executioner returned to their proud sovereign and told 
him what they had heard. The king’s heart was troubled by this answer, and he 
gave orders that Bozorjmehr be taken from his prison to his palace again. 


And so the heavens turned for a while; Bozorjmehr’s face became wrinkled, 
his wealth could not assuage his grief, and he wasted away in sorrow. 


The Emperor of Byzantium Sends a Sealed Casket, and When 
Bozorjmehr Guesses What Is Inside It He Is Released 

At this time, the emperor of Byzantium sent an envoy to the king, with a letter 
and gifts and a locked strongbox. The envoy said, “The message from my master 
is as follows: “The king has many wise priests at his court; if, without opening it, 
they can say what is inside this locked box, we shall send tribute and presents 
beside, according to our custom. But if your clever priests cannot penetrate this 
mystery, the king should not demand any more tribute from us, and neither 
should he send armies into our realm. Answer as seems fitting to you.’” 

The world’s king said to the envoy, “Even this is not hidden from God; with 
his grace I shall solve the problem, and I have clear-thinking advisors to help 
me. Spend a week as our guest, and give yourself freely to wine and pleasure.” 
The king was bewildered as to what to do. He summoned his courtiers and wise 
men, and each of them looked at the keyless casket from every angle, but all of 
them had to confess their ignorance of what was inside it. The king became 
worried when none of the group had had any success. He thought, “This secret 
of the heavens is a problem for Bozorjmehr.” But, embarrassed by the suffering 
his wise counselor had been through, he frowned and his face turned pale. His 
painful thoughts prompted him to have a suit of clothes brought from the 
treasury, and a fine horse with a royal saddle. He sent these to Bozorjmehr with 
a message: “I cannot deny the suffering you have endured; it was the high 
heavens that had me hurt you in this way. Your talk infuriated me, and you put 
your own body at risk. Now something has happened that is troubling my heart. 
The emperor of Byzantium has sent me one of their priests, a famous man in his 
own land, who has a golden casket with him that’s completely closed, with a 
lock, and a seal of musk. The emperor says that our counselors should explain 
what is hidden inside the casket. I thought that this secret is something the soul 
of Bozorjmehr could understand.” 

When Bozorjmehr heard these words, his heart was filled with his old 
sufferings. He left the place where he had been confined, washed his head and 
body, and prayed before God who rules the world. He was an innocent man and 
his king was quick to anger, and Bozorjmehr was afraid that he would be harmed 
by the king again. It was still dark night when the king’s message reached him 
and day had not yet dawned. As the sun showed his crown and night veiled her 


face, Bozorjmehr peered up toward the stars, and when the shining sun rose in 
the sky he washed the eyes of his heart with the water of wisdom. He sought out 
a wise man on whom he could rely and said to him, “My affairs are in a 
wretched state because the sufferings I have been through have darkened my 
eyes. Watch for who meets us on the road, and ask them about their lives, but 
don’t inquire as to their names.” 

Bozorjmehr set out from his house, and there was a beautiful woman 
hurrying toward him. His companion described everything he couldn’t see, and 
Bozorjmehr said, “Find out if this lovely woman has a husband.” When she was 
asked, the woman answered, “I have a husband, and a child too, at home,” and 
Bozorjmehr smiled at her words as he rode forward on his high-stepping horse. 
Then another woman appeared, and Bozorjmehr’s guide asked her, “Do you 
have a husband and child, or do your arms embrace nothing but the wind?” She 
said, “I have a husband, but no child; and now that you have heard my answer, 
get out of my way.” And at that moment a third woman appeared and she too 
was questioned: “You have a lovely face, and a proud, provocative walk; who 
keeps you company?” “I’ve never,” she replied, “had a husband, and I don’t 
want to show my face to anyone.” Now when Bozorjmehr heard these answers, 
he turned them over in his mind. 

His face was melancholy as he hurried forward. When he arrived, he was 
taken to the king, who commanded him to approach the throne. And then the 
king’s heart was filled with sorrow, and he sighed deeply, because he realized 
that his wise advisor could no longer see. The king apologized at length for his 
anger against this innocent man, and then talked about Byzantium and its 
emperor and the locked casket. Bozorjmehr said to the world’s king, “May you 
shine for as long as the heavenly bodies shine. We should call an assembly of 
wise men and priests, as well as the envoy from Byzantium and have the casket 
placed before the king and his courtiers. Then by the power of God who gave us 
thought and has made my soul delight in truth, I shall say what is inside the 
casket, without touching either the box itself or its lock. Even if my eyes are now 
dark, my heart is bright, and my soul is armored with knowledge.” 

The king was happy to hear his words, and his heart revived like a flower in 
the springtime. He drew himself up as his worries fell away, and he had the 
envoy and his casket summoned, together with his priests, advisors, and sages, 
whom he seated before Bozorjmehr. The he addressed the envoy: “Give us your 
message, and make your demands.” The envoy repeated what his emperor had 
said: “A victorious king should have wisdom, knowledge, and a good reputation. 


You have the farr and strength of a world-conqueror, greatness, knowledge, and 
might, priests who seek out the truth, and heroes who support you here at your 
court or take your part in the world at large. Let your clever courtiers see this 
locked and sealed casket, and let them in their wisdom say clearly what is hidden 
there. Then we shall send you tribute and taxes, since my country is wealthy 
enough to do this; but if they cannot do this, then they should no longer ask us 
for tribute.” 

Bozorjmehr then invoked God’s blessing and said, “May the world’s king 
always be happy, understanding, fortunate, and generous! I thank the Lord of the 
Sun and Moon, who shows our souls the way to wisdom, who alone knows what 
is open and what is secret. He has no need of knowledge, but knowledge is my 
desire. There are three shining pearls inside the casket, within a number of 
coverings; one is pierced, one is half pierced, and iron has never touched the 
third.” When the envoy heard this he brought the key, while Nushin-Ravan 
watched. There was a box inside the casket, and inside this there were layers of 
silk, in which three pearls were hidden, just as the Persian sage had said. The 
first of them was pierced, the second half pierced, and the last untouched. All the 
priests who were present cried their congratulations, and showered Bozorjmehr 
with jewels. The king’s face cleared, and as a reward he filled Bozorjmehr’s 
mouth with splendid pearls. His heart was tormented by the thought of what he 
had done before; he writhed within and frowned to think how he had treated this 
man who had shown him such love and loyalty. 

When Bozorjmehr saw that the king’s soul was suffering, he spoke of those 
things from the past that he had kept hidden—the armband and the black bird, 
his anxiety for the jewels, and the king’s sleep. Then he said to the king, “This 
was fated to happen, and there is no point in suffering regret because of it; the 
heavens bring us good and evil, whether to the king, or to his priests, or to 
Bozorjmehr. The signs of the seeds that God has sowed in the stars are written 
on our foreheads. May Nushin-Ravan’s soul rejoice and always be free from 
pain and sorrow. However glorious a king might be, it is his vizier’s job to be an 
ornament to his court. The king’s business is hunting and warfare, wine and 
rejoicing, generosity, justice, and feasting; he knows how his predecessors 
reigned and follows their example. It is the vizier who must accumulate wealth, 
maintain the army, combat gossip, and hear suppliants for justice; it is his heart 
and soul that are troubled by worries about the administration and treasury.” 


A s Kesra Nushin-Ravan’s life drew to a close he nomi-nated his son 
Hormozd as his successor and wrote a document to him setting out his 
advice and final wishes. 


He began by invoking God and continued, “This is the advice of the son of 
Qobad. Understand, my son, that this world is faithless and filled with sorrow, 
hardship, pain, and adversity. And whenever you are happy here and your heart 
is free of sorrow, and you rejoice in your life, remember that you must leave this 
fleeting world. When thoughts of my departure came to me in the bright days 
and the long nights, I searched to see who would be worthy of the crown. I have 
six wise sons, all of them are generous and just, and they delight my heart. I 
chose you because you are the oldest, and you have wisdom and will be an 
adornment to the crown. Qobad was eighty when he made me his successor; I 
am now seventy-four, and I name you as the world’s king. In doing this I seek 
only rest and the public good, in the hope that my soul will be blessed. I hope 
too that God grants you nothing but happiness and prosperity. If you make men 
secure by your justice, you will also ensure your own security, and heaven will 
be your reward: great is the man who sows the seeds of righteousness. 

“See that you are always patient, since it is not becoming for a king to rush 
into decisions. A king who is alert and seeks for instruction keeps his good 
reputation forever. Have no dealings with lies, because if you do, your luck will 
wither away, and keep your heart and mind far from haste because haste sends 
wisdom to sleep. Do good and strive for the good, and in all things, good and 
evil, attend to the words of the wise. Do not let evil come near you, for it will 
certainly have its effect on you; dress appropriately, eat appropriately, and pay 
attention to your father’s advice. You come from God; see that you turn to him if 
you would have him as your guide. If your justice makes the world prosper, your 
throne will be secure and your subjects will be happy. If men do well, reward 
them so that they forget the pains they took. Keep the wise happy and close by, 
and make the world dark for those who are malevolent. Consult with the wise on 
every subject, and do not complain about the difficulties that kingship imposes 
on you. If the wise can always reach you, you will be able to keep your crown 
and throne. 


“Do not let your subjects live in wretchedness, and see that the country’s 
nobles benefit from your justice. Do not look kindly on those of low character, 
and entrust no task to an unjust man. Incline your ears and heart to the poor, and 
take their sorrows on yourself; in this way you will sow seeds of righteousness in 
your orchard, and your enemies will become your friends. When a powerful man 
acts justly and from the heart, the world is happy in his reign, and he too is made 
happy. Do not withhold your wealth from the deserving, and be generous to the 
virtuous. If you follow my advice your crown will keep its eminence. May he 
who bestows all benefits look kindly on you, and may your good deeds be a 
refuge for you. Do not forget my words, even though you can no longer see me. 
May your mind remain fresh and strong, your heart happy, your body pure and 
safe from all malevolence. May wisdom always guard you, and may your mind 
be filled with good thoughts. 

“When I have left this great world, build me a tomb like a palace, in a place 
where few men go, and so high that the vultures cannot fly over it. Its entrance 
must be high in the vault, as high as ten lariats would reach, and over it must be 
written that this is my court, together with an account of my greatness, my 
wealth, and my armies. See that the chamber is spread with carpets and cushions, 
preserve my body with camphor, and sprinkle musk on my head for a crown. 
Bring five unused brocades of cloth of gold from my treasury, and wrap me in 
them according to the custom of the Kayanids and our ancestors. Construct an 
ivory couch and place it there, and over it suspend my crown. Then to its right 
and left set out all my gold dishes, goblets, and jewels: twenty goblets are to be 
filled with rosewater, wine and saffron, and two hundred with musk, camphor, 
and ambergris. Do not exceed or fall short of what I order you. The blood must 
be drawn off from the trunk of my body, so that it dries, and then it must be 
filled with camphor and musk. Then close the door to the chamber, since no one 
must see the king. If the tomb is built in this manner, no one will be able to find 
his way to me. 

“Let my children and family, and all those who will grieve for my death, 
abstain from feasts and festivals for two months, since this is the custom when a 
king dies. And it would be right if all who are noble and benevolent would weep 
for the death of their king. See that you do not disobey the commands of 
Hormozd, or so much as draw breath without his knowledge.” 

Everyone wept when they heard of this document. Kesra Nushin-Ravan lived 
for one more year after he had written it, and when he died these words of his 


were his memorial; see that you preserve his memory. Now I shall tell of the 
crown of Hormozd, and place him on his throne. 


THE REIGN OF HORMOZD 


As Hormozd established his power and was finally able to reign as he wished, 
his evil nature became apparent and he strayed from the paths of righteousness. 
One by one, he destroyed his father’s confidants and advisors, men who had 
lived peacefully and with no fear of danger. There were three in particular who 
had been scholars at Nushin-Ravan’s court—one old man and two younger men. 
The first was Izad-Goshasp; the second, the wise Bozorjmehr, a man blessed 
with the divine farr; and the third Mahazar, also wise and of a serene and 
cheerful character. These three had served Nushin-Ravan’s throne as courtiers 
and viziers, but Hormozd feared that one day they would feel no gratitude 
toward him, and he was determined to bring each of them down into the dust. 


A a ——— — f 
a NO LOD IKKE EXC ORES FORRES oj f 
M ONY ae) ET 
AON Yo 90000 ) oy 
y a Moe Ki a a 
4 i chix 2 “ i § © .@ 
~ 8000 = 





He had Izad-Goshasp thrown into prison for no reason. The chief priest at 
that time—a man called Zardhesht—was filled with anxiety for Izad-Goshasp’s 
fate. It was as if an arrow had wounded his heart, and this good and noble priest 
became pale with worry. After a day in which Izad-Goshasp had had neither a 
servant, food, clothing, or any companion, he sent a message to the chief priest: 
“You have always been as dear to me as my own marrow and skin; I am now 
friendless in the king’s prison, and no one visits me. I’m hungry and my aching 
stomach longs for nourishment. Send me some food, some antidote to the pains 
that gnaw at me.” The priest’s heart was moved to sympathy for his friend’s 





situation, but he sent a cautious reply, “Despite your chains, be thankful you 
have not been physically harmed yet.” He grieved inwardly and pondered what 
to do. He sent some food to the prison, but his heart trembled with apprehension 
at what he was doing, and he said to himself, “If that unchivalrous and luckless 
ruler finds out that his priest has sent something to the prison, my life won’t be 
worth a copper coin. The king will find some way to harm me, and his face will 
turn pale with anger against me.” But his heart was wrung for Izad-Goshasp’s 
sufferings, and his face was sallow with grief. He ordered his cook to take food 
to the prison, and then he mounted his Arab horse and rode there himself. The 
two men embraced, and their eyelashes were as wet as the clouds in spring; they 
talked at length about the king’s evil disposition. A table was set before Izad- 
Goshasp, who took the sacred barsom in his hand and murmured his prayers 
while Zardhesht listened. He talked of his wealth and his palace, and then said, 


“Now go directly to Hormozd and say 

On my behalf, ‘Don’t turn your head away 

But think of all that I have undergone, 
Protecting you as if you were my son: 

Is my reward to be imprisoned here, 

To live in chains, consumed with grief and fear? 
My heart is innocent and will display 

The wrongs it has endured on Judgment Day.’” 


As the priest was returning home, one of the king’s spies ran and told Hormozd 
all he had heard, and the king decided on an evil course. He hardened his heart 
against Izad-Goshasp, and sent someone to the prison and had him killed. He 
continued to act toward Zardhesht as if nothing had happened, but he had the 
priest’s words repeated to him at length and began to consider how to kill him. 
He ordered his cook to prepare a dish that had been secretly poisoned. When 
the priest came to court for the royal audience, the king said to him, “Don’t leave 
us today; I have found a new cook.” The priest sat, and a table was set before 
him, and his face turned pale. He knew that the table signified his end, and he 
was not mistaken in this. The cooks brought in the dishes and the king ate some 
of everything. Then the poisoned dish was brought in, and the priest looked at it 
and knew in his heart that what was being offered to him as nourishment was 
poison. Hormozd watched and said nothing: he stretched out his hand to the 
poisoned dish, in the way kings do when they want to bestow a favor on one of 


their subjects. He took some brains from the dish and said to the priest, “What a 
fine brain you have. I’ve reserved this tender morsel just for you. Open your 
mouth and eat it; it will nourish you well.” The priest replied, “By your soul and 
mind—and may you reign forever—do not order me to eat this morsel. I am full; 
don’t urge me to eat more.” Hormozd said, “By the sun and the moon, by your 
king’s pure soul, take this food from my fingers; do not break my heart by 
denying me.” The priest replied, “The king orders me and I have no choice.” 

He ate the morsel and, tormented by pain, rode quickly to his own house. He 
told no one of the poison he had eaten, but lay down on a mattress, groaning in 
agony. He ordered that antidotes for poison be brought, from his own treasury or 
from the town, but when he ate them they had no effect, and he complained 
bitterly to God about Hormozd. The king sent one of his confidants to watch the 
priest and see whether the poison had taken effect or his plan had failed. The 
priest saw the envoy, and tears coursed down his cheeks as he spoke: “Tell 
Hormozd that I say this to him: ‘Your fortunes will decline, and you and I shall 
both go before our heavenly judge. From now on you will not be safe from 
harm, because God’s justice will find you out. You are a malevolent man, and I 
bid you farewell; evil will come to you from the evil you have done.’” The 
envoy wept to hear these words and reported them to the king. Hormozd 
regretted what he had done, and he brooded on the truth of the priest’s words. He 
sighed deeply, but could see no way to avoid the pains the priest had spoken of. 
Then the priest died, and the wise men of the country wept bitterly for him. This 
is the way of the world, which is full of pain and sorrow. Why strive for a crown, 
or glory in wealth? For the moments of pleasure pass, and time counts our every 
breath. 


Hormozd Kills SimaBorzin and Bahram Azar-Mahan 

The sad incident of the chief priest put the whole country into a turmoil of 
distress. This bloodthirsty king, who was unworthy to sit on the throne, gave no 
thought to the evils that were to come. He prepared to shed more blood and 
decided to use Bahram Azar-Mahan for this purpose. At dead of night he 
summoned him, had him kneel before him, and said, “If you want to be safe and 
never suffer because of my anger or irritation, when the sun rises tomorrow and 
makes the mountaintops glisten like armor, come with the nobles of Iran and 
stand before my throne. I will question you about SimaBorzin; make your heart 
pliant to my wishes when you answer. I will say, ‘Who is this friend of yours? Is 
he evil, or is he a God-fearing man?’ And you will say, ‘He is evil, malevolent, 


the spawn of Ahriman.’ After that you can ask me for whatever you desire— 
slaves, a throne, a seal of authority, a crown.” Bahram replied, “I shall say that 
he is a hundred times worse than you have said.” And in this way Hormozd 
sought for some excuse to ruin SimaBorzin, even though he was a nobleman and 
had been a favorite of Hormozd’s illustrious father. 

When dawn’s ivory veil appeared, and the sun rose in the sign of the Twins, 
the king sat on his ivory throne, above which was suspended his precious crown. 
The nobility of Iran presented themselves at court and when the chancellor drew 
back the curtain they went in together to the king, with Bahram Azar-Mahan and 
SimaBorzin among them. One by one they sat according to their rank, and a 
number of them stood before the king. Hormozd said to Bahram Azar-Mahan, 
“This SimaBorzin, who is here at this audience, is he worthy of his wealth or is 
he an extortionate man? Someone with an evil character does not deserve to be 
wealthy.” Bahram Azar-Mahan knew what the king’s question meant, he knew it 
root and branch. He understood that SimaBorzin was already a man to be 
mourned, and that he would receive nothing but a tomb, without so much as a 
shroud, from the king. He answered, “Your majesty, think nothing of 
SimaBorzin. He is the cause of Iran’s ruin, and would that his body had neither 
marrow nor skin to it. His talk is all slander, which he uses to stir up quarrels.” 

When SimaBorzin heard these words he said to him, “We are old friends— 
don’t vilify me in this way; don’t make common cause with demons like this. 
What have you seen in me, either in word or deed, since we’ve been friends, 
which is the work of Ahriman?” Bahram Azar-Mahan answered him, “You will 
be the first to harvest the seeds you have sown in the world, and this fire you lit 
will give you back nothing but black smoke. When Kesra summoned you and 
me to sit before his throne with the priest Bozorjmehr and that noble courtier 
Izad-Goshasp, he asked us who was worthy of the crown, who had the divine 
farr, whether his older or younger son was more worthy of the crown, and to 
which of them he should give it. We all stood and answered him together, 
saying, ‘This prince who was born of a Turk is not worthy of the throne, and no 
one wants him as king. He is descended from the emperor of China and has an 
evil nature, and in his face and stature he looks like his mother.’ But you said 
that Hormozd was worthy to be king; well, this is the reward you’ve received 
from that worthy man. This is why I have spoken against you and cursed you.” 

Hormozd shrank back in shame when he heard this man’s true words. In the 
darkness of the night he had both men sent to his prisons and muttered angrily 
against them. On the third night, when the moon rose above the mountains, the 


king got rid of SimaBorzin: he had him killed in the thieves’ prison, but all that 
he gained by this was sorrow and curses. Learning of this honorable man’s death 
Bahram Azar-Mahan sent a message to the king: “Your crown is higher than the 
moon’s sphere. You know how hard I have tried to keep your secrets, and that 
before that noble king, your father, I always spoke in your favor. If you summon 
me to your throne I shall give you some advice that will benefit Iran and keep 
those who are wise safe from harm.” Hormozd sent one of his confidants to fetch 
Bahram to the court in the darkness of the night, and the king spoke kindly to 
him, then said, “Tell me what this advice is, which will improve my fortunes.” 
Bahram answered, “I have seen a simple black chest in the king’s treasury: 
within it there is a casket, and within that there is a document written in Persian 
on white silk, and it is this on which the Persians’ hopes depend. It is written in 
the hand of your father, the great king, and you should look at it.” Hormozd sent 
someone to the treasurer saying, “Search among my father’s treasures for a 
simple sealed chest: on the seal is the name Nushin-Ravan (may his soul live 
eternally). Find it quickly and bring it here to me now, in the darkness of the 
night.” The treasurer hurried to find the chest, and ran with it to the king, with its 
seal still intact. The king broke the seal, repeatedly invoking the name of 
Nushin-Ravan as he did so. He looked in the chest and hurriedly pulled out a 
sheet of silk; then he stared at the words that Nushin-Ravan had written there: 


“For twelve long years, unequaled among men 
Hormozd will rule this land as king; but then 
Disturbances will fill the world, his name 

Will be obscured and lose its former fame. 
Foes will attack, and one will prove to be 

An evil and malignant enemy: 

The forces of Hormozd will flee and fail. 

His rival will dethrone him and prevail, 

His wife will put his eyes out, mourners’ cries 
Will rise above his body to the skies.” 


When Hormozd saw this message in his father’s handwriting, he was terrified 
and tore the silk in pieces. His face turned pale and his eyes filled with bitter 
tears. To Bahram he said, “You live by doing evil! What did you want to do with 
this document—tear the head from my body?” 


Bahram said to him, “You are born of a Turkish woman, and you can never 
be sated with bloodshed. Your ancestry is from the emperors of China, not from 
Kay Qobad, even though Kesra bestowed the crown on you!” Hormozd knew 
that if this man stayed alive he would need no prompting to shed his king’s 
blood; hearing these unwelcome words, he had Bahram taken back to the prison. 
On the next night, when the moon rose above the mountains, the executioner 
killed him in the prison. Now there were no wise advisors or priests left at his 
court. 


Saveh Shah Attacks Hormozd 

When Hormozd had reigned for ten years, voices rose against him in every 
country. Saveh Shah advanced from Herat, with elephants, war drums, wealth, 
and an army. To number his troops, count to a thousand four hundred times: he 
had one thousand two hundred war elephants, and you would say there was no 
way left unblocked on the earth. From the plain of Herat to Marvrud the land 
was filled with his warriors, as dense as warp woven with weft. He marched on 
Marv, and the land disappeared beneath the dust raised by his troops. He wrote a 
letter to Hormozd, saying, “Gather your armies and make a way for us; provide 
us with foraging, and remember our swords. I wish to travel through your 
kingdom; my troops cover the rivers, the mountains, and the plains.” When the 
king read this letter, he grew pale at the thought of such an immense army. 

And from the opposite direction the emperor of Byzantium led his army 
toward Persia, subduing the land as he did so. The Byzantine army was a 
hundred thousand strong, and included their renowned, warlike cavalry; they re- 
conquered the territory called Qeisar-Navan, which Nushin-Ravan had 
conquered. From every country armies led by famous noblemen were 
approaching. An army came from Khazar, and the land on their route was 
blackened by the mass of men. They were led by the experienced warrior Bedal, 
who marched with his own wealth and men and overran the countryside from 
Armenia to Ardebil. And an innumerable army came up from Arabia, led by 
young, proud riders like Abbas and Hamzeh. As they came they plundered the 
land that had provided Hormozd with regular tax revenues. They reached the 
Euphrates and left not a blade of grass still growing in the province. 

Hormozd’s days grew dark as messages came in from his forces, and this 
once-flourishing king seemed to wither away. He sent out messengers 
summoning the Persian nobility to his palace, laid the private information he had 
gathered before them, and said, “No one can remember a time when Iran has 
been attacked by so many different armies.” The nobles were perplexed as to 
what to do and made various suggestions; then they said, “You are a clever and 
capable monarch, listen to our opinion in this matter. You are the wise king and 
we are only your subjects, we don’t think of ourselves as learned people. You 
must consider what is to be done, and who can be our country’s savior.” 

The priest who served Hormozd as vizier said, “Your majesty, you are 
knowledgeable and you accept knowledgeable advice. If the army from Khazar 
attacks, we will make short work of them. We can parley with the Byzantine 


Romans, and we’|l utterly destroy the Arabs. My heart has no fear of Arabs. It 
hurts the eyes just to look at them, they eat snakes and lizards and they have no 
skill at fighting. It’s Saveh Shah you should worry about, he’s the real threat to 
us. Troubles come to us from the road to Khorasan, where our armies and wealth 
are being destroyed. When the Turks cross the Oxus and attack, we should 
respond without delay.” Hormozd asked the priest how he thought they should 
deal with Saveh Shah. The priest replied, “Prepare your army, since it’s an army 
that gives a king confidence. Summon the keeper of the muster rolls and have 
him tell you how many men under arms you have.” The keeper brought in the 
rolls; the army came to a hundred thousand men, and this number included both 
infantry and cavalry. The priest said, “With an army like this we need not worry 
about Saveh Shah. If you act chivalrously and righteously, and avoid all evil, 
you will be able to save your subjects as a king should.” 

The king said, “The Byzantine emperor will not try to attack us. Il return 
him the cities that Nushin-Ravan conquered, and he’ll go back to where he came 
from.” He found an envoy who was both a warrior and a scribe, a wise, eloquent, 
and clever man, and instructed him, “Tell the emperor I no longer require tribute 
from Byzantium, and that if he wishes to prosper, he should not set foot on 
Persian soil.” As soon as the envoy passed on the king’s message, the emperor 
returned to Byzantium and gave up all thoughts of war. Hormozd also sent an 
army commanded by the splendid and just warrior Khorad against the forces of 
Khazar. When they reached Armenia the enemy blocked their way and gave 
battle. The Persians killed a great number of them and brought back large 
amounts of plunder from the area. Once Hormozd knew that Khorad and his 
army were victorious, he concentrated all his thoughts on the one remaining 
problem—Saveh Shah. 


Mehran-Setad Recommends Bahram Chubineh to Hormozd 

The king had a wise, contented servant called Nastuh who said to the king, “May 
you live forever, and may evil always be far from you. You should ask Mehran- 
Setad what he remembers of former days. He sits in a commer, conning the Zend- 
Avesta; he’s grown old and weak and has no hopes of the world now. I recently 
spent a day and a night with him and told him about Saveh Shah, his war 
elephants, and his huge army, but when he answered me he spoke only of former 
times. I asked him what he remembered, and he said that he would tell what he 
knew if the king of the world asked him.” 


The king immediately sent a courtier, who brought the old man in a litter to 
the king. When the old man entered, his heart filled with wisdom, his head with 
talk, Hormozd asked him what he remembered about the warlike Turks. “Your 
majesty, you are eloquent and eager to learn,” Mehran-Setad said. “When the 
emperor of China sent your mother to Persia, I went with a hundred and sixty 
brave warriors to ask for her hand. Your father was a wise and just king, and he 
didn’t want the daughter of some concubine. He said to me, ‘Ask only for the 
daughter of the empress; a servant’s child wouldn’t be suitable for our court.’ I 
went to the emperor and greeted him. He had five daughters, all as lovely as the 
spring, all tints and scents and beauty they were. He sent me to his harem; they 
had made the girls’ faces up and put chaplets of roses in their hair, all except for 
your mother, who wore nothing on her head, and had none of the bracelets and 
necklaces and jewels the other girls were wearing. She was the only one who 
was the empress’s daughter, and she was the one who had no make-up or finery 
on. Her mother really loved her and was tormenting herself with the thought of 
her daughter going off to some distant land; she didn’t want to endure having to 
say goodbye to her when she left the emperor’s palace. I chose her, out of all the 
emperor’s daughters, and I didn’t so much as glance at the others. The emperor 
told me to choose another one, saying all five were good, accomplished girls. 
But I said that she was the one I had to have, and that it would be my ruin if I 
chose a different one. 

“Then he called for his learned counselors, and when they had knelt before 
his throne he asked them to cast his daughter’s horoscope, to see what the stars 
held in store for her. One of his astrologers said, ‘May you see nothing but good 
and hear nothing but righteousness. A child like a raging lion will be born from 
this girl and the Persian king; tall and strong-armed, in bravery like a lion, and in 
generosity like a rain cloud. He will be black-eyed, quick to anger, and 
impatient, and when his father dies he will be king. He will use up much of his 
father’s wealth, but few enough of his days will be spent in evil. Then a fierce 
king will arise, and attack with an army of Turks, intending to overrun Persia 
and the Yemen. The Persian king will fear him and his victories; but the king 
will have a subject living far away, a proud, loyal horseman, tall and wiry, his 
head covered in black curls, talkative, with a large nose, dark-skinned, quick and 
fierce in his quarrels. This ambitious man will be named Chubineh, and he will 
be descended from champions. This subject of the king’s will bring his army to 
the court slowly, then suddenly attack the Turks and break their army’s power.’ 


“T’ve never seen a happier man than the emperor of China was when he had 
heard the astrologer out. He gave his daughter, who was the crown of all his 
daughters, to Nushin-Ravan, and, as the king’s representative, I accepted her and 
started on my homeward journey. He gave us so many jewels that we had 
difficulty transporting them. He came with us as far as the Oxus, and there 
placed his beloved child in a boat; then he turned back from the shore, his heart 
filled with sorrow at parting from her. Now I have told the king all that I saw. 
Search your country for this man, and tell your envoy to hurry because the 
king’s victories are in his hands. Don’t entrust this matter to anyone else, friend 
or foe.” When he had said this, his spirit left his body, and the whole company 
wept for him. 

The king was astonished, and bitter tears rained down from his eyelashes. He 
said to the Persians there, “Mehran-Setad remembered these true accounts, and 
when he had told them to me he died, entrusting his soul to God. I am grateful to 
God that I have learned from this old man such pressing news. Search among 
our nobility, and the commoners too, until you find the man he spoke of; do your 
utmost to find him.” Among his listeners was a well-known nobleman who was 
in charge of the king’s stables; his name was Rad—Farrokh and he lived only to 
serve the king. He came to the king and said, “In my opinion the description this 
praiseworthy sage gave fits Bahram, the son of Bahram, who was Goshasp’s 
son. He is a fine, proud horseman: I have not seen a more able lord of the 
marches riding in the plains. You gave him Barda’ and Ardebil to rule, and he 
has become a great warrior there, with his war drums and cavalry.” 


Bahram Chubineh Arrives at Hormozd’s Court 

Hormozd sent for Bahram and had him told of Mehran-Setad’s prediction. The 
ambitious chieftain hurried from Barda with his warriors, and as soon as he 
arrived, Hormozd had him admitted into his presence. Bahram looked at 
Hormozd’s face and greeted him respectfully; the king gazed at him for a while, 
and formed a good opinion of what he saw. He saw the attributes Mehran-Setad 
had described; he smiled and his face relaxed again. Then he questioned him and 
made much of him, and had a fine building set aside for him to stay in. 

The next morning, when night laid aside its musky cloak and the sun showed 
her face, the lord of the marches made his way to the court, and the nobles 
opened a way for him. The king called Bahram forward and sat him on a throne 
in front of the other courtiers. He questioned him about Saveh Shah and said, 
“Should I make peace with him, or send an army to confront him?” The warrior 


answered, “Making peace is not the way to deal with Saveh Shah. If he’s 
determined on war, trying to make peace will only lead to your destruction: a 
malignant man will become more audacious when he sees you have no stomach 
to fight. If you stick to feasting when you should be fighting, one of your 
subjects will take over this realm.” Hormozd asked, “Then what should we do? 
Wait, or march against him?” Bahram replied, “It’s a good omen if this 
malcontent acts unjustly, because justice and injustice can’t be together in one 
place. Attack this evil enemy, bring water to quench his fire; if you don’t, the 
ancient heavens will choose a new ruler here. If we use the strength and skills we 
have, God will not reproach us and we shall not be ashamed when heroes ask us 
about our deeds. If there were only ten thousand Persians left alive and we fled 
from battle, those enemies who love to find fault with you would say that you 
ran away without fighting. If we can rain down arrows on the enemy and make 
our bows like the clouds in spring, if a hundred thousand maces and swords are 
shattered in the lines of battle, and still we are not victorious and must despair of 
our fortunes, then will be the time to obey the enemy, when we have neither 
minds nor souls nor bodies left to us.” 

When the king heard Bahram’s words he laughed, and the throne seemed to 
shine with splendor. The courtiers left the king’s presence, and their hearts were 
filled with anxiety. They said to Bahram, “When the king questions you don’t be 
so foolhardy in your answers. Saveh Shah has such a huge army with him that 
not an ant or a mosquito can find its way through such a mass of men. After the 
things you’ve said in front of the king, who will dare to lead our armies?” But 
Bahram said to them, “My lords, if the king commands it, I am ready to lead our 
armies.” The king’s spies immediately went to Hormozd and told him what 
Bahram had said, adding ten new words for every one he’d spoken. 


Hormozd Makes Bahram Chubineh the Commander of His Army 
The Persian king was pleased to hear this, and he no longer feared Saveh Shah’s 
forces. He made Bahram the commander of his army, lifting this warrior’s head 
to the clouds, and all those who looked for renown in the wars hailed Bahram as 
their chief. Bahram came before his king, armed and ready for combat, and 
asked permission to review the army’s troops, to see who was eager for war and 
who would hold back when there was glory to be won. The king replied, “You 
are their commander, responsible for whatever good or evil comes of this.” 

Bahram went to the plain where the king reviewed his warriors and ordered 
that the Persian army appear before him. He chose the best of them and 


registered the names of twelve thousand armed cavalry, whose horses were 
protected with barding. He enrolled men who were in their forties, and refused to 
consider those who were older or younger. Bahram had overall charge of the 
army, and he made his second in command a man called Yalan-Sineh, whose 
heart longed for war. He was to lead the troops into battle, curveting his horse, 
reminding the men of their lineage, and filling their hearts with courage. Another 
of his subordinates was Izad-Goshasp, who would not turn his horse back from a 
raging fire: his responsibility was to watch the baggage and to see that the two 
flanks of the army coordinated their attack. The rear of the army was 
commanded by Hamdan-Goshasp, a man who could seize lions by the tail when 
he rode. Then Bahram addressed his army: 


“Noble and valiant warriors, see that you 

Act righteously in everything you do— 

If you would have God turn your present night 
To dawn and victory with his glorious might, 
See that in darkness when the trumpets sound 
You leap into the saddle from the ground, 

And ride as if the sun itself arose 

At midnight to do battle with our foes. 

Don’t dream of rest until the battle’s done, 
Rest is for when our victory is won.” 


The king rejoiced to hear of Bahram’s preparations and his speech, and threw 
open the doors of his treasury. He made weapons available to Bahram and had 
his warhorses brought into the town from their pastures, saying that the new 
commander could choose any of them for himself. Then he said, “You’ve heard 
what quantities of troops and arms and treasure Saveh Shah commands, and that 
the earth trembles when he takes the field, and yet you have chosen only twelve 
thousand armed men, together with their horses protected by barding, and I don’t 
know if they will be sufficient on the day of battle. And instead of young 
swordsmen you’ve asked for men in their forties.” 

Bahram replied, “Your majesty, you speak truly and are favored by fortune. 
You have heard tales of the great men who ruled the world before us, and how, 
when fortune promised victory to them, a few troops were sufficient. If the king 
will permit me, I shall give you some examples. When Kay Kavus was 
imprisoned in Hamaveran with a huge army, Rostam chose twelve thousand of 


the finest cavalry he could find; he freed Kavus from confinement, and the force 
he had chosen was undefeated. In the same way Gudarz, the chieftain of the 
Keshvad clan, took twelve thousand armed cavalry with him in his war of 
vengeance for the death of Seyavash. And the great Esfandyar took twelve 
thousand warriors against Arjasp; he was able to raze the enemy’s fortress and 
accomplish all his aims with them. If an army has more men in it than this it 
becomes uncontrollable and the commander is distracted on the battlefield. As 
for your saying that forty-year-olds can’t fight better than younger men, a man of 
forty has experience, and his courage is the greater for it. He knows what loyalty 
is and remembers the bread and salt he’s received; the heavens have turned 
many times above his head. He fears shame and the mockery of his detractors, 
and because of them he won’t avoid fighting; a grown man’s soul is steeled by 
thoughts of his wife and children and family. A young man is easily tricked, and 
when he must wait, he has no patience; he has no wife or children or fields to 
think of, and he confuses what’s important with what doesn’t matter. Because an 
inexperienced man has no wisdom, he can’t see things as they really are. If he’s 
victorious on the day of battle, he’s happy and laughs and wastes his time, and if 
victory isn’t his, the enemy will see nothing of him except his back.” 

At these words, the king felt as refreshed as a rose in the spring. “Go, put on 
your armor,” he ordered Bahram, “and make your way to the reviewing ground.” 
The commander left the king and asked for his belt, cuirass, and helmet. He 
strapped barding onto his horse and tied a lariat to the stirrups. The king came to 
the reviewing ground with his vizier, bringing arrows, polo mallets, and balls. 
His commander appeared and prostrated himself in the dust before his king, who 
gave him his blessing, and in response the commander kissed the ground. Then 
the king held up a banner, on which was depicted a purple dragon; this was the 
banner that had gone before Rostam in his wars, and the king lifted it lightly and 
kissed it, laughing as he did so, and handed it to Bahram. He called down many 
blessings on the banner and said to Bahram, “This banner belonged to the man 
my ancestors always called the first of champions, whose name was Rostam, 
who conquered the world, and was victorious and pure of soul. It is his banner 
you hold in your hand, and may you be victorious and loyal to your king! I 
believe you are another Rostam, in your courage, heroism, and loyalty.” Bahram 
called down blessings on the king and said, “May you be victorious, and your 
soul remained untroubled!” Then he left the reviewing ground for his lodging, 
grasping Rostam’s banner in his fist; the army’s warriors dispersed, and their 
commander was content. 


Bahram Chubineh Marches Against Saveh Shah 

When the first light of dawn appeared above the mountains and the sun’s 
glittering yellow shield shone there, the army’s commander came before his 
king, his arms folded over his chest in submission, to say, “I have all I could 
wish, and by your farr I am the crown of the age, but I have one request to make 
of your majesty. It is that you send someone trustworthy with me, a scribe who 
can report back the name of anyone who distinguishes himself in battle and 
brings the enemies’ heads down into the dust, so that his fame may live in the 
world.” Hormozd replied, “The scribe Mehran is young, eloquent, and 
intelligent,” and he gave orders that Mehran accompany the army. Then the 
commander, alert as a male lion, at the head of his experienced, courageous 
troops, immediately set off from Ctesiphon. 

Hormozd said to his vizier, “He is a brave man and will triumph on the 
battlefield. But what do you think will happen then? We should discuss this at 
length.” The vizier replied, “May you live forever, since this is what you 
deserve. This champion, with his great strength and stature, with his quick 
tongue and confident spirit, will surely be victorious and overthrow the king’s 
enemies. But I fear that in the end he will turn against the king who has favored 
him. He’s very forward in his speech, and he acts like a lion when he talks with 
your majesty.” Hormozd said, “You’re the most suspicious man alive! Don’t 
confuse poison with its antidote. If he defeats Saveh Shah, he deserves a crown 
and a throne. This is my hope, that he reign as a prince, praised and successful.” 
The vizier was abashed, and held his tongue. But in his heart the king pondered 
what he had said, and before long he chose a spy from among his courtiers, 
someone who could follow up on this suspicion. He said to him, “Hurry after the 
army commander, and report back to me on what you see.” The man sped after 
Bahram, and no one knew of his mission. He was both a guide to what was 
happening and an interpreter of omens, someone who told the king what the 
outcome of everything would be. 

As Bahram rode from Ctesiphon at the head of his army, with his lance in his 
hand, he saw a seller of sheep’s heads in the distance. The man had a tray on 
which were a number of dressed heads. Bahram urged his horse forward and 
spitted one of the heads on his lance, lifting up the lance as he rode and then 
flinging the head down at will. He took this as a sign and said, “This is how I 
shall deal with Saveh Shah’s head; I’ll throw it down in the road before his 
troops, and then I’|l destroy his whole army.” The man the king had sent saw 
this and interpreted it appropriately, thinking, “This man has fortune on his side, 


and his efforts will gain him a throne: but then when he has what he wants in his 
grasp he’Il stubbornly defy his king.” He returned, and reported this to the king 
who grew anxious and worried. The man’s words seemed worse than death to 
him; he became dejected, like a green leaf that shrivels and turns black. 

He called for a young messenger to hurry after Bahram, instructing him, “Go 
and tell the army’s commander to halt where he is tonight. At dawn he is to 
return here to me, where I’|l clear the court and give him some advice. I’ve 
remembered a number of useful things I have to tell him.” The young messenger 
caught up with Bahram and told him what he had heard from the king, but 
Bahram answered, “Tell him, “You’re a wise king, and people don’t summon 
armies back when they are on the march. To return as you suggest would be a 
bad omen, and our enemies would be strengthened to hear of it. ’ll come to your 
court once I’m victorious and I’ve made your army and country glow with 
splendor.’” The messenger returned and told the king what warlike Bahram had 
said. The king was pleased at this answer, and the messenger’s efforts had no 
result. 

At dawn Bahram called down blessings on the army and marched them as far 
as Khuzestan; no one along their route came to any harm. When they pitched 
camp a woman with a sack full of straw ran between the ranks; a horseman came 
and bought the sack from her, but he refused to pay and tugged at his reins and 
rode off. The woman went wailing to Bahram and said, “I had a little straw and I 
thought I could sell it, so I brought it to your army; but now a horseman has 
stolen it from me. He has an iron helmet on his head.” They immediately 
searched for the man and dragged him before Bahram, who said to the thief, 
“You will lose your head for this sin you’ve committed.” He was dragged 
stumbling in front of the tents, and his head, arms, and legs were smashed to 
pieces. Bahram split him in two with a sword, to terrify anyone else there who 
was inclined to act unjustly. A proclamation was made in front of Bahram’s 
pavilion: “Whoever steals one stalk of straw will find no mercy; I shall split his 
body open with my sword. Buy whatever you need with silver coins.” 


Hormozd Sends Khorad-Borzin to Saveh Shah with a Deceitful 
Message 

But Hormozd was constantly troubled by his thoughts, thinking now of Saveh 
Shah and his wealth and war elephants, then of the anxieties and fear he felt 
because of Bahram. His soul was full of sorrow, his fearful heart was split in two 
with worry. In night’s darkness, after the moon set, the king said to Khorad- 


Borzin, “Contrive to reach our enemy: go as quickly as you can and don’t rest on 
the way. Observe his army, who and how many they are, and who their leaders 
and warriors are.” Then he had a letter written, filled with advice for his 
dangerous adversary, and it was accompanied by innumerable royal presents. He 
said to his envoy, “Travel toward Herat; on your way you will meet with 
Bahram’s army. Turn aside from your destination and tell Bahram that I’m 
sending flattering messages to Saveh Shah in order to lure him into a trap, and 
that Saveh Shah is not to learn of his identity or intentions.” 

Khorad-Borzin set out and talked with Bahram as his king had ordered, and 
from there he traveled on to where Saveh Shah was camped with his elephants 
and wealth and army. He praised and flattered him, and passed on Hormozd’s 
secret message, amplifying it in every way, so that Saveh Shah would march on 
Herat. This he did, pitching camp by the river there. A scout then saw Bahram’s 
troops and ran to Saveh Shah saying that a mighty army was approaching. Saveh 
Shah was alarmed by this news; he summoned Hormozd’s envoy from his tent 
and spoke to him angrily, “You deceitful devil, haven’t you seen how far you 
could fall, up there on the heights? You’ve come from that wretched king of 
yours to tempt me into an ambush. You’re bringing up a Persian army to attack 
me; they’ve pitched camp on the plains of Herat!” Khorad-Borzin answered, 
“Don’t misconstrue things when you see a few troops in front of you. This is 
some lord of the marches who’s going somewhere, or it’s someone who’s fled 
from his own country and is seeking asylum with you, or it’s a merchant who’s 
traveling with an escort to be safe on the road. Who would be foolish enough to 
oppose you, unless the mountains and oceans are going to fight?” Saveh Shah 
was Satisfied by this answer and replied, “Let us hope things are as you say.” 

Night came quickly from the mountains as Khorad-Borzin returned to his 
tent. He made preparations for flight, to avoid the destruction that was certain to 
descend on him otherwise. As the darkness deepened, Saveh Shah sent his wise 
young son with an escort to his enemy’s leader. As he drew near the Persian 
force, the young prince dispatched a horseman to inquire as to who these troops 
were, and why they were advancing on this territory. A Turk rode forward like 
the wind and called out, “Mighty warriors, who is your commander, who leads 
this army, who is the finest fighter among you? Because our crown prince, 
whom Saveh Shah loves more than his own eyes and heart, wants to see him, 
without an escort.” A warrior came to Bahram and told him what he had heard, 
and the commander came out of his tent and stood there beneath his glittering 
banner. When the prince saw him he urged his horse forward, so that it was 


covered in sweat. He asked, “Where have you ridden from, and why have you 
pitched camp here? I’ve heard that you’ve fled from Persia, that you’re a fugitive 
who has blood on his hands.” Bahram replied, “God forbid that I think of 
opposing Persia’s king. I have come here with my army from Baghdad, at the 
king’s orders, to fight. When news of Saveh Shah’s army reached the royal 
court, he told me to march out and block their way with maces, lances, swords, 
and arrows.” 

The prince immediately returned to his father and told him what had 
happened. Saveh Shah grew suspicious at his words and sent for the Persian 
envoy. But he was told, “Khorad-Borzin has fled, weeping bitter tears of regret 
that he had come here.” Saveh Shah asked his son, “How did that wretch find a 
route to go by? The night was dark, there is a huge army here; how could our 
sentinels be so negligent?” 


Saveh Shah Sends a Message to Bahram Chubineh 

Then Saveh Shah sent an old man, a fine orator, to Bahram, with orders to say, 
“Don’t be such a fool as to lose your reputation here. You should at least realize 
one thing, that this king of yours is trying to get you killed. He’s sent you to 
fight with someone who has no equal in all the world. He’s said to you, ‘Go and 
block his advance,’ but haven’t you heard the unsettling news that if a mountain 
is in my way, I can flatten it with my army and elephants?” When Bahram heard 
these words, he laughed at the man’s blustering tactics. He answered, 


“If secretly the world’s king wants to kill 
His slave, I cannot contradict his will; 

If it would please him, then it’s right that I 
Find my grave here: I am prepared to die.” 


The messenger returned to Saveh Shah and gave him the warrior’s answer. 
Saveh Shah said, “Go and question the Persian again. Say, ‘Why do you need to 
talk so much? Why have you come here? Ask from me whatever you wish.’” 
The messenger went to Bahram and said, “Tell us whatever it is you’re hiding. 
My king’s star is in the ascendant, and he is looking for subjects like you.” 
Bahram replied, “Tell him this: ‘If you want war, stop all this pretense. But if 
you want to make peace with the world’s king, then I shall entertain you in the 
borderlands here, and I shall obey your commands. I shall give your troops gold 
and silver, and crowns and belts of office to those who are worthy of them. I 


shall send a horseman to the king and he will come halfway to meet you. He will 
provide you with foraging, as one ally to another. If you want friendship, the 
king will treat you well. But if you’ve come here to fight, then you should 
realize you’ve entered the sea and it’s a sea monster you’|l be fighting with; 
you’ll retreat from the plains of Herat in such a wretched state that our nobility 
will weep for you. I wish you pits before you, winds at your back, rain to 
accompany you! It’s your bad luck that has brought you here, intending to bring 
down evil on your head.’” 

The messenger hurried back like the wind and recounted every detail of what 
Bahram had said. Saveh Shah was enraged to hear this reply; the cold words ate 
at his heart, and his face turned pale. He said to his envoy, “Go back again, and 
take that demon my answer. Say, ‘There’s no fame to be had from fighting with 
you, and it’ll give me no satisfaction to kill you. I’ve courtiers crowded at my 
door like your king; the least of my servants are your superiors. But if you 
appeal to me for my protection, I’ ll lift your head above them all; you’ll find 
immense wealth, and all your army will be well equipped. An ambitious man 
like you doesn’t try to prove his courage by pointless, idle talk.’”” Once more the 
messenger returned to Bahram and passed on his master’s urgent, heartfelt 
message. And again Bahram replied, “I cannot hide my answer from your lord. 
Say this to him, ‘If indeed I’m as lowly as you say, I feel no shame because of it. 
The King of Kings is ashamed to fight with someone as insignificant as you; it’s 
my unimportance that has made me the leader of this army, which I’ve brought 
here in order to destroy Saveh Shah’s forces. I’ll cut your head off and take it to 
my king, and it’s not even worth spitting on my lance to display as I ride there. It 
would shame you if I asked for your protection, and so in my insignificance I’ve 
come to attack you. You won’t see me except on the battlefield, with my purple 
banner fluttering behind me; and when you see the dragon embroidered there, 
that will be the sign of your death; I shall sheathe my lance in your head and 
helmet.’” 

After hearing such hostile talk, Saveh Shah’s envoy turned his back on 
Bahram. He told Saveh Shah all he had heard and seen, and the Turkish king’s 
head seethed with longing for vengeance. He ordered that his war drums be 
readied, and his towering elephants be led onto the plain; all the land became 
black with dust from his army’s hooves, and the squeal of trumpets rang out. 
When Bahram heard that the enemy’s troops were approaching, and that the 
plain had turned red, yellow, and black with their banners, he ordered his men to 
mount, and he came forward armed, with his mace in his hand. Behind him was 


the city of Herat, ahead an army with drawn swords. He coordinated the right 
and left flanks of his forces, all of whom were eager for battle. It seemed that all 
the world was made of iron, and that the stars were glittering lances. 

Saveh Shah looked at the troops ranged against him: Herat was to the rear of 
Bahram’s men, and Saveh Shah’s own situation was hemmed in and 
unfavorable. He said to his horsemen, men of long experience who sympathized 
with his cause, “That Persian commander has tricked me: he delayed until his 
army had occupied the city and he’s left the reed beds to us.” He drew up his 
army’s ranks in the narrow space left to them; the sky was darkened and the 
earth disappeared. He had forty thousand men on his right flank, but they were 
so hemmed in that they could hardly wield their swords, and there were another 
forty thousand in the rear. Because of the limited space many of his troops could 
do nothing. In the van of his army were his elephants, blocking the way like a 
wall. Saveh Shah was distraught that his army was unable to maneuver: it 
seemed that fortune had turned against him, and that his throne would soon be 
vacant. 


Saveh Shah Sends Another Message to Bahram Chubineh 

Once again Saveh Shah sent a messenger—a glib, deceitful warrior from the 
plains of Herat—to Bahram, saying, “The heavens have no love for you; be 
wise, open your heart’s eyes, and listen to my advice. There are two peerless 
nobles in the world, shining like the sun in the heavens, armed all year round and 
ready to fight: I, the rightful ruler of the world, am one, and the other is my son. 
My troops outnumber the leaves on the trees, supposing they could be counted; 
if I could count my elephants and warriors, they would make the number of 
raindrops that fall in the spring seem laughable to you. I own more armor and 
tents and pavilions than you can imagine; the mass of my horses and warriors 
would terrify the very mountains and deserts. Kings are my servants, or worthy 
to be counted as such; if the seas could flow here and the mountains run, they 
would not be sufficient to move the treasures and troops I’ve accumulated. All 
the nobles of the world, except that Persian lord of yours, call me king. 

“My soul can see clearly enough that your fate is in my hands. If I advance 
my armies, there will not be space for an ant or a mosquito to pass. I’ve a 
thousand armored elephants, and horses flee at the scent of them; who in all Iran 
can stand before me and block my way? My men occupy the land from here to 
Ctesiphon, and the number there will grow. Who has deceived you, what fool 
has tricked you? You’ve no mercy on yourself, or if you have, it’s hidden away 


because it can’t tell good from evil. When did a wise man ever talk so foolishly? 
Forget this war and come over to me. I won’t keep you waiting long for my 
response: I’ll make you a lord, I’Il give you my daughter, you’ |! be an honored 
man here. You’|l be a nobleman, free of all the miseries a subject must endure. 
When the Persian king is killed in battle, his crown and throne will be yours; I’ll 
go on toward Byzantium, and leave all this land and its wealth and armies in 
your possession. I say this because I like you, your deeds show you possess the 
divine farr, and you know how to lead an army in war because your father and 
grandfather were both army commanders. This message is not a trick; I want to 
help you. Today you’re opposing me with your contemptible little army, but 
even if you don’t fall in with my wishes, this is the only message you’ ll ever 
hear from me.” 


Bahram Chubineh’s Answer to Saveh Shah 

The envoy spoke and Bahram listened, and when he answered his words were 
somber. He said, “Among those who have pride and nobility you’re a byword 
for evil; an idle king who talks too much has no one’s respect. Your previous 
messages, and this one, show me you’re a great talker, certainly; someone whose 
luck is running out will try to save himself with speeches. In your pointless 
prattle I can hear that your heart is fearful, that you’re terrified of being defeated. 
When you say you’! kill our king and give me his throne and army, you remind 
me of how, when a poor man is driven from a village, he will always claim that 
he was the village headman, that everyone else was his inferior and he was in 
charge. But the sun will not shine on our deeds for two more days before I send 
your bloody head spitted on a lance to my king. 

“As for your talk about my being grateful to you and hailing you as an 
honorable king because you’ ll give me your child in marriage and the throne of 
Iran, where Ill be your ally, my answer is that my lance is now next to your ear 
and that I shall cut your head off with my sword. And when you’re gone your 
head and crown and treasure, as well as your daughter and all you’ve taken such 
pains to accumulate, will be mine. And your boasts of having more crowns and 
thrones and elephants and cavalry than anyone can count remind me of the 
nobleman who, when he was in the thick of battle, said that a thirsty dog barks 
louder the further away from water he is. Devils must have captured your heart 
to make you come to fight against my king, but you’ll writhe in pain when God 
punishes you and you remember the evil deeds you’ve committed. And then you 
claim that crowned kings are your servants, that all the cities of the world are 


yours and bear witness to your greatness; well, the way’s open to those cities, 
and servants and kings alike can take it. But if you knock at their gates the only 
sovereignty they’ ll grant you is over waste reed beds. You talk about pardoning 
me, but you’ve forgotten my courage; you can pardon me when you see my 
lance, then you won’t be calling me your subject. When my army’s drawn up for 
battle I don’t care a copper coin for your troops and ambition and elephants and 
throne. If you’re a king, why do you lie so much? That’s no way to win glory in 
the world. I’ve told my king that in three days’ time, when the sun lights up the 
sky in splendor, he will see your head spitted on a lance before his throne.” 

The envoy’s cheeks turned sallow, as if his once-flourishing fortune were 
now old and decrepit. He took the message to Saveh Shah, whose face darkened 
when he heard it; but his son said, “What do such boasts matter? We should 
weep with pity for their contemptible army.” The son went to his pavilion and 
gave orders for cymbals and Indian bells, elephants and war drums, and directed 
that the heavens be filled with their din. While his son was preparing for battle in 
this way, Saveh Shah was filled with anxiety. He said to his son, “All our army 
loves you, but don’t attack until dawn.” The two armies retreated to their tents, 
and sentries were posted before the pavilions. On each side camp fires flickered, 
and the world was filled with the noise of the two armies. 


Bahram’s Dream: He Draws Up His Army for Battle 

Bahram was alone in his tent when he summoned the Persian commanders, and 
they discussed the coming battle until nightfall. Then the Turks and Persians 
alike slept, and ambitious men who were eager to conquer the world forgot its 
claims. As Bahram slept within his tent, his heart was preoccupied all night with 
the coming battle. 


And in the lion-warrior’s mind it seemed 

As though the Turks had won; great Bahram dreamed 
His army was destroyed, and when he tried 

To flee, the paths were blocked on every side: 

On foot now and alone, he scoured the plain 

For warriors who could help him, but in vain. 


He was uneasy when he woke, and his mind, which was usually so resourceful, 
was filled with foreboding. The night was dark, and sorrow was his companion: 
he hid his dream and mentioned it to no one. 


At that moment Khorad-Borzin arrived after fleeing from Saveh Shah. “Your 
one hope is to retreat and quickly,” he said. “No one in all the world has ever 
seen an army as massive as Saveh Shah’s. What makes you so confident? Look 
at the devil’s trap you’re falling into. Don’t throw Persian souls to the winds, 
think of our brave warriors’ lives. Find it in your heart to have pity on your own 
life, because you have never faced anything like this before!” Bahram replied, 
“All men from your town can do is sell fish, from summer to winter. Your 
calling is to handle nets by a lakeshore, you’re not a man for maces and swords 
and arrows. But when the sun raises its head above the mountains, I’ll show you 
how I fight with Saveh Shah.” 

When the sun rose in the sign of Leo and the world turned as white as a 
Roman’s face, trumpets were sounded and the earth trembled with the pounding 
of horses’ hooves. Bahram drew up his army and mounted his horse, flourishing 
his well-tried mace in his hand. There were three thousand armored and 
experienced cavalry on the right flank of his forces, and he sent as many warlike 
horsemen to the left flank. One side was commanded by Azar-Goshasp, and the 
other by Goshasp; in the rear was Yalan-Sineh, whose men were armed with 
maces and were to attack last. The van was commanded by Hamdan-Goshasp, 
whose horse’s hooves spread fire in the reed beds. Each of them commanded 
three thousand cavalry, eager for war. 

A herald announced Bahram’s message to his troops: “Great warriors with 
your golden helmets, if anyone flees from this battle, even if he’s faced by a lion 
or a leopard, I swear by God I shall cut his head from his body and give his 
corpse to the flames.” There were two paths from the camp, by which one could 
easily retreat, and Bahram had both blocked with a high wall of earth, while he 
himself took up his position in the center of the army. When the king’s scribe 
saw this, he came to Bahram and said, “This is beyond all reason; your foolish 
boasting has gone on long enough! Look at the armies drawn up here—we’re 
like a white hair lost on a black ox’s hide. Things will go badly for Iran in this 
battle, our land will be destroyed, we’ ll be overrun by Turks, and not a field or a 
river or a Mountain will remain to us!” Bahram yelled at him, 


“Stick to your ink and paper, who told you 
To count our troops? Do what you’re hired to do!” 


The scribe went to Khorad-Borzin and said, “Bahram’s been bewitched by some 
devil!” The two scribes looked for a way to flee, fearing the catastrophe they felt 


sure would come. They went to a hill overlooking the battlefield and fixed their 
eyes on Bahram’s helmet, to see how he fared when the fighting began in 
eamest. 

When Bahram had drawn up his troops ready for battle, he turned aside, 
groaning in anguish, from the battlefield. He prostrated himself in the dust 
before God and cried out, 


“O Lord of truth and justice, if you see 

My cause as wrong, protect my enemy, 

But if it is your cause for which I fight 

Make my heart calm, strengthen my army’s might, 
Give us a joyful victory, and bless 

The world with riches, peace, and happiness. ” 


Still weeping, he mounted his horse, his ox-headed mace in his fist. 


Bahram Chubineh Fights Against Saveh Shah 

Now Saveh Shah addressed his troops: “Begin your magic, so that the hearts and 
eyes of the Persians will tremble, and no harm will come to you.” All his 
magicians set about their business, and fire darted through the air: a wind rose up 
and a black cloud poured down arrows. Bahram cried out, “Noble lords and 
Persian warriors, take no notice of this magic; go forward to war with rage in 
your hearts. If the only hope they have is sorcery and magic, we should weep for 
the poor wretches!” A cry went up from the Persian side, and they readied 
themselves for combat. Saveh Shah saw that the magic had done him no good 
and he attacked on the left, like a wolf falling on a lamb. When he had broken 
their ranks he turned toward the center, where Bahram was. Bahram saw his men 
flee; he charged forward and with his lance unseated three horsemen. He 
shouted, “This is how to fight, this is our custom and how we carry it out. Have 
you no shame before God, or before our noble warriors?” Then like a hungry 
lion he made his way over to the left flank and shattered the enemy’s ranks so 
thoroughly that their leader’s banner disappeared. From there he turned back 
toward the center and said to his commander, “This is a desperate business; if 
the battle goes on for much longer, our army will be scattered; look for some 
way to retreat.” They went and searched, but there was no way back; the road 
was blocked by a wall of earth. Bahram said to his commanders, “We have an 
iron wall ahead of us: any man who can get through it will reach safety and take 


his soul back to Iran and our king. Prepare your hearts to shed blood now: lift 
your shields above your heads and draw your swords. No one should despair of 
God’s help, even if the bright day turns dark before us.” 

For his part Saveh Shah addressed his officers, “Bring the elephants forward, 
into the thick of the fighting, make the Persians’ world dark and desperate.” 
Seeing the elephants in the far distance, Bahram grew anxious and drew his 
sword. He said to his warriors, “Place your helmets on your heads and have your 
bows from Chach ready. By the head and soul of the world’s king, beloved of 
our chieftains, crown of our nobility, I order whoever has a bow to make it ready 
immediately. Shoot three of your poplar arrows tipped with heads that draw 
blood into the elephants’ trunks, then flourish your maces and go forward to kill 
the enemy.” Bahram placed his steel helmet on his head and drew back his bow: 
a hail of arrows rained down and his army charged forward. The elephants’ 
trunks were wounded by the arrows, and the plain grew sodden with their blood. 
Maddened by their wounds, the elephants turned back and trampled their own 
troops. Fortune had turned against them; Saveh Shah’s army was in turmoil and 
many died. Bahram’s troops pursued the elephants, and the earth was like a Nile 
of blood. 

There was a pleasant hill near the battlefield, to the rear of the struggling 
army, and Saveh Shah had gone there to sit on a golden throne and observe the 
battle. He saw his army like a moving mountain of iron, the soldiers’ heads 
covered in dust, their souls downcast, and behind them came the maddened 
elephants, trampling the troops as they stampeded. With tears in his eyes, Saveh 
Shah tried to comprehend how his army had been routed. He mounted a dun 
Arab horse and fled, fearing for his life. Bahram came after him like a raging 
elephant, his lariat on his shoulder, his bow in his hand. He called to his troops, 
“Fortune has turned against them; this is no time for reminiscing and talking. 
Pursue them with your swords, rain arrows down on them, show your mettle as 
cavalry.” He made his way to the hill where Saveh Shah had sat crowned on his 
golden throne, and saw him fleeing in the distance. He sped after him, moving 
like a cloud across the sky, and selected an arrow with a glittering head, flighted 
with four eagle feathers. Placing the thumbstall against the deerskin string, he 
leveled the bow with his left hand and drew back the string with his right. The 
Chachi bow groaned as it bent, and as he pulled the deerskin string back to his 
ear, that too cried out. The arrow sped from his hand and pierced Saveh Shah’s 
spine. Saveh Shah’s head descended into the dust, and the earth beneath him ran 
with his blood. And so this famous king, with his armies and golden throne and 


golden crown, was vanquished. This is the way of the turning heavens, which 
show neither love nor kindness: don’t pride yourself on your high throne, and 
take care to stay far from all harm. 

When Bahram reached him, he dragged him facedown through the dust and 
cut off his head; none of Saveh Shah’s men came near him as he did so. Later, 
seeing his headless body lying in the road, they lamented their loss; the land was 
filled with wailing, the sky with their distress. Saveh Shah’s son said, “This was 
the work of God; Bahram’s good fortune was with him. Our army had no room 
to maneuver, and that was what killed so many of us. The elephants trampled 
many of our warriors, and not one man in ten survived. Men either perished 
beneath the elephants’ feet, or had their heads cut off on the battlefield.” 








Bahram Chubineh Kills a Magician 

When this evil day had passed, not one of the enemy could be seen alive, except 
for those who had been taken prisoner; their bodies were wounded by arrows, 
their souls by sorrow. The way was filled with barding and helmets, heads that 
the helmets had betrayed to death, Indian swords, arrows, and bows. The ground 
was like a sea of blood from the dead, and everywhere saddled horses stood 
ownerless. Bahram searched diligently for the Persian dead, asking Khorad- 
Borzin for help: “Share my troubles for a day: look to see who among the 
Persians has been killed, whom we have to mourn for.” Khorad-Borzin went 
over the whole site, peering in every tent and pavilion. For some time a fine 
cavalry commander named Bahram was missing; he was a nobleman and 
descended from Seyavash. Khorad-Borzin desperately searched high and low but 
could find no trace of him; he turned over the wounded and dead, but found 
nothing. Bahram Chubineh was very distressed, but eventually the man 
appeared, like a key to open a locked door, and leading a weeping red-haired 
Turk whose heart was eaten up with sorrow. When Bahram saw Bahram, he 
said, “May you never lie beneath the dust!” Then he turned to the ugly Turk and 
said, “You, with the hellish face so far from heaven, what kind of a man are 
you? What’s your name and tribe? Your mother should weep for you now.” 

The man replied, “I’m a magician: I’m the opposite of a straightforward, 
honorable man. When my lord goes to war against someone and gets into 
difficulties, I set to work. At night I show people things in their sleep, and this 
disturbs even those who are calm and careful by nature. It was I who sent you 
the nightmare that bothered you so much. But I should try for something 
stronger, because my spells didn’t work. Our stars let us down, and all my 
efforts dispersed like so much wind. If you’ll spare me, you’ve found a very 
skillful assistant.” Bahram carefully considered the man’s words, but his heart 
was troubled, and his face turned sallow. At first he thought, “This man would 
be useful on the day of battle, if I got into difficulties.” But then he thought, “But 
what use was magic to Saveh Shah? All benefits come from God,” and he 
ordered that the man’s head be cut off. When the man had been killed, Bahram 
stood up and said, “O Lord of justice and righteousness: all greatness, victory, 
and the divine farr, might and imperial power, misery and joy, come from you. 
Blessings on the warrior who follows your way.” 

Then the chief scribe came forward and spoke: “O terrifying champion, 
neither Feraydun nor Kesra Nushin-Ravan ever saw a warrior like you. All the 


cities of Iran flourish because of you, all our champions are your slaves. 

Through you the throne has found good fortune, through you its subjects are 
exalted. You are a commander born of commanders: happy the mother who bore 
such a son! Your lineage is splendid and your mind is splendid; you are the pillar 
that supports all our country.” Then all the nobles and the champions of the army 
left the battlefield. 


Bahram Chubineh Sends Saveh Shah’s Head to Hormozd 

Darkness braided its hair, and the braids covered men’s eyes in sleep; night’s 
ebony curtain appeared, and the world rested from the din of drums. Swiftly the 
heavens turned, as if they thought the night tarried too long, until a golden ship 
arose from the water, bringing back sorrow and driving away sleep. 

Bahram ordered his men to sever the heads of all the slain Turkish nobles and 
chieftains and to place a banner behind each head. The prisoners and heads were 
gathered together and taken from the battlefield. Then Bahram summoned his 
scribe and dictated a letter to the king describing the enemy’s innumerable army; 
the changing fortunes of battle; the stratagems, fighting, and maneuvering 
against the enemy’s forces; the Persians’ struggles and prowess; and the cavalry 
who fought all day without respite. He selected an eloquent envoy from among 
his soldiers to take the letter and trophies. First he spitted Saveh Shah’s head on 
a lance and put it with the banner Saveh had carried in battle; likewise, he spitted 
the heads of the Turanian nobles on lances and sent them with banners of the 
Chinese cavalry. He ordered that all these be taken directly to the Persian king. 
The prisoners and plunder he deposited untouched in Herat, awaiting the king’s 
orders as to what was to be done with them. With the heads he also sent a 
number of horsemen to learn whether the king wished him to attack Parmoudeh, 
Saveh Shah’s son. 

For their part, the Turks and Chinese warriors made their way to Turan, 
naked and bereft of their weapons, horses, and baggage. When news of this 
reached Parmoudeh, he flung the crown from his head. The Turks bitterly 
lamented their dead nobles, smearing their heads with dust; they wept, and no 
one ate or rested or slept. Parmoudeh summoned the warriors and, weeping bitter 
tears, asked them how their innumerable army had been defeated in battle. Their 
spokesman replied, “We thought their army of no account, but no one has ever 
seen a horseman like Bahram when he fights. In battle he’s greater than Rostam, 
and no warrior will stay to oppose him. Their army was not a hundredth of ours, 
but the best of our warriors was a child compared to them. God guided him, and 


if I say more you will not want to hear it.” Parmoudeh brooded in his heart on 
Bahram’s deed. Then, seething with rage, he decided to attack. He still had a 
hundred thousand warriors under arms, so he led his army out on to the plains 
and marched toward the Oxus. 

The champion’s letter reached Hormozd as he was sitting with his advisors 
and saying, “My wise counselors, it is now two weeks since we have heard 
anything from Bahram. What do you think of this? What should we do? We 
must discuss the matter.” And at that moment the chamberlain entered and gave 
Hormozd the good news: “May the king reign prosperously forever. Bahram has 
defeated Saveh Shah and made the world splendid by his victory.” Bahram’s 
envoy was summoned, and seated in a higher place than the king’s advisors. He 
said, “Great king, the battle turned out as you would wish. May you live 
peacefully and happily, because your enemies’ fortune has grown old. The heads 
of Saveh Shah and his younger son, whom his father called his crown prince, are 
spitted on lances at your door, and all the city stares at them.” 

The king heard this and stood up, but immediately he bowed before God, and 
said, “O Judge and Guide, it is you who have destroyed our enemies. I was in 
such despair, and had no hope that my enemy would be overcome. It was not my 
commander who did this, or his army, it was God who accomplished this 
victory.” Then he brought out a hundred and thirty thousand coins that he had 
inherited from his father and distributed a third of the sum to the poor, mostly to 
his own courtiers and servants. Another third he gave to the fire-temples, for the 
priests who conduct the rites to celebrate the festivals of No-Ruz and Sadeh, and 
the last third was given to individuals who would undertake to rebuild ruined 
caravanserais in the desert, so that men could travel there safely and without 
fear. Then he remitted four years of taxes on both the poor and the nobles who 
sat on ivory thrones. 

Next, he sent a letter to the ruler of every province, saying that Bahram had 
been victorious and had cut off Saveh Shah’s head. Hormozd worshiped God for 
seven days, and on the eighth he summoned Bahram’s messenger and again sat 
him higher than the other courtiers. He planted a sapling in the garden of 
greatness by writing a fine answer to Bahram’s letter. He sent him a silver throne 
and a pair of golden shoes, as well as other goods, and wrote a charter making 
him lord of Khatlan and Badakhshan, as far as the River Barak. He ordered him 
to give the plunder from the battlefield to his soldiers, except for Saveh Shah’s 
personal treasure, which was to be sent to the royal court; and he directed 


Bahram to attack Parmoudeh immediately, before he became a formidable 
enemy. 

Before he left the envoy was given a robe of honor. When he reached 
Bahram, the commander welcomed him warmly and did what the king had 
ordered, distributing the spoils of war to his soldiers, except for the evil Saveh 
Shah’s treasure, which he sent to the king’s court under the care of trustworthy 
men. Then the commander and his army marched out to war. 


Bahram Chubineh’s Battle with Parmoudeh, the Son of Saveh 
Shah; Parmoudeh Flees to His Castle 

When Parmoudeh learned that Bahram was ambitious for the imperial throne, he 
deposited all his gold and silver coins and his jewels in a castle that he felt was 
safe and secure. Then he crossed the Oxus with his army and went forward 
confidently to battle. The two armies were soon face to face, and each of them 
pitched camp in the environs of Balkh. There were two parasangs distance 
between the two, a space appropriate for a battlefield. 

The next day Bahram, who was eager for battle, hurried out to observe 
Parmoudeh’s forces. Parmoudeh was also watching, and saw him as Bahram 
chose a high hill and ranged his army in front of it, covering the plain. 
Parmoudeh was taken aback at this show of force and the sight of Bahram before 
his troops, his warlike head lifted up to the sky. Filled with anxiety, he said to 
his men, “This leader is like a lion in his pride and ferocity, and the black earth 
where he stands will run with blood. His troops can’t be numbered, and anyone 
would be reluctant to confront them. When night falls we’ll attack, and thereby 
drive fear and anxiety from our hearts.” 

When Bahram marched from Persia against the Turks, an astrologer had said 
to him, “Start no enterprise on a Wednesday; if you ignore this advice, you will 
be harmed, and nothing you do will bring any profit to you.” Between the two 
armies, to one side of the battle plain, there was a garden; on Wednesday 
Bahram went there, saying, “Today will be a day of pleasure.” His men brought 
fine carpets, wine, musicians, and food. Bahram sat there drinking until one 
watch of the night had passed. A scout went to Parmoudeh and said, “Bahram is 
in that garden, drinking.” Parmoudeh chose six thousand of his horsemen and 
sent them to encircle the garden without showing any light. But Bahram realized 
what was being planned and he said to Yalan-Sineh, “Make an opening in the 
garden wall.” Then he and Izad-Goshasp and the other warriors who were with 
him mounted their horses and rode though the breech in the wall: who knows 


how they managed it? Trumpets sounded at the garden door, the commander 
urged his horse forward as a second breech was quickly made in the wall, and 
the enemy forces were thrown into a turmoil. Bahram fought with a javelin in his 
hand, like a man who was half-drunk; he was so eager for blood that no one he 
encountered escaped him. The commanders’ cries and the sounds of iron against 
steel rang out, and from the garden to Parmoudeh’s camp the way was littered 
with headless corpses. 

When Bahram reached his encampment again, he too decided on a night 
attack, and with half the night gone he led his men out onto the plain. They 
reached the Turkish lines without being seen by the sentries and announced their 
approach with the squeal of trumpets and the din of drums. The Turkish warriors 
leaped up, and the tumultuous noise would have deafened a savage lion. Right 
and left in the darkness close combats began; in the night and with long lances 
everywhere men did not know friend from foe; sparks glittered from swords and 
seemed to burn the earth and air. Few Turks remained alive, and their blood 
made the stones there resemble nothing so much as coral. Their leader fled like 
wind-blown dust, his mouth dry and his lips turned blue, and kept going until 
dawn broke and night drew back her skirts. But Bahram pursued him, and when 
he reached him he roared like a lion: 


“Don’t mix with warriors if all you can do 

Is run away when danger threatens you. 
You’re just a little boy; you should have stayed 
Sucking your mother’s milk if you’re afraid.” 


And Parmoudeh replied, “How much blood must you shed before you’! be 
satisfied? When they fight, leopards on land and crocodiles in the rivers 
eventually become sated with blood: but you’ve never had enough, you’re like 
an insatiable lion. You cut off the head of Saveh Shah, whom the turning 
heavens loved while he lived, and you destroyed his armies in such a way that 
the sun and moon felt pity for them. I am that warrior king’s son, and you should 
know that you killed me too when you killed him. But we are all born from our 
mothers for death, whether we are Turks or Persians. You can pursue me as I 
flee, but you won’t catch me until the end of time. If I return armed either of us 
might be killed in combat. Don’t be so headstrong and fiery; this is not how an 
army commander should act. I shall return to my castle and try a new tack: I’ Il 
write to your king, in the hopes that he will grant me his protection. If he accepts 


my petition and helps me, I shall be the slave of his court and give up all hopes 
of sovereignty. I’ll rid my mind of all thoughts of war and vengeance and make a 
pact of peace with him.” 

When Bahram heard him speak in this way, he turned back. After his army 
had rested from battle for a while he went to King Parmoudeh’s abandoned 
camp and toured the area, cutting the heads from the bodies of the dead Turkish 
noblemen. These he heaped up together and the pile was like a mountain in 
height and breadth. Everyone still calls this place “Bahram’s Hill.” Then he 
dragged all the Turks’ armor and equipment to this hill, and finally wrote a letter 
to Hormozd concerning Parmoudeh and his enormous army. He wrote about the 
Turks and their warlike king, who out of fear of Bahram’s sword had resorted to 
a trick, and how the king had had to flee ignominiously from the battle. For his 
part, Parmoudeh closed the doors to his castle and sat conferring anxiously with 
a crowd of advisors. Many men gathered outside his castle gates, but no one 
knew what his plans for war were. 


Parmoudeh Asks Bahram Chubineh for Asylum 

Bahram said, “We should press ahead with this war.” He told Yalan-Sineh to 
select three thousand horsemen, and directed Azar-Goshasp to take four 
thousand. The two of them were to attack whomever they could find, in the hope 
that when he saw the plains flowing with blood, Parmoudeh would be lured out 
of his castle. For three days they scoured the land in front of his castle in this 
way, and on the fourth, as the sun rose, Bahram sent a message to Parmoudeh, 
saying, “Lord and king of the Chinese Turks, why have you chosen this castle of 
all places in the world? Where now is Saveh Shah’s ambition to rule the earth? 
Where are his treasures and power, his elephants with their barding, his clear- 
minded nobles? Where are his sorcerers’ tricks and stratagems, that you’ve now 
hidden yourself away like this? The land of the Turks wasn’t enough for you. 
The world had never seen anyone as fine as your father, but now you’re holed up 
in this castle like a woman, beating your hands against your head in desperation, 
and with bitterness in your heart. Open your castle gates and ask for mercy, ask 
to be allied with my country’s king, and send out whatever wealth you have. I 
will speak for you at the king’s court, and if you have some secret that’s lighting 
up your dark soul, reveal it to me; don’t hold yourself aloof now that your 
situation’s so desperate. If you want war, no army’s going to help you when 
you’ve no money, but if you’ve allies enough and treasure and cash enough then 
beat your war drums and come out and fight!” 


When the envoy had delivered this message, Parmoudeh replied, “Say to him, 
‘Don’t struggle to know the world’s secrets. Because your first trial turned out 
well, you have become overconfident of the world’s ways. Don’t be so vain of 
victory; you may be young, but the world is old. No one knows the secrets of the 
turning heavens because they never show us their true face. Ridicule does not 
become a nobleman, and remember that I too once possessed an army, elephants, 
and war drums. The high heavens weave lies, and you should not give your heart 
over to presumptuous pride. My father was a brave, experienced warrior, and 
you saw him on the day of battle; the earth was the slave of his horse’s hooves, 
and the heavens turned as he willed. But he sought what he should not have 
sought, and his evil designs brought him torment. Merit is obscured by ridicule, 
and our enemies laugh at us. You say that you have more cavalry and elephants 
than grain in the hopper of a mill, but this was true of him too; his good luck 
deserted him, and you will not always be prosperous and hailed as the light of 
the world. You should fear your fate, for it can turn an antidote into poison. Any 
man who makes bloodshed his profession will have enemies plot against him, 
and they will spill his blood as he has spilled the blood of other warriors. If you 
raise destruction’s smoke over the land of the Turks, they will want vengeance 
sooner or later. I shall not present myself before you because I fear for my life. 
You are a Slave and I am a king; how can I grovel before a slave? And I shall not 
fight you without an army, because my friends would say I was crazy to do so. If 
the straits I’m in force me to ask for quarter from your king, there is no shame in 
that; and then the doors to my treasury and my castle will be yours and you can 
do as you wish with this noble land.’” The envoy delivered his message, and 
Bahram was satisfied when he heard it. 


Bahram Chubineh Writes to Hormozd, Asking That Parmoudeh Be 
Granted Safe Conduct 

Bahram wrote a favorable letter to his victorious king, saying, “The Chinese 
emperor is besieged and asks for your favor: he requires a sealed letter of safe 
conduct, and when he receives it he will come to establish peace between you. 
He has fallen from greatness into misery and desires our protection.” 

When this letter arrived, the king’s joy seemed limitless. He summoned his 
courtiers and sat the envoy on a royal throne; as the man read the letter out 
jewels were poured over him. Hormozd said to his courtiers, “Thanks be to God: 
I shall pray for three watches of the night, because the emperor of China will be 
my subject and the high heavens will be my crown. The leader of the Chinese 


Turks lifted his head up to the heavens and thought of himself as the king of the 
world, but now he pays homage to me. I give thanks to the Lord of the Sun and 
Moon, who has granted me this authority. I shall bestow hoarded wealth on the 
poor, so that goodness will come of this, and you too should praise God, and act 
with righteousness.” He called over Bahram’s envoy and spoke to him kindly 
and at length. He asked for a jewel-studded belt, clothes made of gold cloth, a 
horse with a bridle worked with gold and jewels; these he handed to the envoy, 
and added a purse of gold coins and many other presents. Then he declared that 
Bahram was the chief of all champions, and had a scribe write a proclamation on 
silk: “Parmoudeh the emperor is my ally; he is under the protection of Hormozd. 
May God, whose slaves we are, witness this seal and proclamation.” 

Then he wrote a letter as affectionate as heaven’s grace to his ambitious 
commander: “Allow Parmoudeh and his army to come to my court, and send 
here whatever is valuable among the spoils you have taken from his army: may 
God be your guide in this matter. Search out where the enemy might still be 
hiding, and may your good fortune enable you to capture them and burn their 
houses. If you think more efforts are required and you need more troops, ask for 
them and I shall send you as many as necessary. Give me the names of those 
Persians who have acted well and valiantly in this war, so that they may be 
rewarded. I shall give your men the border areas, and you will receive a crown 
of authority over them.” 


Bahram Chubineh’s Anger Against Parmoudeh 

When this letter reached Bahram, his heart was rejuvenated. He was astonished, 
and summoned the Persian troops to see the gifts he had been sent; everyone 
who saw them congratulated him. Then he read them the letter, and such a cry of 
congratulation went up that the ground seemed to shake. He sent the warrant of 
safe conduct to Parmoudeh in his castle and brightened the darkness of his soul. 
That nobleman descended from his castle, blessing Hormozd’s name as he did 
so. Everything of value in the castle was recorded. The proud commander of the 
castle immediately mounted his warhorse and marched with his men out of the 
castle, ignoring Bahram. When Bahram saw that, despite having captured this 
king, he was being treated with contempt, he sent men to bring Parmoudeh 
before the army on foot. Parmoudeh said to him, “I was the lord of any assembly 
and now I am a suppliant with no power; I have descended from my ivory throne 
to a wretched state. You are a malevolent man, and today you have not acted 
well toward me in having me brought before your troops like this. I have a 


warrant of safe conduct and I intend to travel to the king, in hopes that he will 
treat me as a brother and lighten the burden of my sorrows. What business have 
you with me, now that I have handed over to you my royal throne and wealth?” 

Parmoudeh’s words enraged Bahram and he lost all sense of proportion; he 
struck at Parmoudeh violently with his whip, as a man might strike an inferior; 
he had his legs bound in iron fetters and confined him in a tent. When Khorad- 
Borzin saw this, he said to himself, “Good sense is no friend to this 
commander.” He went to the chief scribe and said, “This terrifying champion has 
less sense than the wing of a mosquito, and that’s why he has no respect for 
anyone else. Someone should tell him that this is not the way to act, and that 
there’s no greater danger to a man than his own anger.” The two of them went to 
Bahram, their faces dark with foreboding, their lips filled with advice. They said, 
“You have thrown away the fruits of your labors; God forbid that a nobleman’s 
head be filled with fire like this!” Bahram knew that he had acted in an ugly 
fashion, that he had done something as foolish as throwing sun-baked bricks into 
water. He regretted his actions, held his head in his hands in shame, and had 
Parmoudeh released from his fetters. He sent Parmoudeh a horse with a gold- 
worked bridle and an Indian sword in a golden scabbard, and went to him to 
alleviate his distress. He stayed with him while he prepared to leave, watched 
him mount his swift horse, and accompanied him along part of his route. But he 
saw that the king’s face did not relax or grow cheerful. When the time came for 
them to separate, he said, “I think you’re angry with me in your heart. If this is 
so, say nothing about it to Persia’s king; it will not do your reputation with him 
any good.” 

The emperor replied, “My complaints are against fortune, and I have 
addressed them to God. Don’t think of me as someone who will gossip about 
everyone, but if your king learns nothing of this, he does not deserve to be king. 
The turning heavens put me in fetters: I shall not say that some slave injured 
me.” Bahram turned pale at these words; he writhed inwardly but managed to 
swallow his anger. He said, 


“As far as you are able to, don’t sow 

Destruction’s seeds—you’ll reap them when they grow. 
I tried to make your situation better; 

I wrote on your behalf, and in my letter 

I did not tell the king of all you’d done 

In trying to renew the war he’d won.” 


The emperor replied, “That evil has gone by, and the past is as wind. When a 
man is defeated in war he has to be patient and make peace. But peace and anger 
seem to be the same to you, and it’s clear you have little enough good sense. If a 
man follows his lord, he doesn’t stumble at every turning. It’s God’s way we 
should follow, and cleanse our hearts of darkness. The evil you’ve done has 
gone, like the wind: it would be better if you said no more about it.” 

Bahram said, “I’d hoped this matter would remain secret. But if the sin I’ve 
committed is going to produce trouble, I won’t try to hide it under a silk veil. 
When you get there say whatever you want to; my reputation won’t be harmed 
by it.” The emperor replied, “I consider any king a fool who takes no account of 
good and evil, and who is silent when his subjects act in ways that are wrong. 
Seeing such things from a distance, anyone—enemy, well-wisher, or ally— 
would say that you are an impulsive and contemptible lout, and that the Persian 
king is feeble-minded.” Bahram was enraged, and his face turned pale. Khorad- 
Borzin saw this and was afraid that his bloodthirsty master would kill 
Parmoudeh in his fury. He said to Bahram, “My lord, swallow your anger, and 
turn back. What the emperor has said is true; you should listen to him and drive 
evil thoughts from your mind. If you had not spoken so coldly toward him, you 
heart would not now be so troubled.” Bahram replied, “This vicious, talentless 
son can’t wait to rejoin his father.” The emperor spoke again: “Don’t do this evil 
to yourself; greatness grows old with anger. People like you, with heads full of 
dust and hearts full of smoke, think ill of everyone and get on with no one, and 
their pride is perversity and foolishness. You try to frighten me with talk of the 
King of Kings, but it is right that my pain and peace should come from him. He 
is my equal, a nobleman as I am; he’s not some malevolent slave. He is wise, 
dignified, of good lineage, and he remembers those who are wellborn. I 
command you, by the head and army of the Persian king, to turn back now, and 
to say nothing further to worsen your situation.” 

When he heard this, Bahram turned back to his army’s encampment. Khorad- 
Borzin, the chief scribe, and other learned men wrote a letter to the king, 
recounting everything that had happened, publicly and privately. In the anger of 
the moment Bahram said to his chief priest, “Go immediately into the castle, 
hurry like the wind, and see what kind of treasure is there.” The scribes went 
with trepidation in their hearts, and worked from sunrise until three watches of 
the night had passed: many pages were blackened with ink, but still the work 
was not finished. There was hardly room to move in the castle, so many 
undisturbed ancient treasures were there. From the times of Afrasyab and Arjasp 


there were gold coins, pearls from the sea, and gems from mines whose 
excavation was heaven’s work. Famous treasures were there, like the belt of 
Seyavash, which had three bands of jewels on each boss, and also his earrings, 
the like of which no commoner or nobleman in all the world has ever owned. 
Kay Khosrow had given them to Lohrasp, who had in turn given them to 
Goshtasp, and Arjasp had placed them in the castle at a time that no one now 
remembers. No astrologer or learned man could compute the wealth gathered 
there: one by one each item was recorded, and Bahram sent an eloquent, honest, 
and alert scribe to gather everything of value that was in the castle and bring it to 
one place on the plain. 

Among the valuable objects were a pair of earrings and a pair of boots with 
gold thread braided on them and jewels at the end of each braid. There were also 
two bolts of Yemeni cloth of gold weighing seven man each. In his perversity 
and arrogance Bahram ignored his duty and set these things aside. Then he 
ordered PaydaGoshasp to take the treasures to the king, with an escort of a 
thousand troops. He demanded ten caravans of camels from the emperor and 
counted off the goods as they were loaded. With the emperor at the head and the 
baggage train following on behind, the caravans made their way to court. 


The Emperor Arrives at Hormozd’s Court 

While the king of the world sat in state, with a crown on his head and a mace in 
his fist, news came that the emperor and his train of ancient treasures were 
approaching. The king went on horseback to the courtyard of his palace to see 
the emperor’s face, and also to see whether, when the emperor caught sight of 
him, he and his escort would dismount. He waited anxiously for the outcome, as 
the emperor and PaydaGoshasp came into view. The emperor dismounted and 
ran toward the king. There was a pause, and then Parmoudeh remounted his 
black Arab horse. The King of Kings urged his own horse forward and the two 
conferred together for a moment in the courtyard, but as Parmoudeh tried to 
follow the king into the palace the chamberlain caught at his horse’s bridle. 
Parmoudeh quickly dismounted, and showed his duplicity by this act of homage. 
The king too dismounted, took him by the hand, and led him forward to the 
throne. He showed him great kindness and questioned him; the two talked for a 
long time together. Apartments worthy of his rank were set aside for him and 
decorated, and Parmoudeh was provided with everything he could need. His men 
were given quarters near him, and a scribe was placed at his disposal. The king 
sent servants to take care of the treasures that had accompanied Parmoudeh. 


Hormozd Learns of Bahram’s Behavior and Allies Himself with 
Parmoudeh 

A mounted messenger arrived with a letter from the chief scribe, which read: 
“May the king reign in prosperity forever, and all his actions be generous and 
just. Know then that the army’s champion has taken two bolts of Yemeni cloth, a 
pair of boots encrusted with uncut jewels, and the earrings of the noble Seyavash 
that have come down to us as a reminder of his greatness. Since the champion 
underwent great hardships, this should not be a cause for surprise.” The king 
turned to Parmoudeh and asked him to recount what he had seen, and 
Parmoudeh confirmed what the scribe had written. Hormozd burst out in fury, 


“This overbearing man has lost his way, 

Forgetting it’s his business to obey. 

He dares to strike the Chinese emperor 

As though he were some base inferior, 

And then he takes these earrings—as if he 

Were heir to some imperial family. 

His good deeds have dispersed like wind-blown dust, 
His justice is now shown to be unjust.” 


He summoned Parmoudeh to the place of honor at his side, and the two sat 
feasting until night came and spread its dusky curls over the assembly. Hormozd 
turned to Parmoudeh and said, “You have suffered a great deal from my 
country.” Taking Parmoudeh’s hand in his, he said, to the emperor’s 
astonishment, “Renew our treaty, and let us set our agreement on a new basis.” 
Then they swore a solemn oath, by God and their souls, that Hormozd would not 
turn his heart aside from the emperor, and that he would not change his mind in 
this for anything that Parmoudeh did. They swore by the throne and crown, by 
the sun and moon, by the sacred fires of Azar-Goshasp and Azar-Panah, by God 
who is above all and who maintains Venus and Jupiter in their courses, that 
when Parmoudeh returned to his people he would not turn aside from Hormozd 
or from his courtiers. When they had sworn this oath, they rose and retired to 
their sleeping quarters. 

As the yellow sun rose above the mountains the two kings awoke. Hormozd 
had prepared a robe of honor, woven from gold and silver, together with a horse 
and crown. He sent these to the emperor and then accompanied him for two 


stages of his return journey. At the start of the long third stage he said his 
farewells to Parmoudeh and turned back. 

When Bahram learned of the gifts Parmoudeh had received from the king, 
and that he was returning in triumph, he went out to meet him accompanied by 
his Persian noblemen. He had a stock of fodder made ready for Parmoudeh at 
every stage of the route he would take, in the towns and villages, as well as on 
the plains and mountains. Bahram came before him prepared to apologize 
humbly for his former behavior. He greeted him respectfully, but the emperor of 
China turned his head away and refused to accept any of Bahram’s gifts, 
including the fodder he had provided for him and the slaves and purses of gold 
he had brought. Bahram rode with him, but the emperor would not cast a glance 
at him, and so they went forward for three days during which time Parmoudeh 
did not address a word to him. On the fourth day the emperor sent Bahram a 
message, “Go back, you have tired yourself out enough.” Bahram angrily turned 
back toward Balkh, and there he stayed for a while, regretting his former actions, 
his heart filled with sorrow. 


Hormozd Sends Bahram Chubineh a Spindle and Woman’s Clothes 
King Hormozd was dissatisfied with Bahram, and his impetuous behavior filled 
the king’s soul with foreboding; first, because Bahram had intentionally 
mistreated the emperor, and second, because of his presumptuousness in taking 
spoils to which he was not entitled. He therefore wrote him a letter: “Base devil 
that you are, you no longer know yourself. You think you have no need of your 
superiors and do not understand that our abilities come from God. You see 
yourself seated on the sphere of heaven; you have disobeyed my orders and 
followed your own inclinations. You have forgotten the troubles I have endured, 
as well as the army and wealth I command. You do not act as a commander 
should, but raise your head up proudly to the skies. Now a royal gift has come 
that is worthy of you, something that is appropriate for the way you are acting.” 
When Hormozd had sealed the letter he gave orders that a black spindle case 
containing a spindle, raw cotton, and various other unworthy objects be 
prepared. Then he asked that a purple blouse woven from hair be brought, 
together with a woman’s red coif, and a pair of woman’s yellow pants. He chose 
a messenger who was suitable to take such a present and said to him, “Take 
these to Bahram, and tell him, ‘You are a worthless, useless wretch. You put the 
emperor of China in chains and you enjoy humiliating your superiors, but I shall 


bring you down from that throne you’ve placed yourself on, and I shall not 
consider you as a man from now on!’” 

The messenger memorized the speech and traveled as fast as the wind. When 
Bahram saw the letter and gifts, he chose silence and patience. He said, “So this 
is my reward, and this is how my king treats me. But this cannot be the king’s 
idea; it must be because of gossip by those who hate me. The king rules over his 
subjects, and if he despises me that is his right, but I did not think my enemies 
would gain access to him so quickly. Everyone has seen what I have done since I 
set off with all speed from the king’s court, with only a small army at my 
command; everyone knows the difficulties and trials I have undergone. If 
contempt is my reward for enduring such hardships, and if fortune can only treat 
me with scorn, I shall complain to God that the heavens have utterly withdrawn 
their favor from me.” 

Then he prayed to the Lord of Justice from whom all benefits come, and put 
on the red and yellow clothes. He set out the black spindle case and the other 
objects the king had sent, and ordered the king’s nobles who were in his army to 
present themselves before him. His dark soul was filled with conflicting thoughts 
as they entered, young and old, and saw the manner in which he was dressed. 
They were all bewildered, and each man’s heart was filled with anxiety. Bahram 
said to his men, “This is the gift the king has sent me. He is our ruler and we are 
his slaves, and our hearts and souls are filled with love for him. What do you 
think is the significance of this, and how should I answer our country’s king?” 

They all began to speak at once, saying, “You are a great champion, and if 
this is what the king thinks of you, then his courtiers are dogs. Remember what 
that wise old man said when he was grieved by Ardeshir’s negligence: ‘I despair 
of our king’s throne and crown, since he pays no attention to whatever I do, for 
good or ill.’” Bahram replied, “Do not say such things. It is the king who confers 
honor on his army; we are his slaves, he is the provider, and we are his 
suppliants.” But the Persians answered, “We shall serve no more. None of us 
will call him the king of Iran, or Bahram his army’s commander.” They went out 
on to the plain, and for some time Bahram spoke with them, and his lips were 
always filled with conciliatory words. 


Bahram Sees His Fortune 

After two weeks Bahram went out of his castle and onto the plain. He saw a 
thicket of trees ahead of him that seemed a fine place to pause and drink wine. A 
wild ass was there, and no one has ever seen a more splendid animal. Bahram 
rode after the wild ass, but without tiring his horse. After riding across open 
country for a while, they reached a narrow defile, and when Bahram followed 
the ass through it a wide desert appeared on the other side. The ass sped ahead 
and Bahram rode after him across the burning plain, until a magnificent castle 
appeared in the distance. Bahram rode toward it, with the ass still leading the 
way. Izad-Goshasp was riding after him, and when they reached the castle, 
Bahram gave him his horse’s reins and said, “May wisdom always be your 
companion.” Then he entered the castle on foot, and went forward without a 
guide. 

Izad-Goshasp waited for a while at the palace gateway, and then Yalan-Sineh, 
who had been following them on his swift-paced horse, arrived. Izad-Goshasp 
said to him, “Go into the castle and see where our commander has got to.” 
Anxious to find his master, his heart filled with trepidation, Yalan-Sineh entered 
the castle. He saw an arch and a hall more splendid than any he had ever seen or 
heard of in Iran. In the hall there was a golden throne, its feet encrusted with 
jewels, and on it was laid a tapestry of Byzantine brocade embroidered with 
figures picked out in jewels on a golden ground. A woman with a crown on her 
head was sitting on the throne; in stature she was like a cypress tree, and her face 
was as lovely as the spring. The army’s commander was seated on another 
golden throne, and around him were numerous serving girls as beautiful as idols, 
with fairy-like faces. As soon as the woman saw Yalan-Sineh she said to one of 
the serving girls, “Go quickly, dear friend, and tell that lionhearted warrior he is 
not permitted to be here. He should stay with his companions, and Bahram will 
come to him soon enough.” And immediately she sent the serving girls to 
Bahram’s escort, to take their horses to the stables, where they and their saddles 
would be taken care of. 

At the command of this beautiful hostess, a gardener opened the door to the 
gardens, and a Zoroastrian priest came forward, praying quietly, the sacred 
barsom in his hand. Tables laid with many kinds of food were set about the 
garden. Once the men had eaten, their horses were brought at the gallop, and as 
he was leaving, Bahram addressed the woman who had entertained them, “May 


Jupiter protect your crown.” She answered him, “Be victorious, always patient- 
hearted, careful in your councils.” 

As Bahram left the garden, his eyes rained down bitter tears. His nature had 
changed, his answers had changed, and his head seemed to lift itself up to the 
Pleiades. Again he followed the wild ass until it led them out of the thicket. 
When he reached the town again, he said nothing to his soldiers of what had 
happened. Khorad-Borzin watched him and said, “My lord, tell me truly, what 
was this marvel that you saw in the hunting grounds, this thing that no one has 
ever seen or heard of?” But Bahram gave him no answer: deep in thought, he 
made his way to his palace. 


Bahram Adopts the Customs of a King 

On the next day, when the foothills of the mountains turned to silver and the 
golden lamp of heaven appeared, a carpet of Chinese brocade was spread out, so 
that the ground looked like the heavens. Golden seats, with cushions made of 
gold-worked brocade, were set about the palace, and the commander of the army 
took his place there on a golden throne. He sat enthroned in state, like a King of 
Kings, with a royal crown on his head. The chief scribe saw all this and realized 
that it was an act of defiance. He went to Khorad-Borzin and told him what he 
knew, what he had seen, and what he had heard. Khorad-Borzin now knew that 
matters had reached a crisis and said to the scribe, “Don’t take this lightly. We 
should say nothing, but in the darkness of the night we should go to the king.” 
Once they had made their decision, they fled from Balkh under cover of 
darkness. 

When Bahram heard of what they had done, he said to Yalan-Sineh, “Take a 
hundred horsemen and go after those two fools.” Yalan-Sineh rode as quickly as 
wind-blown dust. He soon caught up with the chief scribe and closed in on him 
like a wolf. He stripped this innocent man of all he had and brought him back in 
heavy chains, so that Bahram could kill him. Bahram said to him, “Devil’s 
spawn, why did you leave me without permission?” He answered, “My lord, 
Khorad-Borzin frightened me. He said that if I stayed, only my enemies would 
be happy; that he and I were in danger of being killed unless we fled.” Because 
Bahram’s honor seemed to be impugned before his men, he replied, “We must 
discuss the good and bad of this.” He compensated the scribe for his injuries, 
returned his wealth to him, and said, “From now on consider more carefully 
what it is you’re doing, and don’t try to flee again.” 


Khorad-Borzin Informs Hormozd of Bahram’s Actions 
But Khorad-Borzin rode on undetected to the king’s court, and there 


He told him all he’d witnessed, every word 

Of all the secret gossip that he’d heard— 

He told him of the thicket, the wild ass 

That guided Bahram, and the narrow pass, 
The jeweled castle and its lovely queen, 

The serving girls, the wonders that he’d seen. 
He detailed all of this, and when he’d done, 
Answered his monarch’s questions one by one. 


Hormozd was astonished by his words, and everything he heard went straight to 
his heart. Then he remembered the priest who had foretold that someone would 
arise who would disobey him, and a cold sigh came from his heart. Immediately 
he summoned the chief priest and sat him down with Khorad-Borzin, to whom 
he said, “Tell this man what you saw on that road.” Khorad-Borzin did as his 
king commanded him and went over everything once again. The king said to the 
chief priest, “What can this mean? We must consider all the parts of it: there was 
an ass in a thicket and it went ahead as a guide; a castle in the middle of an arid 
desert, a crowned woman on a golden throne with serving girls standing before 
her as if she were a queen. All this is like a dream that someone tells in an 
ancient tale.” 

The priest answered the king of the world, “That wild ass was a demon in 
disguise, and when it summoned Bahram away from righteousness, falsehood 
appeared in his heart. Understand that the castle was made by magic, that the 
woman on the throne was an evil sorceress who showed Bahram the way of 
rebellion and promised him the crown and throne of sovereignty. When he 
returned from seeing her, he became drunk with ambition, and you should accept 
that he will never submit to you again. Your best course is to find some way to 
recall the army from Balkh to your court.” 

Now the king regretted the spindle case, the raw cotton, and the unworthy 
clothes. Not many days passed before a messenger arrived from Bahram, 
bringing a basket filled with daggers whose points were bent back. This he 
placed in front of the king, who stared at the iron weapons. He ordered that the 
daggers’ blades be broken and flung in the basket; then he sent them back as a 
sign of conflict and warfare. When Bahram, whose judgment was clouded now, 


saw the daggers broken in half, he called the envoy and his Iranian advisors to 
him and had them gather round the basket. He said, “Look at this gift from the 
king, and don’t think of it as something of no importance.” His men brooded on 
what the king had done, and on their commander’s words. They said, “The 
king’s first present to us was a spindle and brightly colored clothes, and his next 
was broken daggers—this is worse than wounds and curses. Such a king should 
never rule, and may his memory be forgotten. If Bahram should once again ride 
his horse back to that court, curses on him and curses on the father who sired 
him.” 

Hearing their words Bahram realized that the soldiers’ hearts were weary of 
the king, and he said to them, “Be careful and clear-headed, because Khorad- 
Borzin has told the king everything that had been kept hidden. Now each one of 
you must look to save his soul by swearing fealty to me. I must send lookouts 
onto the roads, or my luck will be at an end and one by one every man in this 
army will be killed.” He said this, but his plans were quite otherwise: pay 
attention, and you will be astonished. He sent horsemen throughout the 
countryside to intercept any letters from the king that might encourage the 
Persians to fight against him. For some time no one received a letter from the 
king. 


Bahram Takes Counsel with His Advisors; His Sister Gordyeh’s 
Intervention 

Then Bahram summoned the nobles of the army and put before them much that 
he had kept private. Hamdan-Goshasp, the chief scribe, warlike Yalan-Sineh, 
Bahram who was descended from Seyavash, and the wise counselor 
PaydaGoshasp were all present. He addressed this band who were eager for 
battle and had lost their way: “Anyone would be pleased to have you as advisors. 
Our superior is needlessly angry with us, and has deserted all precedent and 
good custom. We cannot simply weep over our troubles, like a man who hides 
his wounds from his doctors; what remedy do you suggest? If we hide our 
problems from the wise, simple matters become difficult; we are suffering, and it 
is time to put our troubles before knowledgeable men. We left Iran with a tiny 
army, eager for battle, and no one in the world will ever see a more numerous 
army than that of our enemies. Saveh Shah and Parmoudeh marched on Persia, 
but they considered us of no more importance than a wax bauble, as their real 
goal was Rome. But Parmoudeh and Saveh Shah were overtaken by events the 
like of which the world has never known. Even though we underwent all manner 


of hardships and left them neither their wealth nor their elephants, the king has 
restored their power and is now threatening war with us. What can we do now to 
escape his trap, to slip free of his chains? Think of your own lives, and of what 
balm you can bring to these wounds. I have unburdened my soul to you and told 
you the secrets of my heart.” 

In Bahram’s private quarters his virtuous sister Gordyeh lived; this wise 
woman was her brother’s confidante and comfort. Listening from behind the 
curtain separating her from the company, she heard her brother’s words and 
sprang up, her heart quivering with anger. She stepped into the assembly, her 
head filled with all she wished to say, her tongue with ancient precepts. When he 
heard his sister’s voice, Bahram fell silent, and out of fear the Persians gathered 
there also stopped speaking. Gordyeh addressed them: “You are noble and 
ambitious men, why do you remain silent at his words, although you bleed 
inwardly? You are Persia’s leaders, her wise men, her magicians; what’s your 
opinion of all this, what game do you intend to play on this blood-soaked plain?” 

The horseman Izad-Goshasp spoke: “You remind us of the ancient heroes, 
and even if our tongues are sharpened in anger they are silent before the flood of 
your opinions. All your deeds are from God; they are brave, knowledgeable, and 
filled with wisdom. We don’t have to be like leopards eager for war with 
anyone. Let no one ask for more from me, this is the extent of my answer. But if 
you make war, I will be with you, I’ll ride at the head of your cavalry. If my 
commander approves of me, this will keep me young forever.” Bahram saw that 
Izad-Goshasp was trying to position himself between the two factions. Then he 
turned to Yalan-Sineh and said, “What thoughts are you keeping hidden?” He 
replied, “Noble commander, whoever follows God’s ways will not turn to evil 
when he gains victory and glory. If he does so, congratulations will turn to 
curses, and the turning heavens will hate him. God has given you glory and good 
fortune, an army, wealth, a diadem, and a throne, and, if you strive for more than 
this, ingratitude will fill your heart with sorrow.” 

Next he turned to Bahram, the son of Bahram, and said, “You are a wise man 
and reason is your friend, what do you think of this search for a throne and 
crown? Will it end well, or in pain and sorrow?” 


Then Bahram smiled at him, and threw his ring 
Into the air. “A slave can be a king,” 

He said, “for just as long as this will stay 

Up in the air. And there’s no simple way 


To gain a royal crown: make no mistake, 
This is an arduous task to undertake. ” 


Then Bahram Chubineh said to PaydaGoshasp, “You’re a lion in battle, a man 
who rides his horse hard, what do you say to this business of mine? Am I worthy 
of the throne?” PaydaGoshasp replied, “You are like the heroes of ancient times. 
A priest once gave good advice for a situation like this: he said that if a man is 
knowledgeable and farsighted and becomes king, his soul will ascend to the 
heavens. It’s better to risk all to be the possessor of the world’s wealth than to 
live a long life as a slave.” 

Next he turned to the chief scribe and said, “You’re an old, cunning wolf; 
open your lips and give me your opinion.” But for a while the chief scribe was 
silent; he sat sunk in a multitude of thoughts. Finally, he said to Bahram, “A man 
who seeks to satisfy his ambition will do so if he is worthy of what he aims at. 
Fate’s reach is long and sure, and our efforts will bear fruit if God approves of 
them.” Then Bahram said to Hamdan-Goshasp, “You have had experience of 
life’s good and bad fortune. Whatever you say here in front of us will disappear 
like the wind and have no evil consequences for you. Give us your opinion of 
this business, say whether you think it will turn out badly or well.” Hamdan- 
Goshasp replied, 


“You’re valued by great men, and yet you fear 
Evils to come, troubles that are not here. 

What have imperial crowns to do with you? 
Thank God, and do what you were born to do. 
Don’t reach up for the dates if you’re afraid 
Their thorns will injure you. Stick to your trade! 
A country’s king can never be at peace, 

The fears and trials he faces never cease.” 


Their remarks distressed Bahram’s sister, and her soul was shrouded in darkness. 
She said nothing to her brother from the time the sun set until half the night had 
passed. Then Bahram said to her, “You are a chaste, good woman; what do you 
think of what has been said here?” But Gordyeh wept and gave him no answer; 
she was not happy with the words that his advisors had spoken. She turned to the 
chief scribe and said, “You have an evil nature, like a wolf’s. Do you think none 
of the noble warriors of the world has ever longed for the crown and throne, for 


mighty armies, for victory and good fortune? Isn’t being king easier than being a 
slave? One should weep for this knowledge of yours! But we should follow the 
customs of the ancient kings, we should listen to their words.” The scribe 
answered her, “If my opinions are not acceptable then you should say and do 
whatever seems right to you; let your heart guide you.” 

Gordyeh turned to Bahram and his conceited knights and said, “There’s no 
goodness in your knowledge or your opinions; your pride is taking you down a 
mistaken path. How many times the throne has been unoccupied, but no subject 
ever glanced at it. They maintained the world in chivalry and had no eyes for the 
throne. Anyone with intelligence knows that proud sovereignty is finer than 
being a humble subject, but no one attempted to seize the Kayanid throne; men 
stood before it ready to serve their kings. A stranger to the royal blood would 
disgrace the crown, and it is lineage that makes a man worthy of greatness. Let 
us begin with Kavus, who tried to find out the ways of God, to count the stars 
and hunt down the secrets of the turning heavens. His perverse thoughts left him 
wretched and sorrowful in Sari, and heroes like Gudarz and Rostam were 
troubled in their souls by this. And then he went to Hamaveran and his legs were 
placed in heavy gyves; but no one ever coveted his throne, they felt only sorrow 
and sympathy for him. When the Persians said to Rostam, ‘You are worthy of 
the Kayanid throne,’ he yelled at the man who had spoken, ‘May I see you in 
your narrow grave! How can a champion presume to sit with the ceremonial that 
attends a king? Should I occupy a golden throne while our king is imprisoned? 
My curses on such a suggestion!’ He chose twelve thousand warlike cavalry and 
rescued Kavus from his chains, as well as Giv, Gudarz, and Tus. 

“No subject ever sought the throne, no matter how fine his family was. And 
when this Turk Saveh Shah came seeking the royal seal and crown, the world’s 
Creator prevented him from reaching Iran. You’re a slave, so what has put it into 
your head to desire the throne of the King of Kings? This Yalan-Sineh curvets 
his horse and boasts that he will make Bahram, the son of Goshasp, into a king, 
and so leave a name for himself in the world. But the wise old king Nushin- 
Ravan was rejuvenated by the sight of Hormozd, and the great of the world are 
his allies or his subjects. In Persia there are three hundred thousand horsemen, 
all famous fighters and all the king’s slaves sworn to carry out his commands. 
The King of Kings chose you as his commander, as was right since your 
ancestors successfully fought against their enemies, and you return evil for this 
good fortune. Well, you should realize that it’s yourself you’re hurting. Don’t 
make ambition king over good sense; no sensible person will call you wise if 


you do this. I may be a woman, and much younger than my brother, but I give a 
man’s advice. Don’t throw away the deeds of your ancestors, and God forbid 
that you remember my advice when it is too late.” 

The whole company was dumfounded by her words, and Bahram bit his lip. 
He knew that she spoke the truth, and that the way she sought was the right one. 
But Yalan-Sineh said, “My lady, don’t talk in this company about kings and 
their customs. Hormozd will soon be gone, and our commander deserves the 
throne. Since Hormozd is as we know him to be, you should consider your 
brother to be the king of Iran. If Hormozd is so proud of the Kayanid crown and 
their customs, why did he send that spindle as a royal gift? We’ve had enough 
talk of Hormozd, anyway. He’s of Turkish lineage, and I curse his people; may 
they disappear from the earth! You talk about Kay Qobad’s line, whose crown 
and throne lasted for a hundred thousand years, but their rule is finished now, 
and there is no point in invoking their name. As for Hormozd’s son, Khosrow 
Parviz, he is not worth mentioning. The best of his entourage are your brother’s 
slaves and servants, and if Bahram tells them to, they will shackle their master’s 
feet for him.” 

Gordyeh answered him, 


“You plot the devil’s work in all you do 

And devils lie in wait to ambush you! 

Stop trying to destroy us; all I see 

From you is empty talk and vanity. 

My father was the governor of Rey 

But if my brother acts now as you say 

And carries out your treacherous design, 

He will annihilate his tribe and mine. 

All that we have achieved, at so much cost, 
Will be dispersed upon the winds and lost. 

You servile wretch—go! Be my brother’s guide, 
Lay waste our lives, spread ruin far and wide!” 


When she had said this, she began to weep and went to her own apartments; in 
her heart she was now a stranger to her brother. Everyone said, “This wise and 
eloquent woman speaks so well that her words seem to come from a book; her 
wisdom surpasses Jamasp’s.” But Bahram was displeased, and his sister’s words 
angered him. His dark heart was filled with foolish thoughts, and he constantly 


dreamed of the royal throne. He thought, “Ambitious men can only win this 
fleeting world through hardship.” Then he ordered a meal prepared and called 
for wine and musicians. “Sing a song of heroes,” he said to the singer. “We’Il 
have the song of the Seven Trials while we drink our wine, the one that describes 
Esfandyar’s expedition to the Brazen Castle and the tricks he played in those 
bygone days.” His companions drank Bahram’s health a number of times, 
saying, “May the province of Rey flourish, since a commander like you hails 
from there, and may God create more as you are!” When the drinkers’ heads 
were confused with wine and night came, the meeting broke up. 


Bahram Has Coins Struck in the Name of Khosrow Parviz 

The sun lifted its lance into the sky, and the dark night quailed before its 
brilliance. Bahram called for the chief scribe, and together they wrote a splendid 
letter to the emperor of China. Bahram wrote, “The need to apologize wracks me 
with pain; my heart is filled with regret and cold sighs. From now on I shall 
respect your country, and if I become lord of all the world, I shall treat you as 
my younger brother. Wash all thoughts of vengeance from your soul, and do not 
keep China and Iran separate from one another.” Then he turned to other 
business. 

He opened his treasury and distributed silver, horses, and slaves to his army; 
his secret aim in this was to further his ambitions. He chose a worthy warrior 
from among his troops and made him the governor of Khorasan. Sunk in 
thought, he himself set off from Balkh to Rey on the day of Khordad in the 
month of Dey. He turned many ideas over in his mind, and then gave orders that 
coins were to be minted in the name of Hormozd’s son, Khosrow Parviz. He 
selected an eloquent, trustworthy merchant, one who was suitable to carry out a 
delicate task, and told him to take a purse of these coins to Ctesiphon. There he 
was to buy fine Byzantine brocades, worked in silk on a gold ground, so that the 
coins would be taken to the king and he would see them. 


Bahram Writes to Hormozd, and Khosrow Parviz Flees from His 
Father’s Court 

He wrote a letter to Hormozd, filled with boasting and vanity. He mentioned 
many matters—Parmoudeh and Saveh Shah’s army, the battles he had fought, 
and the king’s present of a black spindle case and a woman’s coif. Then he 
wrote, “In my dreams I never see the splendor of the king’s face; when your 


noble son Khosrow Parviz sits on the throne, I shall level the mountains and 
make them plains if he orders me to, and turn the deserts to an Oxus of his 
enemies’ blood.” In this way he hoped to have the innocent prince killed. He 
said to the merchant,“When Hormozd sees the coins, he will be alarmed, and 
when he no longer has Khosrow Parviz to help him, he’I!I see the fate I have in 
store for him. Once I have established my authority over the country I shall tear 
the Sasanians up by the roots. God did not create the earth for them, and it’s time 
they forfeited his favor.” 

A messenger took his letter to Baghdad, and when Hormozd read it, his face 
turned as pale as fenugreek. Then news came of the coins minted in his son’s 
name, and sorrow was piled on sorrow. He writhed inwardly and became 
suspicious of his son. He confided his suspicions to Ayin-Goshasp, saying, 
“Khosrow has become rebellious and wants to separate himself from me. He’s 
had coins minted in his own name, and what could be more contemptuous of my 
authority than this?” Ayin-Goshasp said, “May your horse and the battlefield 
never be without you!” Hormozd said, “I’m going to get rid of the wretch 
immediately.” Secretly they summoned a man and sat him down with the king 
that night. Hormozd said to him, “Do as I say: banish Khosrow from the face of 
the earth.” The man replied, “I shall do it; I’ll use spells to drive all pity from my 
heart. Have poison brought from the king’s treasury, and when he’s drunk at 
night, I’ll mix it with his wine. This will be better than shedding his blood.” But 
the chamberlain learned of this, and could not sleep from anxiety. He hurried to 
Khosrow and told him the secret plan. When Khosrow Parviz heard that the king 
of the world was secretly plotting to kill him, he fled in the darkness of the night 
from Ctesiphon and seemed to disappear from the face of the earth. Not wanting 
to lose his precious head to no purpose, he made all haste to Azerbaijan. 

When news reached the country’s governors and lords of the marches that 
Khosrow had fled with a few horsemen from the king’s court, they made 
inquiries as to where he might be. Men like Badan-Piruz and Shir-Zil, both just 
watriors with the strength of elephants, Shiran and pious Vastui, Khanjast from 
Oman, Bivard from Kerman, and Sam, who was descended from Esfandyar, 
from Shiraz—one by one they came with their warriors and sought out Khosrow 
Parviz. 

Khosrow said to them, “I fear the king and his courtiers, but if you will go to 
the fire-temple and there solemnly swear to protect me, never to break this oath, 
I shall stay here with confidence and have no fear of Ahriman’s designs against 
me.” The warriors went to the fire temple and swore as he had requested, saying 


that they would hold him as dear as their own eyes. As soon as he felt safe, 
Khosrow sent out spies to find out what his father said about his flight, and 
whether he was plotting anything new. When Hormozd learned that Khosrow 
had fled, he immediately had Gostahm and Banduy, Khosrow’s maternal uncles, 
thrown into prison, as well as all of Khosrow’s other relatives, and there was 
much talk about this. 


Hormozd Sends Ayin-Goshasp to Fight Against Bahram; He Is 
Killed 

At this time the king said to Ayin-Goshasp, “We seem to have no recourse, and 
pain is our companion. Now that Khosrow has gone, what shall we do against 
that wretched slave Bahram?” Ayin-Goshasp said, “Your majesty, this business 
of Bahram has gone on for long enough. It’s my blood he secretly wants to shed, 
because I was the first person to humiliate him. Send me to him with my legs in 
shackles; it may be that this will benefit you.” The king replied, “I can’t do that; 
it would be the work of Ahriman. No, I'll dispatch an army, with you at its head, 
and you can win glory in battle. But first send someone to him to sound out what 
he is thinking. If he is ambitious for sovereignty, for the crown and throne, good 
fortune will finally desert him. But if he is prepared to be my subject and prefers 
peace, I’ll give him a portion of the world to rule, and place a hero’s crown on 
his head. Let me know immediately what he is up to; don’t delay, be as quick as 
you can.” 

Ayin-Goshasp set about putting the wise king’s plan into action. There was a 
man from his town who was a prisoner in the king’s jail, and when he heard that 
Ayin-Goshasp was going to war, he sent someone to him with a message saying, 
“T’m a fellow townsman of yours imprisoned here. If you beg me from the king, 
I'll accompany you on this expedition. I’ll fight before you, as your protector in 
battle, if only I can get out of this narrow prison.” Ayin-Goshasp sent someone 
to the king to say on his behalf, “One of my fellow townsmen is languishing in 
your jail; give him to me, your majesty, so that he can come with me on this 
expedition.” The king said, “That evil good-for-nothing? When is he ever going 
to fight in front of you in a battle? He’s a violent criminal, a lout, and a thief; 
you must be hoping for a bribe from him! Well, at the moment I don’t want to 
deny you anything, even though there’s no worse blackguard than he is.” And he 
handed this bloodthirsty devil over to Ayin-Goshasp. 

Ayin-Goshasp led his army out, and they marched as quickly as the wind as 
far as Hamedan, where they halted. Ayin-Goshasp made inquiries as to whether 


anyone there understood the stars and could foresee the future. Everyone said, 
“You’ll be pleased with the astrologer who comes to you. There is a rich old 
woman who lives here who seems to know all the secrets of the stars. Whatever 
she says comes to pass, and she can tell you in the summer what will happen in 
the autumn.” Ayin-Goshasp sent someone with a horse to fetch her, and when 
she arrived he questioned her about the king’s business, and about his own 
military expedition. Then he said to her, “Whisper in my ear whether I will die 
in bed, or by my enemy’s dagger.” As he was talking privately with this old 
woman about his own affairs, the man whom he’d begged from the king passed 
in front of the woman, glanced at his commander, and went on. The old woman 
said, “Who was that man? We should weep for the harm he’I!] do to you. Your 
sweet life is in his hands; my curses on him, skin and bones!” 

When Ayin-Goshasp heard this he remembered something he had heard long 
before, something an astrologer had told him that he had forgotten: “Your life is 
in the hands of a neighbor, who is a thief, a lout, and a worthless wretch. He will 
confront you during a long journey; you will cry out for help, and he will shed 
your blood.” He wrote a letter to the king, saying, “That man I begged from you 
should not have been freed from prison; he is something worse than devil’s 
spawn. You told me this, but I did not have your royal farr and so could not see 
the truth. As soon as he atrives, have his head cut off.” He sealed the letter and 
when the seal was dry, he summoned his fellow townsman. He heaped praises 
on him, gave him some money, and called down God’s blessings on him. Then 
he said, “Quickly and secretly take this letter to the king. If he gives you an 
answer, bring it straight to me; don’t stay with the king.” 

The young man took the letter and set off, brooding as he went. He said to 
himself, “I was chained and imprisoned, I couldn’t move, and I’d no food. God 
got me out of that terrible mess, and now my blood and brains are boiling at the 
thought of going back to Ctesiphon.” He went gloomily along the road for a 
while, and then he opened the letter to the king. When he read his commander’s 
letter he was bewildered at the ways of the world. He said, “This is my neighbor 
who begged me from the king, who said it was a noble deed to spare me, and 
now he wants to shed my blood. Did this idea come to him in a dream? Well, 
now he’s going to find out what bloodshed means, and all his troubles will be 
over.” His head whirling, he turned back and traveled as fast as the wind. As he 
approached the commander he saw that there was no one about: Ayin-Goshasp 
was resting in his tent, brooding on the king and what fate had in store, and there 
was no servant, or companion, or sword, or horse nearby. When his neighbor 


entered the tent Ayin-Goshasp knew that he had come to shed his blood. The 
man clapped his hand on his sword, and Ayin-Goshasp tried to soften him with 
words. He said, “Young man, you’re mistaken, wasn’t it I who begged you from 
the king when you’d despaired of life?” The man replied, “You did, but what did 
I do to make you want to destroy me?” As he said this he struck at Ayin- 
Goshasp’s neck with his sword, and the commander’s days of feasting and 
fighting were at an end. 

He brought the severed head out of the tent, while the army was still unaware 
of what had happened. Knowing he would be condemned for shedding his 
commander’s blood, he made his way as quickly as he could to Bahram 
Chubineh. He said to him, “Here is the head of your enemy, who was planning 
to kill you. He’d led an army here against you, not knowing what you intended.” 
Bahram asked, “Whose head is this? Who should weep over it?” The man 
replied, “This is Ayin-Goshasp, who came from the king’s court to fight against 
you.” Bahram said to him, “This noble man had come from the king’s court to 
make peace between me and the king, and you cut his head off while he was 
sleeping. You will receive such a punishment from me that all who see you will 
weep for you.” He ordered that a gibbet be erected before his door, in view of 
the army and the countryside, and there the wretch was strung up alive, so that 
he understood in his heart what he had done. 

When it was known that Ayin-Goshasp was dead, some of the horsemen he 
had brought with him went over to Bahram, and others to Khosrow Parviz, 
hoping to revive their fortunes in the world. The army was like a shepherdless 
flock that disperses on a day of wind and snow. 


Gostahm and Banduy Blind Hormozd 

When Hormozd learned of his commander’s fate, he was so downcast that he 
gave no audiences and no one saw him with a wine glass in his hand. He found 
no peace, he could neither eat nor sleep, and his eyes were always filled with 
tears. Repeatedly he gave orders that no one was to be admitted to him. One of 
the courtiers said that Bahram was preparing for war and was intent on seizing 
the imperial throne. Another said that Khosrow Parviz was so angry with the 
king that he was leading an army against Iran. The chieftains were bewildered, 
and each one had a different opinion of what was happening. When these rumors 
spread throughout Ctesiphon, the king’s rule lost all authority. His servants 
became anxious and quarrelsome, and those who had blessed him now cursed 
him. Few of his men remained at their posts at court, and to the king’s heart the 
world had become a narrow place. 

Banduy and Gostahm learned that the king’s farr had darkened. The prisoners 
freed themselves from their chains and appointed one of their number to find out 
what was happening and who among the warlike chieftains was still at the court. 
When they learned how matters stood, they cast aside all pretense of loyalty and 
broke out of the prison. Such a tumult arose that the whole plain rang with it, and 
the troops who were in the city stood powerless against them. Now armed, and 
with followers and weapons, Gostahm and Banduy marched determinedly on the 
palace; they washed all trace of shame from their eyes. Then a detachment of 
troops appeared from the bazaar, heading toward the palace. Gostahm addressed 
them, “If you wish to join us, renounce your loyalty to the king, because 
Hormozd has turned aside from all good sense and from the true path; from now 
on you should not call him a king. Punish him, make Persia’s glory as bitter as 
colocynth for him. We shall have you as our vanguard and place a new king on 
Persia’s throne, and if you do not falter in this enterprise we shall put Persia in 
your hands, while we ourselves will retire to some corner of the world with our 
companions.” 

At Gostahm’s words, as one man the troops cursed the king and cried, “May 
there never again be a king who seeks to shed his son’s blood!” Roused by his 
speech, they became shameless, setting fire to the palace gates and swarming 
into the audience hall where they snatched the crown from the king’s head and 
dragged him down from the throne. Then they put hot irons into his eyes, and the 
bright lamps of his life turned dark. They left him, still alive, in this state and 
looted all the wealth that was there. 


THE REIGN OF KHOSROW PARVIZ 


By night, Banduy and Gostahm quickly sent a messenger with a change of 
horses to Khosrow, who was then at the fire-temple called Azar-Goshasp, to tell 
him what had happened. But when the envoy described the tumult in Baghdad, 
the young man’s face turned as pale as fenugreek. He said, “Any man who 
ignorantly leaves the ways of wisdom and has no fear of the turning heavens will 
lead a profitless life. If this evil you describe were to please me, my sleep and 
food would turn to fire. Even though my father tried to shed my blood and I fled 
from Iran, I am still his slave and will listen to all he has to say.” 

Immediately he set off with a large number of troops from Barda’, Ardebil, 
and Armenia, traveling as quickly as fire. When news reached Baghdad that a 
new claimant to the throne was on his way, the town grew peaceful again, and 
Khosrow was encouraged by this calm. The city’s chieftains came out to 
welcome him; they seated him on an ivory throne and placed a golden torque 
about his neck and a splendid crown on his head. Khosrow entered the town in 
sorrow and went sighing to his father, his face a witness to the grief he felt. 
When he saw him, he wept and paid him homage; the two were closeted together 
for a long time. Khosrow said, “You are a scion of Nushin-Ravan, but 
misfortune has dogged your reign. You know that if I had been here to support 
you, not even a needle would have been permitted to scratch the tip of your 
finger. Think of what your orders are for me, now that sorrow has come to you 
and my heart is filled with grief. If you command me, I shall be a slave guarding 
you; I have no desire for the crown or the army and will cut my head off before 
you if you order me to.” Hormozd replied, “You are a wise man, and you know 
this day 

Of hardship and despair will pass away. 

I’ve three requests to make of you, no more; 
Grant me these three and I’Il not ask for four. 
First, that as day breaks, in the morning light, 
You’ll sing to me, and drive away the night; 
Next that you’ll send a warrior to me, 


A veteran of our warlike cavalry 

Who’ll talk of wars and hunts; and see he brings 
A book that tells the exploits of our kings, 

So that in hearing them I’II find relief 

From my incessant pain and constant grief. 
Thirdly, see that your uncles understand 

They’re your inferiors here, and that this land 

Is yours to rule, not theirs; blind them, and make 
Their days a darkness for my sorrow’s sake.” 


Khosrow replied, “May anyone who does not mourn for your blinded eyes 
perish, and may your enemies be swept from the earth! But consider, Bahram 
Chubineh has become a formidable warrior, and he has innumerable cavalry and 
swordsmen with him. If I dispose of Gostahm, I’1l have no one to turn to for help 
against Bahram. As for horsemen who’ve known battles and banquets to recite 
the stories of ancient kings for you, I’1l send new ones to you constantly. I wish 
your heart wisdom and relief from the pain you suffer.” He left his father’s 
presence in tears, and told no one of his secret thoughts. The son was a kinder 
man than the king, and as a sage once said, “A sweetly spoken youth is finer 
than 

A difficult and quarrelsome old man.” 


But in the end the virtuous and the vicious both lie beneath the dust. 


Bahram Chubineh Learns That Hormozd Has Been Blinded and 
Leads His Army Against Khosrow Parviz 
Bahram was astonished when he learned that the king’s eyes had been put out 
with hot irons, that the light had died away from the garden’s two narcissi, that 
Hormozd’s good fortune was at an end and his son now sat on his throne. For a 
while he was taken aback and brooded on this turn of events, but then he ordered 
that the armies’ drums be sounded and his great banner be brought out onto the 
plain. The baggage was loaded, the cavalry mounted, and Bahram prepared to do 
battle with Khosrow Parviz. Audaciously he led his army, which was like a 
moving mountain, as far as the bank of the River Nahravan. 

Khosrow grew anxious when he learned of Bahram’s aggressive advance, 
and sent out spies. He said to them, “First you must find out how his army feels 
about his intentions, whether they’re with him in his desire for war, or whether 


they’re moving against us reluctantly. Then notice whether Bahram stays mainly 
in the center of the army or moves about among his troops. Also, learn how he 
holds audience, and whether he ever thinks of going hunting while they’re on the 
march.” The spies set off on their mission without the army being aware of this, 
and when they returned they went secretly to Khosrow and said, “From the 
nobles down to the young recruits, his soldiers are with him in everything he 
does. When his men are on the march, he is always moving among them, 
sometimes with the right wing, sometimes the left, and then with the baggage 
train. He has everyone’s confidence and has no need of outside help. He holds 
court like a king, and hunts in the same fashion. All his behavior is that of a 
king, and he constantly reads the book of Kalileh and Demneh.” 

Khosrow said to his vizier, “We have a long business ahead of us. Bahram 
terrifies the monsters in the oceans when he rides out against his enemies. He 
learned how to act like a king from my father, when he was king of the world; 
he’s taken Kalileh and Demneh as his vizier, and no one has a human advisor 
who’s better than this.” To Gostahm and Banduy he said, “Sorrow and trouble 
are my partners now.” Men like Gerdui, Shapur, Andian, the leader of the 
Armenians, as well as other nobles, sat with the king in secret council. After 
their deliberations Khosrow Parviz led his army out from Baghdad, and pitched 
his pavilion on the plains. The two armies were now close together: on the one 
side the commander, and on the other the king. When the world’s light declined 
in the sky and night spread its dark curls, sentries were posted on each side. 
Then, as night grew dry-lipped and sick at heart and fled from day’s dagger, the 
din of drums began from both camps, and the sun rose to guide them to battle. 
The king ordered Banduy and Gostahm to put on their iron helmets, and he went 
forward with his nobles to the riverbank. 

When the sentry reported to Bahram that the enemy’s forces were within two 
bowshots, he summoned his advisors. He mounted his white charger, a proud, 
fine horse with a black tail and brazen hooves. Grasping an Indian sword, whose 
blow was like lightning from a cloud, Bahram rode forward, glittering in glory; 
Izad-Goshasp was on his left, and Ayin-Goshasp and Yalan-Sineh, both longing 
for combat and filled with courage, accompanied him. There were also three 
Turkish warriors in his retinue, men who had sworn loyalty to Bahram, saying 
that if they saw the king become separated from his men, they would bring him 
dead or as a captive to Bahram. 

On the one side Khosrow waited, on the other Bahram, and between them 
flowed the River Nahravan. The soldiers on both sides watched, to see how 


Bahram would approach the king. 


Khosrow Parviz and Bahram Chubineh Address One Another 
Bahram and Khosrow met, the face of the one was open and confident, the 
other’s closed and apprehensive. The king, dressed in a Chinese cloak of gold- 
worked brocade, sat on his ivory-colored horse. Gerdui preceded him as a guide, 
and he was accompanied by Banduy, Gostahm, and Khorad-Borzin, who wore a 
golden helmet; they were all covered in iron, gold, and silver, and wore golden 
belts studded with rubies. When Bahram saw the king, his face turned pale with 
anger. He said to his warriors, “So this miserable son of a whore has risen up 
from wretchedness and stupidity to be a man; he’s become powerful and is ready 
for battle. He’s learned how to be an emperor, but I shall bring his days in the 
world to an end soon enough. Look at his army from one end to the other, and 
see if there’s a single warrior there worthy of the name. I can see no horseman 
there who’d dare to confront me. Now he will see how men fight: headlong 
horses, swords and maces, weapons’ blows and the hail of arrows, warriors’ 
cries and the give and take of battle. No elephant can keep its ground when I 
lead my army in an attack; the mountains tremble at my war cry, and savage 
lions flee. We’|I put a spell on the waters with our swords and fill the desert 
from end to end with blood.” Then he urged on his piebald horse, and it leaped 
forward like a winged bird. To his army’s astonishment he advanced to the 
river’s edge and stood opposite the young king; a few Persians, all prepared to 
fight against Khosrow, accompanied him. 

Khosrow tumed to his companions and said, “Which of you can recognize 
Bahram Chubineh?” Gerdui said, “Your majesty, look at the man on the piebald 
horse, the one wearing a white cloak and a black sword belt, who’s riding at the 
center of that group of warriors.” Seeing Bahram, Khosrow knew immediately 
what kind of a person he was and said, “You mean the dark, tall man, on the 
piebald charger?” Gerdui said, “Yes, that’s him, a man who’s never had a 
benevolent thought in his life.” Khosrow replied, “If you ask a hunchback a 
question, you’!l get a rough answer. And can’t you see that that man, with his 
boar’s snout and half-closed eyes, is obviously evil and an enemy to God? I can 
see no humility in him, and no one is going to be able to treat him as a subject.” 
But still hoping to turn the time from one of fighting to one of feasting, he 
addressed Bahram from a distance: “You’re a proud warrior, but what are you 
doing here on the field of battle? You’re an ornament to the court, the throne and 
crown depend on you, you’re a pillar of the army in warfare, a shining torch at 


feasts, an ambitious God-fearing warrior; may God never abandon you! I have 
considered your position and weighed well the things you have done. I shall treat 
you and your army as my guests and refresh my soul with the sight of you; then I 
shall name you the commander of Iran’s armies, as is just, and pray to God for 
your welfare.” 

Bahram heard him out. He let the reins in his hand drop and saluted Khosrow 
from his horse, then stood silently before him for a long while. Finally, still 
mounted on his piebald charger, he said, “I rejoice in the life I lead, and fortune 
favors me. I don’t wish you greatness, because as a king you know neither 
justice nor injustice, and when the king of the Alans rules it’s the most miserable 
wretches who support him. I’ve considered your position too, and I have a noose 
ready and waiting for you. Soon I’ll construct a tall gibbet and tie your two 
hands together with my lariat; then I’1l string you up as you deserve, and turn 
your days to bitterness.” 

When Khosrow heard Bahram’s answer, his face turned as pale as fenugreek. 
He said, “Ungrateful wretch, no God-fearing man would speak as you do. A 
guest approaches, and you greet him with curses when you should be welcoming 
him. This was never the way of kings or noble warriors; neither Arabs nor 
Persians have ever acted like this, not if you go back for three thousand years. A 
wise man would be ashamed of such behavior. Think again, don’t follow this 
ungrateful course. When a guest greets you kindly, you must be a devil to 
answer in such a fashion: I fear that I shall see you fall on evil days, ruined by 
your own obstinacy. Your well-being is in the hands of that king who lives 
eternally and rules all things; but you are an ungrateful sinner against God, and 
you’ll bring contempt on your body, terror on your heart. When you say I’m 
king of the Alans, you only mention a third of my lineage; in what way am I 
unworthy to rule, how is this crown unsuitable for my head? Nushin-Ravan was 
my grandfather, Hormozd my father; who can you name who is more entitled to 
the crown than I am?” 

But Bahram answered him, “You’re evil, and you talk and act like a fool. 
You prattle about being a guest, but your nature is wicked and all you can do is 
repeat old stories. What do you know about what kings say? You’re neither wise 
nor a good warrior. You were king of the Alans and now you’re a contemptible 
wretch, lower than a slave of slaves. You’re the most wicked man in the world; 
you’re not a king and you have no right to lord it over other chieftains. The 
people have proclaimed me king, and I shall not leave you space on the earth to 
set your foot down. You say that bad fortune’s in store for me, and that I’m 


unworthy of sovereignty, but I say that you’re unfit to be a king, and may you 
never occupy the throne again! The Persians are your enemies, and they’|I fight 
till they tear you up by the roots and flay the skin from your body and fling your 
bones to the dogs!” 

Khosrow said to him, “You villain, what has made you so angry and 
insolent? Ugly talk is a fault in a man, and your nature has had this trait from the 
beginning. Fortunate the man who lives by wisdom, but wisdom has deserted 
your brain, and when a devil’s hard-pressed he’ll say anything. But I wouldn’t 
want a fine warrior like you to be destroyed by anger: you should drive anger 
from your heart, control yourself, and put a spell on your rage. Remember the 
just God who rules all things, and in doing so make wisdom your guide. There’s 
a mountain of troubles ahead of you, and, if you look, you’ll see it’s higher than 
Bisitun; the desert thorns will bear fruit before someone like you becomes king. 
Your heart’s filled with thoughts of sovereignty, but we’ll see what God wills. I 
don’t know who has taught you this villainy and these councils of Ahriman, but 
whoever it was wanted to bring about your death with his words.” Then 
Khosrow dismounted from his ivory-colored horse, removed the precious crown 
from his head, and turned lamenting toward the sun. His heart was filled with 
hopes of God’s grace, and he said, “Bright Lord of Justice, it is you who makes 
the tree of hope bear fruit. You know this slave who stands before me, and that 
one should weep for the shame he has brought to the crown.” And then he went 
aside to pray, and opened the secrets of his heart to God: “If I’m to give up my 
authority 

And see my lineage lose its sovereignty, 

I'll be your servant, and my one desire 

Will be to tend your temple’s sacred fire. 

Pll take no food but milk, the clothes I wear 
Will be of wool and animals’ coarse hair; 

I'll have no gold or silver, and I’ll stay 
Within your temple’s precincts night and day. 
But if my sovereignty’s to stay with me, 
Guide my great army on to victory 

And do not hand my crown and throne to one 
Who’s shown himself a slave in all he’s done. 
If I achieve my heart’s desire, I swear 

This horse and crown, the royal jewels I wear, 
My clothes of cloth of gold—all these will be 


Devoted to your temple’s treasury; 

Over your temple’s lapis dome I’Il pour 

Ten purses of gold coins, and when I’m sure 
That I am once again Iran’s sole king, 

I'll add ten thousand more gold coins, and bring 
The captives from this war, so that they’ll be 
Your temple’s slaves in perpetuity. ” 


This sorely pressed man stood again after he had prayed, and quickly went back 
to the riverbank. He called out to Bahram Chubineh, “You have no wisdom, no 
manners, no royal farr; you’re the hellish slave of some monstrous irascible 
demon who has blinded you. You’ve found rage and revenge instead of wisdom, 
and hell’s demons applaud you for it; thorn brakes seem cities to you, hell seems 
an orchard; wisdom’s torch has died before your eyes, and taken all the light 
from your heart and soul. Some wily magician has raised your ambitions and 
shown you the abyss, but the leaves of the tree for which you reach are 
poisonous, and its fruit is bitter. None of your family has ever shown such pride 
and ambition; God has not granted you the exalted position you crave, and you 
should not dream of things that can never be. A crab cannot sprout an eagle’s 
wings, and an eagle cannot fly beyond the sun. I swear by God and by the throne 
and crown that if I find you without your army, I shall do you no harm. I have 
heard your savage language, but it is God who gives us victory and on him I 
rely. If I am not worthy to be a king I’ve no wish to live as anyone’s subject.” 

Bahram replied, “You’re foolish and in thrall to Ahriman. Your father was a 
God-fearing man, but you didn’t respect him for what he was, and you pushed 
him ignominiously from the throne. You want to be a wise and capable king in 
his place, but you’re perverse and an enemy to God, who will send you nothing 
but evil. It’s true that Hormozd was unjust at times, and the land groaned 
beneath his oppression, but you’re unworthy to be his son and to rule Iran and 
Turan. You don’t deserve a throne, or even life; good fortune has so deserted 
you that a tomb is all you’re good for. I shall avenge Hormozd, and I shall be 
king in Iran. And tell me again the story that everyone agrees on, about how you 
thrust hot irons into the king’s eyes, or that you at least gave the orders for this to 
be done. From now on you’|I see that sovereignty is mine, and I rule the 
heavens, from the sun to Pisces.” 

Khosrow said, “God forbid that a man should rejoice at his father’s pain. It 
was written thus; what had to be came to pass, and there is no point in discussing 


it endlessly. You call yourself a king, but when death comes you won’t even 
have a shroud to your name. You’ve your horse and barding, and because of 
these you hope for a sovereignty that will never exist. You’ve no home, no 
wealth, no country, no lineage; you’re a king who’s filled with wind. For all 
your army and wealth and false titles, you’ ll never know the splendor of a royal 
throne. Subjects have never sought to be king because they knew they were not 
worthy of the throne and crown. God created sovereignty out of justice, ability, 
and lineage; he bestows it on the most worthy person, the wisest, and the most 
compassionate. My father made me king of the Alans, and I was troubled 
enough by you then; now God has conferred imperial sovereignty, greatness, and 
the royal crown and throne on me. I shall do good in the world, so that my name 
shall not disappear after my death. When Hormozd ruled justly, the world 
rejoiced in his reign, and I as his son have inherited his throne, as is right, and 
with the crown and royal belt I have found good fortune. But you—you are filled 
with sin and deceit: first you attacked Hormozd, and all the evil in his reign was 
from you and your tricks and plots and lies. If God wills it, I shall avenge him 
and turn your sun to darkness. Who is worthy of the crown? If I am not worthy 
of it, who is?” 

Bahram replied, “You’re a warrior, and whoever snatches sovereignty from 
you is worthy of it. The Ashkanians ruled when Babak’s daughter gave birth to 
Ardeshir. And isn’t it true that Ardeshir became powerful and seized the throne 
through killing Ardavan? But five hundred years have passed since then, and the 
Sasanian crown has grown cold. Now it is time for me to possess the throne and 
crown, and my victorious fortune will ensure this. I look at your face and your 
fortune, your army, your crown, and your throne, and I stretch out my hand 
against the Sasanians as a savage lion leaps on its prey. I shall erase their names 
from the records and trample the Sasanian throne beneath my feet. If one listens 
to those who know the truth, it’s the Ashkanians who deserve to rule. The truth 
is that you’re a Sasanian and your lineage is a contemptible one, because Sasan 
was a Shepherd, and the son of a shepherd. Didn’t Babak employ him as a 
shepherd for his flocks>?” 

But Khosrow answered, “You ungrateful criminal, wasn’t it the Sasanians 
who raised you up in the world? Your words are nothing but lies from one end to 
the other, and no honor will come from such talk.” Bahram replied, “It’s no 
secret that Sasan was a shepherd.” Khosrow said, “When Dara died, he was 
unable to bequeath the crown to Sasan; but though fortune turned against him, 
the race survived, and no justice will come from your unjust chatter. And this is 


the intelligence and good sense and glory with which you hope to gain the 
imperial throne?” As he spoke, he laughed and turned away toward his own 
army. But one of the three savage Turks, who were as wild as wolves, and who 
had promised Bahram that on the day of battle they’d seek fame by bringing the 
king before him dead or alive, rode fearlessly forward and flung a lariat of sixty 
coils, which caught on Khosrow’s crown. Gostahm severed the rope with his 
sword and the king’s head was unharmed. Bahram turned on this wretched Turk 
and said, “You deserve to be in your grave for this! Who told you to attack the 
king; didn’t you see me standing there parleying with him?” Then he returned to 
his camp, his soul filled with sorrow, his body with disquiet. 


\/ chemently, Gordyeh tried once again to dissuade her brother from his plans, 
but to no avail. Bahram attacked the king’s army at night, and Khosrow Parviz 
was forced to flee back to Ctesiphon. There he consulted with his blind father 
Hormozd, who advised him to ask the emperor of Byzantium for help. As they 
were talking, news came that Bahram’s army was approaching, and Khosrow 
fled westward into the desert. Khosrow’s advisors, Gostahm and Banduy, 
remained behind and, unbeknownst to Khosrow, strangled Hormozd. Then they 
set out after Khosrow, who had taken refuge in a monastery. Bahram’s army 
reached the monastery, but through a ruse of Banduy’s Khosrow was once again 
able to flee westward. Banduy fell into Bahram’s hands and was imprisoned, but 
he managed to escape. Bahram crowned himself king. Khosrow meanwhile had 
reached Byzantium and entered into lengthy negotiations with the emperor 
there, using Gostahm as his go-between. Eventually, the emperor agreed to help 
him against Bahram Chubineh. 


The Emperor of Byzantium Sends Khosrow Parviz an Army and His 
Daughter 

The emperor selected a hundred thousand of his troops, all fine men ready for 
battle, and these he assigned to Khosrow Parviz, together with armor, cash, and 
warhorses. In this way the king’s long wait came to an end. The emperor had a 
daughter named Mariam, who was a wise, dignified, and intelligent young 
woman. He affianced her to Khosrow, with the rites of his religion, calling down 


God’s blessing on her. Gostahm received her from the emperor, and with all due 
ceremony he handed her over to Khosrow. The emperor presented them with 
such a dowry that the splendid horses carrying it were exhausted by the weight. 
There were gold vessels and imperial jewels, rubies, and clothes embroidered 
with gold-worked designs, carpets, and Byzantine silk brocades bearing figures 
woven in gold. There were also bracelets, torques and earrings, and three 
splendid crowns encrusted with jewels. Four golden litters were prepared, their 
facings studded with gems, as well as forty closed couches of ebony, glittering 
with gems like a rooster’s eyes. Following them came serving girls as lovely as 
the moon, and five hundred young male servants mounted on horses with 
trappings of gold and silver. Then there were forty handsome, charming 
Byzantine eunuchs, together with four wise and famous philosophers; to these 
last the king told everything that was necessary. He also spoke with Mariam in 
secret, advising her on obedience and her duties, on when she should be 
generous, on her food, and on what behavior was appropriate. When the gifts 
were reckoned up their value was estimated at more than three hundred million 
dinars. 

The emperor consulted with astrologers as to when would be the best time for 
the journey and set off on an auspicious day. After two stages of the journey he 
gave orders that Mariam come to him, and he spoke with her at length. He said, 
“Keep yourself secluded, and do not loosen your belt until you reach the Persian 
border; Khosrow must not see you naked before then, since this could lead to 
unforeseen consequences.” He then bade her an affectionate farewell. To his 
brother Niatus, who was in charge of the Byzantine troops sent to Khosrow, he 
said, “Mariam is of your own blood, and so I have entrusted her to you. I am 
giving my daughter, my wealth, and a well-equipped army into your 
safekeeping.” Niatus accepted the charge, and when he and the king had spoken 
together, he wept as they turned aside from one another. 

Niatus, bearing his sword and mace, marched at the head of the army. 
Khosrow heard of their approach and set out from the town where he was 
waiting. As the dust sent up by the approaching troops became visible, followed 
by their banners and their splendid armored cavalry bearing down toward him 
like the wind, Khosrow laughed from his heart, as a flower blossoms in the 
spring. His spirits lifted and he dug his heels into his horse’s flanks. He saw 
Niatus and embraced him, questioning him at length about the emperor who had 
gone to such trouble on his behalf and offered him so much wealth. Then he 
went over to the litter, where he saw Mariam and glimpsed her face beneath her 


veil; he questioned her too, and kissed her hand, rejoicing in his heart to see her 
beauty. 

Khosrow brought the army to his royal pavilion, where he had a private 
chamber prepared for Mariam. He sat talking with her for three days, and on the 
fourth, as the sun lit up the world, he had a splendid tent prepared, and there he 
summoned Niatus and his subordinates Sergius and Kut, as well as the other 
Byzantine commanders. He asked them, “Who are your leaders, your finest 
warriors?” Niatus chose seventy men to lead the attack on the day of battle, and 
each of them had a thousand picked cavalry following his banner. When 
Khosrow saw this fine force of cavalry all eager for war, he praised God who has 
created time and the world, and called down his blessings on Niatus and the 
army, as well as on the emperor and his country. To the commanders he said, “If 
God is with me in this battle, I shall show my mettle, and make the earth as 
splendid as the Pleiades. May our thoughts now be only of friendship; the 
heavens are with us, and the kindness of noble men is as an orchard for us to rest 
in.” 


hosrow Parviz traveled to Azerbaijan, where the people welcomed him. 

Bahram Chubineh’s attempts to rally support began to fail, and there were 
a number of skirmishes between Bahram and Khosrow’s allies. For a while, 
Khosrow became separated from the main body of his army. 


Khosrow Fights Against Bahram Chubineh 

At that moment a cry went up from the sentries, and Bahram was told that a 
group of men was approaching. Eager for conquest, with his wits about him, 
Bahram mounted his horse, he grasped his sword, and fastened his lariat to his 
saddle. From his horse’s height he surveyed the little group of men who were 
approaching, and then chose a few of his own warriors. He said to Yalan-Sineh, 
“That wretch wants to prove his worth in battle: I know it can’t be anyone but 
him who would dare to fight against me. He’s come to attack me with his 
handful of men, and he’s walking into the mouth of a monster. There can’t be 
more than twenty warriors with him, and I don’t recognize any of them. If he 
confronts me and I don’t overcome him, I’m a nobody.” To Izad-Goshasp and 
Yalan-Sineh he said, “Men don’t hide their bravery; we don’t need more than 
four of us to defeat them.” There was a man there called Janforouz, who 
preferred night to day; Bahram put him in command of his troops, while he and 
three companions went out to confront the enemy. 

When Khosrow saw Bahram, he said to the Persians, “Their men are coming. 
Don’t let your hearts fail now, because I’m finally face to face with my destiny. 
I’m here with my mace, and there is that malignant Bahram; fight against these 
rebels to my rule! There are fourteen of you, three of them; God forbid that they 
defeat you!” Niatus and his Byzantine companions had no choice but to prepare 
for combat. Other men made their way into the mountains where they could look 
down on the two groups, and everyone said, “Why is the king throwing his life 
away like this? Why should he leave behind all his fine cavalry and go into 
battle alone?” They raised their hands to the heavens in horror, believing that 
Khosrow was as good as killed already. 

Bahram urged his horse forward and Yalan-Sineh and Izad-Goshasp 
accompanied him. When Khosrow’s companions saw the enemy, most of them 
were like a flock of sheep scattering before a wolf. The king stood his ground as 
they fled, but he too had no choice but to wheel his horse about as Izad-Goshasp 
bore down on him. Gostahm, Banduy, and Gerdui were still with him: the royal 
hero called on God’s help and said to Gostahm, “What is the point of my 
fighting if my men flee from me?” Gostahm replied, “Their cavalry are upon us, 
you can’t fight them alone!” Khosrow looked back at their pursuers and saw that 
Bahram rode ahead of the rest. To save his skin, he cut away the straps of his 
horse’s black barding, so that it could flee more quickly. His companions lagged 
behind, but his enemies began to close on him. As he rode, he came up against a 


mountain in which there was a narrow defile. He turned and his three enemies 
faced him; behind him was the defile, which narrowed to a cul-de-sac. The 
world’s king was alone, cut off from his companions. He dismounted from his 
horse and began hurriedly to climb the mountain, but there was no way forward 
and the watching warriors despaired of his life. There was no place to make a 
stand, and no way to escape, and Bahram came rushing toward him. He called 
out to Khosrow, “Deceitful fool, now the abyss is opening beneath your glory! 
Why did you deliver yourself into my hands?” 

When the king saw the desperate straits he was in, with his enemy’s sword 
behind him and the rock ahead, he prayed aloud to God, “O world Creator, you 
are above the turnings of fate! Help me in my distress! It is you I turn to, not 
Saturn or Mercury.” 


Before the echo of this prayer had died, 

Redoubled from the flinty mountainside, 

Sorush appeared; Khosrow stared in dismay— 

The angel’s clothes were green, his horse was gray. 
He paused, then lifted Khosrow by the arm, 

And set him down where he was safe from harm 
(There’s no surprise in this; the miracle 

Was God’s, with him all things are possible). 

Now Khosrow wept and asked: “What is your name?” 
The angel said, “I am Sorush. I came 

In answer to your faith, and soon you’ll be 

The world’s king, glorious in your sovereignty: 
You’ll reign for thirty-eight long years if you 

Act righteously in everything you do.” 

He vanished, and the world has never known 

A vision like the one Khosrow was shown. 


Bahram was astonished at all this and called repeatedly on God, saying, “When I 
fight with men I hope I'll never lack for bravery, but now I think I am fighting 
with the spirit world, and I must weep for my bad fortune.” 





On the other side of the mountain Niatus prayed to God for help, while 
Mariam scored her face with her nails in her anxiety for her husband. The hearts 





of the Byzantine troops on the plain and in the foothills were filled with 
foreboding, and when Niatus lost sight of Khosrow, he drew Mariam’s golden 
litter aside and said to her, “Stay where you are. I fear that the Persian king has 
been killed.” At that moment, Khosrow appeared in the distance on the 
mountainside; all of the army rejoiced, and Mariam’s heart was freed from 
dread. Khosrow came down from the mountain and told Mariam what he had 
seen: “My lovely Byzantine princess, it was God who saved me,” he said. “I 
didn’t flee out of cowardice or hang back from the fight. I was trapped in a rocky 
defile and called on the Creator for help, and he revealed to his slave secrets he 
had kept hidden. I saw things that the great Feraydun, Tur, Salm, and Afrasyab 
did not dream of, and they are portents of victory and royal power.” The king 
told her what he had experienced, and then he ordered his army to prepare for 
battle and to remember Khosrow as they fought. For his part, Bahram was filled 
with consternation and regretted all he had done. 


The Battle Between Khosrow Parviz and Bahram Chubineh 
Khosrow’s army came down from the foothills, and the world turned black with 
the dust sent up by its cavalry, while from the other direction Bahram led his 
army forward, so that there was no brightness left in the day. Bahram said, 
“Whoever leads an army needs to be wise, brave, and capable; the warriors who 
have seen my lance and my heroic spirit have chosen me over Khosrow, and I 
shall hurl the name of Nushin-Ravan into the dust.” Making wildly for the king, 
he went ahead of the main body of his army, readied his bow, and notched an 
arrow to the string. Quickly he loosed the arrow toward the king’s waist, but the 
arrow faltered in its flight, and when a slave saw it strike, he was able to pluck it 
out from the brocade in which the king was clothed. The king rushed forward 
against Bahram and lunged with his lance. Bahram’s body was protected by a 
cuirass and the lance split with the impact; nevertheless, Bahram was terrified by 
the blow. The king sprang forward once again, bringing his sword down on 
Bahram’s helmet; his sword, too, broke in pieces, and the blade stayed lodged in 
the helmet. Everyone who saw this or who heard the clash of metal on metal 
praised the king’s courage. Their warriors followed the two, and battle was 
joined. Banduy hurried over to the king and cried, “Your crown is more exalted 
than the moon; this army is like a host of ants or locusts, covering all the desert 
and wastelands. It is not right that blood should be shed needlessly, or that a king 
attack his subjects. If anyone asks us for quarter, it would be better to grant it 
than to kill or wound him in battle.” Khosrow replied, “I’ve no desire to avenge 


myself against those who repent of their sins; they are all under my protection, 
they are the jewels in my crown.” 

Night came down from the dark mountains, and the two armies separated and 
went back to their camps. The cries of the sentries and the jingling of bells meant 
that few of the soldiers fell asleep. Ambitious Banduy selected a brave herald 
with a strong loud voice and ordered him to mount his horse and get ready to 
wake anyone who slept. The two went out into no-man’s land between the two 
armies and, when they were close to the enemy’s camp, the herald cried out: 
“You slaves who have sinned and whose luck has run out, even if you have 
sinned more than any other man and distinguished yourself in battle against him, 
the king swears by God that he will forgive the crimes you have committed in 
public and in secret.” When this cry was heard in the darkness everyone pricked 
up his ears, and Bahram’s famous warriors prepared to steal away. 

When the bright sun appeared above the mountaintops, and day made the 
land shine like silk, the plain was empty of people; they had crept away in the 
night, unbeknownst to Bahram. No one was to be seen in the tents, except a few 
of Bahram’s closest friends and advisors. As Bahram walked among the empty 
tents and realized what had happened, he said to his companions, “Fly from this 
place, don’t wait for disaster to strike.” He asked the cameleers for three 
thousand camels, fine mounts that would foam at the mouth and bear heavy 
burdens. He loaded them with all the portable wealth he had—carpets and 
provisions, gold and silver, his ivory throne, bracelets, gold torques and crowns 
—then he mounted his horse and prepared to retreat. 


Bahram Chubineh Flees to the Emperor of China 

Bahram and his remaining soldiers trusted neither the road nor the loyalty of the 
countryside they were traveling through. With terror in his heart, Bahram took 
his gold and silver by trackless ways. Yalan-Sineh and Izad-Goshasp rode to one 
side of the army, telling stories of ancient kings as they went; Bahram rode 
ahead, his heart filled with regret and anguish. A humble village, too lowly to 
supply the wants of a nobleman, came into view in the distance. Because their 
throats were dry with thirst, Bahram stopped at an old woman’s house. Politely 
they asked for bread and water. The crone heard them out and set an old basket 
containing barley bread in front of them, together with a tattered water skin. 
Yalan-Sineh handed the barsom to Bahram, but he was so sunk in sorrow he 
forgot to observe the ritual silence while eating. They ate the bread, asked for 
wine, and murmured their prayers. The old woman said, “You want wine, do 


you? I’ve wine and an old dried gourd: I split the gourd when it was fresh, and I 
dried it to use as a cup, and placed it over the wine.” Bahram said, “As long as 
there’s wine, we don’t need any finer cup than that.” The old woman went and 
brought her cup, which delighted Bahram. He filled it with wine, to please her, 
and said, “Now, mother, tell us what news you’ve heard about the world’s 
business.” The crone said, “My brain’s grown tired with all I’ve heard today: 

So many folks from town have come this way 

And all they’Il talk about is Bahram’s battle 

Against the king, and such like tittle-tattle. 

He had to run away, so people claim, 

And hasn’t got a soldier to his name.” 


Bahram said, “Tell me then, do you think Bahram was wise to do what he did? 
Or do you think he’s an ambitious fool?” The woman said, 


“Good sir, what devil’s darkened your clear eyes? 
Bahram rebelled, and everyone who’s wise 

Just laughed at him; nobody reckons he 

Could win against a royal enemy.” 


Bahram said, “If he asks you, tell him to drink wine from a gourd, and keep a 
basket of barley bread for him till the next barley harvest comes round.” This 
was Bahram’s supper, and he stayed there that night, hoping to find some rest for 
his spirit, though he was unable to. 


H ere, Ferdowsi unexpectedly breaks off his narrative for a moment to insert 
a lament for the death of his son. 


Ferdowsi’s Lament for the Death of His Son 


Now that I’m more than sixty-five years old, 
It would be wrong of me to hope for gold. 
Better to heed my own advice, and grieve 


That my dear son is dead. Why did he leave? 

I should have gone; but no, the young man went 
And left his lifeless father to lament. 

I long to overtake him; when I do 

Ill say, “I should have quit the world, not you, 
And in your going, my beloved boy, 

You left your father destitute of joy. 

You were my help in all adversity; 

Why, now I’m old, have you abandoned me? 
Did you perhaps find younger friends, who led 
You from my side, to travel on ahead?” 

At thirty-seven, his unhappy heart 

Despaired and he was ready to depart; 

When difficulties came he’d always shown 

Me kindness, now he’s left me here alone. 

He went, while grief and bitter tears remain, 
And inward suffering, and heartfelt pain. 

He’s gone into the light, and he’ll prepare 

A place to welcome his dear father there: 

So many years have passed, and surely he 

Is waiting there impatiently for me! 

May God illuminate your soul, my son, 

And wisdom keep you safe where you have gone. 


N ow that Bahram had fled, Khosrow Parviz had no more need for his 
Byzantine allies, who returned home. Bahram reached China, where he 
ingratiated himself with the emperor by killing a rebellious chieftain who was 
threatening the court, and then by slaying a lion that had killed one of the 
emperor’s daughters. Bahram’s reward was to be married to another of the 
imperial daughters. Khosrow Parviz sent a letter to the emperor demanding 
Bahram’s extradition; the emperor’s response was to put Bahram in charge of 
an army to invade Iran. 


Khosrow Sends Khorad-Borzin to the Emperor 


When the king learned that this wolf Bahram had emerged from his thicket once 
more and was at the head of an army whose dust obscured the sky’s brightness, 
he said to his counselor Khorad-Borzin, “Hurry to the emperor, and speak to him 
with all the persuasiveness you can muster. In Persia and beyond, you are the 
most knowledgeable of men, and you have the most eloquence.” He opened the 
doors to his treasury and brought out such jewels, swords, and golden belts that 
Khorad-Borzin murmured the name of God in wonder. He took these objects as 
gifts and made his way to the Oxus; from there he continued by a secret route. 
When at last he reached the palace, he selected a messenger to announce his 
arrival to the emperor. 

As soon as he heard the news, the emperor had the audience hall prepared and 
gave orders that the envoy be admitted. Khorad-Borzin entered humbly, made 
his obeisance before the emperor, and said briefly, “Your slave will speak when 
you order him to.” The emperor replied, “Eloquent talk will make an old man’s 
heart young again: tell us the profitable things you have to say. What’s said is 
the marrow of a meeting, things left unsaid are only the skin.” These words 
reminded Khorad-Borzin of the ancient enmity between their countries. He 
began his speech by invoking the world’s Creator, who has made the heaven’s 
sphere and the earth and time, and both the weak and the powerful; then he 
spoke of the certainty of death, and the history of the Persian kings. He 
continued: “Now the king of Persia is your relative, and his happiness and 
sorrow depend on your good and bad fortune. In the time of great kings, his 
mother’s father was the emperor of China. Now in these days, when many things 
have changed, our alliance is renewed. May God who bestows victory keep you, 
and may the nobles of the earth be as your slaves.” The emperor listened to him, 
then said, “You are a wise man; if there is another like you in Persia he must be 
eloquent enough to praise the heavens!” A place was set aside at court for the 
envoy, and the emperor kept him close by. At his command the gifts were 
counted out to the court treasurer, and the emperor said to him, “May you never 
want for wealth in the world. If there is something I can give you in exchange 
for all you have brought, tell me what it is. But you are more splendid than all 
gifts; you are the crown of the world’s wise men.” 

Khorad’s lodgings were beautifully decorated with all kinds of fabrics, and he 
was always welcome to join the emperor at table, out hunting, during the court 
festivities, or to drink wine with him. He waited for a chance to make his case; 
one day he saw an opportunity and bravely spoke up: “Bahram has an evil 
nature,” he said. “He’s more malevolent than Ahriman himself. He sells men of 


experience and understanding for profit, and for a paltry profit at that. It was 
Hormozd who promoted him, who lifted him up above the sun’s sphere. Before 
that no one had heard of him, but then he was successful in everything he 
touched. He might act very well toward you now, but in the end he will betray 
you, as he betrayed the Persian king; he has no respect for either kings or God. If 
you send him to the Persian king, you’ ll lift the king’s head above the moon with 
happiness. All Persia and China will then be yours, and you can have your 
palace anywhere you wish.” The emperor was astonished at these words. His 
eyes darkened, and he said, “If you would keep my goodwill, don’t say such 
things. I’m not a suspicious man and I don’t break my word; a man who breaks 
his word has the dust as his shroud.” When Khorad heard this, he knew that his 
mission had failed and that Bahram had encouraged the emperor with hopes of 
conquering Persia: to talk further with him would be a waste of breath. 

Having lost hope of winning over the emperor, he decided to approach the 
empress, and he looked for someone with access to her. He met with a palace 
chamberlain and beguiled him with stories about Khosrow Parviz. Then he said 
to him, “I need to meet with the empress; help me be introduced to her as a 
scribe.” The man replied, “There’s no hope of that; Bahram Chubineh’s her son- 
in-law, and all the power he has here is derived from her. You’re a learned man 
—seek some other way, and tell no one of your secrets.” Khorad-Borzin could 
see no solution to his difficulties. 

There was an old Turk named Qalun, who was held in contempt by the other 
Turks; he wore sheepskins, and lived off whey and millet. Khorad-Borzin 
summoned this man to his fine quarters, where he gave him gold and silver 
coins, clothes, good meals, and entertained him with men of standing and 
importance. Khorad was cautious and patient, sly, and careful, and while he was 
cultivating Qalun he also continued to question the chamberlain of the empress’s 
palace. This man, who visited the empress day and night, was tight-lipped and 
revealed nothing, but one day he said to Khorad, “You’re a scholar, and a 
learned man, and if you had some knowledge of medicine too, and were famous 
for it, you would be as welcome as a new crown on the empress’s head, because 
her daughter is ill.” Khorad replied, “I have some medical knowledge. If you tell 
the empress, I will do my best in this business.” The chamberlain hurried to the 
empress and said that a new doctor had arrived. She replied, “May you live in 
happiness for this news: bring him here, and don’t stand scratching your head, 
get on with it!” He ran to Khorad-Borzin and said, “See that you do this secretly. 
Go to her and don’t tell her your name; just be an amiable doctor.” 


Khorad went to the empress and saw that her daughter was suffering from a 
liver complaint. He asked for pomegranate juice and a particular kind of cress 
that grows on the banks of streams, and with these he tried to bring down the 
fever in her brain. By God’s will, after seven days the girl was well again, and as 
resplendent as the new moon. The empress brought a purse of gold coins from 
her treasury and five lengths of gold cloth. She said, “Take these worthless gifts, 
and ask for anything else you desire.” Khorad replied, “Keep these things for 
now; I shall ask for your help when I need it.” 


Khorad-Borzin Sends Qalun to Bahram Chubineh 

For his part, Bahram had reached Marv, where he had drawn up an army as 
splendid as a pheasant’s feathers. A messenger from the emperor reached him, 
saying, “Let no one go into Persia, because if Khosrow Parviz learns of our 
plans, he’ll change his disposition toward us; have it announced that if anyone 
crosses into Iran without a sealed order from me, I’! have him hacked in two, 
and I swear by God that I won’t let him ransom his life with silver.” 

For three months Khorad watched these secret preparations. Then, sick at 
heart, he summoned Qalun and made much of him. He said, “Every man in the 
world has some kind of secret in his heart. You used to beg door to door in 
China for coarse barley bread and millet, and sheepskins to wear; now your food 
is fine bread and lamb, and you dress in white silk. Look how you were and how 
you are, how men’s curses have tured to congratulations! Now your life is 
drawing to an end; you’ve seen many days and nights, mountains and plains. 
There is something I want you to do. It’s dangerous, and you may gain a throne 
from it, or you may end up in the black earth. I’ve obtained a copy of the 
emperor’s seal, and I want you to travel quickly to Bahram and stay in Marv. 
There you’re to put on your black sheepskin, and take a knife with you. Wait for 
the day of the month that is called Bahram, because he believes that’s an 
inauspicious day for him. I’ve watched him for years, and on that day he never 
wants a crowd of people near him; he hides himself away wrapped in Chinese 
brocade. Say that you’re bringing the great lord Bahram Chubineh a message 
from the emperor’s daughter; see that you keep the knife in your sleeve until he 
calls for you. When you’re admitted say, ‘Her majesty ordered me to whisper 
her message in your ear, so that no one else may hear it.’ And when he asks, 
“What message?’ run to him and plunge the knife into his gut, and then look for 
some way to escape. Whoever hears him cry out will flee from him—to the 
stables, or to look to the carpets or treasury; no one’s going to harm you for this 


murder. And if you are killed for this, you’ve already experienced the good and 
bad that this world has to offer. But it’s likely that no one will pay any attention 
to you, and if you can get away with this, you have bought the world and paid its 
price; King Khosrow Parviz will give you a city, a portion of the world for your 
own.” 

Qalun said, “I'll need a pass to get to him. I’ve reached the age of a hundred; 
how much longer am I going to live in want? My body and soul are ready to 
sacrifice themselves for you, since you’ve looked after me in the days of my 
wretchedness.” When Khorad heard this he hurried to the empress and said to 
her, “The time has come, your majesty, for me to ask for your help. Two of my 
men have been thrown into chains, and I need your assistance to set them free. 
Get me a copy of the emperor’s seal; you’ll be giving me my life back if you do 
this.” The empress said, “He’s in a drunken sleep; I’ll take an impression of his 
seal from his finger.” She asked Khorad for clay, and then she went to her 
husband’s bedside and impressed his seal ring on the clay; this she gave to 
Khorad, who thanked her and handed it over to the old man, Qalun. 


Bahram Chubineh Is Killed by Qalun 

Qalun took the impression of the seal and made his way quickly to Marv. There 
he waited until the day of Bahram, the one Bahram thought of as inauspicious. 
Bahram was alone in his house with a slave, eating a meal of pomegranates, 
apples, and quinces. Qalun went there and said to the doorman, “I’m not a 
wairior or a free man; I’ve been sent by the emperor’s daughter. Her ladyship 
told me a secret to whisper in the king’s ear: by his grace, she is pregnant, and 
unwell. If you could announce me, I’|l give the message to his majesty.” The 
doorman hurried to Bahram and said, “An ugly messenger dressed in a 
sheepskin is here; he says he has a message for your majesty from the emperor’s 
daughter.” Bahram said, “Tell him to show his face in here.” 

Qalun approached and put his head inside the door. Bahram saw a weak old 
man standing there and said, “If you’ve a letter, bring it here.” Qalun replied, 
“Tt’s something she said, that’s all. I don’t want to say it in front of anyone else.” 
Bahram said, “Be quick, then, come and tell me in my ear; don’t stand on 
ceremony.” Qalun went forward with the knife in his sleeve, and then his 
treachery became apparent: he bent as if to whisper in Bahram’s ear and plunged 
the knife into him, and the house was immediately in an uproar. As Bahram 
cried out, “Ah, I’m dead,” people came running to him. He said, “Grab that man! 
Ask him who sent him here.” Everyone who was in the house descended on the 


old man; they broke his legs, and the servants slapped and punched him, but no 
matter how hard they hit him he never opened his lips, though they tormented 
him from midday to midnight. By then his arms were also broken; they flung 
him into the courtyard, and with grief in their hearts they returned to Bahram. 
Blood flowed from his wound; his cheeks were flushed and sighs escaped his 

lips. At that moment his sister Gordyeh came to him, tearing out her hair in her 
anguish. Distracted with grief, she laid her wounded brother’s head against her 
breast and cried out, “You were a knight whose presence spread such fear 

That lions would slink away when you came near; 

Who felled this pillar of the world? Who planned 

This crime and put the dagger in his hand? 

Alas for your ambition and your might, 

Your prowess that put savage lions to flight; 

You bowed to neither God nor king; whose blow 

So cruelly laid your mammoth body low? 

Who wrenched the roots up of this mountainside ? 

Who felled this cypress in its noble pride? 

Who stretched his hand out to this princely crown 

And flung it so contemptuously down? 

Who filled this sea with earth? Who shattered this 

Great rocky peak and made it an abyss? 

We’re strangers here, with no one to protect 

Our lives and wealth, or treat us with respect— 

My lord, I said to you repeatedly, 

‘Do not uproot the tree of loyalty, 

Because if one Sasanian girl remains 

And crowns herself, it will be she who reigns, 

And all the provinces in Persia’s land 

Will willingly submit to her command: 

Their hearts will not betray this family.’ 

But you ignored my words, my lord, and me. 

Regret your actions, and the paths you trod, 

And take your guilty soul from here to God. 

Evil has come to our great house; I weep 

That all our foes are wolves, and we are sheep.” 


When the wounded man heard her words, and understood the wisdom of her 
heart, and saw her face scored by her nails, her hair torn from her head, her heart 
filled with anguish, and her eyes with tears, he spoke sadly and falteringly: 
“Your advice lacked for nothing, but now my life draws to an end. Your advice 
had no effect on me; a demon misled me. There never was a king greater than 
Jamshid—the world lived in awe and hope of him—and yet he was misled by 
demons and made the earth a dark and fearsome place for himself. There was 
King Kavus, who ruled the world and was blessed by fortune, and he too was 
destroyed by a wretched demon; he ascended into the sky to see the turning 
spheres, the moon, and the sun, and you know the evil that came to him because 
of this. A demon misled me too, and I strayed from righteousness. I regret the 
evil I have done, but I trust that God will pardon me. Thus was it written on my 
forehead; why should I grieve for old sorrows again? The waters rise above my 
head, and all my joys and sorrows are as so much wind. Thus was it written, and 
what had to be came to pass, neither more nor less. I remember the words of 
advice you gave me. They are like jeweled earrings in my ears, but now that 
justice and injustice come to an end for me, do not repeat those words any more. 
Turn your face toward God, trust that fortune will smile again for you. The only 
friend you have against evil is God; speak with no one of either sorrow or joy. 
This is the portion I have had in the world, this and no more; now it has come to 
an end, and I must depart.” 

Then he said to Yalan-Sineh, “I hand the army over to you; pray for good 
fortune. Look after my virtuous sister; there is no finer advisor in the world than 
she is. Don’t be separated from one another, stay always together. Don’t remain 
in this enemy land; I have traveled here and am sickened by it. Go immediately 
to Khosrow Parviz; tell him your story and hear what he says. If he forgives you, 
have only him as the sun and moon of your lives. Build me a tomb in Persia, and 
destroy the palace I made for myself at Rey. I undertook so much for the 
emperor of China, and I had no thanks for it; this was not a just reward for my 
pains, that he should send some devil to kill me. Thus has it always been for the 
Persians; there has always been some evil demon guiding them.” 

Bahram had a scribe come and write a letter on silk. He said, “Tell the 
emperor: ‘Bahram has gone; he has gone wretchedly and in sorrow, and with his 
ambitions thwarted.’ Write, ‘Look after those I leave behind and save them from 
their enemies, since I never did you any harm, and sought only righteousness 
and wisdom on your behalf.’” Then he spoke at length to his sister, first pressing 


her beloved head against his chest, then putting his mouth to her ear; in this 
fashion, his eyes filled with blood and he gave up his soul. 

Everyone there wept bitterly for him, and their hearts were filled with 
anguish. His sister was loud in her laments, going over in her mind all he had 
said to her, and her heart was split in two with grief. They constructed a narrow 
coffin of silver and put a muslin undershirt on him, then wrapped his warlike 
body in brocade. Lastly they sprinkled camphor over the body until his head was 
hidden beneath it. 


horad escaped back to Iran, where he was warmly welcomed by Khosrow 

Parviz. The emperor of China wished to honor Bahram Chubineh’s 
memory by proposing marriage to his sister Gordyeh, and he sent a letter to her 
to this effect. 


Gordyeh Consults with Her Advisors and Flees from Marv 

This young, wise woman sat and deliberated with her advisors. She said, “A new 
proposal has come to me, and it will always be remembered in my heart. The 
emperor of China has asked for my hand in the most ornate language. He has no 
faults; he is a great king, a brave man, and the lord of Turan. But whenever the 
Turks and Persians have tried to ally themselves in this way, the result has been 
sorrow and trouble. Look at Seyavash and Afrasyab; what did Seyavash gain 
except exposure to the burning sun? No mother ever bore such a fine young 
man, and yet he was destroyed. And what did Seyavash’s son do but raise the 
dust of battle over Iran and Turan? We must arrange matters so that we flee in 
secret from these Turks to Persia. I have been worried about this for some time 
and have written a letter to Gerdui, asking him to intercede for us with Khosrow 
Parviz, and to tell him all that we’ve suffered.” 

Everyone there said, “You are our mistress, an iron mountain cannot make 
you quail, we will follow wherever you lead. You are more clever than a wise 
man, more intelligent than a knowledgeable vizier. We are all your servants and 
yours to command, and we will support you in your response to the emperor’s 
request.” She reviewed her troops, and had money made ready. She watched the 
army as it passed before her and chose one thousand one hundred and sixty men, 


champions who would not desert even if each faced ten enemies. She paid them 
and then returned to her house, where she said to the army commanders, “Once a 
man has decided on a journey his heart should be steadfast through good and bad 
fortune. He does not fear the might of the enemy, even if severed heads rain 
down on him from the clouds. We are strangers in Turan; we have no friends or 
allies here, we are weak and helpless among these Chinese noblemen. We must 
travel in darkness when our enemies are bewildered by sleep. Don’t be anxious 
about the journey, even if a Chinese army attacks us, for surely their chieftains 
will come after us with their heavy maces. And if they come, stand together and 
give blows as good as those you receive. If any of you are not with me in this, 
you can stay here.” 

With one voice they replied, “We are your servants, and we will not turn 
aside from your commands.” Then they prepared for battle against the Chinese 
forces; Yalan-Sineh, Mehr, and Izad-Goshasp mounted their horses and said, “It 
is better to die with honor than to live with the Chinese triumphing over us.” 
Meanwhile Gordyeh visited the camel caravans and asked to see camels paraded 
before her; she chose three thousand of them and loaded them with their 
baggage. When night fell Gordyeh mounted her horse; she sat like a proud 
walrior, grasping a mace in her hand. Her horse was covered with splendid 
barding, and she wore armor and a helmet and a sword at her side. Her army 
rode forward like the wind, through the dark night and the bright day. 


The Emperor Sends Tovorg After Gordyeh: She Kills Him 
Many of the Persian soldiers threw themselves on the mercy of the Chinese 
emperor. His brother Tovorg came to the emperor and said, “You are a warlike 
lord; though many Persians have appealed to us for quarter, their army is making 
its way to Iran. If they escape, this will shame you forever, and your soldiers and 
people will laugh at you.” The Chinese emperor’s face clouded with fury and he 
said, “Hurry, and get an army together; see how far they’ve gone. When you 
catch up with them, don’t use force at first, but try to see what persuasive talk 
will do. They don’t know how we go about these things; it may be that you can 
break their determination by talk. Speak kindly to them, make much of them, 
treat them respectfully and chivalrously. But if one of them should attack you, 
then play the man and don’t hesitate to fight: make Marv their graveyard and its 
earth as bright as a pheasant’s feathers with their blood.” 

Tovorg set off with six thousand Turkish cavalry and on the fourth day 
caught up with the Persians. When their lionhearted leader saw them, she felt no 


anxiety. She hurried over to the leader of the caravan of camels and had the 
baggage placed behind the troops, and then inspected the plain where it was 
likely that a battle would be fought. She donned her brother’s armor and 
mounted a high-stepping charger. The two armies drew up their forces, face to 
face, and every man there was ready to sacrifice his life. Tovorg, whom the 
emperor referred to as an old wolf, was at the head of his men, and he called out 
to the Persians: “Isn’t that noble woman somewhere in your ranks?” Because 
Gordyeh was dressed in heavy armor, Tovorg did not recognize her, and once 
again he called out, “Where in this company shall I find the sister of the 
murdered king? I need to talk with her, both about the days that are gone by and 
about new matters.” Gordyeh replied, “I am the person you’re looking for, and 
I’m ready to ride my horse against a ravening lion.” 

When Tovorg heard her, and saw her seated on her warhorse, her mien as 
threatening as a lion’s, he was astonished and said, “The emperor has chosen 
you from all his realm, so that you will be a reminder to him of that great knight 
Bahram. He said that if you listen to his words he will reward you handsomely. 
He said to me, ‘Hurry to her, and tell her that if she is not pleased with my offer 
then I can change my mind. Talk to her and come to an agreement with her, and 
only if she won’t accept your advice should you detain her.’” 

Gordyeh said, “Let us move aside from the main body of the army. There I’ Il 
answer everything you’ve said.” Tovorg came forward from his troops, to where 
the valiant warrior stood. When she saw that he was alone, this resourceful 
woman glared at him from beneath her dark helmet. “You saw Bahram; you 
admired him as a horseman and a warrior,” she said. “He was a mother and a 
father to me, but his days have come to an end. Now I shall test your mettle and 
fight against you, then, if you think I’m ready for a husband tell me, and we’ |1 
see if there is a husband who pleases me.” She urged her horse forward, and 
Izad-Goshasp rode behind her. She lunged with her lance at Tovorg’s waist, and 
split the fastenings of his armor, piercing his body. Yalan-Sineh led her troops in 
a general attack, and the Chinese army was thrown into confusion; many were 
killed, or hurled to the ground, or wounded. The Persians pursued them for two 
parasangs, and few of them remained mounted; the plain was like a river of 
blood, with headless bodies and others sprawling in the dust. 

After her victory she crossed into Persia, and there wrote a letter to her 
brother Gerdui, explaining all that had happened to Bahram and herself. 


Gostahm Revolts Against Khosrow Parviz and Proposes Marriage to 
Gordyeh 

At this time Khosrow Parviz sent a messenger into Khorasan and said to him, 
“Speak with no one on your journey, but go straight to the lord of the marches, 
Gostahm, and say that he is to come to me as soon as he reads my letter.” When 
the messenger reached Khorasan he went to Gostahm’s court and repeated the 
king’s message. But knowing that Khosrow Parviz was young and bloodthirsty, 
when Gostahm received this order he gathered his forces together and went to 
cities ruled by men of authority, visiting Sari, Amol and Gorgan. In a drunken 
rage the king killed Gostahm’s brother, Banduy, and when Gostahm heard about 
this, he bit his hand, dismounted from his horse, tore at his clothes, and heaped 
dust on his head. He knew that the king wished to destroy him, in revenge for his 
part in the death of the king’s father, Hormozd. He rode like the wind, lamenting 
and mourning, to the forest of Narvan, gathering men as he went. Near the 
mountains at Amol he hid his army in the woods and began a series of raids on 
the area. Wherever there were men without work, he gave them bread, and they 
joined with him. Whenever he heard that the king’s troops were nearby, he 
attacked and destroyed them. 

Meanwhile Gerdui went to Khosrow Parviz and told him of his sister 
Gordyeh’s exploits, and of how she had defeated the emperor’s forces at Marv. 
Gostahm too heard that Bahram’s days had come to an end, and that Gordyeh 
had left China’s savage ruler and defeated his forces in battle. Gostahm led his 
forces out to welcome her, and when she heard of this, Gordyeh and her chief 
advisors set off from Amui. When he saw her troops in the distance, Gostahm 
urged his horse ahead of the main body of his men. He came before Gordyeh 
lamenting for Bahram, and then told her of his grief for Banduy, wiping his tears 
away with the sleeve of his robe. He saw Yalan-Sineh and Izad-Goshasp, and as 
he wept he dismounted from his horse. He told them how the king had killed 
Banduy, and how evil days had befallen him. He said, “It was as though the king 
had forgotten that he is the son of Banduy’s sister, and that Banduy had shed his 
own blood for him. He cut off Banduy’s hands and feet, just as one would expect 
from a man of his nature. What hopes can you have of such a man? He will do 
worse than this to you and your friends, and meat will be cheap in the town 
when he butchers you. As soon as he sees Yalan-Sineh in the distance he’Il be 
eager for revenge, because you were Bahram’s commander, and it was through 
him you became powerful in the world. Whoever knows Khosrow Parviz avoids 
him; the best thing for him is a sharp knife at his throat! But join with me, and 


we’ ll plan something.” Hoping to save themselves from harm, all those who 
heard him accepted his suggestion. Then he spoke earnestly to Gordyeh about 
Bahram’s exploits, and at his words she softened, and many thoughts filled her 
mind. All of her men went over to Gostahm, and hope brightened their dark 
forebodings. 

One day Gostahm said to Yalan-Sineh, “What would this woman say to being 
married?” Yalan-Sineh replied, “I’ll prepare her mind for the idea.” Seeking out 
Gordyeh, he said, “I know the world, and I have seen you are a wise woman. It 
was right that you put off the emperor and chose to come back to Persia. What 
do you think of Gostahm as a husband? He’s the king’s uncle, and a powerful 
commander.” Gordyeh answered, “If I take a Persian husband, my family won’t 
die out.” Yalan-Sineh gave her to Gostahm, who was a fine warrior, and of noble 
lineage. Gostahm thought her as sweet as a fresh apple, and in his good fortune 
he had no suspicion of disaster. His days were renewed in fighting against the 
armies the king sent, and as they were defeated his confidence increased. 


Gostahm Is Killed by Gordyeh 

As time passed the king became more alarmed by Gostahm. One day he burst 
out to Gerdui, “Gostahm has married Gordyeh; her warriors went over to him, 
and I think they did it on her advice. One of my informants has come from Amol 
and told me of everything they’d kept hidden.” He talked in this way until night 
fell, and men’s eyes grew weary, tired out by his words. As the servants brought 
candles and wine he cleared the hall of strangers and sat alone with his advisor, 
Gerdui. The two of them talked over the business of Gordyeh at length, and 
Khosrow said, “I’ve sent any number of armies against Amol, and the men have 
either been killed or returned wounded and complaining about their misfortunes. 
I can only see one solution to this, because so far my plans have weakened the 
crown and throne. When Bahram Chubineh forgot his duty, Gordyeh always 
supported us. I’ve an idea, but don’t spread it abroad. I must write a letter to 
Gordyeh, one that’s as beguiling as a stream of wine in the garden of paradise. 
I’ll say to her, ‘I shall be your friend everywhere and in every way. For a long 
time my tongue has not revealed the secrets of my heart, but now it’s time to 
speak out, and Gerdui is my confidant in this. Find some means to get rid of that 
wretched miscreant Gostahm; if you can put him beneath a gravestone, my heart 
and household are yours. When you have done this I’ll give provinces to your 
army and your companions, everyone you wish, and they will rule in those lands. 
You will have the golden chamber in my women’s apartments, and all my desire 
for vengeance will be at an end. I swear I will do these things; I will add more 
oaths to this oath, and if I break my word, may all my alliances fail.’” 

Gerdui responded, “Long may you flourish, as shining as Venus in the sign of 
Virgo! You know that, compared with your life, I set no value on my soul and 
children, or my land and friends, precious though they are to me. I’ll send 
someone with this letter to Gordyeh and make her dark soul bright again. I shall 
send my own wife, and this will allay any suspicions; this is a woman’s work, 
especially a clever woman’s. The more I consider this, the more I see the 
message must be sent to my sister. This matter will soon be over with, and to 
your advantage; we must do neither less nor more than you have said.” 

Khosrow was overjoyed when he heard this, and all his worries disappeared 
like the wind. He asked that paper and ink made from musk be brought from the 
treasury, and then he wrote a letter as lovely as a garden, as a rose whose petals 
are like the beloved’s cheeks. It was filled with promises and oaths, adulation 
and advice, and when the ink on the greeting had dried, the letter was sealed 


with black musk imprinted with the name of King Khosrow Parviz. Gerdui also 
wrote a letter filled with advice and other matters; the king’s letter was placed 
inside his, and the two were wrapped in silk. His resourceful wife heard all these 
words, took the package, and rode to the forest of Narvan as one woman bearing 
a message to another. 

Gordyeh’s face lit up like the springtime to see her. They talked about 
Bahram for a while and tears dropped from their eyes. Then the messenger 
handed over her husband’s letter, with the king’s hidden inside it. When this 
lionhearted woman saw the king’s missive it was as if she saw the moon before 
her. She smiled and said, “If someone has five friends, this will be no trouble.” 
She kept the letter secret from the court, but read it to five of her confidants, who 
took one another’s hands and swore to aid her. She hid the five in her sleeping 
apartments, and when night came she extinguished the lights and placed her 
hand over her husband’s mouth. The five accomplices rushed to the bedside and 
struggled with the man, who was drunk, until finally they suppressed his cries 
and smothered him. The town was soon in an uproar, and fires were lit in the 
streets. When she heard the noise, this intrepid woman put on her Byzantine 
armor; she called her Persians to her in the darkness and told them she had killed 
Gostahm. Then she showed them the king’s message and encouraged them to be 
of good heart. Her men acclaimed her for what she had done and scattered 
jewels on the letter. 


Gordyeh’s Letter to Khosrow Parviz 

This fearless woman asked for ink and a pen case, and sat with her advisors. She 
wrote a letter to the king concerning his enemies and allies. She began with 
praise of those who cleanse their hearts of vengeance and continued, “The deed 
that the king commanded has been accomplished, and all that his allies would 
wish has come to pass. Gostahm’s forces are in disarray, by the grace of the 
world’s king. What orders have you for me now; what will you demand of your 
slave?” 

When the letter reached Khosrow, his approval of Gordyeh flourished again. 
He summoned an eloquent messenger, one who knew all the ancient stories, and 
wrote a letter as beautiful as a painting by the Chinese master Arzhang. In it he 
summoned her to his court and called her the moon’s diadem. The messenger 
came to Gordyeh like the wind and told her what Khosrow had said, and when 
that lionhearted woman read the king’s letter she was like a rose that blossoms in 


springtime. She mustered her troops and gave them their provisions, and at 
daybreak the baggage was loaded. 

A great company of men came out to greet her, and when she reached the 
court she found the king’s heart filled with anxiety to please her. She and her 
chieftains brought before him innumerable gold coins and jewels, brocades 
woven with gold, crowns and belts, golden thrones and golden crowns, and all 
these were counted out to the king’s treasurer. The king looked at this elegant 
cypress, whose face was as lovely as the spring, and whose walk was like that of 
a pheasant, and had her conducted to the harem, where she was a given a rank 
higher than all his other women. Then he sent for her brother, his vizier, Gerdui, 
and asked for and obtained her hand in marriage, according to the rites of their 
religion. He rewarded her companions with robes of honor, as well as gold and 
silver, and every kind of wealth. 


The Destruction of the City of Rey 

Many long days passed, and Gordyeh wanted for nothing. One day, when 
Khosrow Parviz was drinking wine with the wise men of the court, and with his 
noblemen and warriors, a goblet was discovered with the name of Bahram 
written on it. The king ordered that it be thrown away, and everyone cursed 
Bahram, the goblet, and the man who had brought it there. He said, “Let 
Bahram’s town, Rey, be trampled beneath war elephants’ feet, its inhabitants 
driven out, and let it be turned to a wasteland.” His vizier said to the king, “You 
are a living memorial of the Kayanid kings, but consider, Rey is a great town 
and it would be wrong for it to be trampled beneath elephants’ feet. God would 
not approve of this, and neither would the wise men of the world.” The king 
replied, “Then the place needs an ill-natured governor, an incompetent fool, 
someone who is ignorant and foul-mouthed.” A courtier called Bahman said, “If 
the king wishes, we will look for such an incompetent, but we need some kind of 
guide.” Khosrow said, “He should have red hair, a crooked nose, and an ugly 
face; he must be an infamous man, with a sallow complexion, someone who’s 
malevolent, short in stature, his heart filled with anguish, base in his nature, 
vengeful and with a lying tongue; his eyes should be green and squinting, he 
should have big teeth, and he should lope along the road like a wolf.” 

The priests were astonished to hear Khosrow talk in this way, and wondered 
how they would find such a man. People searched the world, inquiring among 
both rich and poor, and then one day a man came to the king and said, “I saw 
someone of this description on the road. If the king commands me, I shall bring 


him here, and he can be sent to Rey.” The king gave orders that the man be 
brought to the court, and when he entered everyone laughed at his appearance. 
Khosrow said to him, “Well, fool, tell us about how evil you are.” The man 
replied, “I never stop doing evil things, and there’s not an atom of wisdom in 
me. Tell me to do one thing and I’Il do another, and I’1I fill men’s bodies and 
souls with anguish. I live off lies and I’m incapable of doing good.” The king 
said to him, “And may your evil star keep you that way.” 

His name was written down in the court records as the governor of Rey, and 
this shameless man rose to greatness because he was so ugly. He was given a 
motley army and went off to his new post, taking his evil reputation with him. 
When he arrived in Rey he banished all shame from his heart. He gave orders 
that all the gutters on the roofs be torn down, and he took pleasure in watching 
this done. Then he had all the cats killed, which annoyed the city leaders. 
Everywhere he went he had a herald go in front of him shouting, “If I see a 
gutter in place, or a cat in a house, I’1] burn the house down and stone its 
inhabitants.” He searched everywhere and, if he found as much as one silver 
coin, he made its owner wretched. Mice took over the houses, and people 
despaired of the city. When it rained there were no gutters to carry away the 
downpour, and there was no one to care for the city. And that is how this ugly, 
shameless wretch sent from Khosrow’s court caused a flourishing city to fall into 
ruin. The sun beat down on men’s heads, and all the city was filled with pain and 
anguish, while the world ignored their sufferings. 

This went on until spring and the month of Farvardin, when the land is 
adorned with flowers, the world becomes moist with dew, and the mountains and 
valleys are filled with tulips. The nobility went to their gardens to enjoy 
themselves, and the foothills of the mountains were dotted with deer and sheep. 
When Khosrow opened the gates to his gardens, he saw the fountains were filled 
with doves; he ordered that trumpets be blown, and bowls filled with sweet 
scents were set down there. He and his courtiers sat on the grass and called for 
wine, while they chatted amicably together. Gordyeh brought a little kitten, 
which she had dressed up just like a child. Sitting on a pony, on a gold saddle 
omamented with jewels, the kitten had earrings hanging from its ears, and its 
nails had been painted as red as tulips. Its face was as sweet as springtime; its 
black eyes looked sleepy, because it had drunk some wine. A golden bridle hung 
from the pony, and Gordyeh led the kitten around the garden as if he were a 
child. The king of Persia burst into laughter at this sight, and all his courtiers 


copied him. He said to Gordyeh, “My beauty, what do you want from me? Tell 
me what it is you wish for.” 

This resourceful woman bowed before the king and said, “Great king, give 
me Rey: consider wisely, and free its sorrowful inhabitants’ hearts from their 
grief. Recall that shameless wretch from Rey. Know him for what he is, a 
faithless, evil man. He has driven the cats from their houses and destroyed the 
town’s gutters one by one.” Khosrow laughed at his wife’s words and said, “You 
are as lovely as the moon and strong enough to destroy an army. Recall that 
malevolent wretch, that Ahriman, from Rey.” And so her good fortune grew in 
the shadow of the royal tree. 


hosrow Parviz’s Byzantine wife, Mariam, bore hima son, Shirui. But the 
court astrologers predicted that the country would suffer as a result of this 
child, and that the army would never acclaim him as their leader. 


THE STORY OF KHOSROW AND SHIRIN 


When Khosrow Parviz had been a fearless young man, in the period while his 
father was still alive, he had loved Shirin, and had cherished her more than his 
own sight. In all the world only Shirin pleased him, and he had eyes for no other 
beautiful women, or for the daughters of the nobility. But then his time was 
taken up with traveling about the world, and by his battles with Bahram; he 
seemed to have forsaken his love, and the beautiful Shirin wept day and night for 
him. 


Khosrow Parviz Goes Hunting, Meets with Shirin, and Takes Her to 
His Harem 
One day Parviz decided to go hunting, and the expedition was arranged as had 
been customary with former kings. Three hundred horses with golden bridles 
were led out; there were one thousand six hundred loyal footmen carrying 
javelins, and one thousand four hundred more who carried staves and swords 
and wore brocade beneath their armor. Following them came five hundred 
falconers, with sparrow hawks, merlins, and falcons, and then three hundred 
horsemen leading cheetahs. There were also leopards and lions, whose mouths 
had been muzzled with gold chains, and a hundred dogs with golden leashes, for 
running down deer. After them came two thousand musicians, all mounted on 
camels and wearing golden crowns; they had prepared songs to celebrate the 
hunt. There were thrones, tents, and pavilions, loaded on camels, as well as stalls 
for the animals. There were two hundred slaves with censers that burned aloes 
wood and ambergris, together with two hundred young servants carrying narcissi 
and crocuses, and they carried these so that the wind bore their scent to Parviz. 
In front of them went men who scattered water in which musk had been mixed, 
so that the wind would not suddenly stir up the dust and disturb the king. 

When Shirin heard that this entourage was approaching, with the king at its 
head, she put on a golden dress scented with musk, and over it a surcoat of red 
Byzantine brocade with a gold ground worked with jewels. She made her cheeks 


the color of pomegranates, and on her head she placed a crown of imperial 
splendor. She went up from her royal chamber onto the roof of her palace, and 
the days of her youth brought her no pleasure. She waited there, with the tears 
trickling down her cheeks, until Khosrow Parviz approached. When she saw the 
king’s face she stood so that he could see her, and she spoke gently to him about 
their former days; her eyes were like narcissi that droop with sorrow, and they 
bathed her cheeks’ rosy color as she wept. Beautiful, and in tears, she 
reproachfully addressed the king: “My lord, my warrior, my king, who lives 

Favored by all that heaven’s fortune gives, 

Where is your love now? Or your tears that I, 

And I alone, could comfort once and dry? 

Where are the endless nights we turned to day 

With tears, and smiles, and amorous sweet play? 

Where are our oaths and promises, and where 

Are all the vows we vowed we’d always share?” 


And as she spoke her tears fell onto her imperial clothes. Tears welled too in 
Khosrow’s eyes, and his face turned as yellow as the sun. He sent a horse with a 
golden bridle for her, and forty reliable Byzantine servants, to accompany her to 
the golden, bejeweled apartments of his harem. 

From there he went to his hunting grounds, taking wine and musicians to 
entertain him, and when he had had his fill of hunting in the plains and hills, he 
set off in high spirits for the city. All the roads and buildings were decorated to 
welcome him, and a confused din of trumpets and songs of welcome resounded 
through the air. He made a royal, imposing figure as he strode into his high 
castle; Shirin came forward from the inner apartments and kissed his feet, the 
ground before him, and his chest. The king turned to his chief priest and said, “I 
want you to think only well of me: marry me to this beautiful woman, and give 
the good news to the world.” Then he married her according to the ancient rites 
that were customary in those days. 


Khosrow Parviz’s Nobles Give Him Counsel 

When the nobility and army learned that Shirin had joined Khosrow Parviz’s 
harem and that this old relationship had been renewed, the city was filled with 
discontent, foreboding, and curses. No one approached Khosrow for three days, 
and when the sun rose on the fourth day Khosrow summoned his nobles to an 
audience with him. He said, “I have not seen you for a few days, and this has 


worried me. I am troubled that something troubles you, and your sorrows fill me 
with anxiety.” When he had finished speaking everyone present held his tongue; 
no one gave him an answer. Then, one by one, they looked at the chief priest, 
who, when he perceived this, stood and addressed Khosrow. “You are just and 
righteous, my lord,” he said. “You became king when you were still a young 
man; you have seen a great deal of both good and evil fortune, and you have 
heard much good and evil in the world, concerning the great and their actions. 
But now the lineage of our nobility has been polluted; our greatness has been 
sullied by this alliance. If the father is pure and the mother is worthless, you 
should realize that purity cannot issue from them. No man seeks righteousness 
from a perverse source, which can only harm righteousness. Our hearts are 
saddened that this vicious demon has become the great king’s consort. Is there 
no other woman in Persia, apart from this one, who pleases the king? If Shirin 
were not present in the king’s harem, his face would shine with righteousness 
everywhere. Your ancestors, who were wise and just men, never heard of such a 
matter.” The chief priest spoke at length, but the King of Kings gave him no 
answer. 

At dawn the next day the court prepared to assemble. One said, “The chief 
priest didn’t know what he was talking about.” Another said, “What he said was 
full of wisdom.” A third remarked, “Today the king will answer him; let’s hope 
he has a good reply ready.” All the counselors made their way into the king’s 
presence, and the nobles took their places there. Then a man came in bearing a 
bowl that glittered like the sun, and he took it to each of the noblemen in turn. 
Warm blood had been poured into the bowl, and he offered it gently to each of 
them, but each man turned his face away. A murmuring spread through the 
assembly and everyone looked at the king, afraid of what he would do. Finally, 
the king said to the Persians gathered there, “Whose blood is this, and why has it 
been placed in this bowl?” The chief priest said, “This blood is polluted, and 
everyone who sees it loathes it.” He picked up the bowl and had it passed from 
hand to hand. Then it was cleansed and made shining again with water, and earth 
was used to scour it. 

When the polluted bowl had been purified and shone again, it was filled with 
wine, with which musk and rose-water were mixed, and it glowed like the sun. 
Khosrow Parviz said to the chief priest, “Is the bowl what it was, or has it 
changed now?” The priest replied, “May your majesty flourish, good has been 
distinguished from evil. At your command what was hellish has become 
heavenly, and you have made what was ugly beautiful.” Khosrow said, “In this 


land Shirin was considered to be like that bowl of polluted blood; but the bowl in 
my harem is now filled with wine; it is my scent that fills her now. Shirin’s 
reputation suffered because of me, and it was because of me that she never 
sought for a partner among the nobility.” All his nobles called down blessings on 
him, saying, “May the earth never be deprived of your reign. Greatness is 
increased by your greatness, and those you ennoble are the earth’s nobility; you 
are our king, priest, and guide, and the very shadow of God on earth.” 


Shirin Kills Mariam; Khosrow Parviz Imprisons Shirui 
Then the king’s magnificence increased, and if before he had shone like the 
moon, he was now as splendid as the sun. He spent all his time with Mariam, the 
daughter of the emperor of Byzantium, and she was his favorite of all the women 
in his harem. Shirin was tormented by this, and her cheeks were always pale 
with jealousy. Finally, she poisoned Mariam, and the Byzantine princess died. 
Shirin did this alone, in secret, and no one was aware of what she had done; and 
a year after Mariam died, Shirin was given the golden apartments in the harem. 
When Mariam’s son, Shirui, was sixteen he had the stature of a thirty-year- 
old: his father brought him teachers, so that he could learn to be an accomplished 
nobleman, and a priest supervised him day and night, according to the king’s 
orders. One day the priest came from the king to the prince and saw that he sat 
idly playing. In front of him lay his book, Kalileh and Demneh, but in his left 
hand the loutish youth held the dried paw of a wolf and in his right a buffalo’s 
horn, and he sat there willfully banging the one against the other. The priest’s 
heart was troubled by this pointless game; he took the wolf’s claw, the buffalo’s 
horn, and the youth’s loutish behavior as a bad omen. He had seen the boy’s 
horoscope, and had heard more details from the vizier and court treasurer, and he 
feared what fate held in store for the prince. He went to the chief priest and said, 
“All the prince cares about is trivial games.” Immediately the chief priest passed 
this on to Khosrow, who was troubled by the report; his cheeks turned sallow at 
the thought of his son, and he brooded on what fate would unfold. He 
remembered the astrologer’s words; his heart was troubled, and his vitals were 
twisted within him. He said, “We must wait to see what the heavens bring forth.” 
By the twenty-third year of the king’s reign Shirui was strong and fully 
grown; he had become refractory and uncontrollable, and Khosrow grew anxious 
about him. The king’s smiling soul was clouded with sorrow, and he had the 
prince confined to his palace, along with his companions and those who sought 
him out for advice; this group came to more than three thousand in all. The place 


was provided with clothes, food, and furnishings, the rooms were decorated 
appropriately, and slaves and servants were there in attendance. The king sent 
wine and limitless gold, and forty men were set to watch over the revelers, who 
passed their time in feasting and pleasure. 


The Tale of the Musician, Barbad 

As time passed the king’s greatness increased, and no one received bad 
treatment at his court. In the twenty-eighth year of his reign news of this reached 
the musician Barbad, who was told, “The king favors musicians, and if you 
compete with his current musician, Sarkesh, he’!l give you a higher rank than 
him.” When he heard this, although he wanted for nothing, ambition flared up in 
him; he traveled from his own country to the king’s court and presented himself 
to the musicians there. When Sarkesh heard him play, he was astonished at the 
newcomer’s skill, and his heart grew dark. He went to the court chamberlain and 
gave him gold and silver and other gifts. He said, “There’s a musician at the 
door who surpasses me in youth and skill: he mustn’t enter Khosrow’s presence, 
because if he does, he’|l be looked on as a novelty and I’|l be thought old- 
fashioned.” The chamberlain agreed to refuse entry to their naive visitor. And so 
when Barbad appeared, he was rudely received. The chamberlain would not 
admit him to the court, and no one came to help him. Despondently he left the 
court gates and, carrying his lute, made his way to the royal garden, where the 
king would go for two weeks of festivities at the New Year. 

The gardener there was named Marduy, and Barbad liked him as soon as he 
saw him. That very day, the two became firm friends, and Barbad said to him, 
“Tt’s as if you’re the soul and I’m the body of one person. I have a favor to ask, 
something that will be easy for you to do. When the world’s king comes to this 
garden, hide me somewhere so that I can see him; I want to watch his face for a 
moment, during the festivities.” Marduy said, “I’ll do it; set your mind at rest.” 

As Khosrow approached the garden, the gardener’s heart glowed with 
excitement. He hurried to Barbad and said, “The king is coming here for the 
celebrations.” Barbad dressed himself all in green and took his lute in his hand, 
ready to sing of glory and battles. He went to where the king was to sit, since a 
new site was selected each spring. There was a green cypress tree there, with 
abundant foliage and branches interlaced like warriors in a battle. Barbad 
climbed this tree and waited for the king to arrive. The king came from his 
palace to the spot that had been prepared for him. A young serving girl with a 
bewitching face gave him a goblet, and the red wine within rendered its crystal 


invisible. At the moment the yellow sun set and purple night came on, Barbad 
took his lute and sang the heroic song he had prepared. Hidden in the tree, he 
sang his beautiful lay, the one we now call “Dad-Afarid,” and the king was 
astonished at the sweetness of his voice. The whole company was amazed, and 
everyone expressed a different opinion as to what was happening. The king 
ordered the company to search the area thoroughly, and they looked high and 
low but came back empty-handed. One experienced man came forward and said, 
“Tt should be no surprise that the king’s good fortune has made even the green 
plants and flowers his musicians: may his head and crown flourish forever!” 

The beautiful serving girl brought another goblet, and as the king took it from 
her, Barbad suddenly struck up another song, “The Heroes’ Battle.” The skillful 
musician sang and Khosrow listened, drinking his wine as the song progressed. 
Then he ordered that the singer be found, and that the garden be turned upside 
down if need be. They searched everywhere in the garden, taking flaming 
torches beneath the trees, but they saw nothing but willows and cypresses and 
pheasants strutting among the flowers. The king asked for another goblet of wine 
and leaned his head forward to listen. Again a song began, accompanied by the 
lute’s sound; it was the one that is called “Green on Green” today, and is used 
for magical incantations. Khosrow Parviz stood to drink to the voice: he asked 
for a goblet that held a deep draught of wine, and he drained the bright liquor in 
one motion. He said, “If this were an angel compounded of musk and ambergris, 
or a demon, he wouldn’t sing these songs, or know how to play the lute in this 
way. Search the garden again, left and right, till you find where he is. I’ II fill his 
mouth and arms with jewels, and make him the chief of my musicians.” 

When Barbad heard the king’s generous words, he came down from the 
branches of the cypress tree, and went forward confidently, in all his glory. He 
approached the king and bowed down, rubbing his face in the dust. Khosrow 
said to him, “What manner of man are you, tell me!” He replied, “Your majesty, 
I am your slave and live in the world only at your command.” Then he told the 
king all that had happened, and of the man who had befriended him. The king’s 
happiness at seeing Barbad was like that of a spring garden in the moonlight, but 
he said to Sarkesh, “You’ve no talent, you’re as bitter as colocynth, and Barbad 
is like sugar. Why did you keep him away from me? Now he’s come, you’ve no 
place in this assembly.” 

Then he drank wine to the sound of Barbad’s voice, draining his goblet of its 
ruby contents, until his head became sleepy, and he filled Barbad’s mouth with 


pearls of the first water. And so Barbad became the king’s musician, and a 
respected man among the country’s nobility. 


Now Barbad’s tale is done: I wish for you 
Good fortune and good friends in all you do. 


Khosrow Parviz Becomes Unjust 

Despite his splendid throne, the great palace he built at Ctesiphon, and all his 
imperial glory, the world’s king was dissatisfied, and he raised dust clouds of 
strife over Iran and Turan. This king who had been so just became unjust, and he 
rejoiced in the injustice of his inferiors. 

There was a man called Farrokhzad, the son of Azarmegan, who became 
Khosrow’s chamberlain. He was always frowning, and he acted malevolently 
toward those under his control, stealing people’s wealth and pitting them against 
one another. He set himself ever new tasks, and all his efforts went to gathering 
ever more wealth. Men’s former blessings turned to curses, and they said that the 
ruler who had been like a sheep had become a savage wolf. Since the populace 
had neither water nor bread nor any means of support, they fled from Persia to 
enemy lands, and the land was filled with curses against all those who had any 
part in this oppression. 

And then there was Goraz, a man devoid of virtue, who fulfilled all Khosrow 
Parviz’s dreams and desires, and guarded the frontier against Byzantium. His 
mind was a demon’s, unjust and shameless, and when the once-just king became 
unjust, he was the first to betray Persia. The next was Farrokhzad, Khosrow 
Parviz’s favorite and his chamberlain, who would let no one near the king. When 
the king’s days were numbered, Farrokhzad’s heart became corrupt: he allied 
himself with the wily Goraz, and their plot spread from province to province. 
Goraz wrote to the emperor of Byzantium and stirred up evil desires in him. He 
wrote: “Rise now, and take Persia; if you do, I will be the first to come to your 
aid.” As soon as he read this, the emperor mustered an army and set off with it 
toward the Persian frontier. 


The Army Deserts Khosrow Parviz and Frees Shirui 

When the king heard of this serious development, he dismissed it as of no 
importance. He knew it was Goraz’s doing, and that he had been in secret 
communication with the Byzantine emperor. Earlier he had summoned Goraz to 
the court but Goraz had made excuses and acted as if the king could not enforce 
his orders, even though he was afraid of him. The king sat in council with the 
Persian nobles, and they considered various ways to rid themselves of this 
problem. Then the king had a clever notion: he wrote a letter to Goraz saying, 
“T’m delighted with what you have done, and have praised you before our 
nobles. When you receive this letter may it brighten your dark spirits. Wait with 


your forces where you are until I advance, and with one army on this side and 
another on that, we shall trap the Byzantine emperor between us. We’! bring 
him back as a prisoner to Persia, and take all his army into captivity.” 

Then the king chose a cunning courtier, someone who could act as a spy, and 
said to him, “See that one of the Byzantine scouts catches sight of you and 
questions you. Then he’lI take you to the emperor, or to their army’s 
commander. When you’re asked who you are, refuse to answer, then say, ‘I’m 
just a poor man trying to make a living, and I’ve traveled a long way to deliver 
this letter to Goraz.’ Tie the letter to your right arm, and if they take it from you, 
so much the better.” 

The man tied the letter as instructed and left the court. As he approached the 
Byzantine marches, a man caught sight of him and took him, with his face 
covered in dust, his cheeks sallow, and his lips purple, before the emperor. The 
emperor addressed him, “Where is Khosrow Parviz? You had better tell us the 
truth!” The poor man mumbled in a bewildered way and hung his head in fear. 
The emperor said, “Search this malevolent, ill-spoken wretch.” They found the 
letter and opened it, and then looked for someone in the area who could read 
Pahlavi correctly. When a scribe was found who was able to read it, the 
emperor’s face turned black as pitch. He said to himself, “This was a trap set by 
Goraz; I was marching straight into an ambush. This king with his army of three 
hundred thousand men and innumerable war elephants wanted to corner me: 
may his life end in darkness and sorrow!” And he withdrew his forces, forgetting 
all thoughts of conquest. 


G oraz and Farrokhzad then made common cause and encouraged the army 
to revolt against Khosrow Parviz. 


Farrokhzad knew that the king was aware of his treachery, and he did not dare 
approach the throne. He waited by the door and sounded people out, trying to 
win allies for when the army would declare itself against the king. He told his 
ideas to everyone and won many people over, saying that another man should 
occupy the throne, because Khosrow Parviz had forfeited farr, glory, and good 
fortune. 


An experienced old man in Farrokhzad’s employ said to his master, “The 
king blames you for the army’s disaffection. You shouldn’t proceed any further 
in this matter until another king is available, otherwise the country will go to 
rack and ruin. We must consider his sons—which of them has the dignity for this 
position and will cause the fewest problems? Then we must place him on the 
throne in triumph and pour gold dinars over his crown as is customary. Since 
Shirui is his eldest son, he is the obvious choice, even though he’s imprisoned at 
the moment.” 

Everyone expressed the same opinion, and not many days passed before the 
dust of Tokhvar’s intrepid army rose up. Farrokhzad went out along the road to 
greet him and his numerous troops, and the two conversed for a long time. 
Farrokhzad went over the injustices that the king had committed and then said, 
“The army must act with chivalry and discretion and install a new king.” The 
commander replied, “I’m not a man for talk, but when I fight I make the world a 
hard place for my enemies. When this king was young, he was loved by 
champions and lords of the marches alike, but may no man make his days as 
dark as this king has done. He lost everything when he became unjust and 
rejoiced in the injustice of his inferiors.” 

At this Farrokhzad chose Tokhvar, from all the Persians, as his accomplice 
and said to him, “Now we must go to where those poor wretches are imprisoned 
and fearlessly free Prince Shirui, who is young, brave, and ambitious. His jailer 
is an army commander, and he and six thousand cavalry veterans keep him and 
his companions under surveillance.” Tokhvar replied, “I take no account of this 
commander. If Khosrow Parviz’s luck revives, every champion in Persia will 
find himself on a gibbet or imprisoned in a pit; no one will escape injury.” 
Having said this he urged his horse forward, and it leaped to the fray like 
lightning. The commander set to guard Shirui came out to oppose him, but he 
was driven back and killed in the battle. Still in his armor, Tokhvar went straight 
to the place where Shirui was confined and called out to him. Shirui knew why 
this proud warrior had come, and when he saw his face glowing after the battle, 
the young man’s heart beat faster with anxiety. Weeping, he said, “Where is 
Khosrow Parviz? It’s not your business to set me free.” Tokhvar said to the 
prince, “If you’re a man don’t stay here like a lion clawing at its cage. If you’re 
not with us, then declare yourself and withdraw. If we lose one out of sixteen 
brothers, that’s of no importance; there are still fifteen more of you. All of the 
others are worthy to rule, and the throne will rejoice in their reign.” Shirui wept 
in bewilderment, uncertain whether to set foot outside of the building or not. 


Khosrow Learns of the Army’s Defection 

Meanwhile Farrokhzad acted as court chamberlain and admitted no one to the 
king’s presence, so that he would not hear of what was going on. When the tent 
of the sun was tattered, and noblemen went to their sleeping quarters, 
Farrokhzad summoned the city’s sentries and all those who had authority over 
them. Confidently they came to the king’s court, where Farrokhzad said to them, 
“The cry of the watchmen must be different tonight from last night. As each 
watch of the night goes by, all the watchmen must cry out in the name of 
Qobad.” They agreed: “We will do this and drive the name of Parviz from our 
minds.” 

When night’s black tent was pitched, the watchmen’s cries went up from the 
city and bazaar, and all of them called in the name of Qobad. The king was 
sleeping in the darkness of the night, and Shirin was next to him in his bed. 
When she heard the cries, she was troubled and her heart beat faster. She said, 
“Your majesty, what can be happening? Listen! We must talk.” The king woke 
at the sound of her voice and said in his irritation, “Your face is as lovely as the 
moon, but why are you talking when I’m asleep?” Shirin replied, “Open your 
ears, listen to what the watchmen are crying!” Khosrow heard their voices and 
his face grew pale as fenugreek. He said, “Three watches of the night have gone 
by, and now you will learn the truth of the astrologers’ words. When this brat 
was born I secretly named him Qobad; publicly his name was Shirui, but in 
private, Qobad. Under cover of the night’s darkness we must make for China, or 
Machin, or Makran; we must flee secretly, and ask for soldiers from the Chinese 
emperor.” But his star was waning, and this talk of flight was empty chatter. 
Tricks did not help him in the night’s darkness; he had underestimated the 
seriousness of what was afoot. He said to Shirin, “My time has come, and those 
who hate us have triumphed over our plans.” She replied, “May you thrive 
forever, safe from your enemies’ hands. Think of some ruse in your wisdom; 
God forbid that your enemies prevail. As soon as dawn breaks they are sure to 
come to the palace.” 

Then the king asked for armor, two Indian swords, a Byzantine helmet, a 
quiver full of arrows, and a golden shield from his treasury, as well as a slave 
who would fight in his defense. In the darkness he made his way to his garden, 
just at the time when the crow wakes up from sleep. Among the trees there was 
no space for a couch: he hung his golden shield from a branch, in an area where 
few men came. He sat among the narcissi and crocuses, with an Indian sword 
placed firmly beneath his knee. As the sun lifted its glittering lance, the king’s 


malevolent enemies made their way to the palace. They went from room to room 
but found no sign of the king; they looted his treasuries and gave no thought to 
his suffering. 


Khosrow Parviz Becomes His Son’s Prisoner 

Khosrow stayed in the garden, in the shade of a tall tree, and by midday he had 
grown hungry. There was an under gardener working there who had never seen 
the king’s face. The sun-like sovereign said to him, “Cut a jeweled link from my 
belt: there are five gold bosses on each link. Take the link to the bazaar; buy me 
some meat and some bread with it, and see that you go by an unfrequented 
road.” Now, for a man who knew about such things, the jewels on the link were 
worth thirty thousand gold coins. 

The gardener hurried off to a baker’s shop and tried to buy bread with the 
gold link. The baker said, “I don’t know what this is worth, but I’m not letting 
you go!” The two went together to a jeweler and asked him to put a value on the 
link. When this knowledgeable man saw the piece, he said, “But who would dare 
to buy this? This is a piece from Khosrow’s treasury; each year a hundred new 
ones of this kind are made. Who did you steal this from? Did you snatch it from 
a slave while he was asleep?” The three of them then took the gold and jewels to 
Farrokhzad, who immediately took this link severed from a golden belt to Prince 
Shirui and showed it to him. Shirui addressed the gardener: “If you don’t tell me 
where the owner of this is, I’1l cut your head off, and the heads of all your family 
too.” 

He replied, “Your majesty, he’s in the garden, dressed in armor, with a bow 
in his hand. His stature is like a cypress tree’s, and his face is like the spring; he 
seems a prince in every way. All the garden shines with his splendor, and in his 
armor he’s like a shining sun. His golden shield hangs from a branch, and a slave 
stands in front of him, bow in hand. He cut this link and gave it to me, and said, 
‘Run and bring me bread and food from the bazaar.’ I ran here from his side just 
a moment ago.” Shirui knew that this was Khosrow, whose appearance was 
unique. Three thousand horsemen went like the wind from the palace to the 
stream’s bank. When Khosrow saw them in the distance he quailed but drew his 
sword for combat. The soldiers saw the king’s face, and they turned back, 
weeping. One by one they went before Farrokhzad, and each told the same story 
saying, “We are slaves and he is Khosrow: misfortune is a new thing in this 
king’s life. No one would oppose him, not so much as by a cold sigh, whether in 
a garden or on the field of battle.” Farrokhzad took a number of guards from the 


palace and went to the king. He went forward alone and said to Khosrow: “If the 
king will grant me audience, and forgive me for what has happened, I will come 
and explain the situation. If not, I shall go back to the palace.” Khosrow said, 
“Say what you have to say; you’re neither my comforter nor my enemy.” 

Farrokhzad said, “Look more wisely on what’s happening. You could kill a 
thousand warriors but finally you’Il tire of combat. All the land of Persia is 
against you; all men are united in their enmity for you. Come, and see what the 
heavens will show; it may be that their longing for revenge will turn to 
clemency.” Khosrow replied, “You are right, this has always been my fear, that 
unworthy men should come and lord it over me and make me the butt of their 
ridicule.” Listening to Farrokhzad’s words, the king had grown sick at heart, and 
he remembered that in earlier times an astrologer had said to him “Your death 
will occur between two mountains, and at the hands of a slave, far from other 
men. One mountain will be of silver, and another of gold, and you will sit 
between the two with your heart trembling in fear. The heavens will be gold 
above you, and the earth will be of iron, and fortune will be against you.” “And 
now,” Khosrow thought, “this iron armor is like the earth for me, my shield is 
the golden heavens; and the treasures that have been piled in these gardens, 
which so delighted my heart, are the two mountains. My days have come to an 
end. Where now is my star that lit the world with splendor, and my power and 
happiness that made my name more exalted than crowns?” 

They brought an elephant before him; his soul was darkened by grief as he sat 
in the saddle and was escorted from the garden. He called out in Pahlavi from 
the elephant’s back, “My treasure, even if you are Khosrow’s enemy, do not 
make common cause with those who are against me. Today I am in the clasp of 
Ahriman, and you were no help to me in my distress; stay hidden, and show your 
face to no one.” Then Qobad ordered his men to treat him well, to have him 
taken to Ctesiphon, and installed in his vizier’s palace, where Galinush would 
watch over him with a thousand cavalry. When the turning heavens brought his 
reign to an end, Khosrow Parviz had ruled for thirty-eight years: this happened 
in the month of Azar, on the day of Dey, at the time when fires are lit, fowls 
roasted, and wine drunk. 

Then Qobad came forward and placed the crown on his head and sat in peace 
and prosperity on the throne. From all of Persia the army paid him homage, and 
he gave them a year’s pay from the king’s treasury. He reigned for no more than 
seven months; you can call him a king if you wish, or something worthless. But 


this is the treacherous world’s way, and you should not look on it with trusting 
eyes. 


Barbad’s Lament for Khosrow Parviz 
When Barbad heard that the king had been unjustly forced to quit the throne and 
that he was now powerless, he traveled from Jahrom to Ctesiphon, his eyelashes 
wet with tears, his heart swollen with grief. He came to the palace and saw the 
former king, whose once ruddy face was now as pale as fenugreek. He stayed 
with him for a while, and then went weeping to the audience chamber. He 
mourned in Pahlavi, his cheeks sallow with grief, and his heart filled with pain. 
When the king and those who were there in the palace, including the guards, 
heard his lament, they all wept, consumed with the fire of their pity. This is what 
Barbad sang: O great Khosrow, great in your majesty, 

In warlike pride, in magnanimity— 

Where is that greatness now, your high renown, 

Your glory and your throne and royal crown? 

Where is your chivalry, your power, my king 

Who sheltered all the world beneath your wing? 

Where are your wives now, your musicians, all 

The nobles who once thronged your audience hall? 

Where now is Kaveh’s banner, and the lords 

Who flourished in the air their glittering swords? 

Where are your valiant warriors and your priests, 

Where are your hunting parties and your feasts? 

Where is that warlike mien, and where are those Great armies that 

destroyed our country’s foes? 

Where is your armor, wondrous to behold, 

Studded with jewels, fashioned from shining gold? 

Where is Shabdiz, your fiery stallion who 

Galloped with such impatience under you? 

Where are your glorious gold-shod cavalry, 

Whose swords sought out one sheath—the enemy? 

Where is that generous, never-failing store 

Of your largess? Your eagerness in war? 

Where are the camels, horses, elephants, 

Their howdahs, trappings, and magnificence? 

Where is that wise nobility of mind, 


That eloquence, at once adroit and kind? 

Why are you left deprived, in this sad state, 
Who read you this page from the Book of Fate? 
Once you desired a son—to be your friend, 

A prop to your old age—and in the end 

Grief came to you from him: a king’s son gives 
His father strength and shelter while he lives, 
But to the King of Kings this son brought pain 
And his success destroyed his father’s reign. 
Count Persia as a ruin, as the lair 

Of lions and leopards. Look now and despair, 
You were the best of Sasan’s line, no one 

Will ever reign again as you have done, 

And as your seed degenerates, this land 
Degenerates beneath an alien hand. 

It is the shepherd’s fault when wolves descend 
And ravage all the sheep he should defend. 
God keep your soul, and may each enemy 

Of yours die gibbeted in agony! 

I swear by God above, my noble king, 

By Mehregan, by New Year and the spring, 
That if my hand plays any song again 

I should be stricken from the roll of men. 

Pll burn my instruments and never face 

The enemies who’ve dealt you this disgrace.” 


Then he cut off his four fingers and went back to his house with his hand 
mutilated; there he built a fire and burned all his musical instruments. 


The Nobility Demand That Khosrow Parviz Be Killed; His Death at 


the Hands of Mehr Hormozd 

All those who had allied themselves with the prince trembled day and night at 
what fate would bring, since Shirui was a coward and untried in the world’s 
ways. The throne was like a snare to him, and his astrologers knew that his 
greatness would not last. Those who had been so eager to bring about this evil 
went to Qobad and talked of what had happened. They said, “We have said this 
once, and now we repeat it: your mind is set on other things than sovereignty. If 


two kings are enthroned in one land, one must take precedence and the other be 
his inferior, and their subjects will rue the day that father and son rule together. 
We are opposed to this arrangement; do not mention it to us again.” Shirui was a 
slave in their hands, and he was afraid of what would come of this. He answered, 
“Only a contemptible fool would put his head deliberately into a trap. You must 
go to your homes and debate what is to be done. Search out someone in the 
world who can secretly deliver me from this difficulty.” The king’s enemies 
looked for someone who would secretly do away with him, but no one had the 
courage to attempt such a feat, or to bear the mountain of guilt that would come 
from killing such a monarch. 

They searched everywhere until they found a man traveling by road who had 
blue eyes and sallow cheeks; his body was covered in hair and his face was 
flushed purple. This evil man’s feet were dusty, his belly was wasted with 
hunger, and his body was naked. No one in the world, rich or poor, knew his 
name. This ugly wretch—and may he never see the joys of paradise—made his 
way to Farrokhzad and said, “I’m the man for this business; fill my belly and 
he’s my prey!” Farrokhzad said, “Go, and do it if you can, and speak not a word 
of this to anyone. I’ll have a purse of gold coins waiting for you, and treat you as 
one of my own.” Then he gave him a sharp, glittering dagger, and the man 
immediately set off on his errand. He found the king, with his feet shackled, in 
the audience hall. 

Khosrow trembled when he saw his assailant, and tears fell from his eyes. He 
said, “What ugly name is yours? Even your mother should weep to set eyes on 
you.” The man replied, “They call me Mehr Hormozd; I’m a stranger in this land 
and have no friends or companions here.” Khosrow said, “And so my end has 
come at the hands of a lowborn criminal. His face is inhuman, and no one in the 
world could expect kindness from such a man.” The king said to a servant boy 
standing near him, “Go lad, and fetch me a bowl of water mixed with musk and 
aloes; and bring me a fine set of fresh clothes.” The boy heard him but didn’t 
know what this signified; he quickly brought the king a golden bowl, a ewer, and 
fresh clothes. Khosrow took the sacred barsom in his hands and prayed: this was 
no time for idle chat or frivolity. He dressed himself in the clean clothes and 
asked pardon for his sins; then he drew a previously unworn cloak over his head 
so that he would not see his murderer. Dagger in hand, Mehr Hormozd locked 
the doors to the king’s apartments; quickly he went forward and slashed through 
the king’s clothes, plunging the blade into his vitals. 


So turns the world, keeping its secrets hidden, and both the prudent, harmless 
man and the idle boaster find nothing there but vanity. Whether you own 
treasures or live in pain and sorrow, you cannot remain in this fleeting world. 
Choose righteousness and benevolence if you would be remembered with praise. 

When news spread in the roads and bazaars that Khosrow had perished in this 
way, evildoers made their way to where his fifteen sons were kept chained in the 
palace and murdered these innocents on the same day. Shirui did not dare say 
anything, but grieved over these events in secret. This then was the end of 
Khosrow, who had been the lord of such armies and ruled with such splendor. 
He had no rival as the King of Kings, and no one had ever heard of such a 
monarch from former times. 


The Story of Shirui and Shirin, the Wife of Khosrow Parviz 

I have finished the tale of Khosrow Parviz, and now I will begin that of Shirui 
and Shirin. Fifty-three days after the king was killed, Shirui sent someone to 
Shirin with this message: “You are an abomination, a magician who knows all 
spells; there is no one in Iran more culpable than you. It was your sorcery, which 
could bring the moon down from the heavens, that bewitched the king. Tremble 
now and come before me. You’ll strut so confidently about the palace no 
longer.” Shirin was enraged by his message, and its ugly, threatening language. 
She said, “May no man flourish who spills his own father’s blood! I shall not see 
that criminal even from a distance, neither on a day of sorrow nor on one of 
feasting.” She summoned a scribe and had a document written in Pahlavi; she 
dictated her will to this man and listed her wealth there. 


Hu 
vi 
Hg 


Whey 
ae ty 





She had a little poison in a coffer, the like of which could not be found 
anywhere in the whole country. From then on she kept it on her person, and this 
cypress of the meadows proceeded to sew her own shroud. She sent a message 
back to Shirui: “You wear the crown, haughty in your majesty, but the words 
you’ve spoken are like leaves in the wind. May the heart of any malevolent 
wretch who talks about magic and rejoices in such things be brought low! If the 
king had cared for such sorceries, he’d have kept a witch in his harem so that he 
could see her face to face; but he kept me there, to delight his heart when he 
looked on me as evening fell. He would call me from my apartments, and his 
soul rejoiced to see me. Shame on you for this talk; such lies don’t suit a 
sovereign. Remember God, who is benevolent, and don’t say such things before 
men again.” 





They took her message to Shirui, who flared up in anger at this innocent 
woman, and said, “You’ve no choice but to come! No one in the world is as 
impudent in her speech as you are.” When she heard this, Shirin was troubled 
and her cheeks turned sallow. She replied, “I will only come to you in the 
company of others; you must be surrounded by wise and respectable men.” 
Shirui summoned fifty old men, wise in the world’s ways, and then sent a 
messenger to Shirin who said, “Rise, come now, and leave off your excuses.” 
Shirin heard, and dressed herself in blue and black and came before the king. 
She went straight to the garden called Shadegan, where there was a place set 
aside for free men to speak; she sat there veiled, as was customary for nobly 
born women. Shirui sent someone to her with this message: “It is now two 
months since Khosrow died; be my wife now, as is worthy of you, and in this 
way you will not be shamed before your inferiors. I shall treat you as my father 
did, and even more respectfully and kindly than he did.” 

Shirin replied, “First act justly toward me, and then my soul will be yours: 
then I will not bridle at your questions, or resist your orders or the wishes of 
your splendid heart.” Shirui agreed to this, and told her to say what she had in 
mind. The noble woman spoke from behind her veil: “May you be prosperous 
and victorious, your majesty. You said that I am an evil woman and a sorceress, 
and that there is no purity or righteousness in me.” Shirui replied, “This is true, 
but such an outburst is not to be taken seriously.” Then Shirin said to the nobility 
gathered in the garden of Shadegan, “What evil have you seen from me, what 
darkness of soul, or deceit, or foolishness? For many years I was the queen of 
Persia, and in this time I always supported her brave warriors. I sought only 
righteousness, and all trickery and deceit were far from my mind. Through my 
intercession many men gained land and a fair portion of the world’s goods. Let 
those who have lived protected by my shadow and that of my crown and glory 
say what they saw and heard, and their words will confirm all I did.” The nobles 
who were there affirmed Shirin’s goodness and said that there was no other 
woman like her in all the world, either in public life or hidden away. 

Shirin said, “My noble lords, who have traveled the world and know its ways, 
there are three things that are honorable in a woman and that adorn the seat of 
greatness. First, that she possess both modesty and wealth, so that she may make 
her husband’s house a place of beauty and contentment; another is that she bear 
him fine sons, and so augment his splendor; and the third is that she be beautiful 
of face and of good stature, and that her hair envelope her like a cloak. When I 
married Khosrow and felt my life to be renewed in the world, he had come from 


Rome disheartened and despoiled of his wealth, with hardly a home to call his 
own in this country. But then his reign became so splendid that no one in the 
world had ever seen or heard of its like. And I bore him four sons—Nastud, 
Shahryar, Forud and Mardanshah—who rejoiced his heart. Jamshid and 
Feraydun did not have such sons, and may my tongue turn mute if I am lying.” 

Having said this she drew back her veil from her face, which shone like the 
full moon, and the night behind it was her hair. “The third quality is a face such 
as you see before you, and if anyone believes that I am lying, let him raise his 
hand. One of my secret attributes was my hair, which no man in the world has 
ever seen. And here I display to you all my magic, which is not from sorcery or 
tricks or malevolence; no one has seen my hair before, and none of the nobles 
have even heard tell of it.” The elders were dumbfounded at the sight of her, and 
they moistened their lips. 

When Shirui saw Shirin’s face, his soul seemed to take leave of his body. He 
said to her, “I must have no one but you; you are the only wife in all Iran whom I 
desire.” The beautiful woman answered him, “There are matters I still require 
from Persia’s king. May your reign be long, but I have some requests, if you will 
grant them.” Shirui replied, “My soul is yours; I will grant whatever you wish.” 
Shirin said, “Give me, piece by piece, before this company of nobles, all the 
wealth that I have owned in this land, and sign this document witnessing that 
you lay no claim to it.” Immediately Shirui did as she requested, and when her 
requests were fulfilled Shirin went from the garden of Shadegan, walking before 
the nobles gathered there, to her own home, where she used her wealth to free 
her slaves and rejoice their hearts. The rest of her possessions she gave to the 
poor, bestowing most on people of her own household. She gave a portion to the 
fire-temples, for the celebration of the new year and summer festivals. There was 
a convent, which was in ruins and had become the lair of lions, and this she 
rebuilt, dedicating it to the memory of Khosrow, for the good of his soul. 

Then she sat in its garden, unveiled, on the ground, divested of her finery. 
She called her servants to her and sat each one down with kindness. She said in a 
loud voice, “All of you who have generous hearts, hear what I have to say, since 
no one will see my face again. Say only the truth; wise people do not lie. From 
the time that I joined Khosrow and was introduced into the golden apartments of 
his harem, from when I became the first of queens and the glory of the king, 
what sins did I commit? Don’t speak merely for form’s sake—what do such 
things matter to a desperate woman?” Everyone stood and said: “Queen among 
queens, you are eloquent, wise, and enlightened in your soul; we swear by God 


that no one has ever seen a woman like you before, or heard such a voice from 
behind the veil. From the time of Hushang until now, no one like you has ever 
sat on the throne.” All her servants and slaves said together, “You are praised in 
China and the west and in Taraz; who would dare to speak ill of you, and how 
could you ever commit an evil act?” 

Shirin responded to them, “This criminal, whom the turning heavens mock, 
killed his own father for the sake of a crown and throne, and for this may he 
never know happiness or good fortune again. Does he think he can evade death, 
having killed his father in such a wretched fashion? He has sent me a message 
that has darkened my anguished soul. I have told him that while I remain alive I 
shall devote myself to God; I have told him my intentions, but his evil desires 
have filled me with sorrow, and I fear that after I die he will publicly slander 
me.” The company wept, both at her words and for Khosrow Parviz. 

The king was told of what this innocent woman had said, and he asked her 
again what she desired. Shirin sent a messenger to him saying that she had only 
one more wish, that the entrance to Khosrow’s tomb be opened for her, and that 
she be allowed to look at him once more. Shirui responded that it was fitting for 
her to look on the king again. The guards opened the tomb and Shirin began a 
mourning lament. She laid her face against Khosrow’s face and spoke to him the 
words they had spoken to one another in times past; then she drank the mortal 
poison she carried, which began to cloud her soul. Her clothes scented with 
camphor, she sat beside the king and leaned her back against the tomb’s walls. 
So she died, and her death was praised by the world. 

When Shirui heard of this, he fell sick, and the sight of Shirin’s body filled 
him with grief. He ordered that another tomb be constructed, and there she was 
laid, her head crowned with musk and camphor. Then Shirui sealed Khosrow’s 
tomb, and not many days passed before he too was given poison: the world had 
had its fill of kings. He was born shamefully and died shamefully, leaving the 
throne to his son. So a man may reign for seven months, and in the eighth he 
finds that his crown is made of the camphor with which the dead are anointed. 


hirui was succeeded on the throne by his son Ardeshir, who ruled for six 

months and was then murdered. Goraz seized the throne, but he too was 
murdered after a reign of less than two months. Two royal princesses, Puran- 
Dokht and Azarm-Dokht, reigned briefly, the first for six months, the second for 


four months; they were succeeded by Farrokhzad, who was poisoned after a 
month. A grandson of Khosrow Parviz, Yazdegerd III, then became the last 
Sasanian king of Iran. 


THE REIGN OF YAZDEGERD 


After the death of Farrokhzad, Yazdegerd became king, in the month of 
Sepandormoz, on the day of Ard. He sat in splendor on the imperial throne and 
placed the crown on his head. He said, “By the revolutions of the turning sky, I 
am the descendant of Nushin-Ravan; from father to son the realm is mine, and 
the sun and the constellations Virgo and Pisces are favorable to my reign. I shall 
confer greatness on the lowly, and I shall not harm the mighty. I do not seek for 
glory and knowledge, or for warfare and valor, since time and good fortune, 
wealth, the royal crown, and the throne stay with no man. It is a good reputation 
we must strive for, not our own pleasure; pleasure is to be ignored, and 
reputation made our goal.” And so he ruled for sixteen years, while the moon 
and sun passed over his head. 


Sa’d, the Son of Vaqas, Invades Iran, and Yazdegerd Sends Rostam, 
the Son of Hormozd, to Fight Against Him Omar, who was then the 
commander of the Arab armies, sent Sa’d, the son of Vaqas, with an 
army against the king. Hearing news of this Yazdegerd gathered 
troops from all quarters and ordered the son of Hormozd to lead 
them against the invader. This man’s name was Rostam; he was an 
astute, intelligent man and a fine warrior. He was also a very 
knowledgeable astrologer, who paid attention to the advice of 
priests. He set out with the nobility under his command, and 
everyone who was capable of fighting well accompanied him. 

For thirty months they skirmished, until the army made a stand at Qadesiya. 
Rostam was a just, kind man; in his capacity as an astrologer he said to himself, 
“This battle will turn out unfavorably; these times are unfavorable to kings, their 
current cannot flow in such channels.” He took his astrolabe and observed the 
stars, and when he saw the day of disaster that loomed he buried his head in his 
hands. He wrote a letter to his brother, beginning with praise of God, who brings 


both good and evil fates to pass. Then he continued: “A wise man will be 
saddened when he learns 
Of how the moving sphere of heaven turns: 
Caught in the evil clutch of Ahriman, 
I am the time’s most sad and sinful man; 
This house will lose all trace of sovereignty 
Of royal glory, and of victory. 
The sun looks down from its exalted sphere 
And sees the day of our defeat draw near: 
Both Mars and Venus now oppose our cause 
And no man can evade the heaven’s laws. 
Saturn and Mercury divide the sky— 
Mercury rules the house of Gemini: 
Ahead of us lie war and endless strife, 
Such that my failing heart despairs of life. 
I see what has to be, and choose the way 
Of silence since there is no more to say: 
But for the Persians I will weep, and for 
The House of Sasan ruined by this war: 
Alas for their great crown and throne, for all 
The royal splendor destined now to fall, 
To be fragmented by the Arabs’ might; 
The stars decree for us defeat and flight. 
Four hundred years will pass in which our name 
Will be forgotten and devoid of fame. 


“They’ve sent a messenger who says to me 

They’ll leave our sovereign all his territory 

From Qadesiya to the river; but, 

For trade’s sake, they require a highway cut 

Through our domains, no more than this. They’Il pay Us taxes, offer 
hostages, obey 

Our king as theirs. But these are words, not acts, And have no 
correspondence with the facts: 

There will be war, and in this conflict I 

Know many lion-warriors will die. 

And all of my commanders, to a man— 


Like Merui from wide Tabaristan, 

Like Armani and Kalbui, all those 

Who fight with heavy maces to oppose 

Our enemies—reject their words and say, 

‘Who are these upstarts who have dared to stray 
Across Mazanderan’s and Persia’s borders ? 
For good or bad then, issue us your orders 
And let our swords and maces drive them back; 
We’ll press them hard enough when we attack!’ 
They cannot know the fate the stars foretell, 
These stars which always treated us so well! 
As soon as you have read this, don’t delay 

But make plans quickly and be on your way; 
Gather together our nobility, 

Their wealth and slaves, horses and property— 
Azerbaijan must be your refuge now. 

If Persian troops come from Zabol, allow 
Them all you can in clothes and charity, 

Treat them with friendly hospitality, 

But watch the turning heavens—it’s from there 
That we are granted comfort and despair. 

Say to our mother all I’ve said, but then 

Tell her she’ll never see my face again. 

Give her my greetings, comfort her and see 
She does not grieve too desperately for me. 

If someone brings sad news of me, don’t let 
Your sorrow weaken you; we should not set 
Our hearts on this world where our wealth is won 
By pain and is another’s when we’re gone. 
Devote your heart to God, and as you pray 
Ignore this fleeting world which fades away. 
The king will not see Rostam any more, 

Since fate has driven me to fight this war. 
Have all our people pray throughout the night, 
Both young and old, until the morning light; 
Be generous to the poor, and in your sorrow 


Trust in God’s help, give no thought to the morrow; And as for me, my 
fate’s to fight, to lead 

Our armies in our country’s hour of need: 

May Persia flourish! But I know that I 

Will not survive this battle, and must die. 

When once the king is threatened, give no thought 

To wealth or life, to all that you have sought, 

Do not be weak or hesitant but strive 

With all your strength to keep the king alive, 

Since of this noble line the king alone 

Still lives; the House of Sasan and its throne 

Depend on him, and after him the race 

Of Sasan will be gone, and leave no trace. 

Alas now for their crown, their court, and for 

Their throne that will be shattered in this war. 

Farewell now: live for the king, be his shield, 

Defend him, sword in hand, and never yield! 


“But when the pulpit’s equal to the throne 

And Abu Bakr’s and Omar’s names are known, 

Our long travails will be as naught, and all 

The glory we have known will fade and fall. 

The stars are with the Arabs, and you’ll see 

No crown or throne, no royal sovereignty: 

Long days will pass, until a worthless fool 

Will lead his followers and presume to rule: 

They’ ll dress in black, their headdress will be made Of twisted lengths of 
silk or black brocade. 

There’ll be no golden boots or banners then, 

Our crowns and thrones will not be seen again. 

Some will rejoice, while others live in fear, 

Justice and charity will disappear, 

At night, the time to hide away and sleep, 

Men’s eyes will glitter to make others weep; 

Strangers will rule us then, and with their might 

They’ll plunder us and turn our days to night. 

They will not care for just or righteous men, 


Deceit and fraudulence will flourish then. 

Warriors will go on foot, while puffed-up pride 

And empty boasts will arm themselves and ride; 

The peasantry will suffer from neglect, 

Lineage and skill will garner no respect, 

Men will be mutual thieves and have no shame, 

Curses and blessings will be thought the same. 

What’s hidden will be worse than what is known, 

And stony-hearted kings will seize the throne. 

No man will trust his son, and equally 

No son will trust his father’s honesty— 

A misbegotten slave will rule the earth, 

Greatness and lineage will have no worth, 

No one will keep his word, and men will find 

The tongue as filled with evil as the mind. 

Then Persians, Turks, and Arabs, side by side 

Will live together, mingled far and wide— 

The three will blur, as if they were the same; 

Their languages will be a trivial game. 

Men will conceal their wealth, but when they’ve died, Their foes will 
pilfer everything they hide. 

Men will pretend they’re holy, or they’re wise, 

To make a livelihood by telling lies. 

Sorrow and anguish, bitterness and pain 

Will be as happiness was in the reign 

Of Bahram Gur—mankind’s accustomed fate: 

There’ll be no feasts, no festivals of state, 

No pleasures, no musicians, none of these: 

But there’ll be lies, and traps, and treacheries. 

Sour milk will be our food, coarse cloth our dress, And greed for money 
will breed bitterness 

Between the generations: men will cheat 

Each other while they calmly counterfeit 

Religious faith. The winter and the spring 

Will pass mankind unmarked, no one will bring 

The wine to celebrate such moments then; 

Instead they’ Il spill the blood of fellow men. 


These thoughts have dried my mouth, my cheeks turn pale, I feel my 
sickened heart within me fail, For since I was a soldier I’ve not known 

Such dark days to beset the royal throne; 

The heavens have betrayed us, and they spurn 

Our supplications as they cruelly turn. 

My tempered sword, that fought with elephants 

And lions, will now I know be no defense 

Against these naked Arabs, and all I see 

Has only multiplied my misery. 

Would that I had no knowledge, did not know 

The good and evil that the heavens show. 

The noble warriors who are with me here 

Despise the Arabs, and they show no fear, 

They think they’ll turn the plain into a flood, 

An Oxus flowing with these Arabs’ blood; 

None of them knows the heavens’ will, or how 

Immense a task awaits our armies now. 

When fate withdraws its favor, why wage war? 

What is the point of fighting any more? 


“My brother, may God keep you safe; may you 
Comfort the royal heart by all you do. 

My grave is Qadesiya’s battlefield, 

My crown will be my blood, my shroud my shield. 
The heavens will this; may my death not cause 
Your heart to grieve too much at heaven’s laws. 
Watch the king always, and prepare to give 

Your life in battle so that he may live— 

The day comes soon when heaven’s sphere will be, 
Like Ahriman, our bitterest enemy.” 


He sealed the letter and summoned a messenger, saying to him, “Take this 
quickly to my brother, and tell him everything that is appropriate.” 


Rostam’s Letter to Sa’d, the Son of Vaqas 
He also sent a messenger, who rode like lightning, to Sa’d. The letter was 
written on white silk, and the scribe’s script glittered like the sun. It was 


addressed “From the son of Hormozd the king, Rostam, the benevolent and 
foremost warrior of the world, to Sa’d the son of Vaqas, who seeks war and has 
made the world a dark and narrow place for himself.” 

The message began, “May the great God, whom we must fear, who has 
founded the turning heavens, and whose rule is one of justice and love, bless our 
prince, who is an adornment to the crown, the throne, and the royal seal, who is 
lord of the sword and crown, and whose glory binds Ahriman’s evils. A 
contemptible business has been set afoot, involving pointless suffering and 
warfare. Tell me who your king is, and what kind of man you are, and what your 
customs and intentions are. You’re a naked commander leading a naked army; 
on whose behalf are you fighting? Bread satisfies you, but you hunger for 
something more; you’ve no elephants, no thrones, no baggage train. Simple life 
in Iran would be enough for you; the crown and royal seal belong to another 
man, who has elephants, treasures, glory, power, and who is king by right of 
descent from father to son. When he appears, the moon is absent from the sky, 
and no king on earth has his stature. When he smiles at a banquet he gives away 
the ransom of the Arabs’ leader, and his treasures remain undiminished by the 
gift. He has twelve thousand hunting dogs, cheetahs, and hawks, all with golden 
bells and ears decorated with jewels; in a year the plains where the Arabs live 
could not provide the food that his dogs and cheetahs run down in the hunt. His 
dogs and cheetahs eat more than you, and the cost is as nothing to the king. 

“Ts there no shame in your eyes, have you no wisdom or benevolence? And 
with your appearance, your lineage, your customs and character, you hope to 
gain the crown and throne? If you have ambitions in the world, and your words 
are not mere idle chatter, send me an experienced, eloquent warrior who can 
explain to me what your intentions are, and who has led you to the Persian 
throne; then we’ll send a knight to the king to make your requests known. 

“Don’t make war against the king, because the end can only be a sorrowful 
one for you. He is descended from the world-ruler Nushin-Ravan, and his justice 
makes old men young again; his ancestors were kings and he is king, and time 
cannot show his equal. Do not make all the world curse you: a just, wise man 
who is not of royal lineage will not seek the throne. Look carefully at the advice 
I give you in this letter, and do not close your eyes and ears to wisdom.” The 
letter was sealed and he handed it to the nobleman Piruz, the son of Shapur, who 
took it to Sa’d, the son of Vaqas. The Persian nobles waited, untroubled in their 
spirits, dressed in armor lavishly covered in gold and silver, with their golden 
shields and golden belts. 


Sa’d’s Answer to Rostam’s Letter 

Sa’d went out with his warriors to welcome the noble messenger. They brought 
him to their camp, and Sa’d questioned him about the king, his advisors, his 
army, and its commander. They spread a simple cloak for Piruz to sit on, and 
Sa’d said, “Our business is with swords and spears; men worth the name don’t 
talk about brocade, or gold and silver, or sleeping and eating.” The noble Piruz 
handed over the letter and repeated Rostam’s words. Sa’d heard him out and 
read the letter, which astonished him. 

He wrote an answer in Arabic, setting out things that were good and things 
that were ugly. He wrote about jinns and human beings, about the words of the 
Hashemite prophet, about the unity of God and the Qur’an, about what was 
promised and what was threatened, about God’s support and the new ways; 
about the burning pitch and icy cold of hell; about the houris and streams, the 
camphor and water, the trees and wine and honey of paradise. Then he wrote, “If 
the king accepts this true faith, he will prosper in both this world and the next. 
He will keep his crown and royal earrings and live forever in splendor. 
Mohammad will intercede for his sins, and his body will be like distilled 
rosewater. Sow seeds that you will reap in paradise; it is wrong to plant hatred in 
the garden of disaster. I would not exchange the sight of one hair of one houri 
from heaven for the person of Yazdegerd himself, together with the wide earth 
and its orchards, castles, palaces, throne rooms, feasts and festivals. In this 
fleeting world your eyes have been dazzled by crowns and wealth; you trust in 
the ivory throne, in cheetahs and hawks and royal benevolence, but this world is 
not worth one gulp of sweet water, so why should it trouble your heart so much? 
Any man who opposes me in battle will see nothing but a narrow grave, and hell; 
if you join with me, your place will be in paradise. Consider carefully which you 
will choose.” He set the Arab seal on the paper and invoked the name of 
Mohammad. He told Sho’beh Moghaireh to take the letter to the warrior Rostam. 


7, : 
FHS 


(\Aii-= 


Ye 
te 
5 


KEG 
rH § 
He (oe 
77 VRS 
SSG 





The Persian commander was told, “A weak, old man is coming as a 
messenger; he has neither a horse nor armor, and he can hardly see. He carries a 
thin sword on his shoulder, and his clothes are tattered.” Rostam had a brocade 
tent prepared and spread with Chinese carpets woven with gold; his troops were 
drawn up as thickly as ants or locusts. A golden chair was placed there, and 
Rostam seated himself on it; around him were gathered sixty of his warlike 
cavalry officers, dressed in purple clothes woven with gold and wearing golden 
shoes, torques, and earrings. The tent itself was royally adomed. 

When Sho’beh reached the tent, he did not set foot on the carpets. He stood 
humbly in the dust, leaning against his sword as if it were a staff. Then he sat on 
the earth and paid no attention to anyone; he did not even look at the Persian 
commander. Rostam greeted him, “May your soul rejoice, your spirit know 
wisdom, and your body flourish.” Sho’beh replied: “Your name is well known; 
if you accept the true faith, I will be satisfied.” Rostam bridled at these words; he 
frowned and his face turned sallow. He took the letter from him and handed it to 
a scribe, who read it to him. Rostam answered, “Tell your master, “You are not a 
king, and you have no right to seek a crown. Speech is not a trivial matter for 
wise men, and you don’t know what it is you’re undertaking.’ If Sa’d wore the 
Sasanian crown it would be an easy matter for me to fight on his behalf; but you 
should realize that your star is faithless. How can I explain to you that today will 
be a day of disaster? If Mohammad himself were your leader, I could speak 
according to the old faith about this new faith. But the hunchbacked sky will 
deal harshly with me. Return in peace, since there is no place for talk on the day 
of battle. Tell your master that it is better to die honorably in battle than to live 
while an enemy triumphs over you.” 


Rostam’s Battle with Sa’d; the Death of Rostam 

Rostam ordered that the trumpets be sounded and his army surged forward like 
the sea. A cloud of dust rose up, and there was such a din of war cries that the 
sharpest ears were deafened. Like fire glimpsed through a purple curtain, 
diamond lances glittered in the darkened air, spears struck against helmets, and 
men’s heads were trampled by horses’ hooves. The battle continued for three 
days; then thirst made men’s blows grow weaker and their horses too faint to 
fight. Rostam’s lips were dry as dust; his mouth was parched and his tongue 
swollen and split. Both men and horses were so tormented by thirst that they ate 
damp clay. A cry like thunder went up, from Rostam on the one side and from 
Sa’d on the other: the two of them rode out from the body of their men and faced 


each other alone beneath a tall cypress tree. Rostam gave another thunderous cry 
and struck a sword blow against Sa’d’s horse: the horse collapsed beneath him, 
and as Sa’d disentangled himself, Rostam lunged at him with his sharp sword, to 
prevent him from rising. He intended to sever Sa’d’s head from his body, but the 
dust of the battlefield hid Sa’d from his sight. He jumped down from his 
leopard-skin saddle and tied his horse’s bridle to his belt, but while he was 
blinded by dust, Sa’d attacked and struck Rostam’s helmet a mighty blow with 
his sword. Blood poured from Rostam’s head, filling his eyes, and the ambitious 
Arab triumphed over him. Sa’d thrust his sword into Rostam’s chest and neck 
and hurled his warlike body into the dust. 

The two armies were unaware of what was happening to their leaders, and 
began to search for them. When they saw Rostam lying bloody in the dust and 
his pavilion slashed into pieces, the Persians fled, and many of their noblemen 
were slaughtered. Many died of thirst while still in the saddle, and in this way 
the lives of many local kings came to an end. The remnant of the army sought 
their king, riding hard by day and night. At this time Yazdegerd was in Baghdad, 
and his soldiers flocked to him there. 


Yazdegerd Consults with the Persians and Goes to Khorasan 
Hormozd’s other son, Farrokhzad, rode furiously to the Tigris, his 
eyes awash with tears. He reached Kerkh and attacked the enemy 
with such force that not an Arab warrior remained alive there. At 
the same time, troops poured out of Baghdad onto the plain and 
joined battle, but when the dust of combat rose into the sky the 
Persians were driven back. Farrokhzad retreated and made his way 
to the king, his armor and weapons smeared with the grime of 
battle. He dismounted from his horse and made his obeisance before 
the king, his eyes filled with bitter tears, his heart with anguish. He 
said, “What are you waiting for? You are putting the Persian throne 
at risk: of all the royal lineage, no one remains alive but you, there’s 
no one else who’s worthy to assume the crown and throne. You are 
one man and your enemies are a hundred thousand: how in all the 
world can you go on with this war? Go to the forests of Narvan; 
there men will join you until you have an army, and then like young 
Feraydun you will be able to make new plans for the future.” The 


king listened to Farrokhzad’s words, and turned over the 
alternatives in his mind. 

The next day the king sat on his throne and placed the Kayanid crown on his 
head. He summoned an assembly of the wise, the nobility, and learned priests. 
He said to them, “What do you think of this proposal? What would you say that 
ancient precedents advise? Farrokhzad tells me to flee with an escort to the 
forests of Narvan, saying I have followers and supporters in Amol and Sari. 
When our armies have grown in size, that will be the time to return and give 
battle. Do you agree with this suggestion?” With one voice they answered, “This 
is not advisable!” 

The King of Kings replied, “I agree with you; my heart cannot go along with 
this idea. Am I to save my own head and abandon Persia’s nobility and its 
mighty armies, the land itself, and its throne and crown? This is neither noble 
nor chivalrous nor sensible. It’s better that I fight with the enemy than endure 
such shame; a leopard-like warrior of ancient times once said, ‘Never turn your 
back carelessly on an enemy, because this can only lead to evil days.’ In the 
same way that the king’s subjects owe him allegiance in good times and in bad, 
so the world’s king must not abandon them to their sufferings while he flees to 
safety and luxury.” The nobles called down blessings upon him, and said, “This 
is the way of true kings! Now consider your orders, and tell us what you wish of 
us.” 

The king answered, “My heart is destroyed by anxieties. We will travel to 
Khorasan, and there restore our strength after our enemies’ attacks. We have 
many men there, many champions ready to fight for us. There are noblemen and 
Turks in the Chinese emperor’s service; they will side with our cause, and I will 
marry a daughter of the emperor to make our alliance stronger. With their help I 
will have a mighty army of both our nobility and warlike Turks. Mahuy is lord 
of the marches there, and he has many men, war elephants, and wealth. He was a 
lowly shepherd, a laborer in the fields, and I promoted him because he spoke 
well and had a warlike nature. He had no status and I made him a lord of the 
marches with war elephants and an army and his own territory. He’s a nobody, 
but he owes his good fortune to my court, and learned men have said it’s an 
ancient precept that one should be wary of those to whom one has done evil, and 
trust in those whom one’s generosity has lifted up to the heavens from 
nothingness.” 

Farrokhzad clapped his hands together and said, “My God-fearing king, don’t 
trust men who have a lowly nature. There’s a new proverb that says however 


much you try to mold a man’s character, you don’t have the key to change what 
God has made, and you won’t alter what he is. May you know nothing but 
sovereignty and greatness!” The king replied, “You’re a lion in combat, but no 
harm can come from this attempt of mine.” 

Night passed, and at dawn the court set out from Baghdad toward Khorasan, 
their hearts prepared for hardship. The Persian nobles who accompanied the king 
were grief-stricken. They invoked blessings on him, praying that the land never 
lose him, and a cry of sorrow went up from the army when they saw the king 
was leaving. Persians and subjects of the Chinese emperor alike came forward 
weeping to the king, their eyes flowing with tears, and said, “How can our hearts 
rejoice in our land without sight of the king? We shall abandon our homes and 
sons and wealth and share your hardships with you. We have no desire to live 
without your throne, and may good fortune never turn against you.” Eloquent 
representatives of the Chinese emperor’s men bowed their faces to the black 
earth and said, “We left our land and sought refuge with you; now we shall go 
with burning hearts to the emperor, fleeing before the Arabs to the Persian 
marches.” The king’s eyes became wet with tears and he sorrowfully addressed 
his noblemen: “All of you, pray to God, praise him endlessly, that I may see you 
all once again, and that this Arab attack be short-lived. You are my strength, 
inherited from my father, and I would not have you harmed, or share with me in 
an evil fate. We shall see if the heavens can turn toward benevolence again, but 
make your peace with them since there is no escaping what they will.” Then he 
spoke to the Chinese merchants and said, “Do not stay in Persia long, because 
the Arabs will bring harm to you and your affairs.” Everyone turned away, filled 
with grief and anguish, weeping and lamenting. 

Farrokhzad, Hormozd’s son, took command of the army and summoned 
experienced Persian warriors to serve. The king traveled, weeping and in sorrow, 
preceded by his commander and the troops. They went stage by stage to Rey, 
and there rested for a while, consoling themselves with wine and music. From 
Rey, partly hopeful and partly despairing, they pushed on like the wind to 
Gorgan; from there they took the road to Bost, their faces filled with frowns, 
their hearts with anxieties. 


Yazdegerd’s Letter to Mahuy and the Lords of the Marches of 
Khorasan The king summoned an experienced scribe and vented the 
emotions of his heart. As he traveled toward Marv, he wrote a letter 


to Mahuy, the son of Suri, who was the governor there. It was a 
message filled with pain and bitterness, with his heart’s desires and 
his eyes’ tears. He opened the letter in the name of the Creator, the 
lord of knowledge from whom all benefits derive, who makes Mars 
and the sun turn in the heavens, who rules over both elephants and 
ants, who raises the lowly as he wishes and needs no precedent for 
his actions. He continued: “What evil days have befallen us! Our 
kingdom has lost its glory: Rostam was killed on the day of battle, at 
the hands of Sa’d, the son of Vaqas, a man who has no country, no 
lineage, no knowledge, and no wealth, and grief hems us in. Now 
that their armies are gathered like magpies before Baghdad, 
summon your troops to service and prepare them for war. I shall 
follow this letter like the wind and come to you trusting in your 
probity and generosity.” He chose an intelligent man, capable of 
giving good advice, as his messenger. 

The king had the army’s drums sounded, and they pushed on from Bost and 
Nayshapur to Tus. When Mahuy learned of their approach, he went forward to 
meet the king with a mighty army, all of whom were armored and bore lances. 
When he saw the splendor of the king’s entourage, with the royal banner and so 
many soldiers clustered about him, Mahuy quickly dismounted, and acted more 
like a slave than a subject, going meekly forward over the hot earth, his eyes 
flowing with tears of humility. He kissed the earth and made his obeisance, then 
waited humbly before the king for a long time. Farrokhzad’s heart was filled 
with happiness when he saw Mahuy’s face and his army’s ranks, and he spoke 
with him at length. “I hand this king, descended from the Kayanid royal line, 
over to your protection,” he said. “See that not a breath of wind is allowed to 
harm him. I must go to Rey, and I don’t know when I shall see the royal crown 
again, since many others like me have been killed on the battlefield by the 
Arabs. There was no knight in all the world like Rostam, no wise man had ever 
heard of his equal, and yet he was killed by one of these crows with their black 
turbans, and the day of his death was a disaster for me. May God give him a 
place among the blessed, and that black crow a place where he’ || be tormented 
by the lances of hell.” Mahuy replied, “You are a great warrior; the king is as my 
own eyes and soul to me, and I accept your request that I protect him.” 


At the king’s command, Farrokhzad set off for Rey, and soon the malevolent 
Mahuy forgot all thoughts of kindness. He spent his nights dreaming of the 
throne, and his manner and bearing changed. He pretended to be ill and 
neglected to serve the king as he should. 


Mahuy Encourages Bizhan to Attack the King; the King Flees to a 
Mill There was a successful warrior named Bizhan, whose family 
was from Tarkhan. His seat was in Samargqand, and he had many 
allies in the area. When the evil Mahuy was seized by ambition, he 
wrote a letter to Bizhan: “You are descended from a warrior race, 
and here is an opportunity for you to profit from battle. The king of 
the world, with his crown and throne and army, is here. If you 
attack, his head and crown and throne will be yours, together with 
his treasures and the black parasol held over the royal head.” 
Bizhan considered the letter, and saw that the world was ambitious 
Mahuy’s to take. He said to his vizier, “As the most honest of my 
men, what’s your advice on this matter? If I lead my army out to 
help Mahuy, my situation here will be ruined: the Chinese king will 
have contempt for me and think of me as an opportunist and a time 
server. And if I don’t do this, people will say I am a coward and 
afraid to fight.” His vizier answered, “You are a lionhearted man, 
and it will be shameful for you to have offered friendship to Mahuy 
and then to back out of it. Send your ally Barsam to fight this battle; 
if you fight just because Mahuy encourages you to, serious men will 
call you frivolous.” Bizhan said, “You’re right, it’s best for me to 
stay where I am. Send Barsam with ten thousand cavalry to Marv, 


and we’Il see whether he can seize Persia’s treasures in his fist.” 
Glittering like a pheasant’s feathers, the army set off from Bokhara and 
arrived at the city of Marv in a week. Yazdegerd had no notion of Mahuy’s 
treachery: when it was still dark, at the time the roosters crow, the sound of war 
drums rang out, and as day broke a horseman came galloping to the king, saying, 
“Mahuy says an army of Turks is attacking, led by the Chinese khan, and they 
are sO numerous it seems the earth could not bear their weight. What are the 
king’s orders?” The king leaped up and strapped on his armor, and the two 


armies came face to face. When Yazdegerd saw the Turks’ forces, he clapped his 
hands together and drew his sword; he appeared before the army, massive as an 
elephant, and the ground was awash with blood like the Nile. But when the king 
attacked the Turks, none of his warriors followed him; they all turned their backs 
on their monarch and abandoned him to the enemy cavalry. And as Mahuy too 
drew back from the fight, leaving him in the midst of the enemy forces, 
Yazdegerd realized his treachery. The king fought furiously, striking out with his 
sword, urging his horse on with his stirrups, and killing many of the enemy’s 
renowned warriors; but when he became more hard-pressed, he turned his back 
on the battle and fled. With many Turks in pursuit, a Kaboli sword in his grasp, 
he rode like lightning flashing from a cloud. 

There was a mill by the River Zarq, and there the world’s king dismounted 
and concealed himself from his enemies. Their cavalry were searching 
everywhere, and all the area was filled with talk of him. The king had abandoned 
his horse with its golden saddle, his mace, and his sword in its golden sheath, 
and when the Turks came on these they cried out in their excitement, while the 
king hid himself away, sitting on dry straw, in the mill. This is the way of the 
deceitful world, raising a man up and casting him down. When fortune was with 
him, his throne was in the heavens, and now a mill was his lot; the world’s 
favors are many, but they are exceeded by its poison. Why should you bind your 
heart to this world, where the drums that signal your departure are heard 
continuously, together with the caravan leader’s cry of “Prepare to leave”? The 
only rest you will find is that of the grave. So the king sat, without food, his eyes 
filled with tears, until the sun rose. 

The miller opened the mill door, carrying a load of straw on his back. He was 
a humble man, called Khosrow, who possessed neither a throne, nor wealth, nor 
a crown, nor any power. He made his living from the mill and had no other 
occupation. He saw a warrior like a tall cypress tree, seated on the stony ground 
as a man sits in despair; a royal crown was on his head, and his clothes were 
made of glittering Chinese brocade. Khosrow stared at him in astonishment and 
murmured the name of God. He said, “Your majesty, your face shines like the 
sun; tell me, how did you come to be in this mill? How can a mill full of wheat 
and dust and straw be a place for you to sit? What kind of a man are you, with 
this stature and face of yours, and radiating such glory, because the heavens have 
never seen your like?” 

The king replied, “I’m one of the Persians who fled from the army of Turan.” 
The miller said in his confusion, “I’ve never known anything but poverty, but if 


you could eat some barley bread, and some of the common herbs that grow on 
the riverbank, I’ll bring them to you, and anything else I can find. A poor man is 
always aware of how little he has.” In the three days that had passed since the 
battle the king had had no food. He said, “Bring whatever you have, and a sacred 
barsom.” The man quickly brought a basket of barley bread and herbs and then 
hurried off to find a barsom at the river toll house. There he met up with the 
headman of Zarq and asked him for a barsom. Mahuy had sent people 
everywhere searching for the king, and the headman said, “Now, my man, who 
is it who wants a barsom?” Khosrow answered him, “There’s a warrior sitting on 
the straw in my mill; he’s as tall as a cypress tree, and his face is as glorious as 
the sun. His eyebrows are like a bow, his sad eyes like narcissi; his mouth is 
filled with sighs, his forehead with frowns. It’s he who wants the barsom, to 
pray; if you saw him, you’d be astonished. I put an old basket with barley bread 
in it in front of him.” 

The headman said, “Run from here and tell Mahuy what you’ve said. But 
God forbid that evil-minded man should show his foul nature once he’s heard 
this.” And he immediately handed him over to a man who took him to Mahuy. 
Mahuy questioned him and said, “Who wanted a barsom? Tell the truth now!” 
Fearfully, the miller said, “I was carrying some materials I needed on my back, 
and I opened the mill door in a hurry, and it was as if I saw the sun shining in 
front of me. He had eyes like a deer’s when it’s afraid—they were as dark as the 
third watch of the night. The mill seemed filled with sunlight because of him; his 
crown was studded with uncut jewels, and he was dressed in Chinese brocade. 
He’s like the springtime itself, and no landowner has ever planted a cypress as 
fine as he is.” 

Mahuy considered in his heart all he had heard and knew that this was none 
other than Yazdegerd. He turned to the miller and said, “Leave this assembly 
immediately and cut the man’s head off; if you refuse I’Il cut your head off here 
and now and leave not one member of your family alive.” The noblemen 
gathered there heard his orders and they all seethed with anger; their eyes were 
filled with tears and everyone spoke vehemently against Mahuy’s plan, 
including his own son. 


Yazdegerd Is Killed by the Miller Khosrow 

When Mahuy had heard his son out, he turned to the miller and said, “Get on 
with it; go now, and spill our enemy’s blood.” The miller heard him but could 
make no sense of what he was being told. It was the night of the thirtieth day of 


the month of Khordad, when the miller returned to his mill and the king. Mahuy 
left the court, his eyes filled with tears, his heart with fury, and sent horsemen 
after the miller, saying to them, “The crown and earrings, his seal ring and the 
royal clothes must not be stained with blood; remove his clothes from his body.” 

The miller wept and his face had turned sallow as he made his way home. He 
prayed, “O bright Creator, thou who art above the heavens’ turning, make this 
man’s soul and body suffer for this evil command he has given me!” His heart 
was filled with shame and fear as he approached the king; his cheeks were 
Stained with tears, and his mouth was as dry as dust. He came up to the king like 
someone about to impart a secret in a man’s ear and plunged a dagger beneath 
his ribs. The king sighed at the wound, and his head and crown fell down to the 
dust, beside the barley bread that lay before him. 


A man who understands the world soon says 
There is no sense or wisdom in its ways: 

If this is how imperial blood is spilled 

And innocents like Yazdegerd are killed, 

The seven spheres grow weary of their roles— 
No longer do they cherish mortal souls. 


The heavens mingle their malevolence 

With kindnesses in ways which make no sense, 
And it is best if you can watch them move 
Untouched by indignation and by love. 


The wretched Mahuy’s knights saw that the royal tree was felled from the throne 
and battlefield, and each of them went forward to gaze at his face. They undid 
the clasp of his purple cloak and removed his crown and torque and golden 
boots. Then, as they stood again before the king, they spoke at last and said, 
“May Mahuy’s body be like his, weltering in its blood on the ground.” 

Quickly they took the clothes and jewels to Mahuy and said, “The king 
knows neither peace nor war now.” He ordered that the body be thrown into the 
river, at night, when men are sleeping. Two callous servants hurried to carry out 
his command; unaware of its rank, they dragged the bloody body outside and 
threw it in the mill pond. When day followed night two religious ascetics came 
into view, and one of them approached the bank. He saw the naked body floating 
there, and ran horrified back to the monastery door, where he told the other 
monks what he had seen. “The king is lying naked and drowned in the Zarg mill 
pond,” he said, and monks and priests came running from the monastery doors, 
crying out in grief for the king. One of them said, “No one has ever seen such an 
event, or heard of it, not from before the time of Jesus, that a wretched slave, a 
man of no account, should give a king hospitality and then murder him. May 
Mahuy be cursed for this! Alas for your head and crown and noble stature, for 
your heart and knowledge and wisdom! Alas for this scion of Ardeshir, for this 
young warlike knight! You were alive, healthy, and wise, and now you have 
taken news to Nushin-Ravan that you who ruled the world and sought out its 
crowns have been killed with a dagger plunged into your liver, and have been 
thrown naked into a mill pond.” 

Four of the monks stripped off their habits and went into the water. They 
dragged the body of the young king, the descendant of Nushin-Ravan, to dry 
land, and everyone there, young and old, wept as they did so. In a garden the 
monks built him a tomb that towered up to the clouds. They dried the dagger 
wound and treated the body with unguents, pitch, camphor, and musk; then they 
dressed it in yellow brocade, laid it on muslin, and placed a blue pall over it. 
Finally, a priest anointed the king’s resting place with wine, musk, camphor, and 
rosewater. 


Mahuy Assumes the Throne 

A man came to Mahuy and said, “The king of the world is now one with the 
earth. Byzantine priests and monks have filled the land with mourning for him. 
Young and old, they went weeping to take his body from the mill pond. They 
built a great tomb for him in a garden.” Evil and shameless, Mahuy said, “Until 
now, Persia has never been kin to Byzantium.” He gave orders that all who had 
built the tomb or who had mourned for the king be killed, and the area be 
plundered; this was Mahuy’s notion of pleasure and appropriate behavior. 

Then he looked about him and saw that in all the world there was no 
remaining descendant of the royal line. This shepherd’s son possessed the king’s 
crown and seal ring, and he longed to rule. He called his confidants to him and 
told them all that was in his heart. He said to his vizier, “You are an experienced 
man, and you must know that a day of battle is looming. I have neither wealth, 
nor name, nor lineage to boast of, and I see that my life is at risk. The name on 
this seal ring is Yazdegerd’s, and my sword is unable to pacify the people. All of 
the cities of Iran were his to command, but no wise man calls me king, and my 
seal’s authority is not respected by the army. There were other alternatives to the 
things I did in secret; why did I shed the blood of the king of the world? I spend 
my nights tormented by anxiety, and God knows the state in which I live.” His 
advisor said, “The deed is done, and the world is full of talk of it. Look to your 
own affairs, because you have cut the thread of the warp now. He lies in his 
tomb, beneath the dust, and has the cure for all the poisons that afflicted his soul. 
Call together men of experience and speak to them sweetly and plausibly. Say, 
‘The king gave me this crown and seal ring, as marks of authority. He did this 
because he knew an army of Turks was approaching. He summoned me in the 
darkness of the night and said, “When the dust of battle rises, who knows who 
will emerge victorious? Take this crown and seal ring, and it may be that some 
day they will be of use to you. This is all I have in the world, see that you hide 
them from the Arabs. Follow my precepts in all you do, and do not give my 
throne to the enemy.” I have this crown as an inheritance from the king, and it is 
at his command that I sit on the throne.’ In this way you will put a good face on 
your deception: who will know whether this is the truth or a lie?” 

When Mahuy heard his words he said, “Wonderful! You are a true vizier, 
there is none better!” He summoned the commanders of his army and spoke to 
them as his vizier had suggested. They knew that what he said was untrue, and 
that he deserved to have his head cut off for his impudence. One of the 


champions there said, “This is your business, whether what you say is true or 
not.” Mahuy sat on the royal throne and became ruler of Khorasan by this ruse. 
He gave grants of land to the nobility, and said, “By virtue of this seal ring I am 
the world’s king.” He distributed the world’s lands while the stars looked on in 
astonishment: he gave his elder son Balkh and Herat, and sent armies out in 
every direction. He promoted evil men, as might be expected of a scoundrel of 
his character, making criminals governors everywhere, and wise men had to bow 
their heads and obey them. On all sides, truth was humiliated and lies flourished. 
When this wretch had gathered together a large enough army and collected 
sufficient wealth, his heart rejoiced; he gave cash to his troops and planned to 
fight against Bizhan. He sent soldiers, under the command of an experienced 
warrior named Garsetun, as an advance guard to Amui. His troops marched on 
Bokhara and he said, “I must take Samargand and Chach by the authority of this 
seal ring and crown, and by the command of Yazdegerd, the world’s king, the 
lord of the seven spheres. I shall be revenged upon Bizhan, since it is he who has 
brought misfortune on Iran.” 


Bizhan Fights Against Mahuy and Kills Him 

News reached Bizhan that Mahuy had seized the imperial throne, sent orders far 
and wide sealed with the royal insignia, and subdued the countryside. Now he 
was heading toward the Oxus with an army eager for battle. Bizhan took his 
head in his hands at this turn of events, and then he summoned his troops to 
prepare for war. Information came that Mahuy’s army had taken Samargand; 
they were crossing the Oxus in boats, and the dust sent up by their troops hid the 
sun. Bizhan led his men out and prepared for battle; when Mahuy saw his 
opponent’s ranks, their armor, helmets, and golden shields, their lances and 
maces and Chachi axes, his soul seemed to desert his body. Sick at heart, he 
drew up his troops; the air was obscured with dust, and the earth was invisible 
beneath the mass of combatants. 

When battle was joined Bizhan planned to close in on Mahuy, but Mahuy 
realized this and, wailing in fear, he fled from the center of his army. Bizhan 
ordered his ally Barsam to lead men to the flank to cut him off. He said, “Mahuy 
is afraid of battle. Don’t take your eyes off him, he mustn’t be allowed to get 
back to the Oxus.” Barsam watched Mahuy’s banner; frowning and cursing, he 
led his men in pursuit of him as far as the sands of the River Farab. There he 
caught up with the fugitive and urged his horse forward. When they were face to 
face, instead of striking at him with his sword, Barsam reached out and caught 


Mahuy by the belt, and threw him easily to the ground. Then he dismounted, tied 
Mahuy’s arms, and flung him on his own horse in front of the saddle. His 
companions arrived at this moment, and the whole plain was filled with talk of 
his exploit. They told him, “Don’t bother taking him prisoner; you should cut his 
head off with an axe.” Barsam answered, “This is not the way to act, because 
Bizhan doesn’t know I’ve captured him.” 

Immediately Bizhan was informed that this vile slave, this ambitious traitor, 
the regicide Mahuy had been taken prisoner. Overjoyed to hear this, he exulted 
in his victory and banished care from his mind. A canopy was set up on the soft 
sand, and Mahuy was quickly brought there. When this sinner saw Bizhan, good 
sense deserted him; he became senseless with fear and began to scatter sand over 
his head. Bizhan addressed him, “You low-born wretch, may no subject ever 
again act as you have done! Why did you kill our just king, the lord of victory 
and the throne? From father to son he inherited kingship and was a king himself, 
the living emblem of Nushin-Ravan.” Mahuy said, “From an evil person you 
should expect nothing but murder and sedition. Cut off my head for the wicked 
deed I’ve done, and fling it before this assembly.” He was afraid that he would 
be flayed alive, and that his body would be dragged along, weltering in its blood. 

Bizhan knew his secret terror, and he paused a while before answering. Then 
he said, “I want to cleanse my heart of hatred for you. With this chivalry of 
yours, this knowledge and understanding and character, you coveted the crown 
and throne.” He cut off Mahuy’s hands with his sword and said, “These hands 
have no equal in crime.” Then he cut off his feet so that he couldn’t move from 
the spot. Finally, he gave orders that Mahuy’s ears and nose be cut off, and that 
he be sat on a horse, and left wandering the hot sands till he died of shame. He 
had a herald go about the camp and announce at each tent, “May those slaves 
who would kill their king think better of their foolishness; may those who 
wouldn’t give their lives for the king be as Mahuy is, and may they never know 
glory!” Mahuy had three sons with his army, each with his own crown and 
throne. There and then a fire was lit, and the father and his three sons were 
bumed in it. None of his family survived, or if they did, anyone who met them 
drove them away; may the nobility curse this family forever, and hate them for 
their murder of the king. 

After this came the era of Omar, and when he brought the new faith, the 
pulpit replaced the throne. 


After sixty-five years had passed over my head, I toiled ever more diligently and 
with greater difficulty at my task. I searched out the history of the kings, but my 
star was a laggard one. Nobles and great men wrote down what I had written 
without paying me: I watched them from a distance, as if I were a hired servant 
of theirs. I had nothing from them but their congratulations; my gall bladder was 
ready to burst with their congratulations! Their purses of hoarded coins remained 
closed, and my bright heart grew weary at their stinginess. But of the renowned 
men of my district, Ali Daylami helped me, and that honorable man Hosayn 
Qotayb never asked for my works for nothing. I received food and clothing, 
silver and gold from him, and it was he who gave me the will to continue. I 
never had to worry about paying taxes and was able to wrap myself in my quilt 
in comfort, and when I reached the age of seventy-one, the heavens humbled 
themselves before my verses. Now I have brought the story of Yazdegerd to an 
end, in the month of Sepandormoz, on the day of Ard, and four hundred years 
have passed since the Hejira of the Prophet. 


I’ve reached the end of this great history 

And all the land will fill with talk of me: 

I shall not die, these seeds I’ve sown will save 
My name and reputation from the grave, 

And men of sense and wisdom will proclaim, 
When I have gone, my praises and my fame. 
